214936
Boerboel
The Boerboel is a large, mastiff dog breed from Africa, bred for the purpose of guarding the homestead. These dogs were often a first line of defense against predators and were valuable in tracking and holding down wounded game. Old farmers tell many tales of the strength, agility, and courage of their Boerboels.Breed HistoryThe word Boerboel derives from boer, the Afrikaans/Dutch word for farmer. Boerboel, therefore, translates as either farmers dog or Boers dog. The Boerboel is the only South African dog breed created to defend the homestead.Despite the Boerboels long breeding history, there is great uncertainty as to how many and which breeds were used to create it. It is generally believed that the breed was created from interbreeding native African canine species and breeds with breeds brought into South Africa from Dutch, French, and British settlers. The most likely origins are claimed to date back to van Riebeecks arrival to the Cape in 1652. Van Riebeeck brought a Bullenbijter with him.(http://sabt.co.za/constitution/AppendixA.pdf) Those with him, and later European settlers, also had large, strong dogs, that almost certainly bred with the indigenous, domestic dog breeds of South Africa.((http://sabt.co.za/press/BoerboelAE.pdf Know the Boerboel, sabt.co.za)Later, in 1928, the diamond mining company Beers imported Bullmastiffs to South Africa to guard the mines. This breed was also crossbred with Boerboels in the region.(Boerboels TodayToday, Boerboel breeding is both a hobby and an industry in South Africa. These dogs are now exported from South Africa to other parts of the world.In 2010, the Boerboel was listed as a fighting dog and outlawed in Denmark.()The protective character of the Boerboel is still evident and is much sought after, as is the calm, stable, and confident composure of the breed. The dogs are obedient and intelligent and have strong territorial instincts. The Boerboel remains the guarding breed of choice amongst current day farmers and is very popular for the same reason in urban communities.(http://www.boerboelinternational.eu/viewpage.php?page_id5 Preamble of Official Breed Standard of Boerboel International, Boerboel International Breed Standard)The name boerboel is commonly misspelled as boerbul, boerbull, and borbull.(http://www.dogresources.com/boerboel/ This South African Boerboel site is intended to be your resource to everything Boerboel-related on the internet. The Boerboel is a rare breed, it is not recognized by the AKC or the CKC and finding quality information can be difficult. If youre looking for Boerboel puppies, studs, breeders, message boards, books, kennels, health information, shows, registries, or anything else Boerboel, youll find it here!, South African Boerboel Directory and South African Boerboel Breeders)DescriptionAppearancethumb|right|The Boerboels distinctive facial characteristics.The Boerboel is a large, heavy mastiff breed.  The height ranges from 60 to 70 cm (23 to 27 in) when fully grown (24 months), and the weight of an adult varies between 50 to 80 kg (110 to 175 lbs).  For comparison purposes, a Boerboel is generally heavier than a Rottweiler or a Doberman, although the same weight, but not as tall as a Dane.(http://www.boerboels.co.uk/faq.htm)CoatThe Boerboel is an average shedder and an easy to groom. The occasional brushing and a monthly bath and nail trim is all that is needed. The breed has an outer coat that is normally coarse and straight, and an undercoat that is soft and dense.(http://www.dog-names.org.uk/boerboel.htm Boerboel Dog & Puppies, Boerboel - Dog of the Boers)Its coat is short, dense, smooth, soft, and shiny. Their coat color can be various shades of red, brown, black, or fawn. Many dogs have a black mask around their mouth that sometimes extends to their eyes and ears. The coat patterns that Boerboels can have are piebald, brindle, and Irish markings.TemperamentBoerboels are an intelligent and energetic breed.( If not provided with adequate stimulation, they will invent or discover ways to entertain themselves - ways that are often considered destructive by their owners. They are loyal and can be extremely protective of their family and territory. training is strongly recommended as they are a powerful and headstrong breed. Owners must socialize their boerboels when they are young by exposing them to unfamiliar adults, children, and animals, and to new situations.((http://www.sabt.co.za/press/20090310BBbuy.pdf Buying a Boerboel, sabt.co.za, March 10, 2009)Prospective owners must recognize that owning a boerboel requires a significant commitment in time and energy as they must be well-trained and socialized in order to be happy members of the family.(Boerboels are sensitive to their environment and their owners moods - they cry and laugh right alongside you. They are quite charming when not being lazy, and will not hesitate to defend you to the death.(This dog is the most protective dog breed that is not aggressive. The potential for aggression if not properly trained and socialized, combined with their intelligence, protective instincts, large size, physical strength, and sheer stubbornness, make the boerboel breed unsuitable for first-time or inexperienced dog owners. Boerboels require human companionship and structure. Owners must be able to control their dogs, through physical strength and social dominance, to prevent the breeds natural protectiveness from becoming aggression.(Three dogs attack teen boy in Russia biting his feet off)(Two Children Seriously Injured in Dog Attacks)HealthBoerboels are generally known for their good health.  However, Boerboels can suffer from hip (http://www.sabt.co.za/press/20070604_HD_grading.pdf New Hip Dysplasia Grading System, sabt.co.za, June 3, 2007) or dysplasia, vaginal hyperplasia,(http://www.sabt.co.za/press/20070712_VHE.pdf Vaginal hyperplasia, sabt.co.za, July 12, 2007) ectropion, and entropion.(http://www.ukbc.co.uk/breeddescription.html Breed Description)( Recently, juvenile epilepsy (with attacks brought on by metabolic changes or stress) has appeared in the boerboel breed.(http://babelfish.yahoo.com/translate_url?doitdone&tturl&intl1&frbf-home&trurlhttp%3A%2F%2Fwww.boerboelinternational.eu%2Farticles.php%3Farticle_id%3D9&lpnl_en Epileptic research, Dr Quirine Stassen, veterinary surgeon, research worker, internal medicine - neurology.university clinic for household pets) The average life expectancy is 10 years.Space and ExerciseIf you are considering adding a boerboel to your family or already own a boerboel and are thinking of moving (to a smaller home), remember this - bored boerboels are destructive boerboels and a 150 lbs, lion-fighting dog can do a lot of damage. Although more suitable for large yards, Boerboels are adaptable and can live in small environments as long as they receive regular exercise and a lot of attention. Whatever the amount of space available, they need to have plenty of physical and mental exercise.( The Boerboel can be exercised in a large yard with enough space to run and play, but at a minimum this type of dog needs to be taken on a long walk every day.Breeding & RegistrationOrganizationsIn 1990, when the Boerboel breed was in danger of becoming extinct, a group of fanciers, the South African Boerboel Breeders Association (SABT), started looking for eligible South African dogs to use as a breeding base.( Of the hundreds of dogs found, 72 were evaluated and registered. A development register was also maintained for several years to widen the pool.The Union of South Africa (KUSA), which is the FCI recognized South African authority on breed standards and pedigrees has recognized the Boerboel and given it full breed status. Although the SABT was the first breed organization founded for the Boerboel, many other Boerboel breed-specific organizations now exist. The Boerboel is not a breed recognized by the UKC or Kennel Club.Boerboels may be registered at birth with one or more breeders associations. Here are a few: the South African Boerboel Breeders Association (SABT), International (BI), World Wide Boerboels (WWB), the Elite Boerboel Breeders Association of Southern Africa (EBBASA), or the Kennel Union of South Africa (KUSA). In order to be registered, a Boerboel must have its birth recorded as having been bred from registered parents and/or must pass an appraisal by a qualified assessor.(http://www.worldwideboerboel.com/id3.html WorldWide Boerboel - Registration - All Boerboels must be Assessed by a WWB Assessor (in person or by Video) in order to be registered., WorldWideBoerboel.com)(http://www.sabt.co.za/press/20070628_Appraisal_and_registration.pdf Many potential owners do not know that SABBA will register a Boerboel only after it has been appraised on individual merit, and not pedigree. The more comprehensive appraisal control sheet, read in conjunction with the terminology sketch, will also help owners understand the appraisal process and pre-assess the qualities of their dogs. SABBA hosts appraisal days in South Africa, as well as in the USA and Europe throughout the year., South African Boerboel Breeders Association (SABBA))(http://www.sabt.co.za/constitution/AppendixI.pdf Main Division: Color, General Appearance, Head, Face, Neck, Forequarter, Center, Hindquarter, Skin/coat, Health, Temperament, Movement; Sub-Division: ... ; Characteristics 1, 2, 3 ; Deviations; Value; Total; Percentage, sabt.co.za - Appraisal Chart)Breed StandardLike other dog breeds, the boerboel has a standard. Unfortunately, the exact specifications of the boerboels breed standard vary depending on the registry.( There are, however, several features that are undisputed.(http://www.boerboelinternational.eu/news.php Boerboel International is an internationally representative association of breeders, members and owners of one of the most spectacular breeds to have ever emerged out of South Africa., boerboelinternational.eu)(http://www.worldwideboerboel.com/id10.html WorldWide Boerboel (WWB) is a USA based, International Boerboel Association & Registry.  WWB was formed with the intent of providing a welcomed and much needed alternative for Boerboel lovers everywhere, especially in the USA.  ... is committed to providing worldclass service, communication, and guidance to its members, while striving to improve and promote the Boerboel with responsible and ethical policies & practices., WorldWideBoerboel.com)Type, conformation, functional efficiency and mentality are equally important in the evaluation of the Boerboel as a whole. The aim with the Breed Standard is to provide clear guidelines for breeders and judges to promote a singular vision of the ideal Boerboel. (The Boerboel is a large dog with well-developed and well-defined musculature. The profile of his head and body is blocky. His movement is naturally powerful and graceful, despite his size. His grace and confidence create a majestic impression.( He must not exhibit any fearful, shy, overly-submissive, threatening, or aggressive behaviors, but needs to be obedient and responsive to his handler. Females are noticeably smaller and less-muscled, but should still exhibit musculature and give the impression of strength and confidence. (See dimorphism)The head is impressive and a distinctive feature of the breed. Any eye color other than brown is considered a minor fault, except blue which is a major (disqualifying) fault. Their expression should always be confident, intelligent, or alert (or a combination, thereof).The body is blocky, muscular, and solid. The chest is broad and deep with well-developed muscles. The back, broad and straight. All joints must appear sound (sturdy and well-attached to the body), and must actually be so when the dog is physically examined.( All parts of the body should meet and connect smoothly and each area should flow naturally into the next (ex. head to neck to chest). There should be profuse pigmentation on the skin (and surrounding hair) of : the lips, palate, eyes, nose, paw pads, toenails, anus, and genitals. Only the black, eumelanin pigmentation is acceptable. It is only acceptable for a dog to possess more than a small amount of pink or salmon-colored skin, if the dog also has white marks, especially on the head.The legs are strong-boned, sturdy, and muscular. The paws must have curved, black nails and tough, black pads. There should be hair between the toes. The legs, paws, metatarsus, stifles, and hocks should point straight up (Leg,Paw,Meta.), straight forward (stif.), and straight backward (hock).The tail should be thick, hairy, and proud. If the tail is docked, it must be at the 3rd or 4th caudal vertebra.The ideal height of a male boerboel is 66 cm (26.5 in), and a female is 61 cm (24.5 in). Males shorter than 60 cm (24 in), and females shorter than 55 cm (22 in) may not compete. Height is measured at the withers.In the show ring, the Boerboel should appear confident and fearless. It should be easily controlled by the handler, however protective behavior of its handler directed towards judges is permitted. Some automatic disqualifications are severe underbite or overbite, blue eyes, excessive amounts of pink skin, overly aggressive behavior, small head, insufficient musculature, abnormal and/or testicles, asymmetric form, too short, a weak, unsound, clumsy, or plodding gait, any obvious physical or behavioral abnormality, and any trait that jeopardize the physical functionality of the dog or would severely hinder or prevent the dog from guarding and protecting.How to StartFor the average boerboel owner thinking of competitively showing his dogs or wanting to breed dogs that conform to the breeds standard, it is important to remember that most professional breeders only sell their pet-quality puppies and either keep their show/breeding-quality puppies for themselves or sell them at a higher price (usually to other breeders). Determined, owners should consult the dogs original breeder, if possible. Other resources are local boerboel breed-specific, molosser-specific, or mastiff-specific breeders and groups. Many breed-specific rescue groups leave their contact information with local shelters and veterinarian offices. Also, keep in mind that the average house pet will not contain enough mass (and perhaps too much fat) for dog show breed standard without an exercise routine.See also* molosser* dog* dog show* Breed Standard Faults* breeding* defects* standard* Union of South Africa* International* Cynologique Internationale* Animal Socialization* training* History of South Africa - Colonization (1652-1815)ReferencesExternal links* World Wide Boerboels* Boerboel International* Boerboels UK* The UK Boerboel Club* SABBA USA* SABBA/SABT* Kennel Union of South Africade:Boerboeles:Boerboelfr:Boerboelhu:Boerboelnl:Boerboelja:no:Boerboelpnb:pl:Boerboelpt:Boerboelru:fi:Boerboelsv:Boerboel
216788
South_Shropshire
South Shropshire was, between 1974 and 2009, a local government district in south west Shropshire, England. South Shropshire was the most rural district of one of the UKs most rural counties, the population of the district was 40,410 in 2001(Census 2001) spread out over 1,027 km of forest, mountains, moorlands, hills and mixed quality farmland. It bordered the unitary authority of Powys in Wales, which it closely resembles, economically, socially, culturally and historically. 65% of the district is part of the Shropshire Hills Area of Outstanding Natural Beauty. Only the towns of Ludlow and Stretton have populations in excess of 3000. Other towns formerly in the district were Clun, Castle, Mortimer and Arms.The district was formed by the merger of the districts of Clun and Bishops Castle and Ludlow in 1974, under the Government Act 1972.(HMSO. S.I. 1972/2039)The district and its council were abolished on 1 April 2009 when the new Shropshire authority was established, as part of the structural changes to local government in England.Economics and DemographicsEconomically the district was largely dependent on tourism, partly due to the decline in the economic significance of farming and also the decline and subsequent end of local lead and mining industry.  In addition to tourism, some industry did exist in the district, in the Stretton and Ludlow areas, and in Burford, near Tenbury Wells.Some statistics for the local area suggest that wages are low, but also that the rate of unemployment is below average.Additionally, the local demographics show a large economic gap between affluent residents and poorer communities.  Many of the affluent residents have moved into the area from other places, such as East England on their retirement. This continues an older trend whose root was initially in the imbalance of wealth associated with the farming economy previously prevalent in the area.GeographyImage:ShropshireHillsAONBMap.jpg|190px|right|thumb|The AONB is highlighted in Green.The District of South Shropshire covered an area of 1,028 square kilometres, or , which was roughly one third of the administrative county of Shropshire as of 2008.South Shropshire is a land of mountains, valleys, hills, moors, forests and low grade farmland. The landscape is often rugged, with crags and rock outcrops very common, especially in the west and around the Hills, and was for the most part gouged by glaciers during the age. It contains a myriad of rock types, and is widely regarded as the geological capital of the UK, with Edge being especially highly regarded by geologists.See the Hills AONB (Area of Outstanding Natural Beauty) for more about the natural geography of the area.HistorySouth Shropshire is littered with ancient monuments, with Fold on the Welsh border being the most notable, and there is evidence of Neolithic quarrying in the Apedale.The area seems to have been settled by the Ordovices, an Age tribe of people in the last millennium BC, and was a stronghold of the Celtic chieftain Caractacus (Caradoc is said to be named after him).The area was probably part of the Military division of the Roman occupation and locals claim that the Romans mined lead in the north west of the district.In the Early Middle Ages, the area was a battleground between the Welsh and the Saxon Kingdom of Mercia and Dyke, which is partially in the district, is a permanent reminder of the areas border status.In the Ages, South Shropshire was part of the Marches, a lawless area ruled by tyrannical feudal lords, who as Lords had de facto independence from the King of England.It has been remarked that the attitude of the time lives on in the areas mistrust of outside control.During the Civil War the area was generally spared from fighting, although there was a small massacre at Castle.During the Revolution, coal was mined around Hill and lead was mined near the border with Wales, e.g. at Snailbeach. Church Stretton was a centre of textile manufacture and Ludlow thrived on the malting trade, while the rest of the area was populated by smallholders. The economy of the area was fragile, and most industry in the area had collapsed by 1900.PoliticsThe last South Shropshire District Council was controlled by the Conservative Party, with the second largest party being the Liberal Democrats.  A number of independent politicians also held seats in the council.  The Labour Party had not contested recent elections within the district.Results of the elections to South Shropshire District Council, 1 May 2003Party SeatsLiberal Democrat and Progressive  11Conservative  18Independent  4Green  1Total  34*Senior Councillors**Council leader: Cecilia Mottley, C,**Deputy leader: ?Energy policyIn May 2006, a report commissioned by British Gas http://www.britishgasnews.co.uk/managed_content/files/pdf/greenCity.pdf showed that housing in South Shropshire produced the 13th highest average carbon emissions in the country at 7,156 kg of dioxide per dwelling.Various StatisticsReferences(ShropshireShropshireShropshireShropshireShropshireShropshire
218076
Keweenaw_Peninsula
right|thumb|250px|Keweenaw Peninsula.The Keweenaw Peninsula ( ) is the northern-most part of Michigans Upper Peninsula. It projects into Superior and was the site of the first copper boom in the States. As of the 2000 census, its population was roughly 43,200. Its major industries are now logging and tourism, as well as jobs related to Technological University and University.NaturalImage:Keweenaw structure.jpg|thumb|350px|right|Cross-section of the Lake Superior basin showing the tilted strata of volcanic rock that form both the Keweenaw Peninsula and RoyaleThe ancient flows of the Keweenaw Peninsula were produced during the Mesoproterozoic Era as a part of the Rift.  This volcanic activity produced the only strata on Earth where large scale economically recoverable 97 percent pure copper is found. Much of the native copper found in the Keweenaw comes in either the form of cavity fillings on lava flow surfaces which has a lacy consistency, or as float copper, which is found as a solid mass.  Copper ore may occur within conglomerate or breccia as void or interclast fillings. The conglomerate layers occur as interbedded units within the volcanic pile.( Huber, N. King (1973) The Portage Lake Volcanics (Middle Keweenawan) on Isle Royale, Michigan, Geological Survey Professional Paper 754C) The Keweenaw Peninsula and Royale, formed by the Midcontinent Rift System, are the only sites in the country with evidence of prehistoric aboriginal mining of copper.  Artifacts made from this copper by these ancient Indians were traded as far south as present day Alabama.(Public Law 102-543 (Oct. 27, 1992); 106 STAT. 3569) These areas are also the unique location where Chlorastrolite, the state gem of Michigan, can be found.right|thumb|250px|Copper Island.The northern end of the peninsula is sometimes referred to as Island (or Kuparisaari by the Finnish immigrants), although this term is becoming less common.( )(An Interior Ellis Island: Ethnic Diversity and the Peopling of Michigans Copper Country, Keweenaw Ethnic Groups -- The Finns.  MTU Archives and Copper Country Historical Collection, J. Robert Van Pelt Library, Technological University.)  It is separated from the rest of the peninsula by the Waterway, a natural waterway which was dredged and expanded in the 1860s(Exploring the North page on Houghton) across the peninsula between the cities of Houghton (named for Houghton) on the south side and Hancock on the north.A Keweenaw Water Trail has been established around Copper Island.  The Water Trail stretches approximately 125 miles (200 km) and can be paddled in five to ten days, depending on weather and water conditions.The Keweenaw Fault runs fairly lengthwise through both Keweenaw and neighboring Houghton counties. This ancient geological slip has given rise to cliffs along US 41 and Brockway Mountain Drive north of Calumet.Climatethumb|right|200px|Keweenaw Snow-mometer north of Mohawk, MI on US-41. The peninsula receives copious amounts of snow from Lake Superior. Official records are maintained close to the base of the peninsula in Michigan, where the annual snowfall average is about 220 inches. Farther north, in a community called Delaware an unofficial average of about 240 inches is maintained. At Delaware, the record snowfall for one season was 390 inches, set in 1979. Averages over 250 inches certainly occur in the higher elevations closer to the tip of the peninsula.HistoryBeginning as early as seven thousand years ago and apparently peaking around 3000 B.C., native Americans dug copper from the southern shore of Lake Superior.  This development was possible in large part because, in this region, large deposits of copper were easily accessible in surface rock and from shallow diggings.  Native copper could be found as large nuggets and wiry masses. Copper as a resource for functional tooling achieved popularity around 3000 B.C., during the Middle Archaic Stage. The focus of copper working seems to have gradually shifted from functional tools to ornamental objects by the Late Archaic Stage c. 1200 B.C.   Native Americans would build a fire to heat the rock around and over a copper mass and, after heating, pour on cold water to crack the rock. The copper was then pounded out, using rock hammers and stone chisels.( The State of Our Knowledge About Ancient Copper Mining in Michigan, The Michigan Archaeologist 41(2-3):119-138. 1995 Susan R. Martin)The Keweenaws rich deposits of copper (and some silver) were extracted on an industrial scale beginning around the middle of the 19th century. The industry grew through the latter part of the century and employed thousands of people well into the 20th century. Hard rock mining in the region ceased in 1967 though copper sulfide deposits continued for some time after in Ontonogan. This vigorous industry created a need for educated mining professionals and directly led in 1885 to the founding of the Michigan Mining School (now Technological University) in Houghton. Although MTU discontinued its undergraduate mining engineering program in 2006, the university continues to offer engineering degrees in a variety of other disciplines.Running concurrently with the mining boom in the Keweenaw was the white pine lumber boom. Trees were cut for timbers for mine shafts, to heat the communities around the large copper mines, and to help build a growing nation. Much of the logging at the time was done in winter due to the ease of operability with the snow. Due to the indiscriminant logging practices at that time, the forest of the Keweenaw looks much different today than 100 years ago.US 41 terminates in the northern Keweenaw at the Michigan State Park housing Fort Wilkins. US 41 was the so-called Military Trail that started in Chicago in the 1900s and ended in the Keweenaw wilderness. The restored fort has numerous exhibits.For detailed information on the regions mineralogical history, see the virtual tour of the peninsula written by the Mineralogical Society of America, found in External links on this page. Information on the geological formations of the region are also detailed. From 1964-1971, the of Michigan cooperated with NASA and the Navy to run the Keweenaw Rocket launch site.CommunitiesA partial list of towns in the Keweenaw Peninsula:* Ahmeek* Atlantic Mine* Grise* Calumet* Chassell* Copper Harbor* Delaware* Dodgeville* Dollar Bay* Dreamland* Eagle Harbor* Eagle River* Freda* Gay* Hancock* Houghton* Hubbell* Hurontown* Lac La Belle* Lake Linden* Medora, Michigan* Laurium* Little Betsy* Mandan* Mason* Mohawk* Osceola* Painesdale* Pelkie* Phoenix* Quincy* Redridge* Ripley* South Range* Tapiola* Toivola* Wyoming (Helltown)See also* National Historical Park* mining in Michigan* ThimbleberryReferencesFurther reading*.*, focuses on three companies, Calumet & Hecla, Copper Range, and Quincy, in a study of native copper mining and copper-sulfide mining on Upper Michigans Keweenaw Peninsula.*.;Primary sources*.External links*Keweenaw Convention & Visitors Bureau*Keweenaw Peninsula Chamber of Commerce*Home of Pasty Central*Keweenaw Rocket Site*Keweenaw Rocket Site history*Copper Country Explorer*Keweenaw Free GuidePeninsulade Keweenawdi Keweenawde Keweenaw
219935
AAC_(disambiguation)
AAC refers to Audio Coding, an audio compression format successor to the MP3 format.AAC may also refer to:Aviation* AAC, IATA airport code for Arish International Airport, Egypt* Advanced Aircraft Corporation, an aircraft manufacturer based in Carlsbad, California* Aviation Corporation, an aircraft manufacturer based in Cleveland, Ohio* Air Command, a radar network* Aeronautical Corporation, an aircraft designer and manufacturer* Airplanes of Canada, a developer and marketer of light amphibious aircraft based in Squamish, British Columbia*Aeronutica Civil de Panam :  Civil Aviation Authority of Panama,  is the agency of the Panamenian government with Authority to regulate and oversee all aspects of civil aviation in PanamaEducation and communication* Associao Acadmica de Coimbra, the students union of the University of Coimbra* Academy of Cincinnati, a private college of art and design in Cincinnati, Ohio* and alternative communication, an area of research, clinical, and educational practiceMilitary* Armament Corporation, a silencer manufacturer* aircraft carrier, an aircraft which can launch other aircraft* Air Corps (United Kingdom), a component of the British Army* Apprentices College, a college that offered military training, education and common core skills* Army Cadets, a youth organisation that is involved with progressive training of youths in military and adventurous activitiesSports* Airlines Center, an arena in Dallas, Texas* Alpine Club, an organization devoted to various aspects of climbing* Athletic Conference (NAIA), an athletic conference sanctioned by the NAIA* Athletic Conference (NCHSAA), a North Carolina High School Athletic Conference* Acadmica de Coimbra - O.A.F., a football organization based in Coimbra, Portugal* of Alabama Camps, an association for Alabama camps and their attendees* Athletic Club, a private athletic club in Duluth, Georgia* Alpine Classic, a tough 200 km bicycle event in Victoria, Australia* Amateur Championship, an amateur golf tournament.Other fields* autoclaved concrete, a lightweight, precast building material* Affirming Anglican Catholicism, a movement operating in several provinces of the Anglican Communion in North America* Association of Canada, a dog organization* arc cutting, a gouging process for metals* Arts Council, the Alameda City arts council serving the arts in the Alameda area* Anglican Council, a conservative organization within the Episcopal Church in the United States* Antibiotic associated colitis, a complication of therapy with clindamycin or ampicillin* Agents and Chemotherapy, an academic journal published by the American Society for Microbiology* language (ISO 639-3 language code)* Astronomy Club, an organization composed mostly of amateur astronomers in the greater Atlanta metropolitan area.* Agricultural Company, a company which serves to improve beef cattle production through responsible natural resource and land use* Aluminium Council, an industry association representing Australian bauxite mining companies and aluminium smelters.* Avio Costruzioni 815, the first Ferrari car that was fully designed and built by Enzo Ferrari* Air Control - Air Conditioning Auxiliary Air Control - Idle Air Control Valve is a part of Automobile.ca:AACde:AACes:AACeo:AACfa:AACfr:AAC()it:AAC()no:AAC(ujednoznacznienie)pt:AACsv:AAC
222193
Patrick_Herron
Patrick Herron (b. 1971, New Jersey) is an American poet, electronic musician (as Blindfolder), and innovation dynamics research analyst at University. He is the creator of proximate.org and founder of the annual Carrboro International Poetry Festival.   Publications * (as Lester) Be Somebody* Text Mining for Genomics-based Drug Discovery* The American Godwar Complex* Man Eating Rice* Three poems in Exquisite CorpseExternal links* Biographical info* Blindfolder in Pitchfork
223141
Marcus_Daly
Marcus Daly redirects here, see also Daly (politics)__NOTOC__death_placeYork City, StatesMarcus Daly (December 5, 1841  November 12, 1900) was an Irish-born American businessman known as one of the three Kings of Montana, States.() Early lifeDaly emigrated from County Cavan Ireland to the States at the age of fifteen, arriving in York City. CareerDaly founded his fortune on the Anaconda Copper Mine in Montana, which he bought with money from various backers, including Hearst (father of Randolph Hearst) in 1880.  The Anaconda began as a silver mine, but copper was discovered there and found to be one of the largest deposits known at the time. He built a smelter to handle the ore, and by 1895 had become a millionaire and owner of the Anaconda Copper Mining (ACM) Company. Daly was active in Montana politics throughout the 1890s and also founded the town of Anaconda, near his smelter.  In 1894 Daly spearheaded an energetic but unsuccessful campaign to have Anaconda designated as Montanas state capital. Another note in politics was his competition with fellow copper king, William A. Clark. He tried to keep him out of office by lavishly supporting Clarks opponents.()Thoroughbred horse racingMarcus Daly invested some of his money in breeding at his Bitterroot Stock Farm located near Montana, and was the owner/breeder of Scottish Chieftain, the only horse bred in Montana to ever win the Stakes (1897).In 1891, Daly became the owner of Tammany, said to be one of the worlds fastest racehorses in 1893. He owned and stood Inverness, sire of Scottish Chieftain, as well as Hamburg, Ogden, and Pepper. He also arranged the breeding of the great Sysonby, ranked number 30 in the top 100 U.S. thoroughbred champions of the 20th Century by magazine. Daly died before the horse was born.Following his death, on January 31, 1901 a dispersal sale was held at New Yorks Square Garden for the Bitterroot Stud Thoroughbreds.(January 31, 1901 New York Times article on the Bitter Root dispersal sale) LegacyDalys legacy was a mixed one for Anaconda.  From 1885 to 1980, the smelter was one of the towns largest employers and provided well-paid jobs for generations.  When the smelter closed in 1980, during a labor strike, 25% of the towns workforce was put out of work and the town has not recovered.  The smelter itself was torn down as part of environmental cleanup efforts in the 1990s, although the smokestack is still visible above the town.Dalys legacy was equally mixed for Butte, Montana.  The Anaconda Company was bought out by the Amalgamated Copper Company in 1899, and by the 1920s controlled mining in the city.  It continued to be one of the states largest employers and a mainstay of the state and local economies until the 1970s.  In the 1950s, the ACM began open-pit mining in Butte, creating a steadily growing pit east of the main business district.  In the mid-1970s, copper prices collapsed and the ACM was bought out by the Atlantic Richfield Company (Arco).  Arco ceased mining in Butte in 1982, ending what Daly had begun almost exactly 100 years before.  See Pit for the lasting impact. Resources now (2007) operates an open pit copper and molybdenum mine in Butte, and also recovers copper from the water in the Berkeley Pit.A statue of Daly stands at the main entrance to Montana Tech of the University of Montana (formerly the Montana School of Mines) at the west end of Park Street in Butte.  A drawing of Daly by the Swiss-born American artist Mller-Ury (1862-1947) was acquired in 2009 by the American National Portrait Gallery in Washington D.C.Marcus Dalys summer home and stock farm, Riverside, is located in Hamilton, Montana and is open to visitors.  See http://www.dalymansion.org for details.The Marcus Daly Memorial Hospital, located in Hamilton, Montana, was incorporated on December 18, 1929.See also*Copper Mining Company*HennessysReferences*National Mining Hall of Fame bio External links*Bio on Irish Identity website*Montana ResourcesDalyDaly
224173
Emanuel_Swedenborg
belief  Christian (born Emanuel Swedberg; January 29, 1688(January 29 according to the calendar. In the calendar, the date would be February 8) &ndash; March 29, 1772) was a Swedish scientist, philosopher, and theologian. He has been termed a mystic by some sources, including the Britannica online version, Swedenborg, Emanuel, (http://www.britannica.com/EBchecked/topic/576681/Emanuel-Swedenborg) retrieved September  9, 2011, and the Encyclopedia of Religion (1987), which starts its article with the description that he was a Swedish scientist and mystic. Others have not used the term, e.g. (http://www.encyclopedia.com/article-1G2-3424503013/swedenborg-emanuel.html)  He termed himself Servant of the Lord Jesus Christ in True Christian Religion, (http://swedenborgdigitallibrary.org/contets/tcrtc.html ) one of his published works.(http://swedenborgdigitallibrary.org/contets/books.html)Swedenborg had a prolific career as an inventor and scientist. In 1741 at the age of fifty-three he entered into a spiritual phase() in which he eventually began to experience dreams and visions beginning on Easter weekend April 6, 1744. This culminated in a spiritual awakening, whereupon he claimed he was appointed by the Lord to write a heavenly doctrine to reform Christianity. He claimed that the Lord had opened his spiritual eyes, so that from then on he could freely visit heaven and hell, and talk with angels, demons and other spirits.He said that the Judgement had already occurred, in 1757, though only visible in the spiritual world, where he had witnessed it.(http://www.swedenborgdigitallibrary.org/contets/LJ.html Swedenborg, E. The Last Judgment and Babylon Destroyed. All the Predictions in the Apocalypse are at This Day Fulfilled. (Swedenborg Foundation 1952, Paragraphs 1-74)) That Judgement was followed by the Coming of Christ, which occurred, not by Christ in person, but by a revelation from Him through the inner, spiritual sense of the Word(Swedenborg, E. The True Christian Religion: Containing the Universal Theology of The New Church Foretold by the Lord in Daniel 7; 13, 14; and in Revelation 21;1,2 (Swedenborg Foundation 1952, paragraphs 193-215)) to Swedenborg.(True Christian Religion, paragraphs 753-786) In fact, Swedenborg said, it is the presence of that spiritual sense that makes the Word Divine.(True Christian Religion, paragraph 200)For the remaining 28 years of his life, he wrote and published 18 theological works, of which the best known was Heaven and Hell (1758),(Swedenborg, E. Heaven and its Wonders and Hell. From Things Heard and Seen (Swedenborg Foundation, 1946)) (Bergquist, Preface (p. 1516)) and several unpublished theological works. Some followers of Swedenborg believe that, of his theological works, only those which  Swedenborg published himself are fully Divinely inspired.(See Which of Swedenborgs books are Divine revelation?)In Life on Other Planets, Swedenborg stated that he conversed with spirits from Jupiter, Mars, Mercury, Saturn, Venus, and the moon.(Emanuel Swedenborg, Life on Other Planets. Translator: John Chadwick. Foreword By: Raymond Moody, ISBN 0-87785-320-7.) He did not report conversing with spirits from Uranus and Neptune, however, which were not discovered yet. This lack is seen by some to raise question about the credibility of all his reports on this matter.  This issue has been extensively reviewed elsewhere.(Simons K. The Life on Other Planets Question The Swedenborg Project 2007)Swedenborg explicitly rejected the common explanation of the Trinity as a Trinity of Persons, which he said was not taught in the early Christian Church. There was, for instance, no mention in the Apostolic writings of any Son from eternity. (The True Christian Religion #175) Instead he explained in his theological writings how the Divine Trinity exists in One Person, in One God, the Lord Christ, which he said is taught in Colossians 2:9. (See also 1 John 5:20, Matthew 28:18 and Acts 20:21) Swedenborg also rejected the doctrine of salvation through alone, since he considered both faith and charity necessary for salvation, not one without the other. The purpose of faith, according to Swedenborg, is to lead a person to a life according to the truths of faith, which is charity, as is taught in 1 Corinthians 13:13 and James 2:20.Swedenborgs theological writings have elicited a range of responses. However, he made no attempt to found a church.(Block, M.B The New Church in the New World. A Study of Swedenborgianism in America (Holt 1932; reprint Octagan 1968), Chapter 3.)(Benz, E. Emanuel Swedenborg. Visionary Savant in The Age of Reason (translated by Goodrick-Clarke (Swedenborg Foundation 2002, p. 487)) A few years after his death  15 by one estimate(Crompton, S. Emanuel Swedenborg (Chelsea House 2005, p. 76))  for the most part in England, small reading groups formed to study the truth they saw in his teachings.(Block, Chapter 3) As one scholar has noted, Swedenborgs teachings particularly appealed to the various dissenting groups that sprang up in the first half of the 19th century who  were surfeited with revivalism and narrow-mindedness and found his optimism and comprehensive explanations appealing.(Ahlstrom, S.E. A Religious History of the American People (Yale 1972, p. 483)) A variety of important cultural figures, both writers and artists, were influenced by Swedenborg, including Appleseed, Blake, Luis Borges, Burnham, Conan Doyle, (http://www.classic-literature.co.uk/scottish-authors/arthur-conan-doyle/the-history-of-spiritualism-vol-i/ebook-page-02.asp)Waldo Emerson, (http://books.google.com/books?idOndb2uKhq_YC&printsecfrontcover&sourcegbs_ge_summary_r&cad0#vonepage&q&ffalse), Flaxman, Inness, James Sr., Jung, (http://topics.nytimes.com/top/reference/timestopics/people/j/carl_gustav_jung/index.html), Kant,(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Emanuel_Swedenborg#Kant_on_Swedenborg)Keller, Miosz, Strindberg, Suzuki, and Yeats.His philosophy had a great impact on The Duke of Sodermanland, later King Carl XIII, who as the Grand master of Swedish Freemasonry (Svenska Frimurare Orden) built its unique system of degrees and wrote its rituals.In contrast, one of the most prominent Swedish authors of Swedenborgs day, Henric Kellgren, called Swedenborg nothing but a fool.(Henrik Kellgren published an often quoted satirical poem entitled Man ger ej snille fr det man r galen (You Own Not Genius For That You are Mad) in 1787. See Jonsson, Inge, Swedenborg och Linn, in Delblanc & Lnnroth (1999). (Link to the full poem, in Swedish)) A heresy trial was initiated in Sweden in 1768 against Swedenborgs writings and two men who promoted these ideas.(The trial in 1768 was again Gabrial Beyer and Johan Rosn and essentially concerned whether Swedenborgs theological writings were consistent with the Christian doctrines. A royal ordinance in 1770 declared that Swedenborgs writings were clearly mistaken and should not be taught even though his system of theological thought was never examined. Swedenborg then begged the King for grace and protection in a letter from Amsterdam. A new investigation against Swedenborg stalled and was eventually dropped in 1778. (1999), pp.453463)In the two centuries since Swedenborgs death, various interpretations of his theology have been made, and he has also been scrutinized in biographies and psychological studies.(This subject is touched on in the preface of Bergquist (1999), who mentions the biography by Martin Lamm (originally published 1917) and its focus on the similarities of Swedenborgs scientific and theological lives. He mentions an earlier biography by the Swedish physician Emil Kleen who concluded that Swedenborg was blatantly mad, suffering paranoia and hallucinations. A similar conclusion was made recently by psychiatrist John Johnson in Henry Maudsley on Swedenborgs messianic psychosis, Journal of Psychiatry 165:690691 (1994), who wrote that Swedenborg suffered hallucinations of acute schizophrenia or epileptic psychosis. For comment on Johnsons interpretation, see special issue of The New Philosophy on The Madness Hypothesis.))BiographyEarly lifeFile:Hornsgatan 43 Emanuel Swedenborg Stockholm 2005-06-17 013.jpg|thumb|181px|Memorial plaque at the former location of Emanuel Swedenborgs house at Hornsgatan on Sdermalm, Stockholm.Swedenborgs father, Swedberg (16531735), descended from a wealthy mining family. He travelled abroad and studied theology, and on returning home he was eloquent enough to impress the Swedish king, Charles XI, with his sermons in Stockholm. Through the Kings influence he would later become professor of theology at University and Bishop of Skara.( familjebok, 2nd edition (Ugglan) article Svedberg, Jesper (1918))(Encyclopeaedia Britannica, 1911 edition. article Emanuel Swedenborg)Jesper took an interest in the beliefs of the dissenting Lutheran Pietist movement, which emphasised the virtues of communion with God rather than relying on sheer faith (fide).(Svedbergs pietistic interests are described in Bergquist (1999), p.230232) Sola fide is a tenet of the Church, and Jesper was charged with being a pietist heretic. While controversial, the beliefs were to have a major impact on his son Emanuels spirituality. Jesper furthermore held the unconventional belief that angels and spirits were present in everyday life. This also came to have a strong impact on Emanuel.((Encyclopeaedia Britannica. article Emanuel Swedenborg)(Martin Lamm (1978 1915; pp.119) notes how all Swedenborg biographies at that draw similarities between the beliefs of Jesper and Emanuel. Lamm himself partially agrees with them, but he maintains that there were marked differences between them too.)Swedenborg completed his university course at Uppsala in 1709, and in 1710 made his tour through the Netherlands, France, and Germany, before reaching London, where he would spend the next four years. It was also a flourishing center of scientific ideas and discoveries. Emanuel studied physics, mechanics, and philosophy, and read and wrote poetry. According to the preface of a book by the the Swedish critic Lagerkrantz, Swedenborg wrote to his benefactor and brother-in-law Eric Benzelius that he believed he (Swedenborg) might be destined to be a great scientist.(Lagercrantz, preface.)(x)Scientific periodMachine, sketched in a notebook in 1714. The operator would sit in the middle, and paddle himself through the air.In 1715 Swedenborg returned to Sweden, where he was to devote himself to natural science and engineering projects for the next two decades. A first step was his noted meeting with King XII of Sweden in the city of Lund, in 1716. The Swedish inventor Polhem, who became a close friend of Swedenborg, was also present. Swedenborgs purpose was to persuade the king to fund an observatory in northern Sweden. However, the warlike king did not consider this project important enough, but did appoint Swedenborg assessor-extraordinary on the Board of Mines (Bergskollegium) in Stockholm.(The meeting between the King, Polhelm and Swedenborg is described in detail in Liljegren, Bengt, Karl XII i Lund : nr Sverige styrdes frn Skne, (Historiska media, Lund, 1999). ISBN 91-88930-51-3)From 1716 to 1718 Swedenborg published a scientific periodical entitled Daedalus Hyperboreus (The Northern Daedalus), a record of mechanical and mathematical inventions and discoveries. One notable description was that of a flying machine, the same he had been sketching a few years earlier (see Machine (Swedenborg)).(x)Upon the death of Charles XII, Queen Ulrika Eleonora ennobled Swedenborg and his siblings. It was common in Sweden during the 17th and 18th centuries for the children of bishops to receive this honour as a recognition of the services of their father. The family name was changed from Swedberg to Swedenborg.(Bergquist (1999), pp.114115)In 1724 he was offered the chair of mathematics at University but he declined, saying that he had mainly dealt with geometry, chemistry and metallurgy during his career. He also noted that he did not have the gift of eloquent speech because of a speech impediment. The speech impediment in question was stuttering, noted by many acquaintances of his: it forced him to speak slowly and carefully and there are no known occurrences of his speaking in public.(Berquist (1999), pp.118119) The Swedish critic Olof Lagerkrantz proposed that Swedenborg compensated for his impediment by extensive argumentation in writing.(Proposed by Lagercrantz, also mentioned by Bergquist (1999), p.119)New direction of studiesDuring the 1730s Swedenborg undertook many studies of anatomy and physiology. He had the first anticipation, as far as known, of the neuron concept(Fodstad, H. The neuron theory Stereotactic and Functional Neurosurgery 2001;77:20-4) It was not till a century later that science recognized the full significance of the nerve cell. He also had prescient ideas about the cortex, the hierarchical organization of the system, the localization of the fluid and the functions of the gland. In some cases his conclusions have been experimentally verified in modern times.(Gordh, E. et al.Swedenborg, Linnaeus and Brain Research and the Roles of Gustaf Retzius and Alfred Stroh in the Rediscovery of Swedenborgs Manuscripts. Upsala Journal of Medical Sciences 2007; 112:143-164)(Gross C.G. Emanuel Swedenborg: A neuroscientist before his time. The Neuroscientist 3: 2(1997))(Gross, C. Three before their time: neuroscientists whose ideas were ignored by their contemporaries Experimental Brain Research 192:321 2009) There is also evidence that Swedenborg may have preceded Kant by 20 years in the development of the hypothesis.(http://www.newchurchhistory.org/articles/glb2007/baker.pdf)In the 1730s Swedenborg also became increasingly interested in spiritual matters and was determined to find a theory which would explain how matter relates to spirit. Swedenborgs desire to understand the order and purpose of creation first led him to investigate the structure of matter and the process of creation itself. In the Principia he outlined his philosophical method, which incorporated experience, geometry (the means whereby the inner order of the world can be known), and the power of reason; and he presented his cosmology, which included the first presentation of his hypothesis.In Leipzig, 1735, he published a three volume work entitled Opera philosophica et mineralis (Philosophical and mineralogical works), where he tries to conjoin philosophy and metallurgy. The work was mainly appreciated for its chapters on the analysis of the smelting of iron and copper, and it was this work which gave Swedenborg international reputation.(Bergquist (1999), pp. 142155)The same year he also published the small manuscript de Infinito (On the Infinite), where he attempted to explain how the finite is related to the infinite, and how the soul is connected to the body. This was the first manuscript where he touched upon these matters. He knew that it might clash with established theologies, since he presents the view that the soul is based on material substances.(Lamm (1987), pp.4243, notes that by assuming that the soul consists of matter, as Swedenborg did, one becomes a materialist. He further notes that this was also noted by contemporaries.)(Jonsson, Inge, Swedenborg och Linn, in Delblanc & Lnnroth, p.321)He also conducted dedicated studies of the fashionable philosophers of the time Locke, von Wolff, Leibniz, and Descartes, as well as returning to earlier thinkers Plato, Aristotle, Plotinus, Augustine, and others.(Bergquist (1999), pp.165178)In 1743, at the age of 55, Swedenborg requested a leave of absence to go abroad. His purpose was to gather source material for Regnum animale (The Animal Kingdom, or Kingdom of Life), a subject on which books were not readily available in Sweden. The aim of the book was to explain the soul from an anatomical point of view. He had planned to produce a total of seventeen volumes.(Jonsson, Inge, Swedenborg och Linn, in Delblanc & Lnnroth, p.325)Journal of DreamsBy 1744 he had traveled to the Netherlands. Around this time he began having strange dreams. Swedenborg carried a travel journal with him on most of his travels, and did so on this journey. The whereabouts of the diary were long unknown, but it was discovered in the Royal Library in the 1850s and published in 1859 as Drmboken, or Journal of Dreams.He experienced many different dreams and visions, some greatly pleasurable, others highly disturbing.(Bergquist, p.200208) The experiences continued as he travelled to London to continue the publication of Regnum animale. This cathartic process continued for six months. It has been compared to the Catholic concept of Purgatory.(Bergquist (p.206) makes the comparisment to Purgatory) Analyses of the diary have concluded that what Swedenborg was recording in his Journal of Dreams was a battle between the love of his self, and the love of God.(Analysis by Bergquist, p.209. Bergquist has previously published a separate book commenting on the Journal called Swedenborgs drmbok : gldjen och det stora kvalet (Stockholm, Norstedt, 1988))Visions and spiritual insightsIn the last entry of the journal from October 2627, 1744, Swedenborg appears to be clear as to which path to follow. He felt he should drop his current project, and write a new book about the worship of God. He soon began working on De cultu et amore Dei, or The Worship and Love of God. It was never fully completed, but Swedenborg still had it published in London in June 1745.(Bergquist (1999), pp.210211)One explanation why the work was never finished is given in a well-known and often referenced story. In April 1745, Swedenborg was dining in a private room at a tavern in London. By the end of the meal, a darkness fell upon his eyes, and the room shifted character. Suddenly he saw a person sitting at a corner of the room, telling Swedenborg: Do not eat too much!. Swedenborg, scared, hurried home. Later that night, the same man appeared in his dreams. The man told Swedenborg that He was the Lord, that He had appointed Swedenborg to reveal the spiritual meaning of the Bible, and that He would guide Swedenborg in what to write. The same night, the spiritual world was opened to Swedenborg.(This account is based in Bergquist (1999), pp.227228. The story was much later told by Swedenborg to Carl Robsahm (see Robsahm, #15))Scriptural commentary and writingsIn June 1747, Swedenborg resigned his post as assessor of the board of mines. He explained that he was obliged to complete a work he had begun and requested to receive half his salary as a pension.(Bergquist (1999),pp.286287) He took up afresh his study of Hebrew and began to work on the spiritual interpretation of the Bible with the goal of interpreting the spiritual meaning of every verse. From sometime between 1746 and 1747, and for ten years henceforth, he devoted his energy to this task. Usually abbreviated as Arcana Clestia and under the Latin variant Arcana Caelestia(Cf. Michelle Grier, Swedenborg and Kant on Spiritual Intuition in On the True Philosopher: Essays on Swedenborg, ed. Stephen McNeilly (London: Swedenborg Society, 2002), p. 1. Accessed 2010-11-11) (translated as Heavenly Arcana, Heavenly Mysteries, or Secrets of Heaven depending on modern English-language editions), the book became his magnum opus and the basis of his further theological works.(Bergquist (1999), p.287)The work was anonymous and Swedenborg was not identified as the author until the late 1750s. It consisted of eight volumes, published between 1749 and 1756. It attracted little attention, as few people could penetrate its meaning.(Bergquist (1999), p.288)(Jonsson, Inge, Swedenborg och Linn, in Delblanc & Lnnroth, p.316)His life from 1747 until his death in 1772 was spent in Stockholm, Holland, and London. During these twenty five years he wrote another fourteen works of a spiritual nature of which most were published during his lifetime.One of his lesser known works presents a startling claim, that the Last Judgment had begun in the previous year (1757) and was completed by the end of that year(The Last Judgment and Babylon Destroyed. All the Predictions in the Apocalypse are At this Day Fulfilled from Things Heard and Seen. From De Ultimo Judicio Et De Babylonia Destructa,) and that he had witnessed the whole thing.(Last Judgment, #60) According to Swedenborg, the Last Judgment took place, not in the physical world, but in the World of Spirits, which is located half-way between heaven and hell, and which everyone passes through on their way to heaven or hell.(Swedenborg, E. Heaven and Its Wonders From Things Heard and Seen (Swedenborg Foundation 1946, #421-535)) The Judgment took place because the Christian church had lost its charity and faith, resulting in a loss of spiritual free will that threatened the equilibrium between heaven and hell in everyones life(Last Judgment #33-34)(For an extensive explanation of the inner spiritual sense of the book of the Apocalypse, see Swedenborg, E. The Apocalypse Revealed Wherein are Disclosed the Arcana Foretold Which Have Hitherto Remained Concealed (Swedenborg Foundation 1928).) In another of his theological works, Swedenborg wrote that eating meat, regarded in itself, is something profane, and was not practiced in the early days of the human race. (Swedenborg, E. Arcana Coelestia #1002, 1003 (Swedenborg Foundation 1956)) This teaching appears to have given rise to the idea that Swedenborg was a vegetarian. This conclusion may have been reinforced by the fact that a number of Swedenborgs early followers were part of the vegetarian movement that arose in Great Britain in the 19th century. (Twigg, J. The vegetarian movement in England, 1847-1981 A study in the structure of its ideology (University of London, 1981)) However, the only reports on Swedenborg himself are contradictory. His landlord in London, Shearsmith, said he ate no meat but his maid, who served Swedenborg,  said that he ate eels and pigeon pie. (Sigstedt, C. The Swedenborg Epic: The life and works of Emanuel Swedenborg Bookman Associates 1952, p. 476, # 642))Swedenborg published his work in London or Holland due to the freedom of the press unique to those countries.(Bergquist (1999),p.477478)(Trobridge, G. Swedenborg, Life and Teaching (Swedenborg Foundation, 1976, p. 272).)Throughout this period he was befriended by many people who regarded him as a kind and warm-hearted man. When in the company of others, he was jovial, and conversed about whatever subject was discussed. Those who talked with him understood that he was devoted to his beliefs. He never argued matters of religion, except when ridiculed, when he replied sharply, so that the ridicule would not be repeated.(Robsahm, #38)(Bergquist (1999), p.475, quotes a letter from the pastor of the Swedish Church in London, Ferelius, in 1780, first published in Tafel II:I, p.560.)File:Swedenborgs grave.jpg|right|thumb|200px|Swedenborgs crypt in CathedralIn July, 1770, at the age of 82, he traveled to Amsterdam to complete the publication of his last work. The book, Vera Christiana Religio (The True Christian Religion), was published in Amsterdam in 1771 and was one of the most appreciated of his works. Designed to explain his teachings to Lutheran Christians, it was the most concrete of his works.(Bergquist (1999), p.464)In the summer of 1771, he traveled to London. Shortly before Christmas he suffered a stroke and was partially paralyzed and confined to bed. His health improved somewhat, but he died on March 29, 1772. There are several accounts of his last months, made by those he stayed with, and by Arvid Ferelius,  a pastor of the Swedish Church in London, who visited him several times.(Bergquist (1999), 471476. Accounts of Swedenborgs last days were collected and published in Tafel II:1, pp.577 ff, 556 ff, 560 ff.)There is evidence that Swedenborg wrote a letter to John Wesley, the founder of Methodism, in February, saying he (Swedenborg) had been told in the world of spirits that Wesley wanted to speak with him.(http://books.google.com/books?id5plNwQ4xyfwC&pgPA106&lpgPA106&dqjohn+wesley+swedenborg&sourcebl&otstv48ELMH0Y&sigxsFqXKc2uEibBH5YjydRkhEJmvM&hlen&eiK0OgTbjLM5TUgQfBsd3lBQ&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum7&ved0CDEQ6AEwBg#vonepage&qjohn%20wesley%20swedenborg&ffalse)  Wesley, startled, since he had not told anyone of his interest in Swedenborg, replied that he was going on a journey for six months and would contact Swedenborg on his return. Swedenborg replied that that would be too late since he (Swedenborg) would be going to the spiritual world for the last time on March 29.(Epic, p. 430ff.) (Wesley later read and commented extensively on Swedenborgs work.)(Swedenborg, E. True Christianity, Containing a Comprehensive Theology of the New Church That Was Predicted by the Lord in Daniel 7:13-14 and Revelation 21:1, 2, (Swedenborg Foundation 2006, Translators Preface, Vol. 2,  p. 36 ff.)) Swedenborgs landlords servant girl, Elizabeth Reynolds, also said Swedenborg had predicted this date, and that Swedenborg was as happy about it as if was going on holiday or to some merrymaking.(Epic, p. 431)  In Swedenborgs  final hours, his friend, Pastor Ferelius, told him some people thought he had written his theology just to make a name for himself and asked Swedenborg if he would like to recant.  Raising himself up on his bed, his hand on his heart, Swedenborg earnestly replied,  As truly as you see me before your eyes, so true is everything that I have written; and I could have said more had it been permitted. When you enter eternity you will see everything, and then you and I shall have much to talk about.(Epic, p. 433) He then died, in the afternoon, on the date he had predicted, March 29.(He was buried in the Swedish Church in Shadwell, London. On the 140th anniversary of his death, in 1912/1913, his earthly remains were transferred to Cathedral in Sweden, where they now rest close to the grave of the botanist Linnaeus. In 1917, the Swedish Church in Shadwell was demolished and the Swedish community that had grown around the parish moved to West London. In 1938 the site of the former church where he had been buried in London was redeveloped, and in his honor the local road was renamed Swedenborg Gardens. In 1997 a garden, play area and memorial near the road were created in his memory.VeracitySwedenborgs transition from scientist to mystic has fascinated many people ever since it occurred, including such people as Kant, Blake, Goethe, Conan Doyle, Balzac, Luis Borges, Strindberg, Waldo Emerson and Jung.Some have asserted that Swedenborg lost his mind, suffering some sort of illness or breakdown.(This reference is written in the lead section) While this idea was not uncommon during Swedenborgs own time, it is mitigated by his activity in the Swedish Riddarhuset (The House of the Nobility), the Riksdag (the Swedish parliament), and the Swedish Academy of Sciences. A close analysis of the historical facts of his life conducted by the Swedenborg Scientific Association concluded that he was sane.(*The Madness Hypothesis, a special issue of the academic journal The New Philosophy (1998;101: whole number), in which a number of authors review the question of Swedenborgs sanity. The issue draws the conclusion based on its analysis of the historical evidence that he was not insane.) Additionally, the system of thought in his theological writings is remarkably coherent.(Bergquist (1999), p.474)Swedenborg has had a variety of biographers, favorable and critical.(Who Was Emanuel Swedenborg (16881772)? An article including a list of biographies about Swedenborg, with a brief analysis of each biographers point of view. Accessed February 2011.) Some propose that he did not in fact have a revelation at all, but rather developed his theological ideas from sources ranging from his father to earlier figures in the history of thought, notably Plotinus.This position was first and most notably taken by the Swedish writer Martin Lamm, who wrote a biography of Swedenborg in 1915, which is still in print.(Bergquist (1999), p.15) Lagercrantz, the Swedish critic and publicist, had a similar point of view, calling Swedenborgs theological writing a poem about a foreign country with peculiar laws and customs.(en dikt om ett frmmande land med sllsamma lagar och seder. Largercrantz (1996), backpage)Swedenborgs approach to demonstrating the veracity of his theological teachings was to find and use voluminous quotations from the Testament and Testament to demonstrate agreement between the Bible or Word of God and his theological teachings. The demonstration of this agreement is found throughout his theological writings, since he rejected blind faith and declared true faith is an internal acknowledgment of the truth. The vast and consistent use of Biblical confirmations in Swedenborgs theological writings led a Swedish Royal Council in 1771, examining the heresy charges of 1770 against two Swedish supporters of his theological writings, to declare there is much that is true and useful in Swedenborgs writings.(Sigstedt (1952), p.408)Scientific beliefsSwedenborg proposed many scientific ideas during his lifetime. In his youth, he wanted to present a new idea every day, as he wrote to his brother-in-law Benzelius in 1718. Around 1730, he had changed his mind, and instead believed that higher knowledge is not something that can be acquired, but that it is based on intuition. After 1745, he instead considered himself receiving scientific knowledge in a spontaneous manner from angels.(Bergquist (1999), p.364365)From 1745, when he considered himself to have entered a spiritual state, he tended to phrase his experiences in empirical terms, claiming to report accurately things he had experienced on his spiritual journeys.One of his ideas that is considered most crucial for the understanding of his theology is his notion of correspondences. But in fact, he first presented the theory of correspondences in 1744, in the first volume of Regnum Animale dealing with the human soul.(x)The basis of the correspondence theory is that there is a relationship between the natural (physical), the spiritual, and the divine worlds. The foundations of this theory can be traced to Neoplatonism and the philosopher Plotinus in particular. With the aid of this scenario, Swedenborg now interpreted the Bible in a different light, claiming that even the most apparently trivial sentences could hold a profound spiritual meaning.(Lamm (1987 1915), dedicates a chapter to the correspondence theories, p.85109)Psychic accountsThere are three well known incidents of psychic ability reported in literature about Swedenborg.(Bergquist (1999), p.312) However, there are several versions of each.The fire anecdoteThe first was from July 29, 1759, when during a dinner in Gothenburg, he excitedly told the party at six o clock that there was a fire in Stockholm (405 km away), that it consumed his neighbours home and was threatening his own. Two hours later, he exclaimed with relief that the fire stopped three doors from his home. Two days later, reports confirmed every statement to the precise hour that Swedenborg first expressed the information.(The accounts are fully described in Bergquist, pp. 312313 and in Chapter 31 of of The Swedenborg Epic. The primary source for these accounts is a letter from Kant in 1768 and the Swedenborg collection by Tafel (see references).)However, though the fire was real enough and spared Swedenborgs house, the fire anecdote  one of the most well-known psychic anecdotes  may have an alternative explanation:In Sweden, the fire is known as Mariabranden (after the church Maria Kyrkan, which was severely damaged). In the high and increasing wind it spread very fast, consumed about 300 houses and made 2000 people homeless.(http://www.brandhistoriska.org/olyckor_se.html; in Swedish) However, the fire undoubtedly broke out Thursday July 19 (about 3 p.m.) and was put out during the following night or early morning.((Staffan Hgberg, Stockholms historia (Stockholms history), part 1, p. 342; in Swedish)) At that time, a messenger could bring the news from Stockholm to Gothenburg within two or three days. Under the July 29 interpretation, Swedenborg did not need any supernatural power or psychic ability to correctly visualize the fire. However, this explanation depends upon there being a belief in the July 29 date-based alternative. Since, as just noted, it seems clear that the July 19 date is correct(Johnson, G., ed. Kant on Swedenborg. Dreams of a Spirit-Seer and Other Writings. Translation by Johnson, G., Magee, G.E. (Swedenborg Foundation 2002, p. 185)) there appears to be no credible basis for an explanation based on the 29th.  It also seems unlikely in the extreme that the many witnesses to Swedenborgs distress during the fire, and the immediate report of it to the provincial governor,(Bergquist, L, Swedenborgs Secret (London, The Swedenborg Society, 2005, p. 270))(Johnson, p. 70)) would have believed any such claim.In the fire anecdote, July 29 is said to be a Saturday. It was a Sunday.(http://www.dinstartsida.se/almanacka.asp?datum1759-07-01; in Swedish)It has been proposed that, according to Swedenborg biographer John Garth Wilkinson, On Saturday, at 4 oclock, p.m., says Kant, when Swedenborg arrived at Gottenburg Gothenburg from England, Mr. William Castel invited him to his house, together with a party of fifteen persons.(John Garth Wilkinson, Emanuel Swedenborg. A Biography. Boston 1849; http://www.ivu.org/history/renaissance/emanuel_swedenborg.pdf.) If so, Swedenborg could not participate in a party on July 19 because this date was a Thursday. If the dinner was arranged the first Saturday thereafter, on Saturday 21 July, Swedenborg also could be informed on the fire by a natural way.This interpretation has several problems: One, as noted above, is that current scholarship does place the incident on July 19.  The original  Knobloch letter quoted  from Kant here(Johnson, G., ed. Kant on Swedenborg. Dreams of a Spirit-Seer and Other Writings. Translation by Johnson, G., Magee, G.E. (Swedenborg Foundation 2002, p. 67)) does not specify a day of the week, but the definitive The Swedenborg Epic biography associates the 19th with Saturday.(Sigstedt, C. The Swedenborg Epic. The Life and Works of Emanuel Swedenborg (New York: Bookman Associates, 1952))  Furthermore, if the 29th is associated with Sunday, as just noted, then the 19th would be associated with Saturday. And, finally, there is, again, the simple logic that, if Swedenborg had received news of the fire at the same time as everyone else in Gothenburg, there would have been no anomaly perceived  at the time and recorded for history.The Queen of SwedenThe second event was in 1758 when Swedenborg visited Queen Louisa Ulrika of Sweden, who asked him to tell her something about her deceased brother Augustus William of Prussia. The next day, Swedenborg whispered something in her ear that turned the Queen pale and she explained that this was something only she and her brother could know about.(According to Bergquist (1999), p.314315, There are several different accounts of the events which makes it difficult to conclude the exact details of the event. Carl Robsahm (see references) reports the story in this way.)The lost documentThe third was a woman who had lost an important document, and came to Swedenborg asking if a recently deceased person could tell him where it was, which he (in some sources) was said to have done the following night.(According to Bergquist (1999), p.316, there are some ten different reports of this event. There are two trustworthy descriptions, one by Robsahm (writing down Swedenborgs own description) and one by a priest who enquired of the woman in a letter fifteen years later.)Although not typically cited along with these three episodes, there was one further piece of evidence of possible pertinence here:  Swedenborg was noted by the seamen of the ships that he sailed between Stockholm and London to always have excellent sailing conditions.(Sigstedt, p. 329)  When asked about this by a friend, Swedenborg played down the matter, saying he was surprised by this experience himself and that he was certainly not able to do miracles.(Kant on SwedenborgIn 1763, Kant (17241804), then at the beginning of his career, was impressed by these accounts and made inquiries to find out if they were true. He also ordered all eight volumes of the expensive Arcana Clestia (Heavenly Arcana or Heavenly Mysteries). One Charlotte von Knobloch wrote Kant asking his opinion of Swedenborgs psychic experiences(Benz,p.11)(This letter is further discussed in Laywine, A., Kants Early Metaphysics. North American Kant Society Studies in Philosophy, volume 3 (Atascadero, California: Ridgeview Publishing Company, 1993), pp.7274.) Kant wrote a very affirmative reply, referring to Swedenborgs miraculous gift, and characterizing him as reasonable, agreeable, remarkable and sincere and a scholar, in one of his letters to Mendelssohn,(Johnson 2002. p. 69) and expressing regret that he (Kant) had never met Swedenborg.(Johnson 202, p. 71)(Benz 2001, p. 13) An English friend who investigated the matter for Kant, including visiting Swedenborgs home, found Swedenborg to be a sensible, pleasant and openhearted man and, here again, a scholar.(Johnson, p. 69)However, three years later, in 1766, Kant wrote and anonymously published a small book entitled Trume eines Geistersehers (Dreams of a Spirit-Seer)(Johnson, G., Magee, G.E. (Swedenborg Foundation 2002)) that was a scathing critique of Swedenborg and his writings. He termed Swedenborg a spook hunter(Benz 2001, p. 31)without official office or occupation(Benz, E., Heron, A. (Translator) Spiritual Vision and Revelation, Chapter VI. The Mystery of a Date  Fresh light on Kants Criticism of Swedenborg, p. 13, reprinted in The New Philosophy 2001 104:7) As rationale for his critique Kant said that he wanted to stop ceaseless questioning(Johnson 2002, p. 83) and inquiries about Dreams from inquisitive persons, both known and unknown,(Johnson, G. Did Kant dissemble his interest in Swedenborg? The New Philosophy 1999, 102: 531) and importunate appeals from known and unknown friends.(Johnson 1999, p. 29) as well as from moon calves( He also said he did not want to expose himself to mockery.(Johnson 1999, p. 84) More significantly, He became concerned about being seen as an apologist for both Swedenborg and for Spiritism in the guise of the interest in Swedenborg.,(Benz 2001, p. 31) which might have damaged his career.(Benz 2001, p. 31)) It seems clear that Dreams was intended as a refutation of all such thinking.(Benz 2001, p.29)) This left Kant in the ironic or hypocritical position of  trying to free himself of ridicule while at the same time applying ridicule to Swedenborg .(However, there has long been a suspicion among some scholars that, despite Dreams, Kant actually had a behind-the-scenes respect for Swedenborg.(Benz 2001, p. xiii) Certainly there were inconsistencies in Kants handling of this issue. For instance,(1) Kants writing style was usually complex, labored, dry ...and earnest(Benz 2001, p. xiv) but in Dreams was often playful, ironic and humorous.( (2) While he mocked Swedenborg in print, in the preserved notes of Kants lectures on metaphysics taken by a student named Herder, Kant treated Swedenborg with respect, not to be sneezed at.(Benz 2001, pp. xiii, xv)(Johnson 2002, p. 73) At one point, Herders notes term Swedenborgs visions as quite sublime.(Johnson 2002, p. xv) (3) Kants friend Moses Mendelssohn thought there was a joking pensiveness in Dreams that sometimes left the reader in doubt as to whether Dreams was meant to make metaphysics laughable or spirit-seeking credible.(Johnson 2002, p. 123)(4) In a one of his letters to Mendelssohn Kant refers to Dreams less-than-enthusiastically as a desultory little essay.(Johnson 2002, p. 85) Finally, a case has been made that Kant wrote Dreams before, not after, the Knobloch letter and that this was accomplished by accidentally or deliberately falsifying the dates of the documents involved, notably that of the Knobloch letter.(Benz 2001, p. 15ff.) This alteration, if true, would strengthen the case for Swedenborgs work being viewed by Kant, in the last analysis, positively. However, the fact of the matter is difficult to determine since the key date involved is that of the original of the Knobloch letter, which is lost.(TheologySwedenborg considered his theology a revelation of the true Christian religion that had become obfuscated through centuries of theology. However, he did not refer to his writings as theology since he considered it based on actual experiences, unlike theology,(x) except in the title of his last work. Neither did he wish to compare it to philosophy, a discipline he discarded in 1748 because it darkens the mind, blinds us, and wholly rejects the faith.(Quoted by Bergquist (1999), p. 178, based on Swedenborgs Spiritual Experiences (1748), 767 (It should be noted, however, that Spiritual Experiences is not among the works Swedenborg published himself, and thus may not be authoritative revelation. See Which of Swedenborgs books are Divine revelation?)The foundation of Swedenborgs theology was laid down in Arcana Clestia (Heavenly Mysteries), published in eight Latin volumes from 1749 to 1756. In a significant portion of that work, he interprets the Biblical passages of Genesis and Exodus. He reviews what he says is the inner spiritual sense of these two works of the Word of God. (He later made a similar review of the inner sense of the book of Revelation in Apocalypse Revealed.(The Apocalypse Revealed Wherein are Disclosed the Arcana Foretold Which Have Hitherto Remained Concealed)) Most of all, he was convinced that the Bible describes a humans transformation from a materialistic to a spiritual being, which he calls rebirth or regeneration. He begins this work by outlining how the myth was not an account of the creation of Earth, but an account of mans rebirth or regeneration in six steps represented by the six days of creation. Everything related to mankind in the Bible could also be related to Christ, and how Christ freed himself from materialistic boundaries through the glorification of his human presence by making it Divine. Swedenborg examines this idea in his exposition of Genesis and Exodus.(Bergquist (1999), p.286309)MarriageOne aspect of Swedenborgs writing that is often discussed is his ideas of marriage. Swedenborg himself remained a bachelor all his life, but that did not hinder him from writing voluminously about the subject. His work on Marriage Love (Conjugial Love in older translation)(1768) was dedicated to this purpose.(Marriage Love #1)The quality of the relationship between and wife resumes in the spiritual world in whatever state it was at their death in this world. Thus, a couple in true spiritual love remain together in that state in heaven for eternity. A couple lacking in that love by one or both partners, however, will separate after death and each will be given a compatible new partner. A partner is also given to a person who loved the ideal of spiritual marriage but never found a true partner in this world. The exception in both cases is a person who hates chaste marriage and thus cannot receive such a partner.(Marriage Love 46-50))Swedenborg saw creation as a series of pairings, descending from the Divine love and wisdom(Marriage Love #52) that define God and are the basis of creation. This duality can be seen in the pairing of good and truth,(Marriage Love #84) charity and faith,(Marriage Love #1) God and the church,(Marriage Love #117) and husband and wife.(Marriage Love #83) In each case, the goal for these pairs is to achieve conjunction between the two component parts. In the case of marriage, the object is to bring about the joining together of the two partners at the spiritual and physical levels, and the happiness that comes as a consequence.TrinitySwedenborg was sharply opposed to the Christian doctrine of the Trinity as three Persons, the Person of the Father, the Person of the Son, and the Person of the Holy Spirit. Instead, he claimed that the three were different components of the one God, one Person, in whom is the Divine Trinity, and that divinity is impossible if divided into three Persons. The three components are the Divine Himself (the Father), the Divine Human (the Son, Jesus Christ), and the going forth into the world of Gods influence, which is the Holy Spirit.(New Jerusalem and its Heavenly Doctrine, # 290 and 306)(The True Christian Religion, #139-184) All three components, soul, mind and body, can be seen in people, who are created in Gods image.((Genesis 1: 26-27))Swedenborg spoke against the Trinity of Persons in virtually all his works.(Bergquist (1999), p.301.)  The Divinity or Divine essence of the three is one, as the Person is one. According to Swedenborg, Muslims, Jews and people of other religions are mainly opposed to Christianity because its doctrine of the Trinity of Persons makes One God into three Gods. He considered the separation of the Trinity into three separate Persons to have originated with the Council of Nicaea in 325 AD and the Creed, circa 500.(True Christian Religion, sections 163168) For example:Swedenborgs theological teachings about the Trinity being in the One Person Jesus Christ is labeled by some as modalism because it identifies three aspects (not persons) of One God, a unitarian God.Sola fide (Faith Alone)He also spoke sharply against the tenet called fide, which means that salvation or righteousness before God is achievable by a gift of Gods grace (Sola gracia), through faith alone, irrespective of the persons deeds in life. Sola fide was a doctrine averred by Martin Luther, John Calvin, Ulrich Zwingli and others during the Protestant Reformation, and was a core belief especially in the theology of the Lutheran reformers Luther and Melanchthon. Swedenborg instead held that salvation is only possible through the conjunction of faith and charity in a person, and that the purpose of faith is to lead a person to live according to the truths of faith, which is charity. He further states that faith and charity must be exercised by doing good out of willing good whenever possible, which are good works or good uses or the conjunction perishes. In one section he wrote:True Christian Religion, section 355()WorksList of referenced works by Swedenborg and the year they were first published.(Latin booktitles, The Swedenborg Society, accessed November 21, 2006.)(The original title, and year of publication is based on Bergquist (1999), Litteraturfrteckning (pp.525534).)(The Works of Emanuel Swedenborg in Chronological Order, Emanuel Swedenborg Studies, accessed February 3, 2011 .)Within parenthesis, the common name used in text, based on the Church online bookstore. Then follows the name of the original title in its original publication.(Emanuel Swedenborg Bibliography, New Church website, accessed November 14, 2006) Various minor reports and tracts have been omitted from the list.* 17161718, (Daedalus Hyperboreus) Swedish: Daedalus Hyperboreus, eller ngra nya mathematiska och physicaliska frsk. (English: The Northern inventor, or some new experiments in mathematics and physics)* 1721, (Principles of Chemistry) Latin: Prodromus principiorum rerum naturalium : sive novorum tentaminum chymiam et physicam experimenta geometrice explicandi * 1722, (Miscellaneous Observations) Latin: Miscellanea de Rebus Naturalibus * 1734, (Principia) Latin: Opera Philosophica et Mineralia (English: Philosophical and Mineralogical Works), three volumes** (Principia, Volume I) Latin: Tomus I. Principia rerum naturlium sive novorum tentaminum phaenomena mundi elementaris philosophice explicandi** (Principia, Volume II) Latin: Tomus II. Regnum subterraneum sive minerale de ferro** (Principia, Volume III) Latin: Tomus III. Regnum subterraneum sive minerale de cupro et orichalco * 1734, (The Infinite and Final Cause of Creation) Latin: Prodromus Philosophiz Ratiocinantis de Infinito, et Causa Finali Creationis; deque Mechanismo Operationis Animae et Corporis.* 17441745, (The Animal Kingdom) Latin: Regnum animale, 3 volumes* 1745, (The Worship and Love of God) Latin: De Cultu et Amore Dei, 2 volumes* 17491756, (Coelestia (or Clestia including Latin variant, Arcana Caelestia (Heavenly Mysteries) Latin: Arcana Clestia, quae in Scriptura Sacra seu Verbo Domini sunt, detecta, 8 volumes* 1758, (Heaven and Hell) Latin: De Caelo et Ejus Mirabilibus et de inferno. Ex Auditis et Visis.* 1758, (The Last Judgment) Latin: De Ultimo Judicio* 1758, (The White Horse) Latin: De Equo Albo de quo in Apocalypsi Cap.XIX.* 1758, (Earths in the Universe) Latin:  De Telluribus in Mundo Nostro Solari, qu vocantur planet: et de telluribus in coelo astrifero: deque illarum incolis; tum de spiritibus & angelis ibi; ex auditis & visis.* 1758, (The New Jerusalem and Its Heavenly Doctrine) Latin: De Nova Hierosolyma et Ejus Doctrina Coelesti* 1763, (Doctrine of the Lord) Latin:Doctrina Nov Hierosolym de Domino.* 1763, (Doctrine of the Sacred Scripture) Latin: Doctrina Nov Hierosolym de Scriptura Sacra. * 1763, (Doctrine of Life) Latin: Doctrina Vit pro Nova Hierosolyma ex prceptis Decalogi.* 1763, (Doctrine of Faith) Latin: Doctrina Nov Hierosolym de Fide.* 1763, (Continuation of The Last Judgement) Latin:  Continuatio De Ultimo Judicio: et de mundo spirituali. * 1763, (Divine Love and Wisdom) Latin:  Sapientia Angelica de Divino Amore et de Divina Sapientia. Sapientia Angelica de Divina Providentia. * 1764, (Divine Providence) Latin: Sapientia Angelica de Divina Providentia. * 1766, (Apocalypse Revealed) Latin: Apocalypsis Revelata, in quae detegunter Arcana quae ibi preedicta sunt.* 1768, (Conjugial Love, or Marriage Love) Latin:  Deliciae Sapientiae de Amore Conjugiali; post quas sequumtur voluptates insaniae de amore scortatorio. * 1769, (Brief Exposition) Latin: Summaria Expositio Doctrin Nov Ecclesi, qu per Novam Hierosolymam in Apocalypsi intelligitur. * 1769, (Interaction of the Soul and the Body) Latin: De Commercio Anim & Corporis.* 1771, (True Christian Religion) Latin: Vera Christiana Religio, continens Universam Theologiam Novae Ecclesiae* 1859, Drmboken, Journalanteckningar, 17431744* 19831997, (Spiritual Diary) Latin: Diarum, Ubi Memorantur Experientiae Spirituales.See also* Church of the New Jerusalem* Vetterling* of Christian thinkers in science* New Church Which Is Nova Hierosolyma* New Church* Thought* Science* Coming* Church of North America* Rite* ChurchNotesReferences*Ahlstrom, S.E. A Religious History of the American People (Yale 1972) Includes section on Swedenborg by this scholar.*Benz, Ernst, Emanuel Swedenborg: Visionary Savant in the Age of Reason (Swedenborg Foundation, 2002) ISBN 0-87785-195-6, a translation of the thorough language study on life and work of Swedenborg, Emanuel Swedenborg: Naturforscher und Seher by the noted religious scholar Ernst Benz, published in Munich in 1948.*Bergquist, Lars, Swedenborgs Secret, (London, The Swedenborg Society, 2005) ISBN 0-85448-143-5, a translation of the language biography of Swedenborg, Swedenborgs Hemlighet, published in Stockholm in 1999. ISBN 91-27-06981-8*Block, M.B. The New Church in the New World. A study of Swedenborgianism in America (Holt 1932; Octagon reprint 1968) A detailed history of the ideational and social development of the organized churches based on Swedenborgs works.*Crompton, S. Emanuel Swedenborg (Chelsea House 2005) Recent biography of Swedenborg.*Johnson, G., ed. Kant on Swedenborg. Dreams of a Spirit-Seer and Other Writings. Translation by Johnson, G., Magee, G.E. (Swedenborg Foundation 2002) New translation and extensive set of supplementary texts.*Lamm, Martin, Swedenborg: En studie (1987; first ed. 1915). A popular biography that is still read and quoted. It is also available in English: Emanuel Swedenborg: The Development of His Thought, Martin Lamm (Swedenborg Studies, No. 9, 2001), ISBN 0-87785-194-8*Lagercrantz, Olof, Dikten om livet p den andra sidan (Wahlstrm & Widstrand 1996), ISBN 91-46-16932-6. In Swedish.*Leon, James, Overcoming Objections to Swedenborgs Writings Through the Development of Scientific Dualism  An examination of Swedenborgs discoveries. The author is a professor of psychology  (1998; published in New Philosophy, 2001)* Emanuel Swedenborg and Dean Fagerstrom  Servants of the Lord and Current Forces to Emphasize the Marriage of Good and Truth As a Means of Healing Societys Ills...*Moody, R.A. Life after Life (Bantam 1975) Reports correlation of near-death experience with Swedenborgs reports of life after death.*Price, R. Johnny Appleseed. Man and Myth (Indiana 1954) Definitive study of this legendary man. Includes details of his interest in Swedenborg and the organizational New Church*Robsahm, Carl, Hallengren, Anders (translation and comments), Anteckningar om Swedenborg (Freningen Swedenborgs Minne: Stockholm 1989), ISBN 91-87856-00-X. Hallengren writes that the first complete publication of the Robsam manuscript was in R.L. Tafels Documents, Vol. I, 1875 (see section reading)*Sigstedt, C.,The Swedenborg Epic. The Life and Works of Emanuel Swedenborg (New York: Bookman Associates, 1952). The whole book is available online at Swedenborg Digital Library.*Toksvig, Signe, Emanuel Swedenborg. Scientist and Mystic., Yale University Press, (1948), and Swedenborg Foundation, (1983), ISBN 0-87785-171-9Further readingNewer material:* The Arms of MorpheusEssays on Swedenborg and Mysticism, ed. Stephen McNeilly (London: Swedenborg Society, 2007), ISBN 978-0-85448-150-7.* Between Method and MadnessEssays on Swedenborg and Literature, ed. Stephen McNeilly (London: Swedenborg Society, 2005), ISBN 978-0-85448-145-3.* In Search of the AbsoluteEssays on Swedenborg and Literature, ed. Stephen McNeilly (London: Swedenborg Society, 2005), ISBN 978-0-85448-141-5.* On the True Philosopher and the True PhilosophyEssays on Swedenborg, ed. Stephen McNeilly (London: Swedenborg Society, 2005), ISBN 978-0-85448-134-7.* Swedenborg and His Influence, ed. Erland J. Brock, (Bryn Athyn, Pennsylvania: The Academy of the New Church, 1988), ISBN 0-910557-23-3.* Jonathan S. Rose, ed. Emanuel Swedenborg: Essays for the New Century Edition on His Life, Work, and Impact (West Chester, Pennsylvania: Swedenborg Foundation, 2002), ISBN 0-87785-473-4. 580 pages. Multiple scholars contributed to this collection of excellent information on Swedenborg, his manuscripts, and his cultural influence. Republished in 2004 under new title, Scribe of Heaven: Swedenborgs Life, Work, and Impact ISBN 0-87785-474-2.* Wilson van Dusen, The Presence of Other Worlds, Swedenborg Foundation, Inc., New York, Harper & Row, 1974. ISBN 0-87785-166-2* The Madness Hypothesis, a special issue of The New Philosophy (1998;101: whole number), a journal produced by the Swedenborg Scientific Association, reviews the question of Swedenborgs sanity in scholarly detail, making the case that he was in fact quite sane.* Donald L. Rose, ed., Afterlife: A Guided Tour of Heaven and Its Wonders. Swedenborg Foundation, 2006. (Excellent abridged version of Heaven and Hell)* T. Suzuki, translated by Andrew Bernstein, Afterword by David Loy, Swedenborg: Buddha of the North. Swedenborg Foundation, 1996. (Brilliantly shows relevance of Swedenborgs ideas to Buddhist thought.)* Sig Synnestvedt, ed., The Essential Swedenborg: Basic Religious Teachings of Emanuel Swedenborg. Swedenborg Foundation, 1970.Older material of importance, some of it not in print:*The most extensive work is: RL Tafel, Documents concerning the Life and Character of Swedenborg, collected, translated and annotated (3 vols., Swedenborg Society, 18751877);* J. Hyde, A Bibliography of the Works of Emanuel Swedenborg (Swedenborg Society).* Kants Trume eines Geistersehers (1766; the most recent edition in English is from 1975, ISBN 3-7873-0311-1 );* J. G. Herders Emanuel Swedenborg, in his Adrastea (Werke zur Phil. und Gesch., xii. 110125).*Transactions of the International Swedenborg Congress (London, 1910), summarized in The New Church Magazine (August, 1910).* Swedenborg and Esoteric Islam (Swedenborg Studies, No 4) by Corbin, Leonard Fox* Waldo Emerson, Swedenborg; or, the Mystic, in Emerson: Essays and Lectures (New York, New York: The Library of America, 1983), ISBN 978-0-940450-15-8.External links*Australian centre providing a range of services and information about Swedenborg and his spiritual teachings. Full on-line catalogue.*.**Emanuel Swedenborg Studies is dedicated to collecting, analyzing, and preserving the historical record of the life and times of Emanuel Swedenborg (16881772). Among the existing broad context of apologists and critics of Emanuel Swedenborg, it is the mission of Emanuel Swedenborg Studies to establish an objective and comprehensive record of the facts of Emanuel Swedenborgs Life  all of the facts and only the facts.About, Emanuel Swedenborg Studies, accessed April 30, 2007.*A Journal of Dreams.*Information Swedenborg Inc The mission of Information Swedenborg Inc. is to raise awareness of the life and work of Emanuel Swedenborg. Sells books by, about and related to Swedenborg, world wide but especially within Canada.*The Swedenborg Foundation is a non-profit publisher, book seller, and educational organization which publishes the theological works of Swedenborg, contemporary books and videos on spiritual growth, offers lectures and workshops, and maintains a library of Swedenborgian literature.*The Heavenly Doctrines, a searchable library of Swedenborgs revelatory phase theological writings.*Small Canon Search Swedenborg enumerated in his Arcana Coelestia #10,325 the books of the Bible that were, according to his revelation, Divinely inspired. In his True Christian Religion # 779 he indicated that books of his revelation that he published were also Divine revelation. This search engine, then, for the convenience of the reader, searches only the works thus inspired. For further review of this issue, see Which of Swedenborgs books are Divine revelation?*Emanuel Swedenborg Swicki, a collaborative community searching the World Wide Web for information about Emanuel Swedenborg.*The Swedenborg Project A 501(c)(3) non-profit organization incorporated in the state of Maryland for the purpose of disseminating the teachings of the Second Coming of Jesus Christ, revealed through Swedenborg. The Projects website provides an overview and reference information in keeping with that goal.*The Swedenborg Digital Library contains online full-text versions of books about Swedenborg and the Second Coming as well as access to the books of the Second Coming teachings that Swedenborg himself published.First Translation of Swedenborgs theological writings: 16th Chapter of Genesis as explained in the Arcana Clestia (This translation from Latin into English was commissioned by Swedenborg himself and is a photocopy of a first edition copy: PDF - 12MB).*The Swedenborg Society The Swedenborg Society translates, prints and publishes works by the Swedish scientist, philosopher and visionary, Emanuel Swedenborg.*The New Jerusalem and its Heavenly Doctrine According to What Has Been Heard from Heaven With an Introduction Concerning The New Heaven and the New Earth (Swedenbog Society 1911; Swedenborg Foundation 1951) This book is one of the Writings but is included in the present section because it provides an extremely compact summary of the Writings that was written by Swedenborg himself.SwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborg SwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgja:SwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSvedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgSwedenborgzh:
225878
Operation_Rolling_Thunder
casualties252,000 military,182,000 civilian120 aircraft.(http://www.pbs.org/battlefieldvietnam/timeline/index2.html Battlefield Vietnam: Timeline)Operation Rolling Thunder was the title of a gradual and sustained U.S. Air Division (later Air Force), U.S. Navy, and of Vietnam Air Force (VNAF) aerial bombardment campaign conducted against the Republic of Vietnam (North Vietnam) from 2 March 1965 until 1 November 1968, during the War.The four objectives of the operation (which evolved over time) were to boost the sagging morale of the Saigon regime in the Republic of Vietnam, to persuade North Vietnam to cease its support for the communist insurgency in South Vietnam without actually taking any ground forces into communist North Vietnam, to destroy North Vietnams transportation system, industrial base, and air defenses, and to cease the flow of men and material into South Vietnam. Attainment of these objectives was made difficult by both the restraints imposed upon the U.S and its allies by War exigencies and by the military aid and assistance received by North Vietnam from its communist allies, the Union and the Peoples Republic of China (PRC).The operation became the most intense air/ground battle waged during the Cold War period; indeed, it was the most difficult such campaign fought by the U.S. Air Force since the aerial bombardment of Germany during War II. Supported by communist allies, Vietnam fielded a potent mixture of sophisticated air-to-air and ground-to-air weapons that created one of the most effective air defenses ever faced by American military aviators. After one of the longest aerial campaigns ever conducted by any nation, Rolling Thunder was terminated as a strategic failure in late 1968 having achieved none of its objectives.(Since protective reaction air strikes were conducted between November 1968 and April 1972 within North Vietnam under the moniker Rolling Thunder, it can be claimed that the campaign was the longest ever conducted by any nation. Earl H. Tilford, Setup. Maxwell Air Force Base AL: Air University Press, 1991, p. 153.)Gradually escalating actionBackgroundIn response to President Dinh Diems abrogation of the 1956 reunification election and suppression of communists during the late 1950s, Hanoi had begun sending arms and material to the guerrillas of the Front for the Liberation of South Vietnam (NLF), who were fighting an insurgency to topple the American-supported Saigon government.(Stanley Karnow, Vietnam. New York: Viking, 1983, pps. 237239.) To combat the NLF and to shore up the government in the south, the U.S. initially delivered monetary aid, military advisors, and supplies.(Ronald H. Spector, Advice and Support. Washington DC: States Army Center of Military History, 1983, pps. 275373.) Between 1957 and 1963, the U.S. found itself committed, through its acceptance of the policy of containment and belief in the theory, to defending South Vietnam from what it saw as expansive communist aggression.(In its public defense of its policies, the State Department argued that South Vietnam was fighting for its life against a brutal campaign of terror and armed attack inspired, directed, supplied, and controlled by the communist regime in Hanoi. U.S. Department of State, Aggression from the North. Washington DC: U.S. Government Printing Office, 1965, p. 60.)U.S. policy was for a time dictated by its perception of improvement in the Saigon government.(The coup against President Dinh Diem had unleashed a maelstrom of political unrest and communist victories. Coup followed coup in Saigon as ARVN generals vied for power. There were seven governments in Saigon in 1964, three between 16 August and 3 September alone. Robert M. Gillespie, The Joint Chiefs of Staff and the Escalation of the Vietnam Conflict, 19641965. Unpublished Masters Thesis, Clemson University, 1994, p. 63.) No further commitment by the Americans would occur without tangible proof of the regimes survivability.(Senator Mike Gravel, ed., The Pentagon Papers. Boston: Beacon Press, 1971, vol. 3, pps. 1720.) Events in Vietnam, however, outraced this policy. By the beginning of 1965, it was stood upon its head  without further American action the Saigon government could not survive.(George M. Kahin, Intervention. New York: Knopf, 1986, p. 272.)  Questions then arose among the U.S. administration and military leadership as to the best method by which Hanoi (the perceived locus of the insurgency) could be dissuaded from its course of action. The answer seemed to lie in the application of air power. By 1964 most of the civilians surrounding President B. Johnson shared the Chiefs of Staffs collective faith in the efficacy of strategic bombing to one degree or another.(Tilford, p. 92. See also Gillespie, pps. 6469.) They reasoned that a small nation like North Vietnam, with a tiny industrial base that was just emerging after the Indochina War, would be reluctant to risk its new-found economic viability to support the insurgency in the south.(Tilford, p. 92.) Constantly affecting this decision-making process were fears of possible counter moves or outright intervention by the Soviet Union, the PRC, or both.(Lyndon B. Johnson, The Vantage Point. New York: Holt, Rhinehart, and Winston, 1971, pps. 6667.) The civilians and the military were divided, however, on the manner of affecting Hanois will to support the southern insurgency. The civilians thought in terms of changing the regimes behavior while the military men were more concerned with breaking its will.(Gillespie, p. 70.)In August 1964, as a result of the of Tonkin Incident, in which U.S. naval vessels claimed to have been attacked by North Vietnamese patrol boats, President Johnson ordered retaliatory air strikes (Pierce Arrow) launched against the north.(The most accurate description of the incidents is Edwin E. Moise, Tonkin Gulf.)  This did not, however, satisfy the military chiefs, who demanded a wider and more aggressive campaign.(Mark Clodfelter, The Limits of Airpower New York: Free Press, 1989, p. 47.)ImplementationBy the end of August, the Joint Chiefs had drawn up a list of 94 targets to be destroyed as part of a coordinated eight-week air campaign against North Vietnams transportation network.(Jacob Van Staaveren, Gradual Failure. Washington DC: Air Force Museums and History Program, 2002, p. 46. See also Tilford, p. 93.) Bridges, rail yards, docks, barracks and supply dumps were all targeted. Johnson, however, feared that such a campaign might trigger a direct intervention by Chinese or Soviets, which might, in turn, cascade into a world war.(Gillespie, p. 71.) With McNamaras support, the president refused to endorse such an unrestricted bombing campaign.Instead, the U.S. launched more tit-for-tat airstrikes in retaliation for a 7 February 1965 NLF attack at Pleiku (Flaming Dart) and for a bomb attack against an American enlisted mens billet at Qui Nhon on the 10th (Operation Flaming Dart II). These small-scale operations were launched against the southern region of the country, where the bulk of North Vietnams ground forces and supply dumps were located.(H.R. McMaster, Dereliction of Duty. New York: Harper Collins, 1997, 218222.) Surrendering to continued NLF advances and pressures from the Joint Chiefs, Johnson formally authorized a sustained bombing program, codenamed Rolling Thunder, which would not be tied to overt North Vietnamese actions.(Although some within the administration believed that the campaign would be costly, and that it might not work, they reasoned that it was an acceptable risk, especially when considered against the alternative of introducing American combat troops. Morocco, p. 40. For the Secretary of Defenses thoughts on the planning and implementation of the air campaign see Robert S. McNamara, In Retrospect. New York: Times Books, 1992, pps. 171177.) Rolling Thunder called for an eight-week air campaign consistent with the restrictions that Johnson and Secretary of Defense S. McNamara had imposed upon it. If the insurgency continued with DRV support, strikes against the DRV would be extended with intensified efforts against targets north of the 19th parallel.(McMaster, p. 226.) It was believed that selective pressure, controlled by Washington, combined with diplomatic overtures, would prevail and compel Hanoi to end its aggression.(Col. John Schlight, A War Too Long. Washington DC: Air Force History and Museums Program, 1996, p. 46.) The military was still not satisfied, since, for the time being, the bombing campaign was to be limited to targets below the 19th parallel, each of which would have to be cleared individually by the president and McNamara.(John Morocco, Thunder from Above. Boston: Boston Publishing Company, 1984, p. 56. The daily target selection meetings were soon replaced by weekly sessions and finally by the creation of bi-weekly force packages.)The first mission of the new operation was launched on 2 March against an ammunition storage area near Xom Bang. On the same day, 19 VNAF Skyraiders struck the Quang Khe Naval Base. The Americans were shocked when six of their aircraft were shot down during the mission.(Jacob Van Staaveren, Gradual Failure. Washington DC: Air Force History and Museums Program, 2002, p. 86.) Five of the downed crewmen were rescued, but it was a portent of things to come.(Morocco, p. 54.)Over the northStrategic persuasionIn keeping with the concept of gradualism, in which threatening destruction would serve as a more influential signal of American determination than destruction itself, it was better to hold important targets hostage by bombing trivial ones. From the beginning of Rolling Thunder, Washington dictated which targets would be struck, the day and hour of the attack, the number and types of aircraft and the tonnages and types of ordnance utilized, and sometimes even the direction of the attack.(Morocco, p. 55.) Airstrikes were strictly forbidden within  of Hanoi and within ten nautical miles (19 km) of the port of Haiphong. A thirty-mile buffer zone also extended along the length of the Chinese frontier. According to Air Force historian Earl Tilford:Targeting bore little resemblance to reality in that the sequence of attacks was uncoordinated and the targets were approved randomly  even illogically. The Norths airfields, which, according to any rational targeting policy, should have been hit first in the campaign, were also off-limits.(Tilford, p. 109.) Although some of these restrictions were later loosened or rescinded, Johnson (with McNamaras support) kept a tight rein on the campaign, which continuously infuriated the American military commanders, right-wing members of Congress, and even some within the administration itself.(Morocco, p. 57.) One of the primary objectives of the operation, at least to the military, should have been the closure of Haiphong and other ports by aerial mining, thereby slowing or halting the flow of seaborne supplies entering the north. President Johnson refused to take such a provocative action, however, and such an operation was not implemented until 1972. There was also little consultation between Johnson and the military chiefs during the target selection process. Even the Chairman of the Joint Chiefs, Army General Earl G. Wheeler, was not present for most of the critical discussions of 1965 and participated only occasionally thereafter.(Wayne Thompson, To Hanoi and Back. Washington DC: Smithsonian Institution Press, 2002, p. 80.)The majority of strikes during Rolling Thunder were launched from four Air Bases in Thailand: Korat, Takhli, Thani, and Ubon.(Only one South Vietnam-based squadron (based at Da Nang) participated in the DRV missions.) The aircraft would refuel from aerial tankers over Laos before flying on to their targets in the DRV. After attacking their targets (usually by dive-bombing) the strike forces would either fly directly back to Thailand or exit over the relatively safe waters of the Gulf of Tonkin. It was quickly decided that, in order to limit airspace conflicts between Air Force and Naval strike forces, North Vietnam was divided into six target regions called Route Packages, each of which was assigned to either the Air Force or Navy and into which the other was forbidden to intrude.Navy strikes were launched from the aircraft carriers of Force 77, cruising off the North Vietnamese coast at Station. Naval aircraft, which had shorter ranges (and carried lighter bomb loads) than their Air Force counterparts, approached their targets from seaward with the majority of their strikes flown against coastal targets.(This also helped account for the lower number of aircraft and pilot losses suffered by the Navy. Fighters had only to defend a 90 degree arc in front of the strike force, SAM exposure was more limited, and coastal targets made the shorter distances of search and rescue operations more conducive to success.)On 3 April the Joint Chiefs convinced McNamara and Johnson to launch a four-week attack on North Vietnams lines of communications, which would isolate that nation from its overland sources of supply in the PRC and the Soviet Union. About one-third of the norths imports came down the northeast railroad from the PRC, while the remaining two-thirds came by sea through Haiphong and other ports.(Thompson, p. 26.) For the first time in the campaign, targets were to be chosen for their military, rather than their psychological significance.(Morocco, p. 58.) During the four weeks, 26 bridges and seven ferries were destroyed.(Morocco, p. 61.) Other targets included the extensive North Vietnamese radar system, barracks, and ammunition depots. The panhandle of southern North Vietnam, however remained the primary focus of operations and total sorties flown there rose from 3,600 in April to 4,000 in May.(Morocco, p. 63.) Slowly moving away from the destruction of fixed targets, armed reconnaissance missions, in which small formations of aircraft patrolled highways, railroads, and rivers, searching for targets of opportunity, were authorized. These missions increased from two to 200 sorties per week by the end of 1965.(Morocco, p. 63.) Eventually, armed reconnaissance missions would constitute 75 percent of the total bombing effort, in part because the system through which fixed targets were requested, selected, and authorized was so complicated and unwieldy.(Tilford, p. 108.)Changing priorities and POL strikesIf Rolling Thunder was supposed to send signals to Hanoi to desist in its actions, it did not seem to be working. On 8 April, responding to requests for peace negotiations, North Vietnamese Premier Van Dong stated that they could only begin when: the bombing was halted; the U.S. had removed all of its troops from the south; the Saigon government recognized the demands of the NLF; and it was agreed that the reunification of Vietnam would be settled by the Vietnamese themselves.(Morocco, p. 62.) Ominously, on 3 April the North Vietnamese Air Force made its first appearance when American aircraft were attacked by Soviet-built MiG-15s.The entire complexion of the American effort was altered on 8 March 1965, when 3,500 Marines came ashore at Nang, ostensibly to defend the southern airfields committed to prosecuting Rolling Thunder.(Karnow, p. 415.) The mission of the ground forces was expanded to combat operations and, from that point onward, the aerial campaign became a secondary operation, overwhelmed by troop deployments and the escalation of ground operations in South Vietnam.(NSAM 328, 6 April 1965. Neil Sheehan, et al. The Pentagon Papers. New York: Ballentine, 1971, pps. 442443. See also Tilford, p. 115.) Until the third week of April, Rolling Thunder had enjoyed at least equal status with air missions conducted in the south. After that time, strikes that interfered with requirements for the southern battlefield were either cut back or cancelled.(Schilght, Air War in South Vietnam. p. 33.) By 24 December 1965, 170 U.S. aircraft had been lost during the campaign (85 Air Force, 94 Navy, and one Marine Corps). Eight VNAF aircraft had also been lost.(Chris Hobson, Vietnam Air Losses. Hinkley UK: Midland Press, 2001, pgs. 15166. These losses include not only combat shootdowns, but those due to accidents, mechanical failure, and unknown causes.) Air Force aircrews had flown 25,971 sorties and dropped 32,063 tons of bombs. Naval aviators had flown 28,168 sorties and dropped 11,144 tons. The VNAF had contributed 682 missions with unknown ordnance tonnages.(Van Staaveren, p. 316.)hit by SA-2 over Vietnam.jpg|thumb|An F-105D hit by an SA-2 missile.U.S. reconnaissance discovered on 5 April 1966 that the North Vietnamese were constructing positions for what could only be missile (SAM) batteries. The Air Force and Navy then filed a joint appeal to Washington for permission to strike the sites, but they were refused since most of the sites were near the restricted urban areas.(Morocco, p. 107.) It came as no surprise when, on 24 July, an F-105 was shot down by a Guideline missile. Three days later, a one-time strike was authorized against the two offending missile sites. The Americans, however, fell for an elaborate trap when the sites turned out to be dummies surrounded by anti-aircraft artillery defenses. One American pilot described the action which followed as looking like the end of the world.(Morocco, p. 109.) Six of the strike craft were destroyed (two of the pilots were killed, one missing, two captured, and one rescued) during the debacle.(Morocco, p. 109.) On 29 June 1966, airstrikes against the norths petroleum, oil, and lubricants (POL) storage areas were authorized by Johnson. The American military had advocated such strikes since the inception of the operation, believing that to deny North Vietnam its POL would cause its military effort to grind to a halt. The strikes at first appeared successful, destroying tank farms near Hanoi and Haiphong and leading the CIA to estimate that 70 percent of North Vietnams oil facilities had been destroyed for the loss of 43 aircraft.(Morocco, p. 130) The success proved only a short-term inconvenience for North Vietnam, however, since Hanoi had anticipated just such a campaign and had dispersed the majority of its POL stocks in 50-gallon drums across the length of the country. The POL attacks were halted on 4 September after U.S. intelligence admitted that there was no evidence yet of any shortages of POL in North Vietnam.(Morocco, p. 131.)ReactionsProblemsRolling Thunder exposed many problems within the American military services committed to it and tended to exacerbate others. A key interservice issue (and one which was not solved until 1968) was the command and control arrangement in Southeast Asia. The Air Forces 2nd Air Division (replaced by the Seventh Air Force on 1 April 1966) was ostensibly responsible for aerial operations over North and South Vietnam. It was subordinate, however, to MACV and its commander, U.S. Army General C. Westmoreland, who tended to see his problems centered in the south.(Thompson, p. 14.) The U.S. Seventh/Thirteenth Air Force, based in Thailand (which carried out the majority of the Air Forces strikes in North Vietnam), had a dual command structure. It reported to the Seventh on operational matters and to the Thirteenth Air Force (whose headquarters was in the Philippines) for logistical and administrative concerns. These command and control complexities grew even more tangled with the division of the aerial effort into four competing operational areas (those in South Vietnam, North Vietnam, and Laos (both north and south).(Schlight, Air War in South Vietnam, p. 24.)The Navys Task Force 77 took its orders via Fleet from CINCPAC, a Navy admiral based in Honolulu, through his subordinate, the Air Force commander of Pacific Air Forces (PACAF).(Thompson, p. 18.) Due to their influence, the Navy could not be persuaded to integrate its air operations over North Vietnam with those of the Air Force. General William Momyer, commander of the Seventh, had the impression that CINCPAC and PACAF wanted to keep the Thai-based aircraft out of his hands. By denying Momyer, they were really denying Westmoreland and keeping air operations against the DRV under their control.(Thompson, p. 15. This policy was ultimately unsuccessful. In November 1965, bombing in the area abutting the DMZ (Route Package One) was handed over to Westmoreland as part of the extended battlefield. Schlight, A War Too Long, p. 48.) To complicate matters, the U.S. ambassadors to Thailand (Martin) and Laos (H. Sullivan) exerted undue influence over operational and command arrangements.(Thompson, p. 15.)This bizarre command structure went against the grain of the Air Forces single air manager concept, which dictated that one commander was to control and coordinate all aircraft within a combat theater.(See Niagara) The chain through which operational strike requests had to flow gave some indication of the growing overcomplexity of the campaign. Requests for airstrikes originated with the 2nd Air Division and Task Force 77 in Vietnam and then proceeded to CINCPAC, who in turn reported to his superiors, the Joint Chiefs, at Pentagon. After input from the Department and the CIA, the requests then proceeded to the House, where the president and his Tuesday Cabinet made decisions on the strike requests on a weekly basis.(Van Staaveren, pps. 7276. The meetings were usually attended by the president, McNamara, Secretary of State Rusk, and the presidents special assistant for national security affairs, Bundy) VA-196 dropping Mk 82 bombs Vietnam.jpg|thumb|U.S. Navy A-6A Intruder all-weather bombers, in 1968. Another problem exposed by Rolling Thunder was the unpreparedness of the Air Force for the operations it was undertaking. Its aircraft had been designed and its pilots trained for strategic operations against the Soviet Union  for nuclear, not conventional war.(Tilford, p. 113.) The new campaign exposed years of neglect in conventional tactics, while aircraft capabilities and armament were ill-suited to the task at hand. The Air Force was also embarrassed by the fact that the Navy was better prepared. It possessed the only all-weather fighter-bomber in the U.S. inventory in the new Intruder and was also responsible for the development of the Phantom fighter-bomber, which became ubiquitous during the Vietnam War.(The Air Forces unpreparedness was further revealed by its lack of adequate aerial reconnaissance aircraft (eg. 01 and 02 observation aircraft used for crucial Air Control missions over South Vietnam, which it originally had to borrow from the Army) and tactical fighter-bombers (eg. War-era A-1 Skyraiders, which it had to obtain from the Navy). The F-4 Phantom that the Air Force fielded was not equipped with a gun since it was it expected to conduct air-to-air combat operations solely with missiles. General Momyer had long opposed putting a gun on the F-4 and was convinced to do so only after air-to-air engagements in 1966. The first Air Force version equipped with an internal gunsystem only appeared in 1968.Thompson, p. 64.)Once air-to-air combat began over North Vietnam, the Air Force was again found lacking. The mainstay missiles of the air war turned out to be the Navy-developed Sidewinder and Sparrow, not its own Falcon.(Thompson, p. 91.) The Air Force continuously opposed adapting to the war in Southeast Asia, since its leadership believed that it was an aberration that would be quickly resolved. It could then turn its attention (and its more modern weapons) against the greater threat posed by the Soviet Union. None in the Air Force high command foresaw that the war would drag on for nearly a decade.(Tilford, p. 113.)The Air Force did possess an aircraft which had an all-weather capability, radar-guided bombing equipment, and awesome destructive potential  the Stratofortress. The civilian administration, however, never considered utilizing the big bombers (whose operations remained under the control of the Air Command) very far north of the DMZ, believing that it was too overt an escalation.(Morocco, p. 85.) Air Force Chief of Staff P. McConnell also opposed sending the bombers into the air defense environment in the north and limited B-52 strikes to Route Package One.(Schlight, A War Too Long, p. 48. This policy compounded already existing tensions between airmen and their Army and Navy counterparts. The airmen were already upset that Westmoreland was ordering the greatest strategic bomber ever built into a ground support role, but then to have a naval officer (CINCPAC) pick their targets was simply unbearable. William P. Head, War Above the Clouds. Maxwell Air Force Base AL: Air University Press, 2002, p. 23.) Compounding these issues was the one-year rotation policy adopted by the Pentagon in Southeast Asia. Although the first aircrews arriving in-theater were highly experienced, the rapidly growing tempo and ever-expanding length of the operation demanded more personnel. This exacerbated a growing lack of experienced aircrews. This dilemma was further compounded by an Air Force policy which dictated universal pilot training while proscribing involuntary second combat tours, which combined, had the effect of rotating personnel to different aircraft.(Marshall L. Michel Clashes: Air Combat Over North Vietnam 19651972. Annapolis MD: Naval Institute Press, 1997, pg 163. An experienced F-4 pilot could end up flying FAC missions in an Skymaster during a subsequent tour whereas an SAC or Military Airlift Command pilot could end up flying the F-4 Phantom.) Conversely, the Navy tended to maintain its aircrews within the same community for the duration of their careers, thereby retaining their expertise, but also incurring greater losses among experienced crews undergoing multiple combat tours.(Michel, p. 168) Another factor was the weather within the operational theater. The cyclical monsoon patterns meant that the weather was deplorable for flight operations eight months of the year (from late September to early May) when rain and fog tended to conceal targets. Lack of adequate all-weather and night-bombing capability made it necessary for the majority of U.S. missions to be conducted during daylight hours, thereby easing the burden on the air defense forces of North Vietnam.Peoples War in the airBefore Rolling Thunder even began the North Vietnamese leadership knew what was coming. It issued a February 1965 directive to the military and the population to maintain communication and transportation and to expect the complete destruction of the entire country, including Hanoi and Haiphong.(Van Staaveren, p. 83.) The communist leadership declared a peoples war against the air war of destruction...each citizen is a soldier, each village, street, and plant a fortress on the anti-American battlefront.(Morocco, p. 96.) All except those deemed truly indispensable to the life of the capital were evacuated to the countryside. By 1967, Hanois population had been reduced by half.(Morocco, p. 137.)right|thumb|200px|North Vietnamese air defense weapons.Since gaining air superiority over U.S. forces was out of the question, the northern leadership decided to implement a policy of air deniability. At the beginning of the campaign, North Vietnam possessed approximately 1,500 anti-aircraft weapons, most of which were of the light 37 and 57mm variety. Within one year, however, the U.S. estimated that the number had grown to over 5,000 guns, including 85 and 100mm radar-directed weapons.(Morocco, p. 102.) That estimate was later revised downward from a high of 7,000 in early 1967 to less than a thousand by 1972.(Thompson, p. 40. The 1972 figure might also reflect the redeployment of anti-aircraft battalions after the end of Rolling Thunder to the defense of the Chi Minh Trail in Laos. See Commando Hunt.) Regardless, during Rolling Thunder, 80 percent of U.S. aircraft losses were attributed to anti-aircraft fire.(Thompson, p. 311.)Backing up the guns were the fighter aircraft of the North Vietnamese Air Force, which originally consisted of only 53 MiG-15 and Fresco aircraft.(Morocco, p. 102.) Though considered antiquated by the Americans when compared to their supersonic jets, the North Vietnamese turned their aircrafts weaknesses into strengths. They were fast enough for hit and run ambush operations and they were also maneuverable enough to shock the American fighter community by shooting down more advanced F-8 Crusaders and Thunderchiefs, which had to quickly develop new tactics. The newer missile-armed F-4 Phantom would become the Americans primary dogfighting platform. The simple appearance of MiGs could often accomplish their mission by causing American pilots to jettison their bomb loads as a defensive measure.(Thompson, p. 35. During the last four months of 1966, 192 American aircraft were intercepted by MiGs. Of these, 107 (56 percent) were forced to jettison their bombs . Morocco, p. 142.) In 1966, the 15s and 19s were joined by more modern Soviet-built Fishbeds, which could fight on a more equal footing with the U.S. aircraft. By 1967, the North Vietnamese Air Force was maintaining an interceptor force of 100 aircraft, many of which were based on PRC airfields and out of reach of American air attack.(Morocco, p. 148.) To protect the northern economy, it was decentralized and large factories, located in the heavily-populated Red River Delta region, were broken up and scattered into caves and small villages throughout the countryside. In the more heavily-bombed southern panhandle, entire villages moved into underground tunnel complexes for the duration. Food shortages in North Vietnam became widespread, especially in the urban areas, as rice farmers went into the military or volunteered for service repairing bomb damage.(Morocco, pps. 135139.) When the nations transportation system came under attack, destroyed bridges were repaired or replaced by dirt fords, ferries, and underwater and pontoon bridges. The system proved to be durable, well built, easily repaired, and practically impossible to shut down.(Tilford, p. 112.) Perhaps North Vietnams ultimate resource was its population, which was fired by nationalist zeal. During 1965, 97,000 North Vietnamese volunteered to work full time in repairing the damage inflicted by U.S. bombs. Another 370,000500,000 worked part time.(Morocco, p. 98.) When the nations lines of communication came under attack, railroad supply trains and truck convoys were split into smaller elements which traveled only at night. The logistical effort was supported by citizens on sampans, driving carts, pushing wheelbarrows, or man-portering supplies on their backs to keep the war effort going. They were motivated by slogans like Each kilogram of goods...is a bullet shot into the head of the American pirates.(Morocco, p. 100.)Biggest shooting gallery on EarthSAMs and Wild WeaselsNorth Vietnams deployment of SAMs forced American pilots to make hard choices: either approach targets at higher altitudes (to avoid anti-aircraft fire) and become prey to SAMs, or fly lower to avoid the missiles and become the target of anti-aircraft batteries. Due to altered tactics and the increased use of electronic radar jamming, the record of SAM kills decreased over time. The already dismal missile success rate fell from one kill for 30 launches to less than one kill for 50.(Thompson, p. 50.) Those figures do, however, say a great deal about the inefficiency of Rolling Thunder, since North Vietnams SAM batteries never lacked sufficient stocks of missiles, regardless of efforts to interdict the supply system. VA-25 during Ironhand mission 1969.jpg|thumb|U.S. Navy A-7B Corsairs armed with Shrike anti-radiation missiles, 1969.The nature of the gradual escalation had given Hanoi time to adapt to the situation. By 1967, North Vietnam had formed an estimated 25 SAM battalions (with six missile launchers each) which rotated among approximately 150 sites.(Thompson, p. 40. Average time for the displacement of a SAM battery was four hours. Two more hours produced an operational site.) With the assistance of the Soviet Union, the North Vietnamese had also quickly integrated an early warning radar system of more than 200 facilities which covered the entire country, tracking incoming U.S. raids, and then coordinating SAMs, anti-aircraft batteries, and MiGs to attack them.(Thompson, p. 41.) During 1967 U.S. losses totaled 248 aircraft (145 Air Force, 102 Navy, and one Marine Corps).(Hobson, pgs. 15166.)To survive in this ever more lethal air defense zone, the U.S. had to adopt newer, more specialized tactics. Large-scale strikes, known as force packages in the Air Force and multi-carrier strikes by the Navy, were assigned numerous support aircraft to protect the fighter-bombers. First into the target areas were specialized Iron Hand flak suppression missions. These consisted of F-105 Weasel hunter/killer teams configured with sophisticated electronic equipment to detect and locate the emissions associated with SAM guidance and control radars. The Wild Weasels also carried countermeasures (ECM) equipment to protect themselves. They directed flak suppression strikes and carried Shrike anti-radiation missiles (another Navy development), which homed in on the radar systems of the SAMs. The SA-2 had greater range than the Shrike, but if the Shrike was launched and the radar operator stayed on the air, the American missile would home in on the signal and destroy the radar source. A sophisticated cat and mouse game then ensued between North Vietnamese radar operators and the Wild Weasel pilots. The Navy also utilized aircraft in a similar role, but did not create a specialized unit like the Wild Weasels to conduct SAM suppression. Next came the bomb-laden strike aircraft protected by escort fighters (Combat Air Patrol or MIGCAP) and electronic jamming aircraft to degrade enemy radar. New ECM devices had hurriedly been deployed to protect aircraft from missile attacks, but they remained subject to frequent breakdowns because of climate conditions in Southeast Asia. Also included in the missions were KC-135 aerial tankers and Search and Rescue (SAR) helicopters, which were, in turn, protected by propeller-driven A-1 escorts.From mid-1966 until the end of 1967, President Johnson continued to dole out sensitive targets one by one to the generals while simultaneously trying to placate the doves in Congress and within his own administration with periodic cutbacks and half-hearted peace initiatives.(The most complete treatment of the search for peace is Allen E. Goodman, The Search for a Negotiated Settlement of the Vietnam War.) In the end, this erratic course satisfied no one and did little to alter the course of the war.(Van Staaveren, p. 147.)The nature of the targets and the risks involved in striking (and re-striking) them began to take a toll. of Naval Operations David McDonald reported to his co-chiefs after a trip to South Vietnam in September 1966, that Rolling Thunder aircrews were angered with the targeting process and that they faulted the campaign due to guidelines requiring repetitive air programs that seemed more than anything else to benefit enemy gunners.(Van Staaveren, p. 187.) During 1967, the second full year of Rolling Thunder operations, 362 U.S. aircraft had been lost over North Vietnam. (208 Air Force, 142 Navy, and 12 Marine Corps).(Hobson, pgs 15166.)MiGs and interdictionRolling Thunder reached the last stage of its operational evolution during 1967 and 1968. The chief purpose of the American air effort in the higher Route Packages of North Vietnam was slowly transformed into that of interdicting the flow of supplies and materiel and the destruction of those segments of the norths infrastructure that supported its military effort.Although most U.S. aircraft losses continued to be inflicted by anti-aircraft fire, U.S. Air Force F-105s and Navy Skyhawks increasingly encountered SAMs and MiGs. North Vietnamese fighters also became a particular problem because of the lack of radar coverage in the Red River Delta region, which allowed the MiGs to surprise the strike forces. Airborne early warning aircraft had difficulty detecting the fighters at low altitudes and the aircraft themselves were difficult to see visually.(Thompson, p. 17.)MiG-21 landing with chute.jpg|thumb|A missile-armed VPAF MiG-21PF landing.While F-105s did score 27 air-to-air victories, the overall exchange ratio was near parity. In January 1967, the Americans sprang a surprise on the MiGs when they launched Bolo. F-4 Phantoms, using the same radio call signs, direction of approach, altitude, and speed as a typical flight of bomb-laden F-105s, lured the MiGs toward what the MiG pilots thought would be easy prey. The result was seven MiGs shot down within 12 minutes.(Schlight, A War Too Long, p. 52.)Later in the year, the U.S. launched its most intense and sustained attempt to force North Vietnam into peace negotiations. Almost all of the targets on the Joint Chiefs list had been authorized for attack, including airfields that had been previously off-limits.(Morocco, p. 159.) Only central Hanoi, Haiphong, and the PRC border area remained prohibited from attack. A major effort was made to isolate the urban areas by downing bridges and attacking LOCs. Also struck were the Thai Nguyen steel complex (origin of the Push), thermal and electrical power plants, ship and rail repair facilities, and warehouses. North Vietnamese MiGs entered the battle en masse, as their capital was threatened and kill ratios fell to one U.S. aircraft lost for every two MiGs.(Morocco, p. 159.) During 1968, MiGs accounted for 22 percent of the 184 American aircraft (75 Air Force, 59 Navy, and five Marine Corps) lost over the north.(Hobson, 15166. See also Morocco, p. 159.) As a result, operations against the last of North Vietnams airfields, previously off-limits to attack, were authorized. Despite the best interdiction efforts of Rolling Thunder, however, the NLF and PAVN launched their largest offensive thus far in the war on 30 January 1968, striking throughout South Vietnam during the lunar new year holiday. The Offensive concluded as a military disaster for North Vietnam and its NLF allies, but it also adversely affected U.S. public opinion, which in turn affected the will of Washington.(Contrary to opinion, the U.S. public still supported the American effort in South Vietnam. It was disturbed by the magnitude of the offensive only in that its military and civilian leadership had constantly reassured them that American goals were being achieved and that there was a light at the end of the tunnel. Tet merely served notice to the administration that the public wanted either victory or an end to the open-ended commitment of American resources and manpower. Clark Dougan, et al Nineteen Sixty-Eight. Boston: Boston Publishing Company, 1983, pps. 6870.) Fortunately for North Vietnam, many U.S. bombing advocates (including Air Force Chief of Staff McConnell) did not want to risk the one aircraft capable of delivering a lot of bombs in bad weather  the B-52. Without them, there was little that could be done over the north in response to Tet, since bad weather minimized fighter operations until the beginning of April.(Thompson, pps. 124125.)End of the line Opposition  By spring 1967, Robert McNamara and other civilians in the administration had become convinced that both Rolling Thunder and the ground war in South Vietnam were not working.(McNamara, pps. 265271.) The bombing campaign had fallen far short of its goals and the disenchanted continuously opposed the Joint Chiefs recommendations for an increased tempo of bombing and the loosening of target restrictions.(McNamara, pps. 275277. See also Morocco, pps. 153154.) The generals found themselves on the horns of a dilemma of their own making. They continuously claimed that the campaign was working, yet they also had to continuously demand greater latitude in order to make the campaign succeed.(Tilford, p. 120. The military men could not back down. Unless given the opportunity to demonstrate the full potential of their services, they feared the loss of future roles and diminished budgets. Morocco, p. 153) The limited goals entailed in American foreign policy and the militarys goal of total victory were simply not reconcilable. The great conundrum had then become how to defeat North Vietnam without defeating North Vietnam.(Tilford, p. 138.)On 9 August 1967 the Armed Services Committee opened hearings on the bombing campaign. Complaints from the armed services had sparked the interest of some of the most vocal hawks on Capitol Hill.(Morocco, p. 154.) The military chiefs testified before the committee, complaining about the gradual nature of the air war and its civilian-imposed restrictions. It was obvious that McNamara, the only civilian subpoenaed and the last to testify before the committee, was to be the scapegoat.(McNamara, pps. 284291.) The Secretary of Defense marshaled his objections to an indiscriminate air war and adeptly rebutted the charges of the military chiefs.(Thompson, pps. 8182.) He bluntly admitted that there was no basis to believe that any bombing campaign...would by itself force Chi Minhs regime into submission, short, that is, of the virtual annihilation of North Vietnam and its people.(Morocco, p. 156.)It had now become clear to President Johnson that McNamara had become a liability to the administration.(Karnow, p. 454.) In February 1968, McNamara resigned his position and was replaced by Clifford, who was chosen because of his personal friendship with Johnson and his previous opposition to McNamaras suggestions that the number of troops in the South Vietnam be stabilized and that Rolling Thunder be ended.(Tilford, pps. 149150.) McNamaras position, however was almost immediately taken up by Secretary of State Dean Rusk, (until then an ardent advocate of the bombing campaign). Rusk proposed limiting the campaign to the panhandle of North Vietnam without preconditions and awaiting Hanois reaction.(Thompson, p. 135-136.) Within months Clifford too began to adopt the views of the man he had replaced, gradually becoming convinced that the U.S. had to withdraw from an open-ended commitment to the war.(Morocco, p. 183. See also Thompson, pps. 136139.) Disappointed by perceived political defeats at home and hoping that Hanoi would enter into negotiations, President Johnson announced on 31 March 1968, that all bombing north of the 19th parallel would cease.(Morocco, pps. 183184.) As a result of that decision, into the area between the 17th and 19th parallels, the Air Force and Navy began to pour all the firepower that they had formerly spread throughout North Vietnam. The Air Force doubled the number of sorties sent into Route Package One to more than 6,000 per month with the campaign concentrated on interdiction choke points, road closing, and truck hunting.(Thompson, p. 145.) Once again, the military commanders were faced a familiar dilemma: having opposed the bombing cutback, they then decided that the new policy had a lot of merit, especially when considering the alternative of no bombing at all.(Thompson, p. 141.) The North Vietnamese responded by doubling the number of anti-aircraft batteries in the panhandle, but most of their SAM batteries remained deployed around Hanoi and Haiphong.Hanoi, which had continuously stipulated that it would not conduct negotiations while the bombing continued, finally agreed to meet with the Americans for preliminary talks in Paris. As a result, President Johnson declared that a complete bombing halt over North Vietnam would go into effect on 1 November 1968, just prior to the U.S. presidential election. Although the bombing halt was to be linked to progress in the peace talks, the Joint Chiefs were skeptical that the administration would reopen the bombing campaign under any circumstances.(Thompson, p. 151.) They were correct.ConclusionsBetween March 1965 and November 1968, aircraft of the U.S. Air Force had flown 153,784 attack sorties against North Vietnam, while the Navy and Marine Corps had added another 152,399.(Thompson, p. 303.) On 31 December 1967, the Department of Defense announced that 864,000 tons of American bombs had been dropped on North Vietnam during Rolling Thunder, compared with 653,000 tons dropped during the entire War and 503,000 tons in the Pacific theater during the World War.(Berger, Carl, ed., The United States Air Force in Southeast Asia. Washington DC: Office of Air Force History, 1977, p. 366.) The CIA estimated on 1 January 1968 that damage inflicted in the north totaled $370 million in physical destruction, including $164 million worth of damage to capital assets (such as factories, bridges, and power plants). The agency also estimated that approximately 1,000 casualties had been inflicted on the North Vietnamese population per week, or approximately 90,000 for the 44-month period, 72,000 of whom were civilians.(Texas Tech University, Vietnam Virtual Archive, Appraisal of the Bombing of North Vietnam (through 1 January 1968), p. 32.)Due to combat and operational circumstances, 506 U.S. Air Force, 397 Navy, and 19 Marine Corps aircraft were lost over or near North Vietnam.(Hobson, pgs. 15116.)(Schlight, A War Too Long, p.53) During the operation, of the 745 crewmen shot down, the U.S. Air Force recorded 145 rescued, 255 killed, 222 captured (23 of whom died in captivity), and 123 missing.(Schlight, A War too Long, p. 53.) Figures on U.S. Navy and Marine Corps casualties were harder to come by. During the 44-month time frame, 454 Naval aviators were killed, captured, or missing during combined operations over North Vietnam and Laos.(Marolda, p. 82.)Rolling Thunder had begun as a campaign of psychological and strategic persuasion, but it changed very quickly to interdiction, a tactical mission.(Tilford, p. 106.) Its ultimate failure had two sources, both of which lay with the civilian and military policy-makers in Washington: First, neither group could ever conceive that the North Vietnamese would endure under the punishment that they would unleash upon it. The civilians, moreover, did not understand airpower well enough to know that their policies might be crippling it; Second, the American military leadership failed to initially propose and develop, or later to adapt, an appropriate strategy for the war.(Tilford, p. 155.)Along the way, Rolling Thunder also fell prey to the same dysfunctional managerial attitude as did the rest of the American military effort in Southeast Asia. The process of the campaign became an end unto itself, with sortie generation as the standard by which progress was measured.(Tilford, p. 132.) Sortie rates and the number of bombs dropped, however, equaled efficiency, not effectiveness.(Head, p. 37.) Moreover, North Vietnams ability to turn its weaknesses into strengths, the personal sacrifices borne stoically by its population, and the iron determination of its government made it a formidable enemy. Fortunately for North Vietnam, its military effort was not sustained solely by its domestic industry, but rather by substantial support from China and the Soviets. If enough of the supplies necessary to maintain its operations could be imported and distributed (by whatever means), that nation could not (and would not) be coerced into the capitulation of its goals. Legacy The U.S fighter community was shocked with the news that elderly subsonic fighters were inflicting losses against the F-105 Thunderchief, the fastest and most sophisticated strike fighter then in the Air Force inventory. One result was a drastic rethinking of air combat and aircraft design which had been based around delivery of nuclear weapons in Europe and missile interception. As a result the F-4 Phantom became the primary U.S. air superiority fighter for both services in the latter days of the war. The Air Forces F-4E was fitted with maneuvering slats and internal gun, while the Navy cancelled an expensive new fighter design in favor of a plane that would be more, rather than less effective, in a short-range dogfight than the Phantom. Analysis of the campaign resulted in the creation of new pilot training programs, such as the famous TOPGUN, utilizing Tigers and A-4 Skyhawks to simulate the threat of small subsonic and supersonic MiG fighters. The U.S. also started the design of a new generation of fighters that were optimized for visual-range dogfights. Although the first of these teen fighters would not enter service soon enough to cover Americas withdrawal from Vietnam, they would dominate future air battles and served into the 21st century.See also*of 23 August 1967ReferencesNotesSourcesPublished government documents*Berger, Carl, ed, The United States Air Force in Southeast Asia, 19611973. Washington DC: Office of Air Force History, 1977.*Corum, Col. Delbert, et al and Maj. Paul Burbage, et al, The Tale of Two Bridges and The Battle for the Skies over North Vietnam, 19641972. Maxwell Air Force Base AL: Air University Press, 1976.*Department of State, Aggression from the North: The Record of North Vietnams Campaign to Conquer South Vietnam. Washington DC: U.S. Government Printing Office, 1965.*Head, William P. War Above the Clouds: B-52 Operations During the Second Indochina War and the Effects of the Air War on Theory and Doctrine. Maxwell Air Force Base AL: Air University Press, 2002.*Marolda, Edward J. By Sea, Air, and Land: An Illustrated History of the U.S. Navy and the War in Southeast Asia. Washington DC: Naval Historical Center, 1994.*Schlight, Col. John, A War Too Long: The USAF in Southeast Asia, 19611975. Washington DC: Air Force History and Museums Program, 1996.*Schlight, Col. John, The War in South Vietnam: The Years of the Offensive, 19651968. Washington DC: Air Force History and Museums Program, 1999.*Spector, Ronald H. The United States Army in Vietnam: Advice and Support, 19411960. Washington DC: States Army Center of Military History, 1983.*Thompson, Wayne, To Hanoi and Back: The U.S. Air Force and North Vietnam, 19661973. Smithsonian Institution Press, 2002.*Tilford, Earl H. Setup: What the Air Force Did in Vietnam and Why. Maxwell AFB AL: Air University Press, 1991.*Van Staaveren, Jacob, Gradual Failure: The Air War Over North Vietnam, 19651966. Washington DC: Air Force History and Museums Program, 2002.*Declassified CIA documents concerning Operation Rolling ThunderDocument collections*Gravel, Senator Mike, ed., The Pentagon Papers: The Defense Department History of United States Decisionmaking on Vietnam 5 vols. Boston: Beacon Press, 1971.*Sheehan, Neil, Hedrick Smith, E.W. Kenworthy, & Fox Butterfield, The Pentagon Papers as Published by the New York Times. New York: Ballentine, 1971.Biographies & memoirs*McNamara, Robert S. with Brian VanDeMark, In Retrospect: The Tragedy and Lessons of Vietnam. New York: Times Books, 1995.*Johnson, Lyndon B. The Vantage Point: Perspective on the Presidency, 19631969. New York: Holt, Rhinehart, and Winston, 1971.Secondary sources*Clodfelter, Mark, The Limits of Airpower: The American Bombing of Vietnam. New York: Free Press, 1989.*Dougan, Clark, Stephen Weiss, et al., Nineteen Sixty-Eight. Boston: Boston Publishing Company, 1983.*Gillespie, Robert M. The Joint Chiefs of Staff and the Escalation of the Vietnam Conflict, 19641965. Unpublished Masters Thesis, Clemson University, 1994.*Goodman, Allen E., The Search for A Negotiated Settlement of the Vietnam War. New York:  Berkeley CA: University of California Press, 1986.*Kahin, George M. Intervention: How America Became Involved in Vietnam. New York: Knopf, 1986.*Hobson, Chris, Vietnam Air Losses: U.S. Air Force, Navy, and Marine Corps Fixed-Wing Aircraft Losses in Southeast Asia, 19611973. Hinkley UK: Midlands Press, 2001.*McMaster, H.R. Dereliction of Duty: Lyndon Johnson, Robert McNamara, and the Joint Chiefs of Staff and the Lies That Led to Vietnam. New York: Harper Collins, 1997.*Moise Edwin E., Tonkin Gulf and the Escalation of the Vietnam War. Chapel Hill NC: University of North Carolina Press, 1996.*Morocco, John Thunder from Above: Air War, 19411968. Boston: Boston Publishing Company, 1984.*Nichols, John B. On Yankee Station: The Naval Air War over Vietnam. Annapolis MD: Naval Institute Press, 2001.*Smith, John T. Rolling Thunder: The Strategic Bombing Campaign, North Vietnam, 19651968. Kensington Publishing Group, 1987.External links* Bibliography: Operation Rolling ThunderRolling ThunderRolling ThunderRolling ThunderRolling ThunderThunder hadmveletRolling ThunderRolling ThunderRolling ThunderRolling ThunderRolling ThunderRolling Thunderdch Sm Rnzh:
226985
Vermiculite
 references   (http://www.mindat.org/min-4170.html Mindat.org)(http://rruff.geo.arizona.edu/doclib/hom/vermiculite.pdf Handbook of Mineralogy)(http://webmineral.com/data/Vermiculite.shtml Webmineral data)Vermiculite is a natural mineral that expands with the application of heat. The expansion process is called exfoliation and it is routinely accomplished in purpose-designed commercial furnaces. Vermiculite is formed by weathering or hydrothermal alteration of biotite or phlogopite.( Large commercial vermiculite mines currently exist in Russia, Africa, China, and Brazil.OccurrenceVermiculite was first described in 1824 for an occurrence in Millbury, County, Massachusetts, USA. Its name is from Latin vermiculare, to breed worms, for the manner in which it exfoliates when heated.(It typically occurs as an alteration product at the contact between felsic and mafic or ultramafic rocks such as pyroxenites and dunites. It also occurs in carbonatites and metamorphosed magnesium rich limestone. Associated mineral phases include: corundum, apatite, serpentine and talc. It occurs interlayered with chlorite, biotite and phlogopite.(StructureVermiculite is a 2:1 clay, meaning it has 2 tetrahedral sheets for every one octahedral sheet. It is a limited expansion clay with a medium capacity. Vermiculite has a high exchange capacity at 100-150 meq/100 g. Vermiculite clays are weathered micas in which the potassium ions between the molecular sheets are replaced by magnesium and iron ions.Commercial uses*moulded shapes bonded with silicate for use in:**high-temperature insulation**refractory insulation**fireproofing of structural steel and pipes*conditioner*as loose-fill insulation*packing material, valued for its high absorbency*suitable as a substrate for various animals and/or incubation of eggs*lightweight aggregate for plaster, proprietary concrete compounds, firestop mortar and cementitious spray fireproofing*as an additive to fireproof wallboard*component of the interior fill for pillows, along with graphite*carrier for dry handling and slow release of agricultural chemicals*soil additive for plants, together with perlite for potted plants*growing medium for hydroponics.*means to permit slow cooling of hot pieces in glassblowing, lampwork, steelwork, and beadmaking*used in in-ground swimming pools to provide a smooth pool base*used in commercial warmers*used as a sterile medium for the incubation of reptile eggs*light-weight insulative concrete*used in AGA cookers as insulation*used in explosives storage as a mitigant*used to absorb hazardous liquids for solid disposal*used in gas fireplaces to simulate embers*used as a coating/impregnation on fiberglass sleeve, tape, rope and fabric to increase the useful temperature range and to add abrasion resistance.since it is lite weight in nature it is also used as a water proofing concrete in terrace floor, toilet sunken, etc.,*used as part of a substrate for fungi cultivationCommercial manufacture of exfoliated vermiculitethumb|right|Vermiculite output in 2005In 2005, South Africa was the top producer of vermiculite with about 40% world share followed by the USA and China, reports the Geological Survey.While some exfoliators focus on only a few of the possible applications, others can provide vermiculite products for all its applications. It is common for vermiculite exfoliators to exfoliate perlite also, as both are often sold together. For those who want to set up a new exfoliation process, it is possible to find expert consultants to advise in the design and construction of the desired facilities. Vermiculite exfoliators have an international trade association called The Vermiculite Association to represent the industrys interests and to exchange information. Many of its members also maintain memberships in The Perlite Institute.FireproofingSprays containing asbestos are still widely used for fireproofing in some parts of the world.  These sprays contain aggregates of MMMF (man-made-mineral-fibres) including rockwool and ceramic fibres.  The cementitious versions of these fireproofing sprays contain cement and lightweight aggregates of the plaster vermiculite.  Vermiculite ore, particularly those mined from the U.S., usually is contaminated with asbestos.  Danger of exposure to asbestos in these sprays is greatly increased when not handling following proper industrial hygiene procedures.Asbestos contaminationAlthough not all vermiculite contains asbestos, some products were made with vermiculite that contained asbestos until the early 1990s. Vermiculite mines throughout the world are now regularly tested for it and are supposed to sell products that contain no asbestos. The former vermiculite mine in Libby, Montana, did have tremolite asbestos as well as winchite and richterite (both fibrous amphiboles) &mdash; in fact, it was formed underground through essentially the same geologic processes as the contaminants.  A vermiculite mine in Virginia has also been found to be contaminated by asbestos.(http://www.seattlepi.com/uncivilaction/asb04.shtml)Pure vermiculite does not contain asbestos and is non-toxic, but it can become contaminated over long periods if there is a presence of a secondary mineral called diopside.  After millions of years of weathering, the biotite turns into vermiculite and the diopside turns into asbestos.Controversy over health risksThe largest and oldest vermiculite mine in the United States was started in the 1920s, at Montana, and the vermiculite was sold under the commercial name Zonolite.  The Zonolite brand and the mine was acquired by the W.R. Grace Company in 1963.  Mining operations at the Libby site stopped in 1990 in response to asbestos contamination.  While in operation, the Libby mine may have produced 80% of the worlds supply of vermiculite.()The United States government estimates that vermiculite was used in more than 35 million homes, but does not recommend its removal. Nevertheless, homes or structures containing vermiculite or vermiculite insulation dating from before the mid 1990sand especially those known to contain the Zonolite brandmay contain asbestos, and therefore may be a health concern.An article published in the Lake Tribune on December 3, 2006, reported that vermiculite and Zonolite had been found to contain asbestos, which had led to cancers such as those found in asbestos-related cases. The article stated that there had been a cover-up by W.R. Grace Company and others regarding the health risks associated with vermiculite and that several sites in the Lake Valley had been remediated by the EPA when they were shown to be contaminated with asbestos. W.R. Grace Company has vigorously denied these charges.The vermiculite deposit at the mine in Libby, Montana, was (and is) heavily contaminated with asbestos.(AP Feature on Libby, MT: For asbestos-ravaged town, questions persist. Accessed May 24, 2010.) Numerous people were knowingly(Dean, Cornelia. http://www.hereandnow.org/shows/2009/02/rundown-219/ ) exposed to the harmful dust of vermiculite that contained asbestos.  Unfortunately, the mine had been operating since the 1920s, and environmental and industrial controls were virtually non-existent until the mine was purchased by the W.R. Grace Company in 1963. Yet, knowing the human health risks, the mining company still continued to operate there until 1990. Consequently, many of the former miners and residents of Libby have been affected and continue to suffer health problems. Over 200 people in the town have died from asbestos-related disease due to contamination from vermiculite mining from nearby Zonolite Mountain, where soil samples were found to be loaded with fibrous tremolite (known to be a very toxic form of asbestos), and countless others there who insulated their homes with Zonolite have succumbed to asbestos-related diseases, most of whom never were employed in environments where asbestos was an issue.()After a 1999 Post-Intelligencer story claimed that asbestos-related disease was common in the town, the EPA, in response to political pressure, made cleanup of the site a priority and called Libby the worst case of community-wide exposure to a toxic substance in U.S. history.()() The EPA has spent $120 million in Superfund money on cleanup.( In October 2006, W. R. Grace Company tried to appeal the fines levied on them from the EPA, but the Supreme Court rejected the appeal.() The States government is also pursuing criminal charges against several former executives and managers of the mine for allegedly disregarding and covering up health risks to employees.(  They are also accused of obstructing the governments cleanup efforts and wire fraud. To date, according to the indictment, approximately 1,200 residents of the Libby area have been identified as suffering from some kind of asbestos-related abnormality.()  Jury selection was to have been completed in February, 2009.()()The case ended in acquittals on May 8, 2009.(http://abcnews.go.com/US/wireStory?id7539715) On June 17, 2009, the EPA issued a public health emergency in and near Libby, thereby allowing Federal agencies to provide funding for health care, and for removal of contaminated insulation from affected homes.(Dean, Cornelia. U.S. Cites Emergency in Asbestos-Poisoned Town York Times, June 18, 2009.)See also*fire protection*Fireproofing*Firestop*Asbestos*Perlite*silicate*Plaster*of minerals*foot gardeningReferencesExternal links*United States Senator Patty Murray*Environmental Working Group*United States Environmental Protection Agency*The Vermiculite Association http://www.vermiculite.org/*The Perlite Association http://www.perlite.org/*Petition for writ of certiorari to U.S. Supreme Court (April 27, 2006)af:Vermikulietar:ca:Vermiculitacs:Vermikulitde:Vermiculites:Vermiculitaeu:Bermikulitafa:fr:Vermiculitegl:Vermiculitait:Vermiculitehe:ka:kk:nl:Vermiculietja:no:Vermikulittpl:Wermikulitpt:Vermiculitaru:simple:Vermiculitesk:Vermikulitsr:fi:Vermikuliittisv:Vermikulittr:Vermiklituk:zh:
229174
Ranong_Province
 footnotes                Ranong (Thai ) is one of the southern provinces (changwat) of Thailand, on the coast of the Sea. It is the province with the fewest citizens. Neighboring provinces are (from north clockwise) Chumphon, Surat Thani and Phang Nga. To the west, it also borders Kawthaung, Tanintharyi,  Myanmar.GeographyRanong is located on the Isthmus, the narrow strip that connects mainland Thailand with the Peninsula, on the west side of the mountain range. It has a long coast on the Sea. The province is known for having the most rainfall of all Thailand, the rainy season lasting for about eight months. In 1955 the annual rainfall reached 6,699.5 mm, compared to about 1,200 in central Thailand.The province is the least populated province of Thailand; 80% of the area is covered by forests, and 67% is mountainous terrain. Historically the major industry was tin mining, but most mines are now exhausted. White clay mining for the production of porcelain and fishing are the main industries today, together with rubber and nut farming.The Biosphere Reserve in the north of Kapoe covering 303.09 km was declared in 1997. It is the fourth biosphere reserve of Thailand, but the only one located at the coast to protect the mangrove forests. In the south of the province is the Nakha Wildlife Sanctuary.HistoryKhaw Soo Cheang was a Chinese immigrant from Zhangzhou-fu, Fukien Province. He was an officer of the Small Knives Secret Society, which was fighting to restore the Dynasty. His other name was Khaw Teng Hai, and his alias was Khaw Soo Cheang (Please see the Chinese inscription on his tomb in Ranong). In 1810 he arrived in Penang and stayed in Sungai Tiram which is about 1 kilometer from the present Lepas International Airport where he was engaged in small-scale vegetable farming. Once a week Khaw Soo Cheang would take his produce down to Jelutong to sell.Khaw Soo Cheang subsequently went into trading and started a small sundries shop business under the name of Koe Guan. Subsequently he started trading up the coast of what is today Southern Thailand. Khaw Soo Cheang had six sons, of which Khaw Sim Cheng was the eldest, Khaw Sim Kong the second, Khaw Sim Chua the third, Khaw Sim Khim the fourth, Khaw Sim Teik the fifth, and Khaw Sim Bee the sixth. The eldest son Sim Cheng is belevied to be the son by his China born wife who remains unknown to the descendants today . Sim Kong , Sim Chua, Sim Khim  and Sim teik are the sons of his wife Sit Kim Lean who is venerated by the descendants as the lady ancestor and is buried in Ranong. Sim Bee his youngest son was from one of his Thai Wifes.  From trading Khaw Soo Cheang diversified into tin mining, shipping and supplying immigrant labourers. In 1844 he was appointed Royal Collector of tin royalties in the Ranong area, and received the title Luang Ratanasethi. In 1854 King Mongkut made him governor of Ranong and elevated him to the rank of Phra. At the time Ranong was subordinate to province, but in 1864 it was elevated to full provincial status, and Khaw Soo Cheang became a Phraya. He successfully defended the new province against being invaded and annexed by the Burmese. The family became close to the Thai royal court, especially Prince Damrong, who stayed at the family home in Penang, which was named Chakrabong in honour of the  Thai royal family. in 1872 Khaw Soo Cheang who was then an old man of 81 sailed back to China where he married an 18-year-old damsel. Prior to that voyage he had a will made by the venerable firm of Presgrave and Matthews in Penang.The eldest son, Khaw Sim Cheng, died before his father who died in 1882. The second son, Khaw Sim Kong became the next governor of Ranong  in 1874 In 1896 Sim Kong became commissioner of the Monthon of Chumphon. His fourth son, Sim Khim, became governor of Kraburi, and the fifth son, Sim Teik, became governor of Langsuan. Khaw Sim Bee, the youngest son,  Mahison Phakdi became governor of Trang, and in 1900 commissioner of Monthon Phuket. The Khaw family founded a steamship company known as  Eastern shipping company. Subsequently they founded a trading concern known, Eastern Trading company which they tried to list on the stock exchange unsuccessfully. Their business empire also included , Tongkah Harbour the first Asian company involved in dredging the harbor floor for tin (a publicly listed company). The Penang branch of the family were also one of the founders of an insurance company known as Khean Guan Insurance .In his will dated 1872 Khaw Soo Cheang divided his estate into 16 parts, of which 15 parts were distributed to his descendants. One-sixteenth was used to set up Koe Guan Kong Lun, the family trust, which came into existence in 1905. Under the terms of the Trust Deed, it was stated that 21 years after the death of the last person whose name appeared in the Trust deed the trust would be vested. The last person whose name appeared on the trust deed who died was his great-grandson Khaw Bian Ho, who died on October 21, 1972. Twenty-one years later on October 21, 1993, the Trust was vested, and the Trustees began the process of winding up Koe Guan Kong Lun. Khaw Soo Cheang who gave up his position as Governor of Ranong in 1874 arranged for his 2nd son Khaw Sim Kong to lead the family enterprise in Thailand until the latters death in 1912. His fourth son Khaw Sim Khim took on the role of managing and leading the family interest in Penang until his death in 1903.However after the death of Khaw Sim Bee in 1913, a commissioner from outside the area was appointed to stop the traditionally inherited administrative power of the family. The family essentially divided into the Malaysian and Thai portions of the family. In 1932 all Chinese immigrants and their descendants had to adopt a Thai name after the military coup. The family of Khaw Soo Cheang on the Thai side of the border had been given the name meaning from Ranong by the Thai King and became the Na Ranong family. In Malaysia and elsewhere they are still known as the Khaw family.Khaw Soo Cheang, Khaw Sim Kong. Khaw Sim Teik and Khaw Sim Bees tombs are today located in Ranong. The tombs of Khaw Sim Khim is located in Batu Lanchang Chinese cemetery while Khaw Sim Chua who had no sons is purportedly buried off Kampar Road in Penang. Today the eldest son Sim Cheng and the third son Sim Chuas family are extinct.Today the only vestige of his presence in Penang is the Penang state hall known as Dewan Sri Pinang which sits on the land known as Ranong grounds which was given by the Khaw family to the then government of the day in gratitude for the opportunities. The houses where the Khaw family resided on the famous millionaires road Northam Road such as Asdang, Chakrabong and the house owned by Khaw Sim Khim opposite the old Shih Chung school besides No 32, have all been sold and demolished and no longer remain in the hands of the family.SymbolsThe provincial seal shows a castle on top of a hill, to remember that King Chulalongkorn (Rama V) once visited Ranong and stayed at the Ratana Rangsan Castle on top of the Niveskiri Hill.The provincial tree is the Banaba (Lagerstroemia speciosa), and the provincial flower is the orchid formosum.Administrative divisionsright|150px|Map of AmphoeRanong is subdivided into five districts (amphoe). These are further subdivided into 30 subdistricts (tambon) and 167 villages (muban). Ranong itself is the only town (mueang), and there are five more subdistrict municipalities (tambon).TourismSightsRattanarangsarn Palace (  ) ...Phraya Damrong sutjarit Mahitsornpakdee (Kor Sim Kong) built this throne hall for the residence of King Rama V during the royal visit to Ranong Province on April 2325, 1890. It is located on the hilltop named Niwest Kiree. But the original throne hall was later dismantled and replaced by the city hall and then the new provincial hall was built in 2002. It was made of teak wood. It is a historical tourist attraction of Ranong residents. Ranong Governors Grave ()  This Chinese grave of  Phraya Rattanasetthi (Kho Su Chiang), Ranongs first governor, is situated on a piece of land dedicated by King Rama V. There are three tiers of stone platform with steps leading up to the grave with antique granite sculptures of Chinese noblemen, horses, goats and lions on both sides.Hot Springs and Raksawarin Public Park  () The hot springs have been a popular tourist spot ever since King Rama V visited Ranong in 1890. There are three natural spring pools. The temperature of the water in the pools remains constant at about 65 C.Wat Hat Som Paen  () This temple is on Khlong Hat Som Paen and provides a sanctuary for a shoal of soro brook carp.Wat suwan Khiri () It contains a Burmese style Chedi, over 70 years old and 10 metres in height, which was built by a Burmese, a main ordination hall or Phra Ubosot where a beautifully bejeweled standing Buddha image is enshrined and a belfry decorated with a feline pattern.Namtok Punyaban () Formerly known as Namtok Set Takuat, this 20-metre high waterfall is located at Mu 1 Tambon Bang Non, on the right at km. 597 on Highway No.4 towards Chumphon.Namtok Ton Phet () Surrounded by moist evergreen forest with Ranongs highest Phota Chong Dong Mountains being the source of water, each tier of the falls cascades down boulders all year round.Phukhao Ya (Grass Hill) or Khao Hua Lan (Bald Hill) () Known to locals by a variety of names and endearingly referred to as Thailands version of a Swiss pasture, this hill is something of an anomaly as it is completely treeless, being covered instead by a thick blanket of grass. Namtok Ngao National Park ()  Covering a total area of approximately 417,500 rai in Amphoe La-un and Amphoe Mueang of Ranong and Amphoe Sawi, Amphoe Thung Tako, Amphoe Lang Suan and Amphoe Phato of Chumphon, it was declared a national park on 3 June, 1999.Ngao Mangrove Forest Research Centre ()  has been declared a World Biosphere Reserve Zone by UNESCO owing to the essential role this mangrove plays in maintaining the regions ecological integrity. Many species of marine life come to the mangrove to mate, incubate their eggs and care for their young until the offspring are strong enough to face the perils of the open sea. Hat Chan Damri () This small beach and pier, and a nearby hillside viewpoint offer good vantage points from which to witness seafaring life along the mouth of Ranongs principal river.Victoria Point or Ko Song (   ) An island in neighbouring MyanmarChang (Ranong) () With an area of 18 square kilometres and 80 homes on the entire island. Cashew and para rubber plantations as well as coastal fisheries are the peoples main industries.Ko Phayam () is famous for both its long fine white sandy beaches and for the cashew nuts which are grown on the island. A number of sea gypsies, or Chao Le, live on the island as well. Mangrove Arboretum () Located within Pa Khlong Lamliang-La-un National Reserve area and attached to a concession forest, the mangrove became under concession for 15 years before reforestation under the Khlong La-un Mangrove project. Two years later, it was developed into a mangrove arboretum with a 1,500-metre long boardwalk being constructed.Royal Initial Stones () There is an area where the royal initials of King Rama V were inscribed onto a stone to mark his royal visit. There are also inscriptions of Their Majesties King Adulyadej and Queen Sirikits as well as Her Royal Highness Princess Chakri Sirindhorns initials on their royal visit.Kho Khot Kra or Kra Isthmus (  ) The Kra Isthmus is the Malay Peninsulas narrowest point, spanning a mere 44 kilometres from the of Thailand on the east coast to the Andaman Sea on the west coast.  The Kra Isthmus provides an excellent vantage point from which to see the Kra Buri River forming a natural boundary between Thailand and Myanmar.Tham Phra Khayang () Despite its small scale, this cave is related to a legend of the establishment of the district. Some 40 metres deep inside, a staircase leads upward and further outside the cave to where some rare herbs are believed to have been grown. Namtok Chum Saeng or Namtok Sai Rung () In the rainy season, a lot of water cascades down the boulders in rainbow splashes. This is how it is called Namtok Sai Rung or Rainbow Waterfall.Namtok Bok Krai () At the end of the road, a 20-metre walk through farmland and a moist forest will lead to this enormous waterfall that runs throughout the year.Khlong Nakha Wildlife Reserve () This wildlife reserve houses a breathtaking waterfall known as Namtok Phan Met () amid a stretch of verdant forest.Laem Son National Park  () It covers a total area of 196,875 rai. It also covers islands in the Andaman Sea; namely, Ko Khangkhao and Mu Ko Kam. Places of interest within the national park include:Hat Bang Ben () is a long and vast sandy beach shaded by pine trees where the national park headquarters is located.Hat Laem Son () is a white sandy beach approximately 4 kilometres next to Hat Bang Ben.Hat Praphat or Hat Hin Thung (  ) is located at Mu 2 Tambon Kam Phuan. Similar to Hat Bang Ben, Hat Praphat is a large beach shaded by pine trees.Ko Khangkhao () is an island with fine sandy beaches and a gravel beach known as Hat Hin Ngam in the north.Ko Kam Yai () is a scenic island with white sandy beaches almost all around.Ko Kam Nui () is not far from Ko Kam Yai with beaches on one side and many other nearby islets.Khao Fa Chi () So named because of its resemblance to a traditional Thai food cover, Fa Chi hill is located in Tambon Bang Kaeo. The hill provides an excellent vantage from which to see two rivers, the Kra Buri and the La-un, converge. Japanese soldiers used this area as a port, sending support to Burma during the Second World War.Japanese Shipwreck () Approximately 2 kilometres beyond Chao Fa Chi, a wreck of a Japanese logistic warship used in World War II between a pier in Tambon Pak Chan, Amphoe Kra buri and Burma is visible at low tide.Local productsRanong is renowned for its preserved seafood such as dried shrimp, shrimp paste, as well as cashew nut and dumplings.ActivitiesCruising along the Kra Buri River ()   Fishing and Diving at Mu Ko Kam (  )Hiking in Mangrove Forests ()   The mangrove forests along the shore, at the mouths of the rivers, and on islands, though covering a relatively small area of the province, are essential to the regions integrity and continued prosperity. The people of Ranong take pride in having some of the best preserved and protected mangrove forests in the country. Twenty-five of the worlds sixty-eight species of mangrove trees can be found in the province.	Elephant Riding ()   Near the hot springs in Raksawarin Public Park, there is a forest management unit responsible for protecting and maintaining the adjacent forest.Culture FestivalsVisit Ranong and Andaman Fair () Held in March, the Fair features exhibitions by various organizations, booth displays of travel agencies and folk sports activities.	Image Boat Procession and Races ( ) Held cooperatively by Thai and Burmese people during the first three days of the waning moon of the eleventh lunar month, the event features a Buddha image boat competition. Boats will be decorated to carry Buddha images and will float in procession along the Kra Buri River, near the Kra Isthmus, passing by riverside communities. There will be a boat song contest and boat races as well as other forms of entertainment in front of the Kra Buri District Office.ReferencesExternal links*Province page from the Tourist Authority of Thailand*Official website*Website of Kiwi Orchid  containing a Ranong travel guide*Ranong provincial map, coat of arms and postal stampRanongHbo:(Provinz)fa:de RanongRanongdi Ranongms:RanongRanongja:(provins)Ranong(provncia)()Province(provins)th:()(tnh)zh-classical:(lalawigan)wuu:zh:
231301
Progressive_cavity_pump
right|linkImage:Progressive_cavity_pump_animation.gifA progressive cavity pump is a type of positive displacement pump and is also known as a progressing cavity pump, eccentric screw pump or even just cavity pump.  It transfers fluid by means of the progress, through the pump, of a sequence of small, fixed shape, discrete cavities, as its rotor is turned. This leads to the flow rate being proportional to the rotation rate (bidirectionally) and to low levels of shearing being applied to the pumped fluid. Hence these pumps have application in fluid metering and pumping of viscous or shear sensitive materials. The cavities taper down toward their ends and overlap with their neighbours, so that, in general, no flow pulsing is caused by the arrival of cavities at the outlet, other than that caused by compression of the fluid or pump components.As is common in engineering generally, these pumps can often be referred to by using a trademark.  Hence names can vary from industry to industry and even regionally; examples include: Moineau (after the inventor, Moineau), Mono pump, Moyno pump, Mohno pump.A progressive cavity pump also can act as a motor when fluid is pumped through the interior.  Applications include well drilling. Theory Image:Progressive cavity pump rotor.png|thumb|right|The helical rotor and the two joints of the drive mechanism.Image:Progressive cavity pump rubber stator.png|thumb|right|A drawing of the rubber stator.thumb|right|Shape of the cavities left between the rotor and the stator.The progressive cavity pump consists of a helical rotor and a twin helix, twice the wavelength and double the diameter helical hole in a rubber stator. The rotor seals tightly against the rubber stator as it rotates, forming a set of fixed-size cavities in between.The cavities move when the rotor is rotated but their shape or volume does not change. The pumped material is moved inside the cavities.()The principle of this pumping technique is frequently misunderstood. Often it is believed to occur due to a dynamic effect caused by drag, or friction against the moving teeth of the screw rotor. However in reality it is due to the sealed cavities, like a pump, and so has similar operational characteristics, such as being able to pump at extremely low rates, even to high pressure, revealing the effect to be purely positive displacement (see pump).At a high enough pressure the sliding seals between cavities will leak some fluid rather than pumping it, so when pumping against high pressures a longer pump with more cavities is more effective, since each seal has only to deal with the pressure difference between adjacent cavities. Pumps with between two and a dozen or so cavities exist.When the rotor is rotated, it rolls around the inside surface of the hole. The motion of the rotor is the same as the smaller gears of a gears system. As the rotor simultaneously rotates and moves around, the combined motion of the eccentrically mounted drive shaft is in the form of a hypocycloid. In the typical case of single-helix rotor and double-helix stator, the hypocycloid is just a straight line. The rotor must be driven through a set of joints or other mechanisms to allow for the movement.()The rotor takes a form similar to a corkscrew, and this, combined with the off-center rotary motion, leads to the alternative name; eccentric screw pump.Different rotor shapes and rotor/stator pitch ratios exist, but are specialized in that they dont generally allow complete sealing, so reducing low speed pressure and flow rate linearity, but improving actual flow rates, for a given pump size, and/or the pumps solids handling ability. Operation of Cavity Pumps In operation progressive cavity pumps are fundamentally fixed flow rate pumps, like pumps and pumps, and this type of pump needs a fundamentally different understanding to the types of pumps to which people are more commonly first introduced, namely ones that can be thought of as generating a pressure. This can lead to the mistaken assumption that all pumps can have their flow rates adjusted by using a valve attached to their outlet, but with this type of pump this assumption is a problem, since such a valve will have practically no effect on the flow rate and completely closing it will involve very high, probably damaging, pressures being generated. In order to prevent this, pumps are often fitted with cut-off pressure switches, burst disks (deliberately weak and easily replaced points), or a bypass pipe that allows a variable amount a fluid to return to the inlet. With a bypass fitted, a fixed flow rate pump is effectively converted to a fixed pressure one.At the points where the rotor touches the stator, the surfaces are generally traveling transversely, so small areas of sliding contact occur.  These areas need to be lubricated by the fluid being pumped (lubrication).  This can mean that more torque is required for starting, and if allowed to operate without fluid, called run dry, rapid deterioration of the stator can result.While progressive cavity pumps offer long life and reliable service transporting thick or lumpy fluids, abrasive fluids will significantly shorten the life of the stator; as abrasive fluids will shorten the life of any type of pump. However, slurries (particulates in a medium) can be pumped reliably as long as the medium is viscous enough to maintain a lubrication layer around the particles and so provide protection to the stator. Typical design of Cavity Pumps Specific designs involve the rotor of the pump being made of a steel, coated in a smooth hard surface, normally chromium, with the body (the stator) made of a molded elastomer inside a metal tube body.  The elastomer core of the stator forms the required complex cavities.  The rotor is held against the inside surface of the stator by angled link arms, bearings (which have to be within the fluid) allowing it to roll around the inner surface (un-driven).  Elastomer is used for the stator to simplify the creation of the complex internal shape, created by means of casting, which also improves the quality and longevity of the seals by progressively swelling due to absorption of water and/or other common constituents of pumped fluids. Elastomer/pumped fluid compatibility will thus need to be taken into account.Two common designs of stator are the equal-walled and the unequal-walled. The latter, having greater elastomer wall thickness at the peaks allows larger-sized solids to pass through because of its increased ability to distort under pressure. The former have a constant elastomer wall thickness and therefore exceed in most other aspects such as pressure per stage, precision, heat transfer, wear and weight, but they are more expensive due to the complex shape of the outer tube. History In 1930, Moineau, a pioneer of aviation, while inventing a compressor for jet engines, discovered that this principle could also work as a pumping system. The University of Paris awarded Ren Moineau a doctorate of science for his thesis on the new capsulism. His pioneering dissertation laid the groundwork for the Progressing Cavity Pump.In 1932, Moineau partnered with Robert Bienaim of the Gvelot Group to found PCM Pompes, now PCM, who is based worldwide.Typical application areas*Food and drink pumping*Oil pumping*Slurry pumping*Sewage sludge pumping*Viscous chemical pumping*Stormflow screeningSpecific uses*Grout/Cement Pump*Lubrication oil pump*Marine Diesel fuel pump*Mining slurry pump*Oilfield motors*Winery use*Water Pump use for waterReferencesExternal links*Compensating Eccentric Motion in Progressing Cavity Pumps - Detailed pump development description*Eureka magazine article - Magazine Entry/Description for a Pump from Netzsch,*Progressive Cavity Pumps - A concise description of progressive cavity pump operation from the and Agriculture Organizationde:Exzenterschneckenpumpede tornilloponpakawitacyjnasv:Skruvpump
232402
Decepticon
Nemesis The Decepticons are usually depicted as the antagonists in the universes of the Transformers toyline and related comics and cartoons, and the enemies of the Autobots.()()() The villains take many forms, and have many different origins and stories across the numerous different Transformers media, but in almost all incarnations, they are led by Megatron. They are typically represented by the purple facial insignia they all wear. Primarily, Decepticons have red eyes, while Autobots have blue eyes. They are usually known for their air power, especially since many of them turn into aircraft. They often turn into military vehicles, construction vehicles, and even smaller-than-human-sized objects.Most Decepticons think very little of humans and consider them no better than pests or insects. A version decepticons work at CJL and steal energy ressources from honest working humans. Once the ressources are depleted,  Melgars as they are known at CJL come from latino countries, moove to other feeding grounds. This is strongly emphasized in the 2007 film Transformers, when Megatron is seen flicking a human like a bug and saying disgusting. Another example is when the Decepticon Frenzy complained about how the stupid insects tried to shoot him. In the animated series, Starscream works with the human, Arkeville and comments about how little he cares about destroying the entire planet Earth in order to achieve his goal.In the Japanese version of the franchise, the Decepticons are called Destron or Deathtron ( Desutoron). The one exception to this naming convention is Car Robots, where the sub-group referred to as Decepticons in the Robots in Disguise adaptation, is known in Japan as the Combatrons (the Japanese name of the G1 subgroup known as the Combaticons). The overall name of the Robots in Disguise villain faction is Destronger. However, the Japanese Version of Transformers Animated uses Decepticon ().MembersTransformers: Generation 1Marvel ComicsIn the Marvel comic continuity, it was established that the Decepticons came in and out of the gladiator pits on Cybertron. Early on, the leadership of the Decepticons constantly changed due to their tendency to kill and replace their leaders. It would not be until a lowly Decepticon affiliated gladiator named Megatron assumed the throne that the Decepticons became a true threat to the rest of the population of Cybertron.While Megatron was the primary leader, other Decepticons had prominent roles as leaders of the group. Shockwave, Scorponok, Bludgeon, and Ratbat all led the Decepticons, often overthrowing Megatron in the process or taking over the group during the period when Megatron was believed dead.In the G2 Marvel series (which continues from the G1 Marvel series), it is stated that the Decepticon forces on Cybertron underwent a massive split in the wake of Megatrons disappearance when Megatron, Optimus Prime, and their respective troops crashed on Earth. The smartest, strongest, and most intelligent Decepticons left Cybertron to colonize nearby galaxies, leaving a token leadership of overly cruel and duplicitous Decepticons to control Cybertron. These Decepticons who left their homeworld became The Second Generation Decepticons, who were led by the villainous Maximo. On the final page of the last issue, the Liege Maximo indicates that the Decepticons and all their descendants came from him, which indicates that he is the original founder of the Decepticons.Animated seriesIn the original animated series continuity, the Decepticons owe their warlike ways to their factions origin as military hardware robots, created by the five-faced aliens, the Quintessons, while the Autobots were designed as consumer goods. Following the rebellion that forced the Quintessons off the planet, the Decepticons - as they named themselves - lusting for power, began a civil war. The Autobots could not hope to match the superior firepower and battlefield powers of the Decepticons, and instead turned to stealth, developing the art of transformation, modifying their bodies so that they could assume other forms. With this additional power, the Autobots were able to win the conflict, and a period of peace began, known as the Golden Age of Cybertron, when energy was plentiful and the planet shone with a golden hue.Working in secret, the Decepticons also developed transformation technology, along with new robot-mode flight powers, and, under the command of one of the first of this new breed, Megatron, they attacked one of the capitals outer cities, killing the current Autobot leader. As the knowledge of this act was not made public, younger robots continued to idolize these powerful new flying robots - until one such young robot, Pax, was duped by Megatron into allowing him access to an energy storage facility. Megatron turned on Pax and fatally injured him, but the ancient Autobot, Trion, then rebuilt Pax into the first of a new, battle-hardy breed of Autobot - now, he was Prime, leader of the Autobots, who led them against Megatron and the Decepticons as the civil war erupted once more.After five million years, Cybertron was nearly depleted of all its energy when the Decepticons received word that the Autobots were planning to search for new energy resources. Following the Autobot ship, the Ark, in their ship, the Nemesis, the Decepticons boarded the Ark and engaged the Autobots on their ship. Unfortunately, the Ark drifted too close to Earth and crashed landed in a volcano. All the occupants of the Ark went into emergency stasis, while the Decepticons on the Nemesis ejected to South America. There, they scanned the forms of local insects, becoming the Insecticons. After 4 million years, the volcano the Ark was wedged in, erupted in Earth year 1984, restarting its computer, I. Sending out Spy Satellites, Teletraan created alternative forms out of Earth vehicles for any transformers caught in its scanning beam (Like Eagles for Skywarp and a truck for Prime). The Decepticons awakened first but later the Autobots did too, thanks to Starscreams carelessness.By the Earth year 2005, however, the Decepticons had succeeded in completely conquering Cybertron. In a final attempt to destroy the remaining Autobots they attacked Autobot City on Earth but were defeated. On their way back to Cybertron Astrotrain encountered difficulty leaving Earths gravity due to an over-large payload. Starscream convinced the others to jettison all the damaged and dying decepticons, including Megatron. Megatron was then found by Unicron who offered to rebuild him in return for destroying the Matrix of Leadership. Megatron was reformed into Galvatron who returned to Cybertron, destroyed Starscream for his treacherry and reassumed command of the Decpticons. Galvatron then attempted to use the Matrix against Unicron, provoking him into attacking Cybertron. The attack coupled with the temporary loss of Galvatron shattered the decepticon forces, allowing the Autobots to reclaim their home planet. The Decepticons fled to the planet Chaar, a world of ash and ruin, where they struggled to survive until Galvatron returned to them and reorganized them into a fighting force, battling to take back Cybertron.IDW PublishingThe origins of the Decepticons in the IDW continuity would be explored in Transformers: Megatron Origin, which confirmed Megatron as their founder in this timeline. On the run after an attack on an Autobot Senator after a mining dispute, Megatron stumbled onto underground gladiator games in the state of Kaon and quickly became one of its rising stars. However, it only truly became more than this when Ratbat, seeing an opportunity for profit, dispatched Soundwave to arm the gladiators. Megatrons forces then began to commit acts of terrorism increasing in scale and daring, attracting the attention of Prime. Kidnapping Senator Decimus as a symbol (with the help of new airborne recruit Starscream) Megatron issued a rallying call to the gladiators and their supporter, promising to unite them under one badge and make the whole planet their arena. Primes forces then found and arrested them en masse. This was all part of Megatrons plan: a supposedly informant Starscream massacred the Autobot Senate and freed the prisoners, signalling revolution and anarchy in Kaon. Megatron eventually killed Prime one-on-one as a symbol, and the Decepticons were forged.In this continuity, there are a number of differences to the traditional norm. The Decepticons are no longer based on Cybertron due to its devastation by rogue scientist Thunderwing. Instead, they have spread out through the galaxy, using their transforming abilities to infiltrate target worlds (such as Earth or Nebulos) disguised as local vehicles and equipment. They then use their modes to create conflict, leading to complete anarchy as the worlds political and social systems collapse. The Decepticons then move in and harvest the worlds raw resources. How the world is pacified is unknown, although Transformers: Spotlight issue on Sixshot revealed he is often sent in to complete the destruction of entire worlds. As in other continuities, Megatron is in command, and thus far has had to deal with the rebellion of Starscreams Earth infiltration unit and the reemergence of Thunderwing, as well as moving on to Earth in order to harvest the extremely powerful Energon variant Ore-13, something which promises to give the Decepticons a significant edge over the Autobots.Robots in DisguiseIn this continuity, the Decepticons were not the name of the evil faction, but rather a sub-faction created by Megatron. The main faction was instead the Predacons (carrying the name of the main villains over from Wars), who transformed into mechanical animals. Realising that their ability to travel as Earth vehicles gave the Autobots an edge in stealth, Megatron decided to take drastic action.Megatron recovered the protoforms of six Autobots that had crashed to Earth some time before looking for Maximus. Scanning them with vehicle modes at a military base and infusing them with a fraction of his spark energy to ensure their new loyalty, the first five became the Commandos. But when Megatron tried to scan a tanker truck as an alternate mode for the leader Scourge, Optimus Prime was scanned as well, resulting in much of Primes personality being scanned as well. With an infusion of Megatrons spark energy to complete the concoction, Scourge was born, emerging from his pod as a dark twin of Optimus Prime, who proved that Megatrons programming had over-ridden any Autobot goodness within him. Appointed leader of the new Decepticons, they quickly established themselves as a force to be reckoned with.The newly created Decepticons would try many schemes over the course of the series, including attacking various dams and faking their defection to the Autobots. But their leader, Scourge, had grander ambitions in mind. The copy of Optimus personality had been warped by Megatrons evil influence, but the individuality of Optimus remained and Scourge now wanted to control both Predacons and Decepticons. He would seize his chance when Fortress Maximus was awakened, directing him to destroy Galvatron (Megatrons new form). The attempt failed and Galvatron took a terrible revenge - he stripped the Decepticons of their individuality, turning them into little more than drones. After Galvatrons defeat by Prime, the Decepticons were among those sent back to Cybertron for imprisonment, except for Sky-Byte.Unicron TrilogyThe Decepticons appeared as mostly jets and military vehicles.In the Unicron Trilogy continuity, the early history of the war is not expounded upon. The Decepticons, however, remain the main antagonists, with whom the Autobots have been warring for quite some time. The enslavement of the small, power-enhancing Mini-Cons has long been a major goal of the Decepticons, and the Mini-Cons are seen as key to winning the war.Near the end of Armada, the Autobots and Decepticons join forces to defeat the planet-devouring Unicron, and the beginning of Energon sees them as uneasy allies. Many return to Megatrons side when he returns.Cybertron sees a much smaller Decepticon force than the previous two series, and what has become of most of the survivors of the earlier series remains unknown. As Megatrons true plans are discovered, most of the Decepticons, unwilling to be sacrificed as pawns as their leader seeks to remake the universe, again battle a common foe alongside the Autobots. The end of the series sees three of the comic-relief characters, with a reluctant Thundercracker, desiring to begin a new Decepticon force, and take off in a makeshift rocket. It makes it as far as Mars before it crashes, as the ending credits montage of the final episode shows. The foursome survives, however. The fates of the other surviving Decepticons remains unknown, though evidence of Starscreams survival is discovered.TransformersThe Decepticons make an appearance in the 2007 the Transformers live-action film. They include Megatron, Starscream, Frenzy, Blackout, Barricade, Scorponok, Brawl and Bonecrusher. The Movie Prequel comic by Publishing would reveal their origins. Originally Optimus Prime and Megatron ruled Cybertron together, due to the power of the Allspark, a mysterious device that could give life to Transformers - and keep Cybertron itself alive. Eventually, Megatron began to desire its power for himself and assembled a like-minded army of separatists - the Decepticons. Megatron soon struck, and Cybertron became embroiled in civil war. This would later seem to be changed, however, by the sequel films, where it is revealed that Prime was the leader of the Autobots and Fallen the leader of the Decepticons when the war broke out. Optimus would only take command after Sentinel was seemingly killed in action and Megatron served as Fallens field commander due to the latters incapacitation.  The subsequent prequel novel Ghosts of Yesterday revealed that Starscream seized command of the Decepticons after Megatrons disappearance.  Like the Autobots, the Decepticons are designed to look more organic in the movie. While the Autobots have a more human-like physiology, the Decepticons are more monstrous and insect-like in appearance. In Revenge of the Fallen it is revealed that Fallen, a Prime who turned evil, is the First leader and founder of the Decepticons, which would seem to imply the Decepticons were originally Autobots who turned evil.  In the final battle in the second movie, there are many Decepticon casualties including Devastator (destroyed by a rail gun), Mixmaster (cut in half and his head stomped off by Jetfire), Rampage (killed by Bumblebee), Ravage (Stripped from his spine by Bumblebee), Scrapper and Long Haul (killed by an airstrike), Scorponok (head crushed by Jetfire) and the Fallen himself whose spark is ripped out and crushed by Optimus Prime. Also killed in the movie are Sideways and Demolisher, killed at the beginning by Optimus and Sideswipe.  Megatron officially takes full command of the Decepticons at this point, swearing vengeance.The Decepticons return in Dark of the Moon with the plan to use a bridge to bring an army to Earth and transport Cybertron into orbit to rebuild the planet with Earths natural resources and human population as slaves.  Megatron and Prime planned this a long time ago, planning to meet on Earth before Megatron went after the Allspark and ended up frozen and the Ark was shot down by Decepticon fighters (few Decepticons knew of the plan) and crashed on Earths Moon in 1961.  This was detected by the Americans and the Russians and the space programs were created to reach the ship and study it.  However, by 1963 the Decepticons had raided the Ark and removed all but five of the pillars and hid them on the Moon along with an army of hundreds of Decepticons, awaiting the time that the pillars would be used.  After humans succesfully reached the Moon and explored the ship, Soundwave and Laserbeak approached various humans including Dylan Goulds father to get them to shut down the American and Russian space programs.  The Decepticons established a network of human collaborators who kept the humans from noticing the Decepticons actions on the Moon, later led by Dylan Gould.  After a human collaborator named Alexi Voshkod leads NEST to Chernobyl where they retrieve an engine part from the Ark, the Decepticons reemerge for the first time since Egypt in the form of Shockwave and his Driller who attack, but retreat.  This leads the Autobots to retrieve Sentinel and the remaning space bridge pillars and revive him and as this is going according to plan, Megatron orders Laserbeak to kill all the human collaborators but Dylan Gould which he does.  Before hes killed, one of the collaborators named Jerry Wang alerts Sam Witwicky to this and he alerts NEST which ignores it.  Sam and Seymour Simmons find out about the Decepticons plot from pictures a Russian probe got of the Decepticons hiding the pillars and the Dreads are sent to attack the convoy protecting Sentinel, but are killed by Bumblebee, Dino, Sideswipe and Ironhide.  After Sentinel reveals his true colors and murders Ironhide, he sets up the pillars in the Mall and brings the Decepticon army consisting of hundreds of Decepticon soldiers and Decepticon ships to Earth.  Some of the Decepticons scatter around the world to set up the pillars, but most of the army invades Chicago, devestating the human population and taking over.  The Decepticons force the Autobots to leave the planet and use Sam Witwicky to learn that they have no plans to fight back before Starscream apparently destroys them.  The Autobots, NEST and a team of mercanaries led by Sam Witwicky and Robert Epps invade Chicago and battle the Decepticon army.  The group manages to take out much of the army including Laserbeak (killed by Sam Witwicky and Bumblebee), the Driller (killed by Optimus), Starscream (killed by Sam Witwicky), Soundwave (killed by Bumblebee), Barricade (killed by NEST) and Shockwave (killed by Optimus) and disrupt the Control Pillar, forcing Sentinel into battle.  The combined human and Autobot forces overwhelm Sentinel and his remaning forces and missiles destroy most of the Decepticon fighters causing Sentinel to flee before engaging Optimus one on one as Dylan Gould reactivates the space bridge.  Sam Witwicky kills Gould and Bumblebee and Ratchet destroy the Control Pillar, causing Cybertron to implode and ruining the Decepticon plan.  Also, the remaning Decepticon ships are sucked up into Cybertron by the space bridge and are presumably destroyed with the planet.  Sentinel nearly kills Optimus, but Megatron, convinced by Spencer that he would end up working for Sentinel, saves Optimus and incapacitates Sentinel.  Megatron offers a truce between the Autobots and Decepticons after Cybetron is destroyed as long as hes in charge of the Decepticons again, but Optimus refuses and kills Megatron and Sentinel.  While the loss of human life in Chicago is massive, the battle is a major victory for the Autobots as they eliminated most of the Decepticon army on Earth despite there being some still scattered around the globe and the entire Decepticon command structure was destroyed with all of its members killed in the battle.Transformers AnimatedIn Transformers: Animated the Decepticons are usually bigger than the Autobots and usually turn into jets and military vehicles. It takes a group of Autobots to defeat one Decepticon and almost all Decepticons have red eyes and can fly. Most Decepticons in the series are similar to the original G1 series. In the Animated Series Blitzwing, for example, retains his triple changer modes of a tank and jet and also retains his G1 tan and purple color scheme.This series depicts a Decepticon force that is far from what it apparently once was, with Megatron having been chasing the Allspark for millions of years prior to the series beginning. The Decepticons have been wandering the periphery for some time, but have been driven off of Cybertron long ago. These Decepticons see themselves as freedom fighters, seeking to throw off Autobot tyranny, and their plans tend to revolve around returning to Cybertron with the means to retake it.Transformers: TimelinesA series of stories printed by Fun Publications, set in a variety of continuities, the Decepticons of alternate worlds can vary greatly from the classics Decepticon image. In the Transtech storyline the Autobots and Decepticons are merely political factions on a Cybertron which never broke out into war. Lines between good and evil are more blurred.In the Shattered Glass storyline, a group of Decepticons, led by Megatron, are the mirror images of the personalities of most Decepticons. In this world the Decepticon logo is red, and worn by heroic Transformers who seek to protect the weak and oppressed from the evil Autobots.See also* of Decepticons* (Transformers)Referenceses:Decepticonsfr:Decepticanko:id:Decepticonit:Distructorms:Decepticonsnl:Decepticons()pl:Decepticonypt:Decepticonsru:sr:fi:Decepticonsv:Decepticontr:Decepticonszh:
233701
List_of_etymologies_of_country_subdivision_names
This article provides a collection of the etymology of the names of entities. This page generally only deals with regions and provinces; cities and other localities and features may appear listed under the individual country, with a link below.AustraliaStates*South Wales: named with reference to Wales by Captain Cook()*Queensland: named in honour of Queen Victoria( How Queensland Got Its Name)*Australia: located in the south-central region of Australia*Tasmania: named after Tasman, who sighted the island in 1642; originally named by Tasman as Van Diemens Land, after van Diemen, the colonial governor who commissioned Tasmans voyage *Victoria: named in honour of Queen Victoria(http://www.foundingdocs.gov.au/resources/transcripts/vic3_doc_1851.pdf)*Western Australia: comprises the western third of AustraliaTerritoriesMainland* Territory: territory in north-central Australia* Bay Territory: bay named by Lieutenant Bowen in 1791 for the naval hero Admiral Sir Jervis, 1st Earl of St Vincent.()External* and Cartier Islands: named for Reef islets and Island** Ashmore Reef: first recorded sighting by a European, Captain Samuel Ashmore of the Hibernia, 11 June 1811(http://www.environment.gov.au/coasts/mpa/ashmore/plan/chap4.html#42)** Cartier Island: discovered by a Captain Nash, aboard the Cartier(Australia)* Island: bestowed by Captain Mynors of the East India Company for its discovery on Christmas Day, 25 December 1643.(Christmas Island - Britannica Online Encyclopedia)* (Keeling) Islands:**Cocos Islands: for the plentiful coconuts (Cocos nucifera) growing there(Cocos Tourism - Discovery)** Keeling Islands, an alternate name: for their discovery by Captain Keeling of the East India Company in 1609.(Encyclopedia - Britannica Online Encyclopedia)* Sea Islands: uninhabited islands in the Sea, named for the its coral formations, especially the Barrier Reef, the largest coral reef in the world.(Encyclopedia - Britannica Online Encyclopedia)* Island and McDonald Islands:** Heard Island: discovered (first confirmed sighting) by Captain John Heard of the merchant vessel Oriental, 25 November 1853()** McDonald Islands: discovered by Captain William McDonald, 4 January 1854(*Island (Norfuk: Norfuk Ailen): discovered and named by James Cook (1774) either for the Duke of Norfolk(Encyclopedia - Britannica Online Encyclopedia) or for his wife(http://www.stonnington.vic.gov.au/gui/files/NI%20fact%20sheet.pdf)(http://www.pitcairners.org/http://www.norfolkisland.com.au/history_and_culture/paradise.cfm)AustriaStates*Burgenland (German; ; ): originally called Vierburgenland, Land of four Burgs (castles), a name suggested in 1919 from the endings of the four former counties forming the state: Preburg, Wieselburg, denburg and Eisenburg. In 1922 Austria ceded denburg to Hungary and dropped the numeric prefix Vier- (four); the remaining three counties became Burgenland.(Burgenland) The Hungarian Vrvidk  and Croatian Gradie calque the German Burgenland*Carinthia, German Krnten: etymologically related to the early Slavic medieval principality Carantania (Slovenian Karantanija, German Karantanien); a suggested etymology references a Celtic term for stone or crag, while a popular etymology holds that the name means land of friends*Austria, German Nieder-sterreich: the lower part (lower in height) of the original territory of Austria (the eastern country), as opposed to Upper Austria; also called sterreich unter der Enns Austria below the (river) Enns*Salzburg: after the city of Salzburg (literally salt castle), which takes its name from the mines that existed there during the Middle Ages*Styria, German Steiermark: after the castle of Steyr; in the high Middle Ages, it formed a march of the Roman Empire, hence -mark*Tirol: after the Castle near Meran*Austria, German Ober-sterreich: the upper (physically higher) part of the original territory of Austria, as opposed to Lower Austria; also called sterreich ob der Enns Austria above the (river) Enns*Vienna, German Wien: from Celtic Vindobona (vindo white + bona foundation, fort)*Vorarlberg, literally in front of the Arlberg, takes its name from the Arlberg, a mountain (German: Berg) characterised by Arle, a local German term for pine.BelgiumRegions*Brussels, Dutch Brussel, French Bruxelles (the capital city, outside any province; also Belgiums third region): medieval Dutch broek bog + zele (in many place names in the Low Countrieshabitation using thatching)*Flanders, Dutch Vlaanderen, French Flandre(s): plural of a terrain type; or flooded land; or a compound Flemish vlakte plain and wanderen to wander.() The name extended from the historical county (about half lost to French and Dutch neighbours; the rest roughly made up two administrative provinces, East Flanders and West Flanders; in French les Flandres, plural) to the whole Dutch-speaking, majority part of Belgium (French la Flandre, singular)*Wallonia, French Wallonie: from the (Romanized (Germano-) Celtic, now Francophone) Walloon people: as in many European countries, so named by Germanic neighbours; meaning: strangers. Compare Wales.Provinces*Lige: of disputed etymology. The name Lige may have the same origin as the ancient name of Paris, i.e. Lutetia; the German form, Lttich, suggests this. Lige and Lutetia would both derive from Latin lucottia, marsh or mud. Another suggestion derives the names from Latin Ltica, colony, or Leudica, free. Alternatively, the Latin Leudica meaning public place may have given rise to the Walloon Ldje and thence to Lige. Note that the name appeared in written form as Lige (with an acute accent) until the 1950s.BrazilCanadaHistorical regions*Acadia (French Acadie): origin disputed::# Credited to Italian navigator da Verrazzano, who first named a region around Chesapeake Bay Archadia (Arcadia) in 1524 because of the beauty of its trees, according to his diary. Cartographers began using the name Arcadia to refer to areas progressively farther north until it referred to the French holdings in maritime Canada (particularly Scotia). The -r- also began to disappear from the name on early maps, resulting in the current Acadia.(Acadia: Origin of the Word by Bill Casselman):# Possibly derived from the Mkmaq word akatik, pronounced roughly agadik, meaning place, which French-speakers spelled as -cadie in place names such as Shubenacadie and Tracadie, possibly coincidentally.(Provinces and Territories - The origins of their names)*Nunatsiavut: Inuktitut, meaning our beautiful land.(Nunatsiavut Government|Nunatsiavut.com)ChileRegionsRoman numerals originally identified the regions in order from north to south (except Santiago). With the establishment of Arica-Parinacota and Ros Region in 2007 the numbers no longer reflect the regions positions.*Region (Spanish VII Regin del Maule): named after the River.*Region (Spanish VIII Regin del Biobo): named after the River.*Ros Region (Spanish XIV Regin de los Ros): refers to the river systems of Valdivia and Bueno and to the nickname of the city of Valdivia. The name may also reflect the name of Lagos Region (Spanish for Region of the Lakes) from which Los Ros split away.*Region, sometimes also spelled Aysn (Spanish XI Regin Aisn del General Carlos Ibez del Campo): The name Aisn may come from the Huilliche word achen, meaning to crumble. Another theory suggests that the Chonos culture used the word to mean going more to the interior, in reference to the Fjord of Aisn that stretches east from the Moraleda strait.*y Antrtica Chilena Region (Spanish XII Regin de Magallanes y de la Antrtica Chilena): named in honour of Magellan, the of Magellan and the city of Arenas, formerly called Magallanes.ChinaPeoples Republic of China (Mainland)Provinces*Anhui - lit. Peaceful Badge, actually abbreviates Anqing & Huizhou*Beijing - Northern Capital*Chongqing - Doubled Celebration*Fujian - lit. Luck Builds, actually abbreviates Fuzhou & Jianou*Gansu - lit. Willingly Serious, actually abbreviates Ganzhou & Suzhou ()*Guangdong - Eastern Expanses*Guangxi - Western Expanses*Guizhou - lit. Expensive Province, actually refers to Gui*Hainan - of the Southern Sea*Hebei - North of the Yellow River*Heilongjiang - Black Dragon River, the Chinese name for the River, from its Manchu name Sahaliyan Ula (Black River)*Henan - South of the Yellow River*Hubei - North of the Lake, in reference to Dongting*Hunan - South of the Lake, in reference to Dongting*Jiangsu - lit. The River Revives, actually abbreviates Jiangning & Suzhou ()*Jiangxi - lit. West of the Yangtze River (although it is to the Yangtzes south), actually contracts the earlier Western Jiangnan (Jiangnanxi, Western Region South of the River)*Jilin - lit. Lucky Forest, actually a Sinification of Manchu meaning Riverside*Liaoning - lit. Distant Peace, actually refers to Peaceful Liao, the region around the River*Mongolia - from the perspective of Beijing, as distinguished from Outer Mongolia, which became independent in the 20th century (Mongolia itself from Land of the Mongols; Mongol from the Mongol for brave)*Ningxia - lit. Peaceful Summer, actually refers to the Tangut state of Xia*Qinghai - Blue Sea, for Qinghai*Shaanxi - Western Pass(es) or West of the Pass(es), in reference to the three former channels of the River at Sanmenxia, previously supposed to have been cleft in the rock by the Great and now submerged by the Dam*Shandong - East of the Taihang Mountains*Shanxi - West of the Taihang Mountains*Sichuan - lit. Four Rivers, actually refers to the four circuits of the region during the DynastyChengdufu, Kuizhou, Lizhou, and Zizhou*Tianjin - Heavenly Ford, in honor of the Emperors crossing at that point*Xizang (Tibet) - lit. Western Enigma, actually a Sinification of Tibetan Tsang, the central-southern region of Tibet*Xinjiang - The New Frontier*Yunnan - lit. South of the Clouds, actually refers to the Mountains*Zhejiang - Crooked River, a former name of the modern RiverSpecial Administrative Regions*Kong - An Anglicized transcription of the Cantonese Hoeng1gong2 (, Fragrant Harbor),() originally the name of the small inlet now known as Harbour.() The reference to fragrance may refer to the harbor waters sweetened by the esturine influx of the Pearl River or to the incense factories lining the coast to the north of Kowloon which was stored around Aberdeen Harbour, prior to the development of Harbour.( The name was applied to the entirety of Kong Island in the 1842 of Nanking.(Fairbank, John King. Trade and Diplomacy on the China Coast: The Opening of the Treaty Ports, 18421854. 2 vols. Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 1953.) The peninsula and Territories were later added by the 1860 of Peking and the 1898 for the Extension of Hong Kong Territory.*Macao - From the Portuguese transcription Macau of the Cantonese Maa5gok3 (), the temple of the sea goddess A-Ma, or A-Ma Gao (, Bay of A-Ma).()Republic of China (Taiwan)*Hsinchu: New Bamboo in Mandarin, named after a bamboo fortress*Hualien: Lotus Flower in Mandarin*Kaohsiung: Bamboo Forest in a Formosan language*Kinmen: Golden Gate*Miaoli: Plain in a Formosan language, originally sounded like pali ()*Penghu: Splashing Lake in Mandarin*Tainan: South Taiwan City in Mandarin*Taipei: North Taiwan City in Mandarin*Taichung: Central Taiwan City in Mandarin*Taitung: East Taiwan City in Mandarin*Taoyuan: Peach Garden in MandarinCzech RepublicHistorical regions*Czechia, an alternate name for Bohemia: From Czech echy, from ech (a Czech). Traditionally traced to a ech, who brought the Czechs into Bohemia.*Bohemia: Land of the Boii, a Celtic tribe of the region. The ultimate etymology of Boii is uncertain, but has been connected to Proto-Indo-European roots meaning cow and warrior*Moravia: Land of the MoravaDenmark*Bornholm: the Old Norse version of the name, Burgundarholm, suggests connections with the Burgundians, who traditionally originated in Scandinavia*Copenhagen () - a corruption of the original designation for the city, Kbmandshavn, or Merchants Harbour in Danish. It comes to English via the German Kopenhagen.*Virgin Islands, a former territory: See British Virgin Islands below.*Islands (, ), from Norse Froyar - literally, Sheep Islands, from their dense population of sheep. Another theory suggests that the lexeme fr- / fr- instead derives from Celtic and means distant.*Greenland (): from Norse Grnland, literally, green land; so named by the Red to induce settlement there. Greenlandic-speakers use the name Kalaallit Nunaat, meaning Land of the Greenlanders*Jutland (; ) - name associated with the Jutes*Zealand () - literally sea-land or the land in the sea from Old Norse Selund and Old Danish Sialand. A highly speculative alternative interpretation postulates an origin from *Selha-undi, seal.Dominican RepublicEstoniaNote: Estonian maakond means county and maa means land. Counties given here without the suffix -maa take their names (and etymologies as given here) from their capitals.*Hiiumaa: from Estonian hiis - holy grove, or hiid - giant, meaning land of holy groves or land of giants.*Ida-Virumaa: Eastern Virumaa - see Virumaa below*Jgeva: from Estonian jgi - river (Pedja river) and possibly vahe - between (since the old estate stood on an island in the river), meaning between rivers.*Jrvamaa: from Estonian jrv - lake, meaning land of lakes.*Lnemaa: from Estonian lne - western, meaning western land.*Lne-Virumaa: Western Virumaa - see Virumaa below*Petseri: from Russian peshchera - caves.*Plva: from Estonian plv - knee. According to a legend, a virgin was once bricked in a church wall on her knees. According to another version, the Tartu-Vru and Kanepi-Rpina roads form a curve, shaped like a knee.*Prnu: named after Prnu river, that drains into the sea at Prnu*Saaremaa: from Estonian saar - island, meaning island-land.*Valga: from German family names de Walco and de Walko. According to another version, from Old Estonian valketa - white.*Virumaa: from several languages virukas - big or strong, or vire sharp or penetrating (for wind), meaning land of the strong / big or land of the sharp / penetrating winds. (In Finnish, the words for Estonia and Estonians derive from Virumaa - Viro and virolaiset.)Finland*Helsinki: The Swedish name  ( or ) represents the original official name of the city of Helsinki (in the very beginning, in the form Hellssingeforss). The Finnish language form of the citys name probably originates from Helsinga and similar names used for the river currently known as Vantaanjoki, as documented as early as the 14th century. Helsinki (pronounced with the stress on the first syllable: ), refers to the city in all languages except Swedish and Norwegian. Helsingfors comes from the name of the surrounding parish, Helsinge (source for Finnish Helsinki) and the rapids (in Swedish: fors), which flowed through the original village. The name Helsinge possibly originated with medieval Swedish settlers who came from Hlsingland in Sweden. Another possible derivation looks to the Swedish word hals (neck), referring to the narrowest part of the river, i.e. the rapids.()*Ostrobothnia (or in Swedish: sterbotten) - Eastern Bothnia. Bothnia is a Latinization of Norse botn,(http://runeberg.org/svetym/0146.html) meaning bottom. The name botn was applied to the Gulf of Bothnia as Helsingjabotn in Norse, after Hlsingland, which at the time referred to the coastland west of the gulf. Later, botten was applied to the regions Vsterbotten on the western side and sterbotten the eastern side (East Bottom and West Bottom). The Finnish name of sterbotten, Pohjanmaa, or Pohja-land, gives a hint as to the meaning in both languages: pohja means both bottom and north.*land - Waterland, from the proposed Germanic root *ahw-, cognate with Latin aqua and meaning water. Ahvenanmaa, its Finnish name means Land of Perch and is partially borrowed, partially folk-etymologized from Germanic.FranceHistoric regionsMost modern French dpartements take their names from local geographical features: usually rivers, occasionally mountain ranges or coasts. Thus most such names have a self-evident immediate origin: even non-speakers of French can deduce them with a minimum of geographical knowledge. The traditional provinces and regions (of any period) often bear names with richer but more obscure histories.*Alsace - from Latin Alsatia, a Latinised form of the Germanic name that also yields Old High German El-sasz, allegedly meaning foreign settlement (according to the OED article on Alsatia()); or settlement on the Ill River* Artois - from Latin Atrebatensis, adjectival form derived the Belgic tribe Atrebates, whose name comes from *ad-treb-ates, meaning inhabitants, based on the Celtic root treb- building, home (cf. Old Irish treb building, farm, Welsh tref building, Middle Breton treff city, toponyms in Tre-, Provenal trevar to live in a house or in a village).(Xavier Delamarre, Dictionnaire de la langue gauloise: une approche linguistique du vieux-celtique continental, ditions Errance 2003. p. 300.)  According to MacBain (d. 1907),(MacBain, Alexander. (1982:1) An Etymological Dictionary of the Gaelic Language Gairm Publications.) the name Atrebates parallels the Irish aitreibh, building, Early Irish aittreb, building, and Welsh adref, homewards. McBain states that the Celtic root treb corresponds to Latin tribus, tribe, and to English thorpe, village.( MacBain reconstructs *ad-treb- as the Proto-Celtic form of Early Irish aittreb.( The name of the main city of Artoi, Arras (Atrecht in Dutch) derives directly from the tribes name Atrebates, so Artois properly means territory of Arras.*Basque Country (, ) - derived from the ancient tribe of the Vascones via the medieval of Vasconia and a County of Vasconia, split from it. The Basque name derives from Euskara (the autochthonous name of the Basque language).**Labourd(Lapurdi): from the Roman city of Lapurdum (modern Bayonne).**Navarre (French: Basse Navarre, Basque: Nafarroa Behera, Benafarroa). From the medieval of Navarre, itself of disputed etymology (either Basque nabar: brownish, multicolor, also ploughshare; or Romance nava: river bank; or Basque naba (valley, plain) + herri (people, land)). Compare of Navarre#Etymology**Soule: deformation of the original Basque name Zuberoa or Xiberue* Brittany (Bretagne) - area occupied by refugee Britons from Roman Britain (Britannia) circa 500 AD* Burgundy (Bourgogne) - part of the land settled by the East Germanic Burgundians, who possibly originated on the island now known as Bornholm. Speakers of Old Norse knew the island as Borgundarholm, and in ancient Danish especially the islands name appears as Borghand or Borghund; these names relate to Old Norse borg height and bjarg/berg mountain, rock, as the island rises high from the sea.(Mallory, J.P. and D.Q. Adams. Encyclopedia of Indo-European Culture. London: Fitzroy Dearborn Publishers, 1997: p. 269) Other names known for the island include Burgendaland (9th century), Hulmo / Holmus (of Bremen), Burgundehulm (1145), and Borghandholm (14th century).(Politikens Nudansk Ordborg (1993), 15th edition, entry Bornholm)  the Great uses the form Burgenda land.(King Alfreds Anglo-Saxon version of Orosius, London, 1859, edited by J. Bosworth) Some scholars(Essai sur lhistoire du peuple burgonde, de Bornholm (Burgundarholm) vers la Bourgogne et les Bourguignons, 1965, by Rene Guichard, published by A. et J. Picard et Cie. (Paris)) believe that the Burgundians take their name from the island of Bornholm; they comprised a tribe which moved west when the western Empire collapsed, and occupied and named Burgundy in France in the 5th century CE.*Champagne - from the Latin campania (plain, open country, battlefield)*Corsica (Corse) - possibly from the Phoenician Korsai, which means something like forest-covered*Dauphin - from the nickname and of arms of former ruler Guy VIII of Vienne: dolphin*Franche-Comt - in French, literally the Free County of Burgundy (as opposed to the Duchy of Burgundy)*Gascony (Gascogne) - from the of Vasconia (also Wasconia), itself derived from the ancient tribe of the Vascones. In Latin and Romance languages in medieval times, Vascones came to apply to all the Basque-speaking peoples.*Languedoc - the region speaking the langue doc (as opposed to the regions whose language (dol) developed into modern French)*Limousin - from an adjective referring to the local centre, Limoges*Lorraine - from the Mediaeval Latin coining Lotharingia, meaning the lands granted as a kingdom in 855 AD to Lothair, son of the Holy Roman Emperor I*Maine (province/county), from the River, considered a variant/continuation of the River, whose early French name suggests middle river*Normandy (Normandie) - land settled by Viking Northmen in the early 10th century*Occitania, from Occitnia in Occitan. From medieval Latin Occitania (approximately since 1290). The first part of the name, Occ-, is from Occitan dc or Italian doc (i.e. Language of c), a name given to the Occitan language by Dante according to its way of saying yes (c). The ending -itania is probably an imitation of the old Latin name Aquitania.*Provence - from Latin provincia (province), short for Provincia Narbonensis, the Roman province located in present-day southern France.*Savoy - of unknown origin, but dating to the days of the of BurgundyTerritories*Island, a territory: From the French le de Clipperton, for the English mutineer and pirate Clipperton who hid there in 1705.*Island, a territory: For the British ship Europa, which visited the island in 1774. For the etymology of Europe, see of continent etymologies.*Guiana, a territory: See France and Guiana at of country-name etymologies.*Polynesia, a territory: Polynesia formed from the Greek polynesia (many islands), a compound of pol- (, many) and nsos (, island).*Southern and Antarctic Lands, a territory: Self-descriptive. See France at of country-name etymologies and of continent-name etymologies.**da India, part of the French Southern and Antarctic Lands: Cartographic errors misspelling original name Portuguese Baixo da Judia (Jewess Shoal) from the name of a Portuguese ship that ran aground on the reef.(Bernardo Gomes de Brito. Historia Tragico-Maritima. Em que se escrevem chronologicamente os Naufragios que tivero as Naos de Portugal, depois que se poz em exercicio a Navegao da India. Lisboa, 1735. )*Islands, a territory: Presumably from their glorious appearance.*Guadeloupe, a territory: From Spanish Guadalupe, bestowed by Columbus in 1493 in honor of Mara de Guadalupe in Extremadura, Spain.*de Nova, a territory: For da Nova, a 15th-century Portuguese explorer-navigator.*Martinique, a territory: Bestowed by Columbus in honor of Saint of Tours in 1502*Mayotte, a territory: A French corruption of the native Maore or Mawuti, sultanates on the island around the year 1500.*Caledonia, a territory: New Scotland from the Latin Caledonia, bestowed by British captain Cook in 1774 after a supposed resemblance*Runion, a territory: Selected in 1793 to commemorate the union of revolutionaries from Marseille with the National Guard in Paris on 10 August 1792. (For earlier names, see of Runion.)*Collectivity of Saint-Pierre and Miquelon (), an collectivity:**Saint Pierre: From the French for Peter, patron of fishermen.**Miquelon: From the Basque for Michael, possibly for Saint Michael, published by de Hoyarabals pilot in 1579 as Micquet and Micquelle, after which it evolved over time into Miclon, Micklon, and finally Miquelon.*Island: From the French  le Tromelin in honor of the de Tromelin, a French Royal Navy officer who commanded the French corvette Dauphine which visited the island in 1776.(UNESCO in Action. The shipwrecked memory of the LUtile slaves.)* of the Wallis and Futuna Islands (), an collectivity:**Futuna: From an endonym derived from the local futu (tree)(Smith, S. Percy. Futuna, or Horne Island, and Its People. The Journal of the Polynesian Society, Vol. 1, No. 1, pp. 3352. 1892)**Wallis: for the British explorer Wallis, who sailed there in 1797.GermanyStates*Baden-Wrttemberg: formed by combining the names of the former states of Baden and of Wrttemberg.**Baden: after the city of Baden-Baden, formerly Baden, the name became reduplicated to distinguish it from the state (as in Baden in Baden). The name means baths, after the springs in the city.**Wrttemberg: after Wrttemberg Castle, which stood on the Wrttemberg, a hill in Stuttgart, formerly Wirtemberg, further origin uncertain (-berg means mountain)*Bavaria (German Bayern): the state of Bavaria developed out of the tribe of the Baiuvarii, who probably gained their name from the land of Bohemia*Brandenburg: after the city of Brandenburg. The earlier Slavic name of the castle (Burg) of Brandenburg appears as Branibor (Slavic for Branims forest, where bor means a dense forest).*Hamburg: from the 9th-century name Hammaburg, where Hamma has multiple conflicting interpretations, but burg means castle.*Hesse: after the tribe of the Chatti*Saxony (German Niedersachsen): after the tribe of the Saxons. Lower Saxony became differentiated in modern times from the state of Saxony to its southeast. The word lower reflects Lower Saxonys location in the lowlands of the German Plain, as opposed to Saxony, which has a higher elevation*Pomerania (German) Mecklenburg-Vorpommern): formed geographically by joining Mecklenburg with the western part of Pomerania, also called Hither Pomerania.**Mecklenburg takes its name from Mecklenburg Castle in Mecklenburg (Burg means castle in German, the first part means big: compare Low German mekel, cognate with English mickle  big castle).**Pomerania (German Pommern) comes from Slavic roots meaning near the sea (in Slavic languages more means sea): the standard modern Polish name for the region, Pomorze, demonstrates this well.* Rhine-Westphalia (German Nordrhein-Westfalen)  geographically formed by joining the northern part of the Rhineland (after the River Rhine) with Westphalia.** The name of the Rhine derives from Gaulish Renos, and ultimately from the root *reie- (to move, flow, run); words like river and run share the same root.() The River in Italy shares the same etymology. The spelling with -h- suggests a borrowing from the Greek form of the name, Rhenos,( seen also in rheos, stream, and rhein, to flow.** Westphalia formed the westernmost subdivision of the Saxon tribe; the origin of the second part (-falen in German) remains unknown* Rhineland-Palatinate (German Rheinland-Pfalz): formed geographically by joining parts of the Rhineland (after the River Rhine) with the Palatinate, formerly a county located near the Rhine, meaning that its count administered a palace of the Roman Emperor.**The name of the Rhine derives from Gaulish Renos, and ultimately from the root *reie- (to move, flow, run), the common root of words like river and run.( The River in Italy shares a similar etymology. The spelling with -h- suggests influence from the Greek spelling of the name, Rhenos,( seen also in rheos, stream, and rhein, to flow.** The word Palatinate derives from Latin palatinus imperial, from palatium palace, after the location of the palace of the Roman Emperor Augustus on the Hill in Rome*the Saarland - after the River*Saxony (German Sachsen): land of the Saxons (possibly the sword-folk). The state of Saxony developed out of the Saxon tribe, which principally inhabited present-day Saxony; during the Middle Ages and early modern times, the name migrated to the current location of the state of Saxony*Saxony-Anhalt (German, Sachsen-Anhalt): formed geographically by joining the Prussian of Saxony (see above under Saxony) with Anhalt**Anhalt takes its name from Anhalt Castle near Harzgerode; the origin of the name of the castle remains unknown*Schleswig-Holstein: created by joining Schleswig and Holstein.**Schleswig takes its name from the of Schleswig, which in turn derives its name from the Schlei bay and the German word wig for trading place.** Holstein comes from a Saxon subtribe named, in Latin, Holcetae, whose means dwellers in the wood (Northern Low Saxon: Hol(t)saten; German: Holzsassen).* Thuringia (German Thringen)  after the tribe of the Thuringii. Some have suggested that the Thuringii represent the remnants of the Hermanduri, the last part of whose name (-duri) became corrupted (-thuri) and afterwards suffixed with -ing, meaning descendants of (the Hermanduri).(Schutz, 402.)Historic regions* Brunswick (German: Braunschweig): from the town of Brunswick, possibly originating as Brunos wik (Brunos marketplace) (with reference to the legendary founder Duke of Saxony, died 880, or another Bruno) or as burnt wik); the High German form Braunschweig is an erroneous translation of the original Low German Brunswick* Franconia (German: Franken): from the traditional designation Franks, referring especially to the Kingdom of the East Franks. The name refers to those areas east of the Rhine that were first occupied by the Franks, as opposed to areas that were held by the Swabians, Bavarians or Saxons.  The ethnonym Frank has sometimes been traced to the Latin francisca (from the Germanic *frankon, akin to the English franca), meaning javelin. While the throwing-axe of the Franks is known as the francisca, the weapon conversely may have taken its name from the tribe.* Hohenzollern: ultimately from the names of Castle and its location, Mount Hohenzollern (known locally as Zoller or Zollern). The lexeme hoh/hohen in German means high/height.*Oldenburg, after the city of Oldenburg, first recorded in 1108 as the town of Aldenburg, subsequently also a county, duchy, grand duchy and republic, meaning old castle*Prussia (German: Preuen)  (at times historically connected with Germany or with parts thereof): from the people known as the Prussians, a grouping of western Balt peoples whose collective name (German: Prussen or anciently Pruzzen) may possibly derive from an Indo-European root meaning swamp: see people; for political reasons, the electors of Brandenburg decided to name themselves kings of Prussia in the 18th century; in this way, they transferred the name of the remote eastern region to a major German state* Swabia (German: Schwaben or Schwabenland): after the tribe of the Suebi whose name may come from Proto-Germanic *swbaz based on the Proto-Germanic root *sw- meaning ones own people,( (Text in Swedish); for an alternative meaning, as free, independent see ; compare Suiones.) from an Indo-European root *swe-,( (language text); locate by searching the page number. (German language text); for the etymology in English see   Some related English words include sibling, sister, swain, self.) the third-person pronoun.Greece*Arcadia: from Arcas, the legendary eponymous leader of early Hellenic settlers*Sparta: from Greek  spart, a cord or rope made from the shrub spartos, a type of broom*Macedonia, from Greek mak- (long, tall) - highland.India (Republic of India)See of Indian states and union territories by the etymology of their name.Indonesia*Aceh: From the words a meaning not and cheh meaning broken, refers to the strength of unity of the people of the area.*Banten: named in the honor of the former Sultanate, which ruled over the region from 16th to the 18th centuries and became one of the main fronts of opposition against the colonial might of the East India Company (VOC).*Bengkulu: named after the Bengkulu river, which passes through the area of the province. The name of Bengkulu itself comes from the Malay word bangkai meaning corpse, and hulu meaning river-source  it refers to the story that in the past the area near the source of the river Bengkulu had often served as a battlefieldtribes and clans battled each other on the river banks leaving them full of corpses and blood.*Gorontalo: from the Dutch version of the local phrase hulontalo, meaning lands surrounded by water due to the many lakes and rivers formerly in the area*Jaya: The name Irian can have various meanings, as each dialect of the island has a different meaning for it. But the most acknowledged version interprets it as land of heat, as many local dialects interpret iri as fire or heat. The syllable an means land in all the dialects. Thus, Irian may refer to hot weather. An alternative etymology for Irian (variously identified as a real etymology or a etymology) stems from the acronym Ikut Republik Indonesia, Anti Nederland (Join/Follow the Republic of Indonesia, rejecting The Netherlands) (see the article on the Province of Papua   the official Indonesian and internationally recognized name for Irian Jaya). The word jaya means victory or glorious in Indonesian, referring to the Indonesian victory over the colonisers who controlled the area both militarily and diplomatically, a sign of pride as the Indonesians showed themselves capable not only of defending their lands from the Dutch attempt to reestablish colonial rule after World War II, but also of taking over lands not included in the 1945 proclamation or the 1950 reunification, specifically Irian Jaya or the Province of Papua.*Jakarta: from the Javanese words jaya (meaning victory) and karta (meaning glory), which make up the phrase victorious & glorious; this refers to the victory of Prince Pati Unus (also known as Fatahillah) of the Sultanate in his campaign to defeat the rival Malakka Sultanate of the peninsula and Pasai Sultanate of Aceh region in the mid-16th century. The glorious victory also refers to the event of Proclamation of Independence on 17 August 1945 which took place in the city.*Jambi: the province takes its name from the historical Sultanate which ruled over the area from the 17th to the 19th centuries*Lampung: From the word Lambung in the Old Malay phrase anjak Lambung, which means descended from the heights. This refers to the ancestral riddle of the Lampung people, who allegedly had ancestors descended from the heights. The heights reference the southernmost part of the Barisan mountain range that runs through all the western part of the Lampung province. More specifically, it is said that the heights refer to the plateau at the foot of the Mountain. (The center of the legendary ancient Kingdom of Brak, allegedly one of the oldest kingdoms in Indonesia.)*Tenggara: from Nusa meaning islands (referring to the Lesser Sunda Islands that make up the area) and tenggara meaning south-east (referring to the position of the area within the country).*Sumatra: from Battutas 14th-century pronunciation of the name of the Samudra Kingdom (13th to 15th centuries CE)*Yogyakarta: From Jogja and Karta. Jogja is a Javanised version of a Sanskrit word, Ayodhya, the prefix A- meaning not and Yodhya is synonymous to Hindi Yuddha, meaning battle, combat, fight, or war. Thus Ayodhya, which later Javanised into Jogja, meant The place of no fight or in simpler interpretation, peaceful. This may refer to the geographic location of Jogjakarta, being fortified naturally by the Java Sea to the South, the Merapi Mountain to the north, the Gunung Sewu Karst Mountains to the east and Progo River to the west where it would be the perfect fortress of peace, and even more supported as a breeding place of peaceful life with its rich and fertile volcanic land and rivers, sourcing up to the majestic Merapi. The word Karta means glory, referring to a hope that this city would bring glory to its people.Iran (Persia)*Lorestan: land of the Lurs*Mazendran: its combination of 3 words: Mad (female, mother, mater) and Zainthi (wisdom, knowledge, science) Eran (aryans) , Both MAD and Eran is either suffix or prefix of many places in greater Iran or Persia Europeans called + upper IndiaIreland (Eire)*Connacht: Connachta in Irish. Descendants of Conn. From the Irish Connachta people, who all claimed descent from the High King Conn Ctchathach, Conn of the Hundred Battles.*Leinster: Laighin in Irish. From the Irish Laigin people, named after ligne, the broad blue-grey iron spearheads they carried, and Old Norse star, meaning place or territory*Munster: Mhumhain in Irish. From the Gaelic goddess Muman and the old Norse star, meaning place or territory*Ulster: Ulaidh in Irish. From the Irish Ulaid people, whose name probably comes from Old Irish ul, beard, and old Norse star, meaning place or territory.*Meath: Mide in Irish. Middle in Old Irish. No longer a province of Ireland.Italy*Campania: from the Latin campania (countryside, plain, battlefield). Compare Champagne in France.*Friuli: from the Latin Forum Julii (The market of Julius), which at the beginning referred only to the city of Cividale, founded by Caesar and then extended to the whole region*Latium (in modern Italian: Lazio): land of the early Italic inhabitants known as Latins, in their turn popularly associated with the mythological King Latinus turn, Latins (in Latin, Latn)  as well as the name of King Latnus (simply the singular of the same name)  clearly derived their names from Latium by means of the ethnic suffix -nus, with the obvious meaning of inhabitant(s) of Latium, which makes this etymology ridiculously circular, but let that serve as a warning to the reader as to the quality of this and other etymologies on this page. Ovid hints at perhaps a slightly more sophisticated etymology, with a legend of the naming of Latium after Saturn latente deo (as a god in hiding) after he allegedly fled to Italy following his expulsion by Jupiter. - Modern linguists postulate origins in a language (PIE) root *stela- (to spread, extend), expressing the idea of flat land (in contrast to the local Sabine high country). But the name may originate from an earlier, non Indo-European one. See the Online Etymological Dictionary.*Lombardy: from the Germanic tribe of the Lombards (literally long-beards or axe people, or, according to another theory, long-halberds), who invaded Italy in the 6th century. Note: After the Lombard invasion, the name Longobardia or Langobardia applied to the whole of Italy for about two centuries, throughout Europe and also in Arabic (al-Ankubardiya). The name Italia did not return into wide use until the late 8th century*Marche: literally. marches, borderlands. In the Middle Ages the region lay on the boundaries between imperial lands and the more independent areas of southern Italy. The March of Ancona became the best known of such marches*Sardinia: speculatively linked with the Shardana people and/or with Sardis*Sicily: island settled by the SicelsJapanMain Islands*Honshu: Main Province in Japanese*Kyushu: Nine Provinces in Japanese, in reference to the Chikuzen, Chikugo, Hizen, Higo, Buzen, Bungo, Hyga, Osumi, and Satsuma provinces of 7th-century Saikaid (See: Gokishichid)*Shikoku: Four States in Japanese, in reference to the Awa, Tosa, Sanuki and Iyo provinces of 7th-century Nankaid (See: Gokishichid)*Hokkaido: Northern Sea Circuit in Japanese, a compromise archaism selected by bureaucrats during the Restoration (See: Naming of Hokkaido)Korea*Chungcheong - from the first characters in the city names Chungju and Cheongju.*Gangwon (South Korea) /Kangwn (Korea) - from the first characters in the city names Gangneung and Wonju.*Gyeonggi - the Chinese characters for the name mean area around the capital, referring to the location of the province around Seoul, South Korea*Gyeongsang - from the first characters in the city names Gyeongju and Sangju.*Hamgyng - from the first characters in the city names Hamju and Kyngsng (?).*Hwanghae - from the first characters in the city names Hwangju and Haeju.*Jeolla - from the first characters in the city names Jeonju and Naju (The first character of Naju is actually rar changes to n in the initial position, and the combination nr changes to ll due to phonological characteristics of the language).*Pyngan - from the first characters in the city names Pyngyang and Anju.Malaysia*Star - alor in Malay means furrow, while star refers to a kind of tree (Bouea macrophylla) that bears small, sour fruit known as kundang or remia in Malay*Cyberjaya - Malay: cyber excellence, a reference to the citys designation as the Valley of Malaysia*Ipoh - named after the ipoh tree whose poisonous sap the Asli used to coat their blowpipe darts with*Johor - from Arabic jauhar, or precious stones*Kangar - named for the Malay kangkok, a kind of hawk (Spizaetus Limnaetu)*Kelantan - said to be a corruption of gelam hutan, the Malay name for the Melaleuca leucadendron tree, also possibly derived from kilatan (lightning)*Klang - possibly from Mon-Khmer klong or Malay kilang (warehouse)*Bharu - Malay: new town/fort*Lumpur - Malay: muddy confluence, a reference to the founding of the city at the confluence of River and River*Kuching - Malay: cat, but probably a corruption of the Indian cochin (port) or a reference to the mata kucing trees that used to proliferate where the city grew subsequently*Labuan - derived from the Malay labuhan (anchorage)*Langkawi - Malay for eagle island, but possibly related to Langkasuka, an ancient Hindu kingdom founded in Kedah in the 1st century CE*Malacca - named by the founder of Malacca, Parameswara, after the Melaka tree under which he sheltered*Sembilan - Malay: nine states, a reference to the nine original districts (or nagari) settled by the Minangkabau*Penang - named after the Pinang tree*Perak - Malay: silver, from the silvery colour of tin for which the area became famous; or possibly from the glimmer of fish in the water*Putrajaya - Malay: literally: the sons victory; but taken to mean princely excellence. Named after the first Minister of Malaysia, Abdul Rahman Putra, possibly with reference to the planned citys status as the new administration centre for the Federal Government*Selangor - possibly from the Malay selangau (fly) due to the abundance of flies along the River*Petani - literally farmer river in Malay, said to originate from the concentration of paddy-fields and farmers in the state*Taiping - Chinese: great peaceMexicoMongolia*Arkhangai: from the Mongolian: Ar (north,back) and Mountains*Bayan-lgii: from the Mongolian:Rich cradle/region, a province later built in the 1940s especially for some Kazakh tribes migrated to Mongolia in the early 1910s for land. *Bulgan: from the Mongolian:unknown*Darkhan-Uul: from the Mongolian: Darkhan (Strictly protected) and Uul (mountain)*Dornod: from the Mongolian:Eastern*Dornogobi: from the Mongolian:Eastern gobi*Dundgobi: from the Mongolian:Middle gobi*Gobi-Altai: from the Mongolian:Gobi and Altai MountainsMorocco*Sahara, claimed territory: After its geographic position. Sahara derives from the Arabic a-ar (), meaning desert. The area is also claimed by the Sahrawis.Kingdom of the NetherlandsConstituent Countries*Netherlands (Dutch: Nederland): Lowlands(Online Etymology Dictionary. Netherlands. Accessed 16 Sept 2011.)**Drenthe (Low Saxon: Drentie):**Flevoland: from Lacus Flevo (), a name used in Roman sources to refer to a body of water at what would later become known as the Zee. The Netherlands government established the province in 1986 on lands reclaimed from the Zuider Zee in the 1950s and 1960s.**Friesland (West Frisian: Frysln):**Gelderland (also English: Guelders): Named after the modern city of Geldern, Germany.**Groningen (Gronings: Grnnen or Grunnen):**Limburg: Derived from the castle-fortified town of Limbourg which in turn was derived from lint dragon and burg fortress.**Brabant (). The name in Carolingian times appeared in Latinised form as pagus Bracbatensis, from bracha new and bant region.**Holland (Dutch: Noord-Holland): Germanic holt (i.e. wooded) land (often incorrectly regarded as meaning hollow marsh land)**Overijssel: Dutch for lands across the IJssel river (also Latin: Transiselania)**Holland (Dutch: Zuid-Holland): Germanic holt (i.e. wooded) land (often incorrectly regarded as meaning hollow marsh land)**Utrecht: named after the city of Utrecht; the name derives from Latin Ultraiectum ad Rhenum, meaning place to cross the Rhine river.**Zeeland (also English: Zealand): Dutch for Sea land.*Aruba: Uncertain. One etymology derives from Spanish Oro Hubo (there was gold); another cites the Arawak oibubai (guide).*Saint Martin (Dutch: Sint Maartin): for Saint of Tours, as it was first sighted by Columbus on St. Martin Day (11 November), 1493.*Curaao: Uncertain. One etymology derives from Portuguese curaao (healing); another from Portuguese corao (heart); another that it is a local endonym; (Joubert & Van Buurt. 1994.)Other names*Alkmaar: from Aelcemaer, meaning lake of auks, due to the fact that lakes formerly surrounded the core of Alkmaar - all of them now drained and thus turned into dry land*Amsterdam: from Amstelredam, which means dam over the Amstel (the river Amstel flows through present-day Amsterdam)*Batavia (Germanic): arable land (derived from the regional name Betuwe, as opposed to the other regional name Veluwe meaning fallow or waste land). Alternatively: the people known as the Batavians (Latin: Batavi) inhabited the island of Betawe between the Waal and the Rhine. The name of the island probably derives from batawj (good island, from Germanic bat- good, excellent and awj - island, land near water), referring to the regions fertility.*Holland (part of the Netherlands; but the term often refers to the country as a whole): Germanic holt (i.e. wooded) land (often incorrectly regarded as meaning hollow marsh land)*Antilles, a territory: From their Dutch owners and from a mythical land or island (Antillia), west of Europe, or a combination of two Portuguese words ante or anti (possibly meaning opposite in the sense of on the opposite side of the world) and ilha (island), currently the name for these Caribbean Islands.*Rotterdam: meaning dam over the Rotte (the river Rotte flows through present-day Rotterdam)*Stad en Ommelanden for the province of Groningen, meaning city and surrounding lands and referring to the of Groningen and the medieval Frisian lordships west, north and east of the city.*Twente (region in the east of the province of Overijssel): from Latin tvihanti; or after the Germanic tribe the Tubantii as described by Tacitus; or an early form of the current Twents-language word for a 2-year-old horse: Tweanter.New ZealandProvinces*Auckland: in honour of Eden, 1st Earl of Auckland, a patron of Hobson, who founded and named the city of Auckland. The Earl took his sobriquet from Auckland in Durham, United Kingdom, possibly deriving from the Celtic Alclet or Aclet, or Cliffs of the Clyde. Although nowhere near the Clyde, the locality may have had connections with the Celtic kingdom of Strathclyde; it may have borrowed the name of the Clyde for aesthetic or prestige reasons, as Alclets river - the Gaunless - means useless in Norse; or a nearby river may have had the name Clyde  history does not record the name of the river Gaunless before the Norse named it*Hawkes Bay: in honour of Edward Hawke, 1st Baron Hawke of Towton*Marlborough: to commemorate Churchill, 1st Duke of Marlborough*Nelson: in honour of Nelson, 1st Viscount Nelson (the Admiral)*Otago: anglicised from the Mori name Otakou, a kainga east of present-day Otago Harbour, originally meaning one isolated village or place of red earth*Wellington: in honour of Wellesley, 1st Duke of WellingtonOther categories*Islands, a territory: In honor of British captain Cook, who discovered the islands in 1770.*Levin: from a director of the railway company that established the town to help boost its railway*Niue, a territory: Niu probably means coconut, and  means behold. According to legend, the Polynesian explorers who first settled the island knew that they had come close to land when they saw a coconut floating in the water.*Plimmerton: from John Plimmer, Wellington pioneer, director of the railway company that created the seaside resort to help boost its railway; central Wellington has Plimmers Steps.*Tasman: district named from the bay name, in honour of Dutchman Tasman, commander of first European expedition to sight the country; also a mountain and glacier name. Tasman National Park bears a fuller version of his name.*Tokelau, a territory: From the Tokelauan North or Northern, in reference to their position relative to Samoa. The Tokelauan people traditionally suppose themselves to have originated from settlers from Samoa.*Waikato: Named after the River. The hydronym means flowing water in Mori.NorwayTerritories*Island (), a dependent territory: Named after the French explorer Charles Bouvet de Lozier, who discovered it in 1739.()*Svalbard, a territory: A compound of Norse roots meaning cold edgePakistanProvinces*Afghania (Pakhtunkhwa) - from the native language for valley of the Afghans*Balochistan - Land of the indigenous Balochi people of the plateau that straddles south-east Iran and south-west Pakistan*Punjab - from the Persian for Land of Five Rivers in Central Pakistan*Sindh, Sindhustan or Sindhistan - from Sindhu, the Sanskrit name for the Land of the RiverKashmir*State of Jammu and Kashmir  Azad: Urdu, Free; Kashmir either:**from the Koshur (Native Kashmiri) for mountain tribes people in north-east Pakistan; or**from Sanskrit Kayapa-mra, sea (or lake) of the Kayapa,(Talageri, Shrikant. Chapter 4:The Geography of the Rigveda. The Rigveda. A historical analysis. New Delhi: Aditya Prakashan 2000. Retrieved 25 November 2006) although some regard this as a etymology.(Witzel, Michael. Have Words, Will Travel! from WESTWARD HO ! The Incredible Wanderlust of the Rgvedic Tribes Exposed by S. Talageri, Electronic Journal of Vedic Studies Vol. 7 (2001), issue 2 (31 March). Retrieved 25 November 2006.)Papua New Guinea*Britain - in honour of Great Britain. Originally named by Dampier in the Latin form Nova Britannia; called Neu-Pommern (New Pomerania) during the period of German colonization until the conquest of the area by Australia in 1914*New Ireland - named after Ireland (with the Latin phrase Nova Hibernia) by Carteret in 1767 when he established that it differed from nearby Britain. (Officially known as New Mecklenburg (German: Neumecklenburg or Neu-Mecklenburg) during the period of New Guinea from 1885 to 1914.)PeruPoland*Poland - from the tribe of Polans or from the word pole (field) meaning country of fields - Greater distinguishes it from the whole Polish state*Kuyavia - covered by dunes*Poland - in contrast with Poland*Land - from the town of Lubusz*Masovia - boggy*Masuria - from the Masovians, who settled Masuria*Podlaskie, by Lachs , i.e., by Poles*Polesie - covered by forests*Pomerania - along the sea*Silesia - from the holy Silesian mountain of la*Subcarpathia - at the foot of the Carpathians*Warmia - from the Old Prussian tribe of VarmsPortugal*Alentejo: meaning beyond the Tejo (the Tagus river)*Algarve: meaning country to the west (of the Guadiana River), from the Arab Al-Gharb*Azores: from Aores (pl.), after the aor, a type of bird*Beira: quite literally, the edge (during the early phase of Portugals history, Beira formed a borderland)*Madeira: wood*Minho: after the river Minho, that passes north of the region*Ribatejo: meaning near the Tejo (the Tagus river)*Trs-os-Montes: litteraly, behind the hills, its territory is behind the mountains of da EstrelaRomania*Bessarabia - from I, Wallachian prince who led some expeditions in this land*Bukovina - (in German: Buchenland)beech land*Dobrogea - from Dobrotitsa, ruler of the region in the 14th century(See Dobruja#Etymology for this and alternative etymology)*Haeg - Terra HerzogDukes land*Muntenia - from munteanman of the mountains, from Romanian muntemountain*Oltenia - from the river Olt, called Alutus by the Romans, possibly from Latin lutum, meaning mud or clay.*Transylvania - beyond the woods  i.e., from Hungary**Ardeal - possibly a borrowing of the Hungarian name Erdly, like the Romani name Ardyalo  speakers of old Hungarian pronounced Erdly as Erdl. The initial Hungarian e- occasionally changes to a- in Romanian (compare Hungarian egres gooseberry and Egyed, which became agri and Adjud in Romanian). However, the ending -eal in Romanian does not suggest a Romanian borrowing from Hungarian. In parallel examples, Hungarian -ely becomes -ei in Romanian. But when Hungarian adopts a word from Romanian, a usually becomes e: Andreas becomes Endre, the Latin ager becomes eger, etc. Thus the word Ardeal could become Erdly. - The linguist Josep Lad Pic determined that the word Ardeal has an Indo-European origin, while the words Erdely and Erdo do not. The Proto-Indo-European root *arde (to grow, high) manifests itself in the Old Indian rdhuka (prospering), and in Latin arduus (high). In Celtic Gaul, Arduenna silva parallels the English of Arden and the Ardennes Woods in Belgium. In Romanian, deal means hill and ardica to grow, high, prosperous.*Wallachia - land of the Romance-speaking peopleRussia*River: Amur comes from the Tungus amor for great or big river.*Oblast: the region of the city of Arkhangelsk, whose name the inhabitants traditionally associated with a monastery in the area dedicated to the Michael (Russian:   or Arkhangel Mikhail).*Chechnya: the Russian ethnonym Chechen probably derives from the name of the ancient village of Chechana or Chechen-aul. The village stands on the bank of the Argun River, near Grozny. Another theory derives the name from chechenit sya, to talk mincingly.(Websters third international dictionary; Merriam-Webster 1993, p.381.) Vasmer suggests a Kabardian origin: een.() The native term, Noxi, comes from nexa (sheep cheese), nox (plow) or from the prophet Noah (Nox in Chechen).*Dagestan: the word Daghestan or Daghistan (; Arabic and ) means country of mountains; it derives from the Turkic word da, meaning mountain and the Persian suffix -stan meaning land of. The spelling Dagestan transliterates the Russian name, which lacks the velar fricative.*Grozny or Groznyy: Russian for stern or severe (as the adjective describing a fort)*Oblast: from the Russian name Kaliningrad (Kalinin-city) of its largest city, re-named in 1946 to commemnorate Kalinin*Kazan (former Imperial Russian governorate): (compare the name of the city of Kazan)*Krai: the Khabarovsk region. The city of Khabarovsk took its name from the explorer Khabarov*Oblast: from the city (Petersburg formerly known as Leningrad (Russian for Lenin-city)*Novgorod: Russian: literally lower Novgorod: for lower new city, new city on the Lower Volga; in contrast to the older Novgorod*Zemlya: Russian for new land*Novgorod: from Russian roots meaning new city*Novosibirsk: roughly means new Siberian city*Sakhalin: derived from misinterpretation of a Manchu name sahaliyan ula angga hada (peak of the mouth of the River). Sahaliyan means black in Manchu and refers to the Amur River (sahaliyan ula).*Siberia: from a Tatar word meaning sleeping land*Smolensk: from the river Smolnya*Vladikavkaz: Russian for ruler of the Caucasus or rule the Caucasus*Vladivostok: Russian for ruler of the East or rule the East*Volgograd: Russian for city of the Volga or Volga citySlovakia*Bansk Bystrica: The name includes two distinct roots: the adjective Bansk (from Slovak baa - mine) and the name of the local river Bystrica (from Slavic bystrica - a swift stream).() Its name in  has the same semantic origin. The name literally means mining creek.*Bratislava: The first written reference comes from the Iuvavenses, which calls the locality Brezalauspurc (literally: Braslavs castle), in relation to the battles between the Bavaria and Hungary, which took place before the walls of Castle in 907.(Janota, Bratislavsk rarity, page 152; ) The castle got its name either from Predslav, third son of King I or from the local noble Braslav.(Lacika, Bratislava, pg. 6; Janota, Bratislavsk rarity, pg. 154) This former variant reappears as Braslav or Preslava on coins minted by King I of Hungary, dating to about the year 1000 and in which appeared the motto Preslavva Civitas.() At the end of the Ages, the name took its final German form Pressburg: Slovak of Preporok derived from this.() Although Pressburg remained the official name until 1919, the Hungarians use and used the name Pozsony (attested by the 12th century).(() Bozan could result from a ruling of the Castle from the eleventh century. The name Posonium Latin derives from Hungarian.(Janota, Bratislavsk rarity, pp. 155) In addition to these names, documents of the Renaissance call the city  Istropolis which means City of the Danube in Greek. The current name, Bratislava, dates from 1837 when the Slavist scholar Jozef afrik reconstructed a variant of the name, Betislaw(Lacika, Bratislava, pp. 6) a from old names, believing that these derived from the name of the ruler I of Bohemia. This name was used at first request by members of the Slovak movement in 1844 as Bratislav. After War, Slovak deputies tried not to rename the city with the name of Wilson City in honor of U.S. President Wilson, trying to avoid annexation by Czechoslovakia. The proposal was rejected and the official name of the city became the de Bratislava on March in 1919, after the city became part of Czechoslovakia.*Koice: The first written mention of the city as villa Cassa dates from 1230.() The Slovak name of the city comes from the Slavic name Koa  with the patronymic slavic suffix -ice.() According to other sources the city name probably stems from an ancient Hungarian first name which begins with Ko such as Kokos-Kakas, Kolumbn-Klmn, or Kopov-Kop.()  Historically, the city has been known as Kaschau in German, Kassa in Hungarian, Cassovia or Caschovia in Latin, Cassovie in French, Caovia in Romanian,  (Koshitsy) in Russian and Koszyce in Polish (see here for more names).* Nitra: The first mention of Nitra dates back to 880 (other variations: 826 as Nitrawa, 880 as Nitra, and in 1111/1113 as Nitra, Nitria). The name of the city derives from the river Nitra. The name originates in the Germanic word Nitrahwa: in the Indo-European languages nid means flow while ahwa means water.* Preov: The city name originates in the Hungarian word eper which means strawberry.() The citys historic coat of arms contains strawberries.( Historically, the city has been known as Eperjes in Hungarian, Eperies or Preschau in German,  Fragopolis in Greco-Latin, Preszw in Polish, Peryeshis in Romany,  (Pryashev)  in Russian and  (Priashiv) in Rusyn and Ukrainian.* Trenn: Trenn first appeared under Greek name Leukaristos (), depicted on the world map around 150 CE. In 179 CE, during the Wars between the Empire and Germanic Quadi, the Romans carved an inscription on the rock under the present-day castle, mentioning the place as Laugaricio. (The inscription marks the northernmost known presence of the Romans in Central Europe.) The first written mentions in the Middle Ages date from 1111 (as Treinchen) and from 1113 (adjective: Trenciniensis). The name became Trentschin in later German and Trencsn in Hungarian.*Trnava: The name of the city derives from the Slovak word tnie (thornbush) which characterized the river banks in the region. The Hungarian name Nagyszombat (first mentioned in 1238 in the form of Zumbotel) originates from the Hungarian word szombat (Saturday), referring to the weekly market fairs held on Saturdays.*ilinaSouth AfricaBefore 1994* Transvaal: literally beyond the River, which acted as its southern border.* Natal: see below at KwaZulu-Natal.* Free State: the Free State operated as an independent country (Free State) during most of the 19th century. The adjective Orange came from the River to the south/south-west of the province, in turn named in 1779 by Jacob Gordon (17431795), commander of the Cape Colony garrison (17801795), in honour of the Dutch of Orange-Nassau.()* Cape of Good Hope: named after the of Good Hope, where Town stands.After 1994* Cape, Cape, Cape: from the of Good Hope, the site of the first European settlement in todays South Africa, which would give its name to Town, Colony, and the former Province, of which each of the three named provinces originally formed a part.* State: the popular contraction of this provinces historic predecessor, the Free State.* Gauteng: The Sesotho name for the provinces and countrys largest city of Johannesburg. The literal meaning, Place of Gold, refers to the areas large gold-mining industry.* KwaZulu-Natal: a combination of the names of the two entities that merged to form the modern province:** KwaZulu: a bantustan formed in the apartheid era, ostensibly as a homeland for the Zulu** Natal: Portuguese for Christmas. The Portuguese explorer da Gama named the area: he landed on the coast of the future KwaZulu-Natal on Christmas Day in 1497.* Limpopo: the River forms the provinces and the countrys most northern boundary.* Mpumalanga: east, or more literally, the place where the sun rises, in several languages, among them Swazi, Xhosa, and Zulu. Refers to the provinces location in the north-east of South Africa.* North West: From its geographic position, in the north of the country and west of the main population-centre of Gauteng.Spain*Andalusia: from the Arabic name (Al-Andalus, with several suggested etymologies) formerly applied to the whole Iberian Peninsula*Aragon: from the River, that gave its name to the county of Aragon, one of the little Christian polities that resisted Islamic rule in Spain during its greatest extent (see Reconquista)*Asturias: the land of the Astures, an early people of north-west Spain*Basque Country (): from the ancient tribe of the Vascones, whose name became an ethnonym in the Middle Ages. The Basque name derives from Euskara (the autochthonous name for the Basque language).**lava (): of uncertain etymology. Various theories see it deriving from a Roman town called Alba, from several prossible Basque etymologies and even from Arabs (who, however, never occupied the province for long). A chronicle of 905 uses the form Arba, but later the word commonly appears as Alaba or Alava.**Biscay (, ): variant of bizkarra (shoulder, back or, in this case, mountain range in Basque)**Guipuscoa (, ): of unknown etymology. Old documents sometimes use the variant Ipuscoa.*Cantabria: from the Cantabri, a mountain people defeated by the Romans only after a great military effort (Wars, 29 - 19 BC). Celtologists have suggested a derivation from the Celtic root cant-, meaning rock or stone, and from the suffix -abr, used frequently in Celtic regions. From this we can deduce that the word cantabrus means dwelling in the mountains, referring to the rugged terrain of Cantabria. Another suggestion derives Cantabria from the Celtic Kant (mountain or rock) and Iber (the river Ebro), thus The Mountains of the Ebro. Spaniards also call this region La Montaa (The Mountain), but usually call the of Biscay the Sea.*Castile: the Spanish/Castilian name Castilla reflects the Spanish castillo (castle) and the Latin castellum (fort or fortress) with reference to numerous forts or castles erected by King Alfonso I for the defence of the area*Catalonia: from the castl (castellan) class who governed the nascent feudal Catalonia from their castles in the 11th and 12th centuries. (Compare the etymology of Castile.) Other parallel theories exist: Lafont (1986) says Catalunya could come from Arabic Qalat-uniyya (Qalat means castle and -uniyya operates as a collective suffix) because medieval Catalonha formed a border country with a lot of castles in front of the Muslim and Arabized zone of the Iberic peninsula. Some texts suggest that the name Catalunya derives from Gauta-landia: land of the Goths, or Goth-Alania meaning Land of the Goths and Alans(Alans, Encyclopdia Iranica) through Arabian *Cotelanuyya Andalusia, land of the Vandals, as the Visigoths and Alans invaded and divided Iberia between themselves, agreeing to rule some parts together, with the region of Catalunya going to the Visigoths. Additionally, the Visigothic kingdom of Catalonia may have taken its name from that of the original homeland of the Visigoths, Gotland. Coromines suggests an Iberian origin: Laietani (latinization of Iberian laiezken) > *laketani > laketans > metathesized as catelans > catalans, re-inforced by castellani (with an epenthetic s according to Coromines). Another theory suggests *kaste-lan as the Iberian name, later Latinized as castellani (an Iberian tribe in northern Catalonia according to Ptolemy); then the name would have evolved into *catellani > *catelans > *Catalans.*Extremadura: from Latin Extrema Dorii (literally, extremes of the Douro river), referring to the territories south of the Douro basin; or from an Old Castilian word used to designate the further territories controlled by the Christians (see Reconquista)*Galicia: from Latin Gallaecia, the name of the province created in Roman Hispania by Diocletian in 298 CE. It derives from gallicoi or callicoi, (Galli or Celts).*Len: the ancient kingdom and subsequent province of Len take their name from the city of Len, whose name derives from its position as the base of a legion (Latin legio)*Navarre (Spanish: Navarra, Basque: Nafarroa): from the of Navarre. Navarra has been argued to have either a Basque or Romance etymology. In the first case it would come from nabar (brownish, multicolor, also plowshare), in the second from nava (river bank).* Rioja: speculatively interpreted as red from the redness of a prominent soil type in the area.()SwedenHistorical Provincesright|250px|Provinces of SwedenSweden formerly consisted of historical provinces (Swedish: landskap), and the province-names still often serve to describe locations in Sweden. Their names often date from before the year 1000. Officially Sweden now subdivides into counties (Swedish: ln), introduced in 1634.Historical provinces:*Blekinge: from the adjective bleke, which corresponds to the nautical term for dead calm.*Bohusln*Dalarna: meaning the valleys*Dalsland: originally Dal, meaning the valley*Gotland: land of the Gutar*Gstrikland*Halland*Hlsingland*Hrjedalen: valley of the Hrje river*Jmtland*Lappland: land of the Lappi (the people)*Medelpad: Unclear. Medel means in the middle. One theory is the land between the river walleys (Ljungan and Indalslven)*Norrbotten: North Bothnia (originally northern part of Vsterbotten, see below)*Nrke*Skne*Smland: small lands, given for a combination of several smaller provinces.*Sdermanland: south mens land*Uppland up land*Vrmland*Vstmanland: west mens land*Vsterbotten: West Bothnia (west side of the of Bothnia). Compare the area of Finland on the east of the Gulf of Bothnia, formerly the Swedish province of Ostrobothnia (sterbotten  meaning something like east side of the bottom the gulf: see the etymology of Bothnia).*Vstergtland: means Western Gothia/Gtaland.*ngermanland: from the Norse anger, which means deep fjord and refers to the deep mouth of the river ngermanlven.*land*stergtland: means Eastern Gothia/GtalandPresent counties*Stockholm: from Stockholm, the city. From stock (timber log) and holm (small island). (Somewhat disputed.)*Uppsala: from Uppsala, the city. (Ultimate etymology disputed.)*Sdermanland: from Sdermanland, the historical province.*stergtland: from stergtland, the historical province.*Jnkping: from Jnkping, the city. Jn comes from the creek Junebcken; kping means merchant place.*Kronoberg: from Castle. Kronoberg means the Crowns mountain.*Kalmar: from Kalmar, the city. (Ultimate etymology disputed.)*Gotland: from Gotland, the historical province.*Blekinge: from Blekinge, the historical province.*Skne: from Skne, the historical province.*Halland: from Halland, the historical province.*Vstra Gtaland: means Western Gothia/Gtaland.*Vrmland: from Vrmland, the historical province.*rebro: from rebro, the city, the name of which means bridge over gravel banks.*Vstmanland: from Vstmanland, the historical province.*Dalarna: from Dalarna, the historical province.*Gvleborg: from Gvle, the city, and borg (fortress).*Vsternorrland: means Western Norrland.*Jmtland: from Jmtland, the historical province.*Vsterbotten: from Vsterbotten, the historical province.*Norrbotten: from Norrbotten, the historical province.Switzerland*Aargau: German name labelling the district (Gau) of the River Aar.*Appenzell: from Latin abbatis cella, meaning land of the abbot, referring to the fact that Appenzell originally belonged to the of St. Gall.*Basel: traditionally associated with the Greek basileus (king) or basileos (of the king): the city saw itself as preserving the Imperial Roman heritage of its parent settlement, the Roman town of Raurica. Note the use of the basilisk as a Basler icon.*Bern: German Bren (bears): reflected in the capital citys bear-pits, foundation-legend and coat-of-arms*Graubnden: (the German name literally means grey leagues)  from the League, a grey-clad organisation started in 1395.* Jura: after the Mountains.*Neuchtel: French for new castle; Neuenburg (with the same semantic meaning) in German*Schwyz: named after the town of Schwyz; the origin of the town name is unknown.*St Gallen: from Gall (c. 550 - c. 646), traditionally the Irish founder/namesake of the of St. Gall which came to dominate the area.*Solothurn: the city of Solothurn, capital of ther Canton of the same name, first appears under the Celtic name Salodurum.*Thurgau: an early medieval Gau county named after the River Thur.*Ticino: from the principal river of the canton, the Ticino, a tributary of the River.*Uri: (speculatively) from the older German Aurochs, a wild ox (see aurochs); or from the Celtic word ure, a bull. (Note the head of the bull on the cantonal coat of arms.)*Valais (French), Wallis (German): from the Latin  word vallis, meaning valley; the canton consists mainly of the Rhone valley.*Zurich: after the city of Zurich , called Turicum in 2nd century Latin; the origin of the Latin name is unknown.Thailand*Phitsanulok: Vishnus Heaven, from Thai Phitsanu (cognate with Vishnu) and lok (globe)Ukrainethumb|275px|Traditional regionsMost of Ukraines oblasts take their names from their principal city; but Volyn Oblast, Zakarpattia Oblast, and the Crimean Autonomous Republic offer exceptions to this rule. See also of Ukraine.*Oblast: from the city Cherkasy, presumably the citys name derived from Circassians according to da Pian del Carpine, Tatishchev, and Rigelman.(Rigelman, A.I. Chronicles of Russia Minor and its people as well as the Cossacks in general. Kiev. Lybid, 1994. (page 45))*Oblast: from the city Chernihiv*Oblast: from the city Chernivtsi*Crimea: from the Crimean Tatar name: Qrm* Oblast: from the city Dnipropetrovsk (re-named in 1926 after Dnipro (river) and the Soviet Ukraine s head of state, the Bolshevik Ivanovich Petrovsky)* Oblast: from the city Donetsk, after the Donets river. Donetsk forms a diminutive and tributary of the Don.* Oblast: from the city Ivano-Frankivsk, re-named (from Stanyslaviv) after the famous Ukrainian writer Franko (18561916) in 1962*Oblast: from the city Kharkiv, legendarily named for the mythical Ukrainian folk-hero Kharko (died ca 1737)*Oblast: from the city Kherson*Oblast: from the city Khmelnytskyi, named in 1954 on the 300th anniversary of the of Pereyaslav, after Cossack leader Khmelnytsky*City of Kiev: ancient name (Ukrainian: Kyiv). Myth/legend tells of a founder named Kyi*Oblast: from the city Kiev*Oblast: from the city Kirovohrad (Kirov City), after Kirov (named Kirovo in 1934, Kirovograd in 1939)*Oblast: from the city Luhansk*Oblast: from the city of Lviv, founded 1256 by King of Halych, and named after his son Danylovich*Oblast: from the city Mykolaiv, after the day of Nicholas (Ukrainian Mykolai, Russian Nikolai), 19 December 1788, commemorating the fall of the Turkish fortress of Ochakiv to the Russians*Oblast: after the city Odessa in 1795; etymology unknown, but see Odessa: History for some possibilities*Oblast: from Ltava, an ancient name of the city Poltava*Oblast: from the city Rivne*City of Sevastopol: (1783) Greek highly respectable city, august city; see Sevastopol: Etymology*Oblast: from the city Sumy*Oblast: from the city Ternopil*Oblast: from the city Vinnytsia*Oblast: ancient name of the region of Volyn*Oblast: beyond the Mountains, Transcarpathia*Oblast: from the city Zaporizhia, in turn after region beyond the rapids (seventeenth century), downstream of the rapids of the River Dnieper*Oblast: from the city Zhytomyr (988), after Zhytomyr, prince of the DrevliansUnited KingdomFor etymologies of the United Kingdoms constituent countries  England, Scotland, Wales, and Ireland,  see of country-name etymologies.Territories*Anguilla, an overseas territory: eel, for its elongated shape, from either Spanish anguila, Italian anguilla, or French anguille, as it is uncertain whether the island was first sighted by Columbus in 1493 or by French explorers in 1564.(Government of Anguilla. Anguillas History.)*Bermuda, an overseas territory: Land of Bermdez, from the Spanish La Bermuda, from the Spanish captain de Bermdez who sighted the island in 1505 while returning from Hispaniola.()*Indian Ocean Territory (BIOT), an overseas territory: See of country-name etymologies for etymologies of Britain and India*Virgin Islands, an overseas territory: bestowed by Columbus from Ursula and her 11,000 virgins, on account of the seemingless endless number of islands*Islands, an overseas territory: From the Spanish name Caymanas, from the Carib for caiman, a kind of marine alligator.*Islands, an overseas territory: From the Sound between the two main islands, bestowed by English captain John Strong in 1690 in honor of Cary, 5th Viscount Falkland, Lord of the Admiralty. Palace was the Caries ancestral home in Scotland.**Islas Malvinas, its Spanish name: Malovian Islands, from the French Malouines describing the Breton sailors from Malo in Britanny who frequented the islands in the 1690s.**Sebald Islands, a former name now applied in Spanish to the Islands: From a Dutch name commemorating de Weert, the captain usually credited with first sighting the archipelago in 1598.*Gibraltar, a colony: A corruption of the Arabic words Jebel Tariq ( ) which means Tariqs Mountain, named after ibn Ziyad, a Berber who landed at Gibraltar in 711 to launch the Islamic invasion of the Peninsula.*Jersey: The Norse suffix -ey means island and is commonly found in the parts of Europe where Norsemen established settlements. (Compare modern Nordic languages: y in Norwegian, / in Danish and Swedish.)  The meaning of the first part of the islands name is unclear. Among theories are that it derives from Norse jarth (earth) or jarl (earl), or perhaps a personal name, Geirr, to give Geirrs Island. American writer Safire suggested that the Jers in Jersey could be a corruption of Caesar.(Word Origins Vol. 841.)*of Man: The islands name in both English and Manx (Mannin) derives from mac Lir, the Brythonic and Gaelic, equivalent to the god Poseidon.*Montserrat, a territory: From the Spanish name Santa Maria de Monterrate bestowed by Columbus in 1493 in honor of the Blessed Virgin of the Monastery of Montserrate in Spain. Montserrat itself means jagged mountain.*Islands, an overseas territory: A member of the English Captain Carterets crew in his ship HMS Swallow first sighted the remote islands in July 1767. Carteret named the main island Pitcairns Island after the man who first saw land: the son of Major Pitcairn of the Marines.*Helena, Ascension and Tristan da Cunha, an overseas territory**Helena: bestowed by Portuguese explorer da Nova in honor of Saint Helena, the mother of Roman emperor the Great, for its discovery on Saint Helenas Day, 21 May 1502.*Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands (SGSSI), an overseas territory:**South Georgia: Land of George, from the original Isle of Georgia bestowed by British captain Cook in honor of King George III on 17 January 1775. South distinguished it from the other of Georgia, which became an American state in 1782.**South Sandwich Islands: Bestowed by British captain Cook in honor of Montagu, 4th Earl of Sandwich, who at the time was Lord of the Admiralty and helped fund Cooks voyages. South distinguished them from the other Islands, now known by their native name Hawaii.*and Caicos Islands (TCI), an overseas territory:**Turks Islands: for the indigenous Turks-cap cacti (Melocactus communis)**Caicos Islands: from the indigenous Lucayan caya hico, meaning string of islands.United StatesTerritories* Island National Wildlife Refuge, an unincorporated territory: for American captain Baker of Bedford, Massachusetts, who claimed to have discovered it in 1832 or 1834, despite being the third to have done so.()* Guam, a territory: From the native Chamorro word guahan, meaning we have.* Island, a territory: Bestowed by Capt. E. Netcher in honor of the lookout who sighted it from his ship, the Isabella, on 9 September 1842.* Island, a territory: Bestowed by the British Captain Brown in honor of Edward, Thomas, and William Jarvis, the owners of his vessel the Eliza Francis.* Atoll, a territory: For British captain J. Johnston, commander of the Cornwallis, who discovered the atoll on 14 December 1807.* Reef, a territory: For Capt. Kingman, who discovered the reef aboard the Shooting Star on 29 November 1853.* Islands, a territory: For their geographic location, perhaps from the islands situation midway between North America and Asia, or their proximity to the Date Line (halfway around the world from the Meridian).(Frequently Asked Questions about Midway, U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service)**Middlebrook Islands or the Brook Islands, former names: For their discoverer, Captain Middlebrooks.*Island, a territory: From the Spanish Navaza (nava- meaning plain or field), bestowed by members of Columbuss crew who discovered the island while attempting to return to Hispaniola from Jamaica*Mariana Islands, a commonwealth: From its position and the Spanish name Las Marianas bestowed by the Jesuit missionary Vitores in 1668 in honour of of Austria, widow of King Philip IV and regent of Spain.*Atoll, a territory: Named after the boat Palmyra, which belonged to the American Captain Sawle. He sought shelter on the atoll on 7 November 1802, and became the first person known to land on it.*Rico, a territory with commonwealth status: Columbus named the island San Juan Bautista in honour of John the Baptist in 1493. The Spanish authorities set up a capital city called Puerto Rico (meaning rich port). For now unknown reasons, the island and capital city had exchanged names by the 1520s.* States Virgin Islands, an insular area: See British Virgin Islands above.* Island, an unincorporated territory: for British captain Wake, who sighted the island in 1796, despite the Spanish explorer Mendaa having probably sighted it in 1568.See also*Etymology*Toponomy*of country name etymologies*of political entities named after people*of etymologies*of double placenamesNotes
234542
Richard_Trevithick
signature         	Richard Trevithick (13 April 1771  22 April 1833) was a British(Trevithick, Life of Richard Trevithick,1872.) inventor and engineer from Cornwall. His most significant success was the high pressure engine and he also built the first full-scale working railway locomotive. On 21 February 1804 the worlds first locomotive-hauled railway journey took place as Trevithicks unnamed locomotive hauled a train along the tramway of the Ironworks, in Tydfil in Wales.()()Childhood and early lifeRichard Trevithick was born at Tregajorran (in the parish of Illogan), between Camborne and Redruth, in the heart of one of the rich mineral mining areas of Cornwall. He was the youngest-but-one child and the only boy in a family of six children. He was very tall (6ft 2in) and athletic and concentrated more on sport than schoolwork. Sent to the school at Camborne, he did not take much advantage of the education provided  one of his school masters described him as a disobedient, slow, obstinate, spoiled boy, frequently absent and very inattentive. An exception was arithmetic, for which he had an aptitude, but arrived at the correct answers by unconventional means.()Trevithick was the son of mine captain Richard Trevithick (17351797) and of miners daughter Ann Teague (died 1810). As a child he would watch engines pump water from the deep tin and copper mines in Cornwall. For a time he was a neighbour to Murdoch, the steam carriage pioneer, and would have been influenced by his experiments with steam-powered road locomotion.(Griffiths, John C. (2004) Murdock, William (17541839), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Oct 2007  accessed 18 Jan 2009)Trevithick first went to work at the age of 19 at the East Stray Park Mine. He was enthusiastic and quickly gained the status as a consultant, unusual for such a young person. He was popular with the miners because of the respect they had for his father.Marriage and careerIn 1797, Trevithick married Jane Harvey of Hayle.  Janes father, John Harvey, who was formerly a blacksmith from Green, formed the local foundry of Hayle. His company became famous worldwide for building huge stationary  beam engines for pumping water, usually from mines, based on Newcomens and Watts engines.Until this time, such steam engines were of the condensing or atmospheric type, originally invented by Newcomen in 1712, and which also became known as low-pressure engines. Watt, on behalf of his partnership with Boulton, held a number of patents for improving the efficiency of Newcomens engine, including the separate condenser patent  which proved the most contentious.Trevithick became engineer at Dong Mine in 1797 and it was here that he (in conjunction with Edward Bull) pioneered the use of high pressure steam. He worked on building and modifying steam engines to avoid the royalties due to Watt on the separate condenser patent. It was at Ding Dong that and Watt served an injunction on him and posted it on the minestuffs and most likely on the door of the Count (Account) House which, although now a ruin, is the only surviving building from Trevithicks time at Ding Dong.He also experimented with the plunger pole pump, a type of pump  with a beam engine  used widely in Cornwalls tin mines, in which he reversed the plunger to change it into a water-power engine.The high pressure engineImage:Trevithick High Pressure Steam Engine - Project Gutenberg eText 14041.png|thumb|Trevithicks No. 14 engine, built by Hazledine and Co., Bridgnorth, about 1804, and illustrated after being rescued circa 1885; from Scientific American Supplement, Vol. XIX, No. 470, January 3, 1885. This engine is on view at the Museum (London).As his experience grew, he realised that improvements in boiler technology now permitted the safe production of high pressure steam, which could move a piston in a steam engine on its own account, instead of using pressure near to atmospheric in a condensing engine.He was not the first to think of so-called strong steam.  Murdoch had developed and demonstrated a model steam carriage, starting in 1784, and demonstrated it to Trevithick at his request in 1794. In fact, Trevithick lived next door to Murdoch in Redruth in 1797 and 1798.  Evans in the U.S. had also concerned himself with the concept, but there is no indication that his ideas had ever come to Trevithicks attention.()Independently of this, Woolf was experimenting with higher pressures whilst working as the Chief Engineer of the Griffin Brewery (proprietors Meux and Reid). This was an Engine designed by Hornblower and Maberly, and the proprietors were keen to have the best steam engine in London. Around 1796, Woolf believed he could save substantial amounts of coal consumption.According to his son Francis, Trevithick was the first to make high pressure steam work in England in 1799. Not only would a high pressure steam engine eliminate the condenser, but it would allow the use of a smaller cylinder, saving space and weight. He reasoned that his engine could now be more compact, lighter and small enough to carry its own weight even with a carriage attached. (Note this did not use the expansion of the steam, so-called expansive working came later).Early experimentsTrevithick started building his first models of high pressure (meaning a few atmospheres) steam engines, initially a stationary one and then one attached to a road carriage. A cylinder was used, with steam distribution by means of a valve. Exhaust steam was vented via a vertical pipe or chimney straight into the atmosphere, thus avoiding a condenser and any possible infringements of Watts patent. The linear motion was directly converted into circular motion via a crank instead of using a cumbersome beam.The Puffing Devilthumb|Camborne Hill street name and plaque commemorating Trevithicks steam carriage demonstration in 1801.Trevithick built a full-size steam road locomotive in 1801 on a site near the present day Fore Street at Camborne.() He named the carriage Puffing Devil and on Eve that year, he demonstrated it by successfully carrying several men up Fore Street and then continuing on up Camborne Hill, from Camborne Cross, to the nearby village of Beacon. His cousin and associate, Vivian, steered the machine. This is widely recognised as the first demonstration of transportation powered by steam. It inspired the popular Cornish folk song Hill.A steam wagon built in 1770 by Cugnot may have an earlier claim. During further tests, Trevithicks locomotive broke down three days later after passing over a gully in the road. The vehicle was left under some shelter with the fire still burning whilst the operators retired to a nearby house for a meal of roast goose and drinks. Meanwhile the water boiled off, the engine overheated and the machine burned, destroying it. Trevithick did not consider this a serious setback, but rather operator error.In 1802, Trevithick took out a patent for his high pressure steam engine.(Rogers, Iron Road, pp. 40-44) To prove his ideas, he built a stationary engine at the Coalbrookdale Companys works in Shropshire in 1802, forcing water to a measured height to measure the done. The engine ran at forty piston strokes a minute, with an unprecedented boiler pressure of 145 psi.The Coalbrookdale Locomotivethumb|A drawing of the Coalbrookdale locomotive from the Science Museum.The Coalbrookdale company then built a rail locomotive for him, but little is known about it, including whether or not it actually ran. To date, the only known information about it comes from a drawing preserved at the Museum, London, together with a letter written by Trevithick to his friend, Davies Giddy. The design incorporated a single horizontal cylinder enclosed in a return-flue boiler. A flywheel drove the wheels on one side through spur gears, and the axles were mounted directly on the boiler, with no frame.() On the drawing, the piston-rod, guide-bars and cross-head are located directly above the firebox door, thus making the engine extremely dangerous to fire while moving.()This is the drawing used as the basis of all images and replicas of the later Pen-y-darren locomotive, as no plans for that locomotive have survived.(Photograph from the museum near Telford, UK)The London Steam CarriageImage:Trevithicks Dampfwagen.jpg|thumb|right|The Steam Carriage, by Trevithick and Vivian, demonstrated in London in 1803.The Puffing Devil was unable to maintain sufficient steam pressure for long periods, and would have been of little practical use. In 1803 he built another steam-powered road vehicle called the Steam Carriage, which attracted much attention from the public and press when he drove it that year in London from Holborn to Paddington and back. It was uncomfortable for passengers and proved more expensive to run than a horse-drawn carriage and was abandoned.The tragedy at GreenwichAlso in 1803, one of Trevithicks stationary pumping engines in use at Greenwich exploded, killing four men. Although Trevithick considered the explosion was caused by another case of careless operation rather than design error, the incident was exploited relentlessly by Watt and Boulton (competitors and promoters of the low-pressure engine) who highlighted the perceived risks of using high pressure steam.Trevithicks response was to incorporate two safety valves into future designs, only one of which could be adjusted by the operator.() The adjustable valve comprised a disk covering a small hole at the top of the boiler above the water level in the steam chest. The force exerted by the steam pressure was equalised by an opposite force created by a weight attached to a pivoted lever. The position of the weight on the lever was adjustable thus allowing the operator to set the maximum steam pressure. Trevithick also added a plug of lead, positioned in the boiler just below the minimum safe water level. Under normal operation the water temperature could not exceed that of boiling water and kept the lead below its melting point. If the water ran low, it exposed the lead plug, and the cooling effect of the water was lost. The temperature would then rise sufficiently to melt the lead, releasing steam into the fire, reducing the boiler pressure and providing an audible alarm in sufficient time for the operator to damp the fire, and let the boiler cool before damage could occur. He also introduced the hydraulic testing of boilers, and the use of a mercury manometer to indicate the pressure.The Pen-y-Darren locomotiveFile:TrevithicksEngine.jpg|thumb|right|Trevithicks 1804 locomotive. This full-scale reconstruction is in the Waterfront Museum, Swansea.In 1802, Trevithick built one of his high pressure steam engines to drive a hammer at the Pen-y-Darren Ironworks in Tydfil, South Wales. With the assistance of Rees Jones, an employee of the iron works and under the supervision of Samuel Homfray, the proprietor, he mounted the engine on wheels and turned it into a locomotive. In 1803, Trevithick sold the patents for his locomotives to Samuel Homfray.Homfray was so impressed with Trevithicks locomotive that he made a bet with another ironmaster, Crawshay, for 500 guineas that Trevithicks steam locomotive could haul ten tons of iron along the Tydfil Tramroad from Penydarren () to Abercynon (), a distance of 9.75 miles (16 km). Amid great interest from the public, on 21 February 1804 it successfully carried 10 tons of iron, 5 wagons and 70 men the full distance in 4 hours and 5 minutes, an average speed of approximately .() As well as Homfray, Crawshay and the passengers, other witnesses included Mr. Giddy, a respected patron of Trevithick and an engineer from the Government.() The engineer from the government was probably a safety inspector and particularly interested in the boilers ability to withstand high steam pressures.The configuration of the Pen-y-darren engine differed from the Coalbrookdale engine. The cylinder was moved to the other end of the boiler so that the firedoor was out of the way of the moving parts. This obviously also involved putting the crankshaft at the chimney end. The locomotive comprised a boiler with a single return flue mounted on a four wheel frame. At one end, a single cylinder with very long stroke was mounted partly in the boiler, and a rod crosshead ran out along a slidebar, an arrangement that looked like a giant trombone. As there was only one cylinder, this was coupled to a large flywheel mounted on one side. The inertia of the flywheel would even out the movement that was transmitted to a central cog-wheel that was, in turn connected to the driving wheels. It used a high pressure cylinder without a condenser, the exhaust steam was sent up the chimney assisting the draught through the fire, increasing efficiency even more.The bet was won. Despite many peoples doubts, it had been shown that, provided that the gradient was sufficiently gentle, it was possible to successfully haul heavy carriages along a smooth iron road using the adhesive weight alone of a suitably heavy and powerful steam locomotive. Trevithicks was probably the first to do so;(Kirby, Engineering in History, pp. 274-275) however some of the short cast iron plates of the tramroad broke under the locomotive as they were intended only to support the lighter axle load of horse-drawn wagons and so the tramroad returned to horse power after the initial test run.Homfray was pleased he won his bet. The engine was placed on blocks and reverted to its original stationary job of driving hammers.In modern Merthyr, behind the momument to Trevithicks locomotive is a stone wall, the sole remainder of the former boundary wall of Homfrays House.()A full-scale working reconstruction of the Pen-y-darren locomotive was commissioned in 1981 and delivered to Swansea Museum. It is now housed in the National Waterfront Museum. Several times a year it is run on a 40m length of rail outside the museum.The Newcastle locomotiveChristopher Blackett, proprietor of the Wylam colliery near Newcastle, heard of the success in Wales and wrote to Trevithick asking for locomotive designs. These were sent to John Whitfield at Gateshead, Trevithicks agent, who built what was probably the first locomotive to have flanged wheels.(Westcott G.F. ed, The British railway locomotive 1803-1853, HMSO, London, 1958, p. 9) Blackett was using wooden rails for his tramway and, once again, Trevithicks machine was to prove too heavy for its track.()Catch Me Who Canthumb|Trevithicks steam circus.In 1808, Trevithick publicised his steam railway locomotive expertise by building a new locomotive called me who can, built for him by John Hazledine and Urpeth Rastrick at Bridgnorth in Shropshire, and named by Mr. Giddys daughter. The configuration differed from the previous locomotives in that the cylinder was mounted vertically and drove a pair of wheels directly with the connecting rods, without flywheel or gearing. This was probably Trevithicks fourth locomotive, after those used at Coalbrookdale, Pen-y-darren ironworks and the Wylam colliery. He ran it on a circular track just south of the present day Square tube station in London. The site in Bloomsbury has recently been identified archaeologically as that occupied by the Chadwick Building, part of College London.()Admission to the steam circus was one shilling including a ride and it was intended to show that rail travel was faster than by horse. This venture also suffered from weak tracks and public interest was limited.Trevithick was disappointed by the response and designed no more railway locomotives. It was not until 1812 that twin cylinder steam locomotives, built by Murray in Holbeck, successfully started replacing horses for hauling coal wagons on the edge railed, and pinion Railway from Middleton colliery to Leeds, Yorkshire.Engineering projectsThames tunnelIn 1805 Vazie, another Cornish engineer, was selected by the Archway Company to drive a tunnel under the Thames at Rotherhithe. Vazie encountered serious problems with water influx and got no further than sinking the end shafts when the directors called in Trevithick for consultation. The directors agreed to pay Trevithick 1000 if he could successfully complete the tunnel, a length of 1220 feet (366 m). In August 1807 Trevithick began driving a small pilot tunnel or driftway 5 feet (1.5 m) high tapering from 2 feet 6 inches (0.75 m) at the top to 3 feet (0.9 m) at the bottom. By 23 December after it had progressed 950 feet (285 m) progress was delayed after a sudden inrush of water and only one month later on 26 Jan 1808, at 1040 feet (312 m), a more serious inrush occurred. The tunnel was flooded and Trevithick, being the last to leave, was nearly drowned. Clay was dumped on the river bed to seal the hole and the tunnel was drained but mining was now more difficult. Progress stalled and a few of the directors attempted to discredit Trevithick but the quality of his work was eventually upheld by two colliery engineers from the North of England. Despite suggesting various building techniques to complete the project, including a submerged iron tube, Trevithicks links with the company ceased and the project was never actually completed.CompletionThe first successful tunnel under the Thames would be started by Marc Isambard Brunel in 1823, three quarters of a mile upstream, assisted by his son Kingdom Brunel (who also nearly died in a tunnel collapse). Marc Brunel finally completed it in 1843, the delays being due to problems with funding.Trevithicks suggestion of a submerged tube approach was successfully implemented for the first time across the River in Michigan with the construction of the Central Railway Tunnel, under the engineering supervision of The New York Central Railways engineering vice president, J Wilgus.   Construction began in 1903 and was completed in 1910. The Tunnel which was completed in 1930 for automotive traffic, and the tunnel under the Kong harbour were also submerged tube designs.Return to LondonTrevithick went on to research other projects to exploit his high pressure steam engines: boring brass for cannon manufacture, stone crushing, rolling mills, forge hammers, furnace blowers as well as the traditional mining applications. He also built a barge powered by paddle wheels and several dredgers.Trevithick saw opportunities in London and persuaded his wife and 4 children reluctantly to join him in 1808 for two and a half years lodging first in Rotherhithe and then in Limehouse.Nautical projectsIn 1808, Trevithick entered a partnership with Robert Dickinson, a West India merchant. Dickinson supported several of Trevithicks patents. The first of these was the Nautical Labourer; a steam tug with a floating crane propelled by paddle wheels. However, it did not meet the fire regulations for the docks, and the Society of Coal Whippers, worried about losing their livelihood, even threatened the life of Trevithick.Another patent was for the installation of iron tanks in ships for storage of cargo and water instead of in wooden casks. A small works was set up at Limehouse to manufacture them, employing 3 men. The tanks were also used to raise sunken wrecks by placing them under the wreck and creating buoyancy by pumping them full of air. In 1810 a wreck near Margate was raised in this way but there was a dispute over payment and Trevithick was driven to cut the lashings loose and let it sink again.In 1809, Trevithick worked on various ideas on improvements for ships: iron floating docks, iron ships, telescopic iron masts, improved ship structures, iron buoys and using heat from the ships boilers for cooking.Failure and return to CornwallIn May 1810, he caught typhoid and nearly died. By September, he had recovered sufficiently to travel back to Cornwall by ship and in February 1811 he and Dickinson were declared bankrupt. They were not discharged until 1814, Trevithick having paid off most of the partnership debts from his own funds.The Cornish boiler and engineIn about 1812, Trevithick designed the boiler. These were horizontal, cylindrical boilers with a single internal fire tube or flue passing horizontally through the middle. Hot exhaust gases from the fire passed through the flue thus increasing the surface area heating the water and improving efficiency. These types were installed in the Boulton and Watt pumping engines at Dolcoath and more than doubled their efficiency.Again in 1812, he installed a new high pressure experimental steam engine also with condensing at Prosper. This became known as the Cornish engine and was the most efficient in the world at that time. Other Cornish engineers contributed to its development but Trevithicks work was predominant. In the same year he installed another high pressure engine, though non-condensing, in a threshing machine on a farm at Cornwall. It was very successful and proved to be cheaper to run than the horses it replaced. It ran for 70 years and was then exhibited at the Science Museum.The recoil engineIn one of Trevithicks more unusual projects, he attempted to build a recoil engine similar to the aeolipile described by of Alexandria in about AD 50. Trevithicks engine comprised a boiler feeding a hollow axle to route the steam to a catherine wheel with two fine-bore steam jets on its circumference. The first wheel was  in diameter and a later attempt was  in diameter. To get any usable torque, steam had to issue from the nozzles at a very high velocity and in such large volume that it proved not to operate with adequate efficiency.  Today this would be recognised as a reaction turbine.South AmericaDraining the Peruvian silver minesIn 1811 draining water from the rich silver mines of de Pasco in Peru at an altitude of 14,000 feet (4267 m) posed serious problems for the man in charge, Francisco Uville. The low pressure condensing engines by Boulton and Watt developed so little power as to be useless at this altitude, and they could not be dismantled into sufficiently small pieces to be transported there along mule tracks. Uville was sent to England to investigate using Trevithicks high pressure steam engine. He bought one for 20 guineas, transported it back and found it to work quite satisfactorily. In 1813 Uville set sail again for England and, having fallen ill on the way, broke his journey via Jamaica. When he had recovered he boarded the Falmouth ship Fox coincidentally with one of Trevithicks cousins on board the same vessel. Trevithicks home was just a few miles from Falmouth so Uville was able to meet him and tell him about the project.Trevithick leaves for South AmericaOn 20 October 1816 Trevithick left Penzance on the whaler ship Asp accompanied by a lawyer named Page and a boilermaker bound for Peru. He was received by Uville with honour initially but relations soon broke down and Trevithick left in disgust at the accusations directed at him. He travelled widely in Peru acting as a consultant on mining methods. The government granted him certain mining rights and he found mining areas, but did not have the funds to develop them, with the exception of a copper and silver mine at Caxatambo. After a time serving in the army of Simon Bolivar he returned to Caxatambo but due to the unsettled state of the country and presence of the Spanish army he was forced to leave the area and abandon 5000 worth of ore ready to ship. Uville died in 1818 and Trevithick soon returned to Cerro de Pasco to continue mining. However, the war of liberation denied him several objectives. Meanwhile, back in England, he was accused of neglecting his wife Jane and family in Cornwall.Exploring the isthmus of Costa Rica on footAfter leaving Cerro de Pasco, Trevithick passed through Ecuador on his way to Bogot in Colombia. He arrived in Rica in 1822 hoping to develop mining machinery. He spent time looking for a practical route to transport ore and equipment, settling on using the San Juan River, the River, and then a railway to cover the remaining distance. In a biography his son wrote that Trevithick had in mind a steam-driven railway and not mule-driven.The initial party comprised Trevithick, Scottish mining projector James Gerard,(Payton, Philip (2004), Trevithick, Richard (17711833), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Oct 2007  accessed 18 Jan 2009) two schoolboys: Jos Maria Montealegre (a future president of Costa Rica) and his brother Mariano, whom Gerard intended to enrol in School, North London,() and seven natives, three of whom returned home after guiding them through the first part of their journey. The journey was treacherous  one of the party was drowned in a raging torrent and Trevithick was nearly killed on at least two occasions. In the first he was saved from drowning by Gerard, and in the second he was nearly devoured by an alligator following a dispute with a local man whom he had in some way offended. He made his way to Cartagena where he met Stephenson who was on his way home from Colombia. It had been many years since they last met (when Stephenson was just a baby). Stephenson gave Trevithick 50 to help his passage home. He arrived at Falmouth in October 1827 with few possessions other than the clothes he was wearing. Trevithick never returned to Costa Rica.Later projectsTaking encouragement from earlier inventors who had achieved some successes with similar endeavours, Trevithick petitioned Parliament for a grant but he was unsuccessful.In 1829 he built a closed cycle steam engine followed by a vertical tubular boiler.In 1830 he invented an early form of storage room heater. It comprised a small fire tube boiler with a detachable flue which could be heated either outside or indoors with the flue connected to a chimney. Once hot the hot water container could be wheeled to where heat was required and the issuing heat could be altered using adjustable doors.To commemorate the passing of the Reform Bill in 1832 he designed a massive column to be 1000 feet (300 m) high, being 100 feet (30 m) in diameter at the base tapering to 12 feet (3.6 m) at the top where a statue of a horse would have been mounted. It was to be made of 1500 10-foot (3 m) square pieces of cast iron and would have weighed 6000 tons. There was substantial public interest in the proposal, but it was never built.Final projectAbout the same time he was invited to do some development work on an engine of a new vessel at Dartford by John Hall, the founder of J & E Hall Limited. The work involved a reaction turbine for which Trevithick earned 1200. He lodged at The Bull hotel in the High Street, Dartford, Kent.DeathImage:Stedmemomorial.jpg|thumb|left|The plaque at St. Edmunds Burial Ground, East Hill, Dartford. With the words Richard Trevithick Approximately 25ft from this wall lie the remains of Richard Trevithick. The great engineer and pioneer of high pressure steam. He died at the Bull Inn, Dartford and was carried here by fellow workers of Halls Engineering Works. To a paupers grave. Born Illogan, Cornwall April 13th 1771. Died Dartford, Kent April 22nd 1833.After he had been working in Dartford for about a year, Trevithick was taken ill with pneumonia and had to retire to bed at The Bull hotel, where he was lodging at the time. Following a weeks confinement in bed he died on the morning of 22 April 1833. He was penniless, and no relatives or friends had attended his bedside during his illness. His colleagues at Halls works made a collection for his funeral expenses and acted as bearers. They also paid a night watchman to guard his grave at night to deter robbers, as snatching was common at that time.Trevithick was buried in an unmarked grave in St Edmunds Burial Ground, East Hill, Dartford. The burial ground closed in 1857, with the gravestones being removed in the 1960s. A plaque marks the approximate spot believed to be the site of the grave.() The plaque lies on the side of the park, near the East Hill gate, and an unlinked path.Memorialsthumb|upright|Richard Trevithicks statue by the public library at Camborne, Cornwall.Today, to commemorate his achievements, a statue depicting Richard Trevithick holding one of his small-scale models stands beside the library at Camborne.On 17 March 2007, Dartford Borough Council invited the Chairman of the Society, Phil Hosken, to unveil a Plaque at the Royal Victoria and Bull hotel (formerly The Bull) marking Trevithicks last years in Dartford and the place of his death in 1833. The Blue Plaque is prominently displayed on the Hotels front facade.The University Engineering, Computer Science and Physics departments are based around the Trevithick Building which also holds the Trevithick Library, named after Richard Trevithick.()One of the oldest depictions of St Pirans flag can be seen in a stained glass window at Abbey, 1888, commemorating Richard Trevithick. The window depicts St Michael at the top and nine Cornish saints, Piran, Petroc, Pinnock,() Germanus, Julian, Cyriacus, Constantine, Nonna and Geraint in tiers below. The head of St Piran appears to be a portrait of Trevithick himself and the figure carries the banner of Cornwall.()There is a plaque and memorial situated in Abercynon, outside the fire station.  It says In commemoration of the achievements of Richard Trevithick who having constructed the first steam locomotive did on February 21st 1804 successfully hail 10 tons of iron and numerous passengers along a tramroad from Merthyr to this precinct where was situated the loading point of the Glamorgan Canal.In Abercynon, there is also a building called Ty Trevithick, named in his honour.A replica of Trevithicks first full size steam road locomotive was first displayed at Camborne Trevithick Day 2001, the day chosen for the celebration of Trevithicks public demonstration of the use of high-pressure steam. The team consisting of John Woodward, Mark Rivron and Sean Oliver, have continued to maintain and display the engine at various steam fairs across the country. The puffing devil has proudly led the parade of steam engines at every subsequent Trevithick day up to and including 2011. LegacyProfessor Charles Inglis, speaking in 1933 at a lecture to the of Civil Engineers to commemorate the centenary of Trevithicks death, included the following words:ChildrenThe Trevithicks raised four children:* Richard Trevithick (17981872)* Anne Ellis (18001876)* Elizabeth Banfield (18031870)* John Harvey Trevithick (18071877)* Trevithick (18121877)* Frederick Henry Trevithick (18161883)See also* of topics related to CornwallReferencesNotesSources* * Hodge, James (2003), Richard Trevithick (Lifelines; 6.)  Princes Risborough, Buckinghamshire HP27 9AA: Shire Publications* * Lowe, James W. (1975), British Steam Locomotive Builders. Cambridge: Goose ISBN 0-900404-21-3 (reissued in 1989 by Guild Publishing)* Rogers, Col. H. C. (1961), Turnpike to Iron Road London: Seeley, Service & Co.; pp. 4044External links* Richard Trevithick 17711833 (a page from the Trevithick Society website)* The Camborne Trevithick Day Website* Cornwall Record Office Online Catalogue for Richard Trevithick* Contributions to the Biography of Richard Trevithick  Richard Edmonds, 1859* www.steamcircus.info  Compilation of research on the exact location of Steam Circus and some new ideas* The Catch Me Who Can replica website* Richard Trevithick on the Spartacus Educational website* Richard Trevithick steam engine 1805-06 in the Energy Hall, Science Museum, London* The history of the Count House of Ding Dong MineTrevitikTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickja:TrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickTrevithickzh:
236428
Dag_Hammarskjld
 religionLutheran/of SwedenDag Hjalmar Agne Carl Hammarskjld () (29 July 1905  18 September 1961) was a Swedish diplomat, economist, and author. An early of the United Nations, he served from April 1953 until his death in a plane crash in September 1961. He is the only person to have been awarded a posthumous Peace Prize.(http://www.nobelprize.org/nobel_prizes/nomination/nomination_faq.html) Hammarskjld remains the only U.N. Secretary-General to die in office, and his death occurred en route to cease-fire negotiations. of the United States F. Kennedy called Hammarskjld the greatest statesman of our century.()Early lifeDag Hammarskjld was born in Jnkping, Sweden, but spent most of his childhood in Uppsala. The fourth and youngest son of Hammarskjld, Minister of Sweden from 1914 to 1917, and Agnes Hammarskjld (ne Almquist), Hammarskjlds ancestors served the of Sweden since the 17th century. He studied first at Katedralskolan and then at University where he graduated with a of Laws and a degree in economy. During this time he served for a year as the first Curator at Uplands Nation later moving to Stockholm.From 1930 to 1934, Hammarskjld was a Secretary on a governmental committee on unemployment. During this time he wrote his economics thesis, Konjunkturspridningen (The Spread of the Business Cycle), and received a doctorate from University. In 1936, he became a Secretary at the Riksbank and was soon promoted. From 1941 to 1948, he served as Chairman of the bank.During this time Hammarskjld also held political positions. Early in 1945, he was appointed an adviser to the cabinet on financial and economic problems. He helped coordinate government plans to alleviate the economic problems of the post-war period. In 1947, Hammarskjld was appointed to a position with Swedens Ministry for Foreign Affairs, and in 1949 he became the State Secretary for Foreign Affairs. A delegate to the Paris conference that established the Plan, in 1948 he was again in Paris to attend a conference for the Organisation for European Economic Co-operation. In 1950, he became head of the Swedish delegation to UNISCAN. In 1951, he became a cabinet without Portfolio. Although Hammarskjld served in a cabinet dominated by the Social Democrats, he never officially joined any political party. In 1951, Hammarskjld became Vice Chairman of the Swedish delegation to the Nations General Assembly in Paris. He became the Chairman of the Swedish delegation to the General Assembly in New York in 1952. On 20 December 1954, he was elected to take his fathers vacated seat in the Academy.UN Secretary-GeneralHammarskjold outside the UN building.jpg|thumb|upright|Hammarskjld outside the UN headquarters in New York City (Photo: UN/DPI)When Lie resigned from his post as Secretary-General in 1953, the Nations Security Council recommended Hammarskjld for the post. It came as a surprise to him.() Seen as a competent technocrat without political views, he was selected on 31 March by a majority of 10 out of eleven Security Council members. The UN General Assembly elected him in the 7&ndash;10 April session by 57 votes out of 60. In 1957, he was re-elected.Hammarskjld began his term by establishing his own secretariat of 4,000 administrators and setting up regulations that defined their responsibilities. He was also actively engaged in smaller projects relating to the UN working environment. For example, he planned and supervised in every detail the creation of a meditation room in the headquarters. This is a place dedicated to silence where people can withdraw into themselves, regardless of their faith, creed, or religion.(The Meditation Room in the UN Headquarters)During his term, Hammarskjld tried to smooth relations between Israel and the states. Other highlights include a 1955 visit to China to negotiate release of 15 captured US pilots who had served in the War, the 1956 establishment of the Nations Emergency Force, and his intervention in the 1956 Crisis. He is given credit by some historians for allowing participation of the See within the United Nations that year.(Holy Sees Presence in the International Organizations)In 1960, the former Congo and then newly independent Congo asked for UN aid in defusing the Crisis. Hammarskjld made four trips to the Congo. His efforts towards the decolonisation of Africa were considered insufficient by the Union; in September 1960, the Soviet government denounced his decision to send a UN emergency force to keep the peace. They demanded his resignation and the replacement of the office of Secretary-General by a three-man directorate with a built-in veto, the troika. The objective was to, citing the memoirs of Soviet leader Khrushchev, equally represent interests of three groups of countries: capitalist, socialist and recently independent.(http://www.un.org/russian/av/radio/history60/11history60.htm (in Russian))Hammarskjld denied Lumumbas request to help force the Province to rejoin the Congo, causing Lumumba to turn to the Soviets for help. He personally disliked Lumumba and felt that he should be removed from office.(Mahoney, R. D. 1980, The Kennedy Policy in the Congo 1961-1963. Ph.D dissertation, Johns Hopkins University.)Deaththumb|Flight path of Hammarskjlds aircraft (pink line) and the decoy (black line), September 1961In September 1961, Hammarskjld learned about fighting between non-combatant UN forces and Katangese troops of Tshombe. He was en route to negotiate a cease-fire on the night of 1718 September when his DC-6 airliner SE-BDY crashed near Ndola, Northern Rhodesia (now Zambia). Hammarskjld and fifteen others perished in the crash.A special report issued by the United Nations following the crash stated that a bright flash in the sky was seen at approximately 1 am the previous night.() According to the UN special report, it was this information that resulted in the initiation of search and rescue operations. Initial indications that the crash might not have been an accident led to multiple official inquiries and persistent speculation that the Secretary-General was assassinated.()Hammarskjlds death was a memorable event. The Hammarskjld Crash Site Memorial is under consideration for inclusion as a UNESCO World Heritage Site. A press release issued by the Prime Minister of the Republic of the Congo stated that, ... in order to pay a tribute to this great man, now vanished from the scene, and to his colleagues, all of whom have fallen victim to the shameless intrigues of the great financial Powers of the West... the Government has decided to proclaim Tuesday, 19 September 1961, a day of national mourning.(Official inquiryFollowing the death of Hammarskjld, there were three inquiries into the circumstances that led to the crash:((direct link: http://www.un.org/Docs/journal/asp/ws.asp?mA/5069)) the Rhodesian Board of Investigation, the Rhodesian Commission of Inquiry, and the United Nations Commission of Investigation.The Rhodesian Board of Investigation looked into the matter between 19 September 1961 and 2 November 1961( under the command of British Lt. Colonel M.C.B. Barber. The Rhodesian Commission of Inquiry held hearings from 1629 January 1962 without United Nations oversight.  The subsequent United Nations Commission of Investigation held a series of hearings in 1962 and in part depended upon the testimony from the previous Rhodesian inquiries.( Five eminent persons were assigned by the new Secretary-General to the UN Commission. The members of the commission unanimously elected Nepalese diplomat Shaha to head an inquiry.(The three official inquiries failed to determine conclusively the cause of the crash that led to the death of Hammarskjld. The Rhodesian Board of Investigation sent 180 men to search a six-square-kilometer area of the last sector of the aircrafts flight-path, looking for evidence as to the cause of the crash. No evidence of a bomb, missile, or hijacking was found. The official report stated that two of the dead Swedish bodyguards had suffered multiple bullet wounds. Medical examination, performed by the initial Rhodesian Board of Investigation and reported in the UN official report, indicated that the wounds were superficial, and that the bullets showed no signs of rifling. They concluded that the bullets exploded in the fire in close proximity to the bodyguards.( No other evidence of foul play was found in the wreckage of the aircraft.(Job, Air Disaster Volume 4, Aerospace Publications Pty Ltd, 2001 ISBN 187567148X, p 142)Previous accounts of a bright flash in the sky were dismissed as occurring too late in the evening to have caused the crash. The UN report speculated that these flashes may have been caused by secondary explosions after the crash. The sole survivor, Sergeant Harold Julien, indicated that there was a series of explosions that preceded the crash.(()  The official inquiry found that the statements of witnesses who talked with Julian were inconsistent.The report states that there were numerous delays that violated the established search and rescue procedures. There were three separate delays: the first delayed the initial alarm of a possible plane in trouble; the second delayed the distress alarm, which indicates that communications with surrounding airports indicate that a missing plane has not landed elsewhere; the third delayed the eventual search and rescue operation and the discovery of the plane wreckage, just miles away. The medical examiners report was inconclusive; one report said that Hammarskjld had died on impact; another stated that Hammarskjld might have survived had rescue operations not been delayed.( The report also said that the chances of Sgt. Julien surviving the crash would have been infinitely better if the rescue operations had been hastened.(Alternative theoriesDespite the multiple official inquiries that failed to find evidence of assassination, some continue to believe that the death of Hammarskjld was not an accident.(At the time of Hammarskjlds death, Western intelligence agencies were actively involved in the political situation in the Congo,( which culminated in Belgian and American support for the secession of Katanga and the assassination of former prime minister Lumumba. Belgium and the United Kingdom had a vested interest in maintaining their control over much of the countrys copper industry during the Congolese transition from colonialism to independence.  Concerns about the nationalization of the copper industry could have provided a financial incentive to remove either Lumumba or Hammarskjld.( Belgium has since publicly acknowledged and apologized for its negligence in the death of Lumumba.The involvement of British officers in commanding the initial inquiries, which provided much of the information about the condition of the plane and the examination of the bodies, has led some to suggest a conflict of interest.(()  The official report dismissed a number of pieces of evidence that would have supported the view that Hammarskjld was assassinated.( Some of these dismissals have been controversial, such as the conclusion that bullet wounds could have been caused by bullets exploding in a fire.  Expert tests have questioned this conclusion, arguing that exploding bullets could not break the surface of the skin.(( Major C. F. Westell, a ballistics authority, said, I can certainly describe as sheer nonsense the statement that cartridges of machine guns or pistols detonated in a fire can penetrate a human body.(  He based his statement on a large scale experiment that had been done to determine if military fire brigades would be in danger working near munitions depots. Other Swedish experts conducted and filmed tests showing that bullets heated to the point of explosion nonetheless did not achieve sufficient velocity to penetrate their box container.()Denis A H Wright, the then British Ambassador to Ethiopia, in his annual report for 1961 establishes linkage of UN Secretary General Dag Hammarskjolds death on 18 September to British refusal to allow an Ethiopian Military plane carrying troops destined to join the UN mission, landing at Entebbe and over-flying British territory to Congo. Their refusal was only lifted after the death of the Secretary General. A Foreign Office official noting his comments on file, wrote affirming no skeletons in British cupboard and suggesting the Ambassadors comments should be removed from the final, official printed version of the annual report.(P R O FCO 31/165300 Ethiopia: Annual Review of 1961) On 19 August 1998, the Archbishop Tutu, chairman of South Africas Truth and Reconciliation Commission (TRC), stated that recently uncovered letters had implicated the British MI5, the American CIA, and then South African intelligence services in the crash.(Notes for Media Briefing By Archbishop - by Desmond Tutu, Chairperson Of The Truth And Reconciliation Commission - August 19, 1998 - http://www.info.gov.za/speeches/1998/98820_0x1539810364.htm) One TRC letter said that a bomb in the aircrafts wheel bay was set to detonate when the wheels came down for a landing. Tutu said that they were unable to investigate the truth of the letters or the allegations that South Africa or Western intelligence agencies played a role in the crash. The Foreign Office suggested that they may have been created as Soviet misinformation or disinformation.(UN assassination plot denied, BBC World, 19 August 1998. Retrieved 13 October 2007.)On 29 July 2005, the Norwegian General, Egge, gave an interview to the newspaper Aftenposten on the events surrounding Hammarskjlds death. According to General Egge, who had been the first UN officer to see the body, Hammarskjld had a hole in his forehead, and this hole was subsequently airbrushed from photos taken of the body. It appeared to Egge that Hammarskjld had been thrown from the plane, and grass and leaves in his hands might indicate that he survived the crash  and that he had tried to scramble away from the wreckage. Egge does not claim directly that the wound was a gunshot wound.(http://www.aftenposten.no/nyheter/iriks/article1087787.ece)In his speech to the 64th session of the Nations General Assembly on 23 September 2009, Gaddafi called upon the Libyan president of UNGA, Treki, to institute a UN investigation into the assassinations of Congolese prime minister, Lumumba, who was overthrown in 1960 and murdered the following year, and of UN Secretary-General Dag Hammarskjld in 1961.()According to a dozen witnesses interviewed by Swedish aid worker Gran Bjrkdahl in the 2000s, Hammarskjlds plane was shot down by another aircraft. Bjrkdahl also reviewed previously unavailable archive documents and internal UN communcations. He believes that there was an  intentional shootdown for the benefit of mining companies like Minire.()(I have no doubt Dag Hammarskjlds plane was brought down, Gran Bjrkdahl, The Guardian, 2011 Aug 17)(Call for new inquiry following emergence of new evidence, The Guardian 2011 Sept 16)  A US intelligence officer who was stationed at an electronic surveillance station in Cyprus stated that he heard a cockpit recording from Ndola.  In the cockpit recording a pilot talks of closing in on the DC6 in which Hammarskjold was traveling, guns are heard firing, and then the words Ive hit it, according to the US intelligence officer.(BBC News Magazine, 18 Sept. 2-11, Dag Hammarskjold: Was His Death a Crash or a Conspiracy?, http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/magazine-14913456)Honors*Hammarskjld posthumously received the Peace Prize in 1961, having been nominated before his death.*Honorary degrees: The University in Ottawa (then called Carleton College)(Carleton Through the Years. Accessed 2011-03-31) awarded its first-ever honorary degree to Hammarskjld in 1954 when it presented him with a Doctor, honoris causa. The University has continued this tradition by conferring an honorary doctorate upon every subsequent Secretary General of the United Nations. He also held honorary degrees from University, England; in the United States from Harvard, Yale, Princeton, Columbia, the of Pennsylvania, Amherst, Hopkins, the of California, and University; in Sweden, Uppsala University; and in Canada from University as well as Carleton.()*On April 6, 2011, the of Sweden announced that Hammarskjlds image will be used on the 1000 kronor banknote, the highest-denomination banknote in Sweden.()Legacy*F. Kennedy: After Hammarskjlds death, U.S. President John F. Kennedy regretted that he opposed the UN policy in the Congo and said: I realise now that in comparison to him, I am a small man. He was the greatest statesman of our century.(*Refusal to resign: One of Hammarskjlds greatest moments was refusing to give in to Soviet pressure to resign. Dag Hammarskjld: It is very easy to bow to the wish of a big power. It is another matter to resist it. If it is the wish of those nations who see the organization their best protection in the present world, I shall do so again.(UPI Audio: Year (1961) in Review)*In 2011 Financial Times reported that Hammarskjld has remained the benchmark against which later UN Secretary-Generals have been judged.()*Historians views:**Historian Kennedy hailed Hammarskjld in his book The Parliament of Man as perhaps the greatest UN Secretary-General because of his ability to shape events, in contrast with his successors.**In contrast, the right-wing writer Paul Johnson in A History of the Modern World from 1917 to the 1980s (1983) was highly critical of his judgment.*Libraries:**The Hammarskjld Library, a part of the Nations headquarters, was dedicated on 16 November 1961 in honour of the late Secretary-General.**Uppsala University:  There is also a Dag Hammarskjld Library at his alma mater, Uppsala University.*Buildings and rooms:**University: The School of International and Public Affairs at Columbia University in New York has a Dag Hammarskjld Lounge. The graduate school is dedicated to the principles of international peace and cooperation that Hammarskjld embodied.**University: Dag Hammarskjld House on the Stanford University campus is a residence cooperative for undergraduate and graduate students with international backgrounds and interests at Stanford.()**The Geneva School of Diplomacy and International Relations in Geneva, Switzerland has a room named after him.**Hammarskjld Stadium is the main football stadium of Ndola, Zambia.  Hammarskjolds ill-fated flight in 1961 crashed in the outskirts of Ndola.*Streets:**Dag Hammarskjlds Gade is a street in Aalborg, Denmark**Dag Hammarskjlds Vg is one of the longest streets in Uppsala, Sweden. There are several other streets in Sweden sharing this name.**Dag Hammarskjlds All is a street in Copenhagen, Denmark.**The headquarters of the Nations Economic Commission for Latin America and the Caribbean (CEPAL) in Santiago, Chile lies on Avenida Dag Hammarskjld.**The headquarters of the Deutsche Gesellschaft fr Internationale Zusammenarbeit (German Society for International Cooperation, GIZ), is on Dag-Hammarskjld-Weg in Eschborn, Germany.**Dag Hammarskjldlaan is a street in the town of Castricum, The Netherlands.*New York City: A Manhattan park near the United Nations headquarters is called the Dag Hammarskjold Plaza, as are several of the surrounding office buildings.*Religious commemoration: He is also commemorated as a peacemaker in the Calendar of Saints of the Lutheran Church in America on 18 September of each year.*Schools: A number of schools have been named after Hammarskjld, including Middle School in Brunswick Township, New Jersey; Hammarskjold Middle School in Connecticut; Hammarskjold Elementary School in Ohio; and High School in Bay, Ontario.*Hammarskjld Foundation:  In 1962, the Dag Hammarskjld Foundation was created as Swedens national memorial to Dag Hammarskjld.()*Memorial awards:**Medal: On 22 July 1997, the U.N. Security Council in resolution 1121(1997) established the Hammarskjld Medal in recognition and commemoration of those who have lost their lives as a result of UN peacekeeping operations.()**Prize in Peace and Conflict Studies: University annually awards a student the Dag Hammarskjld Prize in Peace and Conflict Studies based on outstanding work in the program.()*Postage Stamp:  United States Postal Service 4-cent value postage stamp, issued on 23 October 1962. Famous for its misprint, this stamp is often referred to as the Hammarskjld invert.Spirituality and MarkingsIn 1953, soon after his appointment as United Nations secretary general, Hammarskjld was interviewed on radio by R. Murrow. In this talk he declared: But the explanation of how man should live a life of active social service in full harmony with himself as a member of the community of spirit, I found in the writings of those great medieval mystics Eckhart and Jan van Ruysbroek for whom self-surrender had been the way to self-realization, and who in singleness of mind and inwardness had found strength to say yes to every demand which the needs of their neighbours made them face, and to say yes also to every fate life had in store for them when they followed the call of duty as they understood it.(Henry P Van Dusen. Dag Hammarskjold. A Biographical Interpretation of Markings Faber and Faber London 1967 p 47.)His only book, Vgmrken (Markings), was published in 1963. A collection of his diary reflections, the book starts in 1925, when he was 20 years old, and ends at his death in 1961.(http://www.buzzflash.com/hartmann/05/03/har05003.html) This diary was found in his New York house, after his death, along with an undated letter addressed to then Swedish Permanent Under-Secretary for Foreign Affairs, Leif Belfrage. In this letter, Dag writes, These entries provide the only true profile that can be drawn ... If you find them worth publishing, you have my permission to do so. The foreword is written by W.H. Auden, a friend of Dags.() Markings was described by a theologian, the late Henry P. Van Dusen, as the noblest self-disclosure of spiritual struggle and triumph, perhaps the greatest testament of personal faith written ... in the heat of professional life and amidst the most exacting responsibilities for peace and order.(Henry P Van Dusen. Dag Hammarskjold. A Biographical Interpretation of Markings Faber and Faber London 1967 p 5) Hammarskjld writes, for example, We are not permitted to choose the frame of our destiny. But what we put into it is ours. He who wills adventure will experience it  according to the measure of his courage. He who wills sacrifice will be sacrificed  according to the measure of his purity of heart.(Dag Hammarskjold. Markings Leif Sjoberg and WH Auden (trans) Faber and Faber London 1964 p 63.) Markings is characterised by Hammarskjlds intermingling of prose and haiku poetry in a manner exemplified by the 17th-century Japanese poet Basho in his Roads to the Deep North.(Dag Hammarskjold. Markings Leif Sjoberg and WH Auden (trans) Faber and Faber London 1964 p149) In his foreword to Markings, the English poet H. Auden quotes Hammarskjld as stating In our age, the road to holiness necessarily passes through the world of action.(WH Auden Foreword to Dag Hammarskjold. Markings Leif Sjoberg and WH Auden (trans) Faber and Faber London 1964 p 23.)The Evangelical Lutheran Church in America commemorates the life of Hammarskjld as a renewer of society on the anniversary of his death, September 18. Bibliography * Durel, Bernard, op, (2002), Au jardin secret dun diplomate sudois: Jalons de Dag Hammarskjld, un itinraire spirituel, La Vie Spirituelle (Paris). T. 82, pp. 901922.* Urquhart, Brian, (1972), Hammarskjold. Alfred A. Knopf, New York.* Velocci, Giovanni, cssr, (1998), Hammarskjold Dag, in Luigi Borriello, ocd  Edmondo Caruana, ocarm  Maria Rosaria Del Genio  N. Suffi (dirs.), Dizionario di mistica. Libreria Editrice Vaticana, Citt del Vaticano, pp. 624626.See also*Hammarskjld invert*The Hammarskjld Trophy Competition*http://www.nytimes.com/2011/09/17/opinion/learning-from-hammarskjold.html?_r1&adxnnl1&adxnnlx1316246416-QXhPTtQZzqirCUXwKUdTjgReferencesExternal links*Dag Hammarskjld  biography, quotes, photos and videos*UNSG Dag Hammarskjold Conference on 9-10 November 2011 at Palace*Weekly blog exploring Hammarskjlds political wisdom*Video of Hammarskjlds funeral in Pathe archive*UNSG Ban Ki-Moon Lays Wreath Honouring Dag Hammarskjold of 1 October 2009 and UNSG with Carl XVI Gustaf of Sweden*UNSG Kofi Annan, Dag Hammarskjld and the 21st century, The Fourth Dag Hammarskjld Lecture 6 September 2001, Dag Hammarskjld Foundation and Uppsala University (pdf)*About Dag Hammarskjld (Dag Hammarskjld Foundation)*United Nations Secretaries-General*Dag Hammarskjld, Secretary-General at the official website of the UN*Biography* The Nobel Prize*Letters say Hammarskjlds death Western plot*Media briefing by Archbishop Desmond Tutu*18 September 1961 UN Secretary-General Dag Hammarskjld is killed and BBC*Audio of Dag Hammarskjolds response to Russian pressure From UPI Audio Archives* List of people who converted to CatholicismHammareldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldja:HammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldHammarskjldzh:
237736
Spelling_bee
A spelling bee is a competition where contestants, usually children, are asked to spell English words. The concept is thought to have originated in the States.() Today, National Spelling Bee competitions for English are held in the United States, Kingdom, Australia, Zealand, Canada, Mexico, Indonesia and India among others. Similar institutions are also found in numerous other countries such as Frances La dicte (de Pivot) and Polands Dyktando, differing in the fact that the competition is about spelling whole texts. They are rare to nonexistent in countries whose national language follows more phonemic spelling rules, as compared to the largely historical spelling of the English and French languages. The first winner of an official spelling bee occurred in 1925 when Neuhauser, then 11 years old, won the 1st National Spelling Bee, in Washington, D.C.( )( ) The 9 finalists were invited to meet Coolidge at the House, a tradition followed by presidents for most of the ensuing 86 years of the contest. Etymology Historically the word bee has been used to describe a get-together where a specific action is being carried out, like a husking bee, a quilting bee, or an apple bee. Its etymology is unclear but possibly derived from the English word bn for prayer.(http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/bee3, noun Merriam-Webster: bee 3) History The earliest evidence of the phrase spelling bee in print dates back to 1825, although the contests had apparently been held before that year. A key impetus for the contests was Websters spelling books. First published in 1786 and known colloquially as The Blue-backed Speller, Websters spelling books were an essential part of the curriculum of all elementary school children in the States for five generations.  Now the key impetus for the contests is the Merriam Webster dictionary. United States The United States National Spelling Bee was started in 1925 by Courier-Journal, the newspaper of Louisville, Kentucky. In 1941, the Howard News Service acquired sponsorship of the program, and the name changed to the Scripps Howard National Spelling Bee (later simply Scripps National Spelling Bee). As well as covering the 50 states, several competitors also come from Canada, the Bahamas, New Zealand and Europe.In the United States, spelling bees are annually held from local levels up to the level of the Scripps National Spelling Bee which awards a cash prize to the winner. The National Spelling Bee is sponsored by English-language newspapers and educational foundations; it is also broadcast on ESPN. Since 2006, the National Spelling Bees championship rounds have been broadcast on ABC live. In 2005, contestants came from the Bahamas, Jamaica, Guam, the Virgin Islands, Samoa, Canada, New Zealand, Rico, and a German military base, as well as the United States. This was the first year that spellers from Canada and New Zealand attended the competition. The final authority for words is the Merriam-Webster unabridged dictionary, the Third New International Dictionary. The annual study list is available from Scripps, either online or in print.The National Senior Spelling Bee started in Wyoming in 1996. Sponsored by the Wyoming AARP, it is open to contestants 50 and older. Maria Dawson is the only contestant to ever win two back to back titles at The National Spelling Bee.The Asian Spelling Bee is another spelling bee platform in the US.  This annual contest takes place across the US each summer in search of the next South Asian-American spelling champ between the ages of 8 and 14 years old.  Launched in 2008, the Asian Spelling Bee will tour 10 US cities in 2011 and is broadcast globally via the satellite channel, Entertainment Television Asia. Canada The Postmedia National Spelling Bee is the official Canadian spelling bee held annually nationwide in Canada since 2005. The bee is affiliated with the States-based National Spelling Bee and uses similar rules and word lists, and competes in all 10 Canadian provinces to provide a Canadian National Champion for the penultimate Scripps competition.It should not be confused with another organization, calling itself the Bee of Canada, which started in 1987 in Ontario, as an initial attempt to form a nationwide bee. As an independent and unsanctioned event not affiliated with the National Spelling Bee, it is only able to field enough candidates to hold competitions in Ontario, and does not crown a true National Champion at all. United Kingdom In the Kingdom a spelling bee for schools is run by Times newspaper. It was started in 2009. Asia In Asia, a spelling bee is being conducted up to the international level by Spelling Bee.  The competition involves learning the correct spelling of words, their use in sentences and in multiple contexts.() Currently, it is being held in India, Abu Dhabi, Ajman, Bahrain, Dubai, Fujairah, Rasal Kaima, Sharja, and Umm-Al-Quwain,.()Another organization that promotes the love of the English language is Horizons Unlimited, which is currently organizing an India Spelling Bee contest for Children in the southern state of Kerala in India. Affiliated to the IndiaSpellBee.com, which has been conducting Spell Bee contests in Southern India for the last five years, the Kochi event will take place on the 29th and 30 January 2011. Africa In Africa, spelling bee is promoted by a company People Limited, which currently organizes the Annual National Speliing Bee contest for children between the age of 7 and 14 in Nigeria. This effort commenced in 2008 when the first National finals was held in Lagos. It is popularly referred to as SPELLIT! Nigeria. National spelling bee Serious spelling bee competitors will study affixes and etymologies, and often foreign languages from which English draws, in order to spell challenging words. Additionally, there have been several preparatory materials, including those published in connection with the Scripps National Spelling Bee and those created by independent organizations not related to Scripps. For the first several decades of publication, the Scripps annual study booklet was named Words of the Champions, which offered 3,000 words in a list separated into beginning, intermediate & expert groupings. In the mid-1990s the annual study list changed to Paideia (from the Greek word meaning education and culture), which ultimately contained more than 4,100 words, then again in 2006 to the shorter list, entitled Spell It!, the 2009 edition having 1155 words (911 basic words and 244 challenge words).The Consolidated Word List, also published by Scripps and available on the National Spelling Bee website, consists of all words used in the National Bee as far back as 1950. It is organized into three section: Words Appearing Infrequently, Words Appearing with Moderate Frequency, and Word Appearing Frequently. Nearly 800 pages and 24,000 words long, the Consolidated Word List is intended for those who have mastered the basics and already gone through Spell It!.Spelling bee participants also use other reference books, notably the Hexco Academics series of spelling books, which feature strategies, methods and lists to further develop spelling skills. Tutoring materials are also becoming available on the web. School spelling bees Spelling bee students usually start competition in schools (schools) or schools. Classes compete against other classes in the same grade, or level, and the winning class is determined by the score of each class. In popular culture  In television *A British television show called Spelling Bee, featuring adult contestants and broadcast by the BBC on 31 May 1938, is generally held to have been the worlds first television show.()*A game show on the former Family Channel cable network, Thousand Dollar Bee engaged children in a spelling bee-like competition.(Thousand Dollar Bee (2004))()*The 2004 game show The Great American Celebrity Spelling Bee featured four teams of four celebrities playing for charity.  The show was hosted by OHurley, and help for the celebrities was provided by Scripps National Spelling Bee participant Patel.*Five episodes of the ESPN show Seats presented and satirized the taped television coverage of the 1994, 1995, 1996, and 1997 Scripps National Spelling Bees.*The NBC game show The Singing Bee is like a spelling bee but instead of spelling words, contestants have to identify lyrics to popular songs.*Spelling Bee, a Night Live comedy sketch in which Fortes character delivers a 75-letter misspelling of the word business that includes 12 consecutive qs In fictional television *The 1878 Harte poem Spelling Bee at Angels describes a spelling contest held at a California gold mining camp.*A spelling bee features as pioneer family entertainment in Little Town on the Prairie by Ingalls Wilder, in which Pa spells down the whole town.*A spelling bee contest was sponsored by Brazilian TV host Luciano Huck, on his weekly show called Caldeiro do Huck, since 2007. Fictional television episodes *An episode of Friends titled The One With The Late Thanksgiving Rachel lies to Ross, saying that she took part in a spelling bee*Spelling as Fast as I Can, an episode of the animated television series Simpsons*An episode of Proud Family titled Spelling Bee*An episode of Roseanne titled Aliens*An episode of Psych titled Spellingg Bee*An episode of Arnold! titled Spelling Bee*An episode of Name is Earl titled The Professor*An episode of Park titled on Monkey Fonics*An episode of to Jim titled Spelling Bee*An episode of House titled Spellbound*An episode of Declassified School Survival Guide titled Sick Days & Spelling Bees*An episode of Belvedere titled The Spelling Bee*An episode of Suite Life of Zack and Cody titled Neither a Borrower nor a Speller Bee*An episode of Together titled Applebees*An episode of the CBC series Red Green Show titled The Spelling Bee*An episode of Frasier titled War of the Words*An episode of Quinn, Medicine Woman titled The Dam*Episodes of Guy titled Tales of a Third Grade Nothing and Mr. Griffin Goes to Washington*In an episode of Anatomy titled The Name of the Game, Dr. Shepherd and Dr. Bailey treat a 7th grade regional spelling champion, making him spell words for them to distract him during awake brain surgery.*An episode of Get a Life titled Chris Brain Starts Working In film *The 1969 film A Boy Named Charlie Brown*The 1986 ABC TV-movie The Girl Who Spelled Freedom, about a Cambodian immigrant girl who competes in spelling bees.(The Girl Who Spelled Freedom (1986) (TV))*The 1994 film Madison*The 2002 Academy Award-nominated documentary, Spellbound, featured eight competitors in the 1999 Scripps National Spelling Bee.*A scene in the 2004 movie Girls shows a girl spelling the word xylocarp.*The 2001 novel Season and its 2005 film adaptation*The 2006 film and the Bee where a young girl from South Los Angeles tries to make it to the National Spelling Bee. In theatre *Eleemosynary, a 1998 play by Blessing, uses the spelling bee as a key story element.*25th Annual Putnam County Spelling Bee, a 2005 musical by Finn. In literature *A character in Phantom Tollbooth, a novel by Norton Juster, is named the Spelling Bee. See also *(exercise) References beepri literumadobeebeept:Soletrandobeebeezh:
239199
List_of_organisations_with_a_British_royal_charter
List of organisations with a British royal charter is an incomplete list of organisations based both on in and over the United Kingdom and throughout the world, in chronological order, that have received a charter from an English, Scottish, or British monarch.:See also organisations in the United Kingdom with a royal charter, which is an alphabetical list of organisations based in the UK.System is modelled on the earliest modern French system.TableKingdom of England 13th and 14th century see table above. 15th century *4 December	1416	Cutlers Company*16 February	1428	Company*22 February	1437	Company*23 August	1437	Company*26 April	1439	Company*       1441    College, Cambridge*	1444	Company*8 May	1453	and Brasiers Company*13 October	1457	College, Oxford*8 March	1462	Chandlers Company*	1462	Company*20 March	1463	Company*16 February	1471	Company*20 January	1473	Company*	1474	of Blacksmiths of Dublin*16 August	1475	Catharines College, Cambridge*7 July	1477	Company*16 February	1483	Chandlers Company*	1496	College, Cambridge 16th century  1500-1549 *10 March	1501	Company*29 April	1501	Company*23 February	1504	Company*2 July	1509	Company*9 April        1511    Johns College, Cambridge*15 January	1512	College, Oxford*       1513    High School*	1517	Christi College, Oxford*23 September	1518	College of Physicians of London*18 January	1528	Company*	1532	Grammar School*25 August	1537	Artillery Company*	1539	Royal Grammar School (Granted a second Charter by Elizabeth I, see below)*	1541	School, Ely*	1542	College, Cambridge*23 July	1545	King Henry VIII School, Coventry*	1545	School*	1547	College, Cambridge*	1547	School, Norwich*13 January	1547	Hospital*13 January	1547	Bartholomews Hospital*	1549	College, Cambridge 1550-1599 *13 May	1550	School*	1550	Protestant Church of London()*14 May	1552	School*17 June	1552	Edward VI Grammar School, Stourbridge*12 July	1552	Edwards School, Bath*18 December	1552	of Merchant Venturers of Bristol*	1552	School*	1552	Edwards School, Birmingham*	1552	Kings School, Macclesfield*26 May	1553	School*26 June	1553	Hospital*26 June	1553	Hospital*	1553	Edward VI Grammar School, Southampton*	1553	School*6 January 1554  Grammar School, Lincolnshire*       1554    Royal Grammar School*	1554	Marys Grammar School, Walsall*15 July	1555	of Arms*	1555	Johns College, Oxford*7 July	1556	of the Priest and Poor of Ginge Petre in the County of Essex*4 May	1557	Company*5 July	1558	Brentwood School*21 May	1560	Dean and Chapter of the Church of St Peter, Westminster*28 February	1561	Grammar School Worcester*	1561	Grammar School, upon Thames*25 October	1561	Company*	1562	Olaves and St. Saviours Grammar School*15 June	1563	Queen Elizabeth Grammar School, Darlington*	1565	College, Oxford*	1565	School*	1567	Elizabeths Grammar School, Blackburn*3 August	1568	and Bricklayers Company*12 October	1568	Company*14 April	1570	Company*	1571	Company*	1571	School*27 June	1571	College, Oxford*9 February	1573	College, Oxford*	1574	School, Kent*	1576	Valence School*19 June	1578	Company*19 July	1581	Company*	1584	Royal Grammar School*	1584	School*	1585	College, Oxford*	1591	Elizabeth Grammar School, Wakefield*       1592    Elizabeths Hospital, Bristol*	1594	Sussex College, Cambridge*3 May	1597	of St. John the Evangelist and St. Anne in Oakham 17th century  17th century *22 March	1600	Grammar School, Newcastle*	1603	College, Oxford*	1603	Hostmen Company of Freemen of Newcastle-upon-Tyne*30 August	1603	Company*17 December	1603	Auckland Grammar School*2 August	1604	Company*16 September	1605	Company*18 September	1605	Company*9 January	1606	Company*19 January	1606	Company*30 April	1606	Company*15 May	1607	Company*24 November 1609 James School, Almondbury 1610s *12 April	1611	Company*22 June	1611	Hospital in Charterhouse*20 December	1611	College, Oxford*13 September	1612	Baudains (Jersey)*	1613	Honourable Irish Society*18 September	1614	Company*	1615	Grammar School*28 January	1617	Company*6 December	1617	of Apothecaries of London*21 June	1619	College 1620s *	1621	Company*	1624	College, Oxford*14 June	1626	Company*22 October	1628	Card Makers Company*16 May	1629	Makers Company 1630s *3 July	1630	College*8 July	1631	College, Grinstead*22 August	1631	Company*14 March	1637	Company*12 January	1638	Company*9 August	1638	Distillers Company*6 November	1638	Company*10 September	1639	Company of Glovers of the City of London*	1639	Company of Parish Clerks 1650s *10 November	1656	Company*13 June	1657	Knitters Company 1660s *28 November	1661	Sellers Company*7 February	1662	England Company*15 July	1662	Society*	1662	Grammar School*16 February	1663	Company*21 December	1663	Company*30 June	1664	Scottish Corporation*18 May	1666	and Clothiers Company of Coventry 1670s *3 February	1670	Company*2 May	1670	Bay Company*2 August	1670	Company*29 December	1670	Plate Workers Company*18 November	1672	House in Kingston-upon-Hull*17 January	1674	Company*31 May	1677	Company*17 December	1677	Company*1 July	1678	of the Sons of the Clergy 1680s *19 October	1681	of Merchants of the City of Edinburgh*8 July	1685	Corporation of the House of Deptford Strond 1690s *8 February 1693	College of William & Mary*16 June	1693	and Silver Wyre Drawers Company*27 July	1694	of England*25 October     1694    The Royal Hospital, Greenwich 18th century  18th century *16 June	1701	for the Propagation of the Gospel in Foreign Parts*19 April	1706	Coat Hospital in Tothill Fields of the Foundation of Queen AnneKingdom of Scotland16th century* 1582 of EdinburghKingdom of Great Britain 18th century  18th century see table above 1710s *23 May	1711	Weavers in Witney, Oxfordshire*3 December	1711	Company*29 July	1714	College, Oxford*24 July	1718	Protestant Hospital*27 July	1719	Society for Carrying on Operas and other entertainments 1720s *22 June	1720	Assurance Corporation*22 June	1720	Exchange Assurance*1727 Royal Bank of Scotland*31 July	1729	Elizabeth Grammar School, Halifax 1730s *17 October	1739	Hospital 1740s *28 April	1741	for the Relief of the Widows and Children of the Clergy of Norwich and Norfolk*13 April	1742	for the Relief of the Widows and Children of the Clergy of Suffolk*5 July	11 October	Linen Bank*29 April	1747	of the Charity for the relief of the poor Widows and Orphans of Beneficed Clergymen or having Curacys in the County of Essex the Deanery of Braughing and Archdeaconry of St. Albans, County of Hertford and Diocese of London 1750s *2 November	1751	of Antiquaries of London*9 December	1758	Hospital 1760s *8 June	1765	Hospital, Norwich 1770s *19 June	1773	Company*	1773	Medical Society*27 January	1774	of Advocates in Aberdeen 1780s *24 March	1781	of the possessions etc. of the Free Chapel of Hindon within the parish of East Knoyle, Wiltshire*29 March	1783	Society of Edinburgh*6 May	1783	of Antiquaries of Scotland*9 June	1783	Chamber of Commerce and Manufactures*10 July	1786	Chamber of Commerce and Manufactures*17 May	1787	Highland and Agricultural Society of Scotland 1790s *26 August	1790	Society of Musicians of Great Britain*21 December	1791	Royal Infirmary*9 January	1792	for the Benefit of Sons and Daughters of the Clergy of the Church of Scotland*30 October	1794	Faith Society*6 June	1796	Faculty of Procurators in Glasgow*24 January	1797	of Solicitors in the Supreme Courts of Scotland*28 June	1798	Academy 19th century  19th century *13 January	1800	Institution of Great Britain*22 March	1800	College of Surgeons of England*22 September	1800	College, CambridgeUnited Kingdom 19th century  19th century *19 April	1801	Gillespies Hospital and Free School*26 March	1802	Society of London*12 May	1802	of Kings College, Halifax,  Scotia*7 April	1807	and Galloway Royal Infirmary*17 April	1809	Horticultural Society 1810s *23 May	1817	Society for Promoting the Education of the Poor in the Principles of the Established Church throughout England and Wales*13 January	1818	Edinburgh Public Dispensary*19 May	1818	Literary Fund*8 May	1819	Royal Infirmary 1820s *	1820	of Procurators and Solicitors in Dundee*31 March	1821	University, Montreal*6 February	1824	Academy*11 August	1824	Asiatic Society*14 October	1824	Caledonian Horticultural Society*1 November	1824	Agricultural Company*9 December	1824	Royal Mental Hospital*23 April	1825	Society of London*15 September	1825	Society of Literature of the United Kingdom*10 November	1825	Diemens Land Company*28 June	1826	Life Assurance Society*15 March	1827	of Toronto*2 August	1827	for the management and distribution of the Artists Fund*6 February	1828	St Davids College, Lampeter*3 June	1828	of Civil Engineers*27 March	1829	Society of London*14 August	1829	College London 1830s *18 January	1830	Lying-in Hospital*23 June	1830	Academy of Music*7 March	1831	Astronomical Society*6 August	1832	Philosophical Society*30 September	1834	Medical and Chirugical Society of London*3 May	1836	of Licensed Victuallers*28 November	1836	of London*11 January	1837	Institute of British Architects*1 June	1837	University of Durham*7 June	1837	of Stationers of Glasgow*26 April	1838	Naval Benevolent Society*13 August	1838	Scottish Academy of Painting, Sculpture & Architecture*26 August	1839	Commercial Bank 1840s *26 March	1840	Agricultural Society of England*29 January	1840	Steam Navigation Company*1 August	1840	of Solicitors of Banffshire*10 November	1840	and Oriental Steam Navigation Company*16 March	1841	of Australasia*16 October	1841	University at Kingston, Ontario*16 March	1842	Free School*30 June	1842	General Benevolent Institution*15 December	1842	Victuallers Asylum*18 February	1843	Society of Great Britain*3 April	1843	Grammar School Worcester*27 April	1843	Elizabeths Almshouses Worcester*18 January	1844	Bank*8 March	1844	College of Veterinary Surgeons*26 February	1845	Society*21 August	1845	College*13 January	1845	and Loan Company of Upper Canada*30 June	1845	Association for Improving the Dwellings of the Industrious Classes*	1845	Queens College of Belfast (now Queens University Belfast)*3 February	1847	Society of British Artists*20 May	1847	for the Encouragement of Arts, Manufactures, and Commerce. (Royal Society of Arts)*17 July 1847      Archipelago Company*8 May	1848	Benevolent Institution*27 June	1848	College of Saint Augustine Canterbury*4 September	1848	Society*16 December	1848	of Preceptors*1 March	1849	Lunatic Asylum (Oxford)*30 July	1849	British Bank 1850s *14 August	1850	for the Exhibition of 1851*12 December	1850	College of Surgeons of Edinburgh*5 May	1851	Institute of Scotland*23 October	1851	Islands Company*23 October	1851	Chamber of Commerce*16 July	1852	of Trinity College, Toronto*8 December	1852	Laval, Quebec*5 April	1852	Theatrical Fund Association*28 January	1853	University, Quebec*13 December	1853	Wellington College*13 June	1853	and Committee of Queens College*19 August	1853	Bank of India, Australia and China*7 April	1854	Association for Improving the Dwellings of the Industrious Classes*7 April	1854	of Worcester Association for Building Dwellings for the Labouring Classess*13 September	1854	of Accountants in Edinburgh*18 October	1854	and Eastern Banking Corporation*7 February	1857	of Procurators and Solicitors in the City and Country of Perth*12 July	1857	for Women*3 February	1858	of Sydney*14 March	1859	of Melbourne*11 January	1859	Geographical Society*6 July	1859	Institution for the Relief of Aged and Infirm Journeymen Tailors*23 September	1859	Benevolent Institution, founded by the late Peter Herve*22 October	1859	School of Dundee 1860s *23 January	1860	United Service Institution*7 March	1860	National Lifeboat Institution for the Preservation of Life from Shipwreck*5 August	1861	College of Physicians of Edinburgh*20 November	1861	Art Union*19 July	1862	Infirmary*1 November	1862	for Idiots*1 November	1862	Andrews College, Bradfield*3 February	1864	Chamber of Commerce*3 February	1864	Orthopaedic Hospital*3 February	1864	for Relief of Widows and Orphans of Medical Men*7 April	1864	Native Trust*9 July	1864	of the Clergy*9 July	1864	Middle Class College in Suffolk*28 July	1864	College*1 November	1864	Pension, Almshouse and Orphan Asylum Corporation*5 December	1865	Society*9 May	1866	for Middle Class Education in the Metropolis and the Suburbs thereof*26 July	1866	Society*28 December	1866	of the Hall of Arts and Sciences (Royal Albert Hall)*26 February	1867	Patrons and Directors of Baillies Institution in Glasgow*4 November	1867	for the Protection of Commercial Interests as respects Wrecked and Damaged Property*30 July	1868	Orphan Home and School*14 September	1868	of Actuaries in Scotland 1870s *4 June	1870	College, Oxford*6 July	1871	Lay Body of the Church of England in Jamaica*17 March	1875	Veterinary College*13 May	1875	Royal Lunatic Asylum*23 October	1876	England Institute of Mining and Mechanical Engineers*7 February	1877	College*11 July	1877	of the Cape of Good Hope 1880s *18 March	1880	University (UK)*24 March	1880	of Chartered Accountants in England and Wales*2 March	1881	of Adelaide*15 July	1881	Institution*31 July        1881    College Colombo, Lanka*26 August	1881	Wales Institute of Engineers*18 August	1882	College, Cambridge*18 August	1882	Colonial Institute*20 April	1883	College of Music*23 August	1883	Cross Hospital*12 December	1883	Society of Law Agents in Scotland*26 June	1884	Pauls Hostel, Cambridge*29 July	1884	of Actuaries*11 August	1884	College of South Wales and Monmouthshire*29 November	1884	Infirmary, Oxford*30 December	1884	National Hospital for Consumption and Diseases of the Chest on the separate or Cottage principle*26 March	1885	College of North Wales*19 May	1885	Charlottes Lying in Hospital*19 May	1885	of Chemistry of Great Britain and Ireland*24 June	1885	Society of London*8 March	1886	Helena College*14 January	1887	Statistical Society*27 November 1887Royal Academy*7 February	1888	of the Buchanan Bequest*7 February	1888	of the Church House*3 May	1888	Priory of the Order of the Hospital of St. John of Jerusalem in England*5 July	1889	Historical Society*23 July	1889	University College of Wales, Aberystwyth (now the of Wales, Aberystwyth)*19 August	1889	Victorias Jubilee Institute for Nurses*19 August	1889	Bank of Persia*15 October	1889	South Africa Company 1890s *8 February	1890	of Journalists*21 October	1890	National Rifle Association*21 October	1890	School*21 October	1890	St. Peters College, Radley*22 November	1890	Press Fund*9 May	1891	Provident Fund for Sea Fishermen*30 July	1891	Chartered Institute of Patent Agents (now the Institute of Patent Attorneys)*5 August	1892	of the Buchanan Retreat*16 May	1893	British Nurses Association*23 November	1893	of Wales*23 November	1893	College of Organists*	1894	London Hospital*11 May	1895	Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Children*26 November	1897	Victoria Clergy Fund*17 February	1898	Library Association*19 May	1898	of the Cranleigh and Bramley Schools*19 May	1898	Order of Nurses for Canada*9 August	1898	Blind Ayslum and School, Edinburgh*7 March	1899	Andrews Ambulance Association*14 July	1899	Antiquity Society of Glasgow*7 October	1899	Home and Hospital for Incurables 20th century  20th century *3 March	1900	of Birmingham*17 September	1900	and Guilds of London Institute*17 September	1900	Northern Central Hospital*26 July	1902	Academy for the Promotion of Historical, Philosophical and Philological Studies*21 August 1902	Trust for the Universities of Scotland (revised 1978)*15 September	1902	Society of Anderston*20 October	1902	Chartered Institute of Secretaries of Joint Stock Companies and other Public Bodies*19 November	1902	Economic Society*16 February	1903	Edinburgh Hospital for Incurables*16 February	1903	Society for Home Relief to Incurables, Edinburgh*9 July	1903	University of Manchester*9 July	1903	of Liverpool*9 July	1903	Society of Queen Square*10 August	1903	University College of Nottingham*11 February	1904	Numismatic Society*21 April	1904	of Leeds*15 July	1904	India Committee*10 August	1904	Cotton Growing Association*24 October	1904	Society for the Protection of Birds*29 May	1905	of Sheffield*11 July	1905	National Orthopaedic Hospital*11 May	1906	and Foreign School Society*30 June	1906	of Directors*1 December	1906	Royal Infirmary*11 February	1907	Warrant Holders Association*1 March	1907	Museum of Wales*1 March	1907	Library of Wales*1 June	1907	of Chemical Industry*6 July	1907	Imperial College of Science and Technology*2 November	1907	Society of South Africa*21 December	1908	College for Women*1 August	1908	Red Cross Society*17 May	1909	of Bristol*10 August	1909	British Colonial Society of Artists 1910s *22 April	1910	Hospital (Free)*13 October	1910	of Deacons of the Fourteen Incorporated Trades of Glasgow*28 November	1910	of Naval Architects*23 January	1911	United Kingdom Beneficent Association*25 May	1911	Society of Painter-Etchers and Engravers*16 December	1911	Scout Association*17 January	1912	Insurance Institute*14 May	1912	Edward the Seventh Welsh National Memorial Association*14 June	1912	School at Rome*16 December	1912	Edward VII Sanatorium*11 February	1913	Trust*24 June	1913	Society of Scotland*7 October 1913    West of England Academy*14 October	1913	Asylum of Montrose*14 October	1913	Royal Infirmary*30 March	1914	Merchants Guild*7 January	1915	of Mining Engineers*7 January	1915	of Mining and Metallurgy*2 June	1915	of Tasmania*23 May	1916	of Oriental Studies, Institution*7 September	1916	Society for the Promotion of Nature Reserves*30 March	1917	College, Cambridge*10 May	1917	War Graves Commission (now War Graves Commission)*19 May 1917	United Kingdom Trust*27 November	1917	Marys Hospital for the East End*14 January	1919	Dunfermline and Hero Fund Trustees*24 February	1919	of Cordiners in Glasgow*15 April	1919	Body of the Church in Wales*30 May	1919	Hospital and Home for Incurables, Putney*9 December	1919	of Chartered Shipbrokers*9 December	1919	University College of Swansea (now University)*20 December	1919	Georges Fund for Sailors*20 December	1919	Kitchener National Memorial Fund 1920s *11 March	1920	Royal Infirmary*25 March	1920	Medical Research Council*25 March	1920	Commissioners*17 May	1920	of Shipping of the United Kingdom*17 May	1920	Society of Massage and Medical Gymnastics*28 June	1920	Academy of Dramatic Art*13 October	1920	Marys Hospital, Paddington*10 June	1921	Association*14 July	1921	College of St. Bartholomews Hospital in the City of London*10 August	1921	of Electrical Engineers*11 October	1921	Forestry Association*11 October	1921	Cotton Growing Corporation*7 November	1921	of British Foundrymen*13 December	1921	Liverpool Seamens Orphan Institution*6 February	1922	Scottish Society for Prevention of Cruelty to Children*3 March	1922	Victoria College, Montreal*3 March	1922	League*1 April	1922	Naval Benevolent Trust (Grand Fleet and Kindred Funds)*5 May	1922	of Architects in Scotland*20 June	1922	Johns Foundation School*10 August	1922	of Estate Management*6 December	1922	H (Incorporated)*6 December	1922	Guides Association*29 January	1923	of Royal Engineers*12 March	1923	Institute of Florence*4 May	1923	of British Industry*4 May	1923	and Staffordshire Hospital*26 June	1923	Royal Infirmary*11 October	1923	College*21 March	1924	School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine*25 June	1924	Life Saving Society*25 July	1924	College, Cambridge*6 February	1925	Institute*17 March	1925	Legion*12 October	1925	Playing Fields Society*12 October	1925	Memorial Theatre, Stratford-upon-Avon*16 December	1925	Sailors and Airmens Families Association*1 February	1926	of Reading*25 February	1926	Margaret Hall, Oxford*25 February	1926	Hildas College, Oxford*25 February	1926	Birkbeck College*25 February	1926	Medico Psychological Association*30 April	1926	College, Oxford*1 June	1926	Masonic Institution for Boys*1 June	1926	The Union*28 June	1926	Institute of International Affairs*28 June	1926	Hughs College, Oxford*5 November	1926	of Transport*20 November	1926	Broadcasting Corporation*14 December	1926	Police Fund*22 March	1928	Association for the Advancement of Science*22 March	1928	of Chartered Accountants in Australia*13 July	1928	of Nursing*14 August	1928	Victoria Hospital, Dundee*20 November	1928	Homeopathic Hospital (now the London Hospital for Integrated Medicine)*20 November	1928	Art Collection Fund*21 December	1928	College*29 January	1929	Garrett Anderson Hospital*1 March	1929	Leopold Davis Scholarships Trust*21 March	1929	Engineering Standards Association*10 May	1929	Church Trustees*10 May	1929	of Gas Engineers*5 July	1929	of Hygiene*17 December	1929	George Hospital at Ilford 1930s *20 January	1930	Society for the Relief of Indigent Gentlewomen of Scotland*28 March	1930	of Mechanical Engineers*28 July	1930	Edwards VIIs Hospital for Officers, Sister Agnes Founder*28 July	1930	Company of Master Mariners*28 July	1930	School*28 July	1930	Ham Memorial Hospital*18 December	1930	National School of Medicine*29 June	1931	Postgraduate Medical School*1 October	1931	Fishmongers Company*7 October	1931	Chemical Institute*7 October	1931	Seamens Pension Fund*11 February	1932	China Committee in London*15 December	1932	Playing Fields Association*16 March	1933	of Marine Engineers*25 May	1933	Library*26 June	1933	Westfield College, London*22 March	1934	of Structural Engineers*9 November	1934	Queen Mary College*20 December	1934	of London Maternity Hospital*21 February	1935	Ladies College*6 June	1935	Agricultural Benevolent Institution*13 August	1935	of Engineers (India)*20 December	1935	Academy of Dancing*13 April	1937	Company of Basketmakers*29 July	1937	Infirmary at Leeds*24 February	1938	of Engineers Australia*25 November	1938	School*25 May	1939	Association of Boys Clubs*25 July	1939	Cancer Research Fund 1940s *19 September	1940	Council*30 May	1941	Red Cross Society*26 June	1946	School, Canterbury*26 June	1946	Company of Carmen*10 July	1946	Council of Great Britain*10 July	1946	of Fuel*29 January	1947	College of Obstetricians and Gynaecologists*10 March	1947	Postgraduate Medical Federation*28 October	1947	National War Memorial Trustees*28 October	1947	Families Fund*9 July	1948	of Nottingham*13 September	1948	College*13 September	1948	of Municipal Engineers*25 October	1948	and Foreign Bible Society*22 December	1948	Aeronautical Society*22 December	1948	College of the West Indies*4 March	1949	Institute for the Blind*30 June	1949	College of North Staffordshire*25 November	1949	Benevolent Institution 1950s *31 March	1950	Alfred Merchant Seamens Society*25 April	1950	Royal Naval Service Benevolent Trust*25 April	1950	Association of Australia*9 October	1950	College of Leicester*8 December	1950	Company of Musicians*21 December	1950	College, Belfast*1 November	1951	Red Cross Society*14 November	1951	Society of Cymmrodorion*24 March	1952	of Southampton*9 April	1952	of Pharmacy, University of London*29 April	1952	Annes College, Oxford*29 July	1952	Masonic Institution for Girls*25 November	1952	and Governors of Queen Elizabeth College*4 December	1952	Air Forces Association*1 April	1953	Antonys College, Oxford*30 April	1953	of Radiologists*20 January	1954	Academy of Science*13 May	1954	of Hull*15 July	1954	Naval Association*21 December	1954	Elizabeth House, Oxford*10 February	1955	College of Rhodesia and Nyasaland*7 April	1955	Theological College*7 April	1955	Education Service*29 July	1955	College of Science and Technology*29 July	1955	of Farmers of the City of London*29 July	1955	Institute of Mining and Metallurgy*28 October	1955	of Exeter*9 October	1956	Ballet*15 February	1957	Edmund Hall, Oxford*22 February	1957	of Chemical Engineers*15 March	1957	of Leicester*17 May	1957	of London Solicitors Company*23 August	1957	Union of the Commonwealth*19 February	1958	Institute of Radiology*14 March	1958	College, Oxford*21 November	1958	of Municipal Treasurers and Accountants*19 December	1958	Humane Society*15 June	1959	Planning Institute*21 December	1959	Bay College - The University College of Sierra Leone 1960s *8 April	1960	Army Museum*3 August	1960	College, Cambridge*26 October	1960	House, Cambridge*2 August	1961	of Sussex*24 October	1961	Archaeological Institute*24 October	1961	Peters College, Oxford*6 December	1961	University of Keele*21 December	1961	Institute of Loss Adjusters*26 February	1962	of the West Indies*2 October	1962	Association*28 November	1962	Association of Australia*26 March	1963	of Dyers and Colourists*2 May	1963	Society of St. George*30 May	1963	of Commonwealth Universities*29 July	1963	of York*29 July	1963	Catherines College, Oxford*29 July	1963	Health Trust*27 November	1963	of East Anglia*27 November	1963	of Basutoland, the Bechuanaland Protectorate and Swaziland*26 March	1964	of Production Engineers*23 June	1964	of Strathclyde*23 June	1964	Medical Institution*27 July	1964	University of Lancaster*20 November	1964	University of Kent at Canterbury*20 November	1964	of Essex*29 January	1965	of Warwick*26 February	1965	Research Council*26 February	1965	Psychological Society*4 May	1965	Environment Research Council*3 August	1965	Mathematical Society*29 October	1965	Science Research Council*31 January	1966	University*24 February	1966	University of Technology*10 March	1966	University of Aston in Birmingham*6 April	1966	University, London*9 June	1966	University*28 July	1966	of Surrey*28 July	1966	College, Cambridge*20 September	1966	of Bradford*20 September	1966	University of Technology*10 February	1967	of Salford*28 June	1967	of Dundee*28 July	1967	College of Art*23 August	1967	Boy Scouts Association*10 October	1967	of Radio and Electronic Engineers, Australia*13 November	1967	of Stirling*13 November	1967	of Wales Institute of Science and Technology*22 March	1968	African Society*1969           Hong Kong Police, reverted to Kong Police after of sovereignty over Hong Kong*23 April	1969	University*25 June	1969	Academy of the Humanities for the Advancement of Scholarship in Language, Literature, History, Philosophy and the Fine Arts*-July	1969	Institute of Building*28 November	1969	for Promoting Christian Knowledge*28 November	1969	Institute of Technology*19 December	1969	College of Pathologists 1970s *4 February	1970	Club (incorporating the National Hunt Committee)*4 February	1970	of the South Pacific*28 July	1970	University of Ulster*30 September	1970	of Physics*11 March	1971	College*22 December	1971	College, University of London*22 December	1971	Council*22 December	1971	Sports Council*22 December	1971	Sports Council for Wales*28 June	1972	Hall, Cambridge*23 October	1972	College of General Practitioners*24 October	1973	Foundation for the study of Industrial Society*16 October	1974	of Chartered Certified Accountants (ACCA)*12 February	1975	of Cost and Management Accountants*12 February	1975	of Metallurgists*18 March	1975	of Measurement and Control*12 November	1975	College of Law*17 March	1976	Institution of Heating and Ventilating Engineers under title of Institution of Building Services*19 May	1976	Council*19 May	1976	of Industrial Artists and Designers*9 June	1976	College, Cambridge*15 September	1976	of Bankers in Scotland*27 October	1976	College, Cambridge*15 November	1977	College London*25 April	1978	Trustees for the Universities of Scotland (new)*6 February	1979	of Arbitrators*14 March	1979	Societies Institute*14 March	1979	of Biology 1980s *13 February	1980	College London*19 March	1980	Society of Chemistry (amalgamation between Royal Institute of Chemistry and Chemical Society)*28 July	1980	Institute of Building*18 February	1981	College, Oxford*28 October	1981	Council*10 February	1982	of Foresters*11 February	1983	of Buckingham*22 June	1983	Film Institute*18 May	1983	Council*20 April	1984	of Engineering*11 April	1984	Society*25 June	1984	of Housing*25 June	1984	of Environmental Health Officers*31 July	1984	of Ulster*31 July	1984	Computer Society*12 September	1984	Hall, Cambridge*30 October	1984	College, Cambridge*5 June	1986	College, Oxford*8 July	1986	Graduate School of Business Studies*10 February	1987	of Bankers*10 June	1987	of London of Education*23 March	1988	of Ophthalmologists*27 April	1988	Motability*7 February	1989	Chartered Institute of Marketing*2 August	1989	Queen Mary and Westfield College*19 December	1989	Commonwealth Society for the Blind*1 November	1989	College, University of London 1990s *7 June	1990	The of Mathematics and its Applications*26 June	1990	Star and Garter Home*21 May	1991	The Management College*11 February	1992	College of Anaesthetists*15 July	1992	The Chartered Institute of Purchasing and Supply*16 December	1993	and Biological Sciences Research Council*16 December	1993	and Physical Sciences Research Council*16 December	1993	Physics and Astronomy Research Council*8 February	1994	Council of England*8 February	1994	Arts Council*8 February	1994	Council of Wales*15 March	1994	Chartered Institute of Taxation*14 December	1994	Institution of Water and Environmental Management*14 December	1994	for the Central Laboratory of the Research Councils*11 April	1995	College, Oxford*11 April	1995	College, Oxford*28 June	1995	The of Optometrists*23 November	1995	College, Oxford*13 March	1996	York Borough Council*13 March	1996	County Council (?)*26 June	1996	Sedgefield Borough Council*23 July	1996	East Lincolnshire Borough Council*23 July	1996	England*23 July	1996	Sport*23 July	1996	Paediatrics and Child Health*26 June	1997	Institute*22 July	1997	Cavendish College, Cambridge*22 July	1997	and Hove Borough Council*11 February	1998	Medway Borough Council*11 February	1998	Royal Palaces*22 April	1998	Edmunds College, Cambridge*15 October	1998	Lincolnshire Borough Council*12 October	1999	Princes Trust*24 November	1999	Air Force Benevolent Fund 21st century *8 February	2000	of Personnel and Development*12 July	2000	Royal Environmental Health Institute of Scotland*11 April	2001	of Incorporated Engineers*11 December	2001	Institute of Wastes Management*12 February	2002	Management Institute*12 February	2002	and the Wrekin Borough Council*26 June	2002	of Occupational Safety and Health*12 June	2003	The Council*15 December	2003	Valley University*11 February	2004	The Company of Engineers*11 February	2004	The Company of Paviors*8 May	2004	for the Environment*27 July	2004	Royal Photographic Society of Great Britain*13 October	2004	for Science Education*22 July	2005	Institute of Architectural TechnologistsSee also* of Canadian organizations with royal patronage* Majestys Most Honourable Privy CouncilReferences
240314
University_of_Exeter
180pxThe University of Exeter (usually abbreviated as Exon. for post-nominals) is a public university in South West England. It belongs to the Group, an association of 19 of the Kingdoms smaller research-intensive universities.The University has three campuses: Streatham; St Lukes (both of which are in Exeter); and Tremough in Cornwall. Most of its work is conducted in the city of Exeter, Devon, where it is the principal education institution. The Tremough campus is maintained in conjunction with College Falmouth under the Universities in Cornwall (CUC) initiative.The Universitys Chancellor is Baroness Benjamin, an actress, author and businesswoman. Its Vice-Chancellor is Professor Sir Steve Smith, who is currently President of UK.Coat of armsThe University of arms symbolises the universitys historical associations with the locality. The triangular gold castle with three towers comes from Exeters coat of arms and probably represents the Castle, as alluded to by the red background. The 15 gold Besants around the edge of the shield are from Cornwalls coat of arms, while the green cross on the white background is from the Plymouth City Councils coat of arms. The theme of learning is symbolised by the book with gold edges and a Latin motto, lucem sequimur (we follow the light).HistoryAfter earlier beginnings, university education in Exeter began in 1922 with the conversion of the previous Albert Memorial College into the University College of the South West of England, and the Colleges inclusion on the list of institutions eligible to receive funds from the then University Grants Committee. The College was conceived as a territorial institution, making university education available relatively locally for students from Devon, Cornwall, Dorset and Somerset.  As was customary for new university institutions in southern England in the late 19th and early 20th centuries, the College prepared students for degrees of the of London.()  With further growth in the 1920s and 1930s, it was granted increasing autonomy, but full independence was delayed by the World War. The university college received its Charter and became the free-standing University of Exeter in December 1955.  In the post-war period, Exeter like other UK universities became much more of a national institution, with students coming from all over the southern United Kingdom; as a research-intensive institution, it now attracts significant numbers of students from overseas.  However, regional activity continued  for example, through extramural teaching throughout Devon and Cornwall, and the establishment of an Institute of Cornish Studies in Truro.Timeline{|cellspacing0, cellpadding3 border0|-! Chancellors!  ! Vice-Chancellors|-valigntop|| Floella Benjamin|Chancellor Baroness Benjamin(2006-)||}Centre for Leadership StudiesIn 1997 the for Leadership Studies was established as a leading centre for research and advanced study into leadership theory. It is the only specialist centre in the whole of Europe dedicated to scholarship in leadership studies.The centre offers MA, MRes and Certificate programs in Leadership which can be learned through coached elearning.Xfi Centre for Finance and investmentA specialist centre for the study of Finance and Investment. It offers an MSc in Financial Analysis and Fund Management, which is designed around the CFA curriculum.ReputationIn recent years, Exeter has risen sharply in all the main league tables, except in the QS World University Rankings, as the following tables show.{| classwikitable width100%|+UK University Rankings|-!! 2012! 2011! 2010! 2009! 2008! 2007! 2006! 2005|-! Times Good University Guide| 10th()| | 9th( )| 13th( )| 9th( )| 28th( )| 34th| 31st( )| 34th( )| 35th| 36th| 38th| 38th| 40th()| 37th| 36th| 35th| 36th| 39th| 36th|-! Guardian University Guide|11th()||13th()| 14th()|34th()| 27th| 28th()| 46th()| 29th()| 31st()|||||||||||-! Sunday Times University Guide| 9th(|titleThe Sunday Times Good University Guide 2010 League Tables |workSunday Times | locationLondon | accessdate2010-04-09}})|| 17th( )| 14th()| 17th( )| 18thth(| 25th()| 24th()| 20th(| 28th(| 24th(| 27th(| 34th(| 32nd(||||||-! Daily Telegraph|||||| 17th()|||| 30th(|||||||||||-! The Independent|||| 19th()| 17th(||||||||||||||||-! The Financial Times|||||||||| 40th()|| 40th()| 40th()| 41st()|||||||}Exeters strongest performance is in the Times Good University Guide rankings. Exeter was the winner of the Times Higher University of the Year award in 2007/8, after finishing runner up three times running.  In 2006, it was noted that, Exeters excellent record merits special recognition as runner-up this year. Students here are some of the most satisfied in the country, ranking it on the fringes of the top 10. High entry standards and low dropout rates further entrench its standing. Sunday Times, 10 September 2006.National Student SurveyThe 2007 Student Survey found that some 91% of Exeter students are satisfied with their experience compared to a national average of 81%. This means that Exeter is 7th in the national universities and colleges satisfaction ranking and 4th in the list of traditional universities. This is the third year in a row that Exeter has come within the top ten.In the 2005 National Student Survey, Exeter was ranked joint 10th nationally for overall satisfaction. The results put Exeter in the top 25 per cent of UK universities for learning resources (such as IT resources) and for course management and organisation.OtherIn 2007/08 academic year the University has seen a rise of 23.8% in applications for places  one of the highest rises among universities in the country.In the 2001 UK Assessment Exercise, 98% of subject areas at Exeter were rated 4, 5 or 5* (of national or international standing). In 2008, 17% of the submitted research was rated 4* (world-leading) and 89% no lower than 2* (recognised internationally).( )In the 2006 National Student Survey, Exeter was ranked joint 11th, and the of Exeter Business School was ranked 1st in the country for Business, Accounting & Finance and Management.The University hosts the Innovation Centre which is based on the Streatham Campus and supports businesses at different stages of growth.Campus lifethumb|right|400px|Washington Singer, Streatham campusStreatham campusthumb|left|250px|Reed Hall, Streatham campusMost students work on the main campus, Streatham, which includes the Theatre.  Sitting on a hillside one side of which looks down across Exeter city centre, the campus is renowned for its beautiful landscaping and excellent views. Independent has described the campus environment as sublime.  The campus also has several galleries, including the Douglas Centre for the history of cinema and popular culture. There is also a Sculpture Walk, including pieces by Moore, Hepworth and a statue to commemorate the events at Square. There is a pub type bar called the Ram and a Bar (previously called the Ewe) within a nightclub called the Lemon Grove (or Lemmy), both run by the Students Guild. The campus boasts a medical centre, a counselling service, a childrens day-care centre, and numerous catering outlets. Many halls of residence and some self-catering accommodation are located on this campus or in the near vicinity. In 2005 Streatham Campuss newest building, the Xfi centre, was completed to provide facilities mainly but not exclusively for postgraduate study into finance and investment.St Lukes campusThe St Lukes campus is home to the largest academic school of the University, the Graduate School of Education (previously known as School of Education & Lifelong Learning). It shares the campus with the Peninsula Medical School (a joint venture with the of Plymouth) and the School of Sport and Health Sciences. The campus is just over a mile from the larger Streatham campus and 10 minutes walk from the city centre.The St Lukes campus also has its own restaurant, cafeteria, bar, bookshop, bank, indoor swimming pool, two gymnasia including an advanced conditioning studio and grass tennis courts for summer use.The future of St Lukes is currently under review, with a proposal to bring one of the Schools located there to the Streatham Campus to allow further expansion (see below).Tremough campus (University of Exeter, Cornwall Campus)thumb|right|250px|The Main Library, Streatham campusThe University of Exeters Cornwall campus, Tremough now houses all the universitys activity in Cornwall, previously scattered across the county.  It is part of the Universities in Cornwall project, and is shared with College Falmouth.  University of Exeter departments on the site include the internationally renowned CSM (School of Mines), whose graduates who are highly sought after by mining and civil engineering industries as well as the (renewable) energy sector. CSM, founded over 100 years before the University of Exeter, merged with Exeter in 1993 and is now part of the School of Engineering, Mathematics and Physical Sciences (SEMPS).  Other departments at Tremough include the rapidly growing Centre for Ecology and Conservation (CEC), English, Geography and the of Cornish Studies, and additional departments are being added, such as History and Law, the first year of which started in October 2007.Students GuildStudents at Exeter are represented by a of Students,() which has an active role in campaigning at local and national levels. It is run by four elected Sabbatical Officers: Nick Davis (President), James Fox (Vice President Participation & Campuses), Emma Payne (Vice President Welfare & Community) and James Eales (Vice President Academic Affairs). They were elected in February 2011 with a record numbers of students voting in the elections, a national record 38.1% turnout of registered students.()Exeters Guild is home to award winning media: a student radio station FM, a newspaper Exepos,() a website Online() and television station XTV.() There is also a volunteering agency within the Students Guild called Action,() which runs its own projects with members of the local community that are run by volunteers and provides further volunteering opportunities through links with external partner organisations. There is a RAG (Raising and Giving) group() which exists to raise money for five nominated charities, and collects in town centres around Britain every weekend. RAG events are run by students, under the co-ordination of a full-time member of staff. The main aim of these societies and activities groups is to provide opportunities for student development. The Guild of Students was renamed the Students Guild in 2005.There are over 100 affiliated student societies, ranging from the Theatre Company and Creative Writing to the LDYS, Future, and Students societies. There are a very large number of sports clubs, and the Union (AU) is now a separate body from the Students Guild. This organisation is led by a student-elected President, currently Simon Tyson. The Debating Society which predates establishment of the university, started life in 1893 as The Exeter Debating Society at the Albert Memorial College, and has played host to many notable speakers including Eden, H Asquith, Kennedy, Foot and Fry.Students are represented by a sabbatical team consisting of a President, Vice President Participation and Campuses, Vice President Welfare and Community, Vice President Academic Affairs, and the Athletic Union President. There are also other non sabbatical officers representing areas of the student population and student activities areas.These are elected by students in a series of elections throughout the academic year.thumb|left|250px|The Peter Chalk Centre, Streatham campus, with the Physics tower in the background Evangelical Christian Union disputes Since late 2006, the Exeter Students Guild has been in dispute()()() with the Evangelical Christian Union (ECU),(Evangelical Christian Union website) over the ECUs requirement that members sign a declaration saying they agree to a statement of beliefs, and the requirement that speakers and committee members agree to a basis.() The ECUs organisation, the and Colleges Christian Fellowship, promote the idea of the doctrinal basis for committee members.()On 24 October 2006, the existing Christian Union was instructed by the Guild to change its name to the Evangelical Christian Union, following a referendum vote by students at Exeter University. The name change was intended to clarify that the societys position was that of Christianity, rather than of all forms of Christianity, and was proposed by a member of the Christian Union.The dispute was covered nationally by news channels including the BBC, with the Students Guild freezing the accounts of the Christian Union, and refusing them free access to Guild facilities as well as advertising rights.On 26 February 2007, the Guild issued a statement saying that Ben Martin is now willing to follow the Internal Complaints Procedure.() By the summer this was completed, with Mark Shaw QC ruling in the students guilds favour.()In 2008/9, after one more failed try by the ECU to change the Students Guild Constitution in terms of being able to restrict membership to only Christians, the President Robert Moore decided to make a U-turn at the end of the academic year.  He proposed scrapping this idea entirely and opening the doctrine of the society up to those of all faiths.  This idea seemed greatly supported but the committee of 2009 preferred that this decision be reviewed by them.New developmentsThe University has undergone an investment programme worth more than 235 million(http://www.exeter.ac.uk/news/stlukes/index.shtml?icidD007-4008488-074F) in recent years. 38 million has been invested in new student accommodation, including the new Holland Hall, named after the former vice-chancellor of the same name.  8m has been invested in sports facilities, including a professional-standard tennis centre. A 1m upgrade has been carried out to the students union building and nightclub and 1.5 m has been spent improving access for people with disabilities.  In October 2002, The Medical School, a partnership between the Universities of Exeter and Plymouth, admitted its first students of medicine. In 2005, the new Centre for Finance and Investment opened, the result of a multi-million pound gift from an anonymous donor. After a donation of 650,000 from the ruler of Sharjah, bin Mohamed Al-Qasimi, an extension has been added to the also recently constructed Institute of Arab and Islamic Studies Building.  In 2006, the Department of Drama completed a major renovation.  The Department of Dramas state-of-the-art 3 million Alexander Building was named after the former University Chancellor Lord Alexander.  A new 28 million Dental School, a partnership between the Universities of Exeter and Plymouth,opened its doors in October 2007.  The dental school will have places for 62 graduate entry students each year.  The South West of England Regional Development Agency is investing 9.7 m in phase II of the University of Exeter Innovation Centre.  The project is currently under construction and will create a  building for use by new and growing businesses within the development and research sectors at the universitys Streatham campus.  Phase I of the Innovation Centre was finished in 2000 and houses high-tech businesses from the software, biomedical sectors to advanced manufacturing and internet firms.The School of Biosciences is undergoing massive investment to further improve the facilities. The Business School, formerly SoBE - The school of Business and Economics, is set to receive investment in the form of a new building to add to its existing buildings of Streatham Court and XFi. Further to the new building, a new student services centre has been constructed in Streatham Court and its lecture theatre corridor and MBA suite renovated.Forum Project48 million has recently been invested into the renovation of the library, great hall and the area between it.   The large glass structure will resemble a large shopping mall style, with a top of the range conference lecture theatre, and many seminar rooms.  It will have trees planted, as well as flowing water to give a modernist, yet natural atmosphere.The new building will act as the Universitys main reception, and is intended to help push the University further into the top 10 in the UK. Restructuring For nearly 40 years Exeter was the only university in the south-west peninsula, and as such it sought to offer the maximum number of academic disciplines.  By 1995 the University had nearly 50 separate departments and centres.  Its Assessment Exercise performance in 1996 was poor, and this was widely attributed to the absence of large strong units.   As a result, an internal working party recommendation a reorganisation into a smaller number of Schools (18, now reduced further to 11, though the two schools of the Peninsula College of Medicine and Dentistry have been added), with the abolition of the traditional Faculties of Arts, Science etc.Despite this internal reorganization, the University again entered the 2001 RAE with substantially more disciplines than most comparable universities, and consequently with smaller units.   Since 2000, the University has therefore undergone a further process of restructuring in order to focus on areas of strength. In 2004, it closed two departments (chemistry and music) that had been suffering low student demand for a long period, and had failed to achieve a 5-grade in any of the RAEs. Although similar moves elsewhere had attracted little attention, a media storm blew up around this issue at Exeter, perhaps because of the high profile that the Vice-Chancellor, Professor Steve Smith, was taking in UK university politics at the time (for example, he had just been appointed as Chair of the 1994 Group). There was also protest within the institution.  The closures eliminated 130 jobs, and the AUT questioned the Universitys financial figures.()Image:Exeter protests over Chemistry closure.png|right|thumb|Protests over department closures. Photograph taken from Exepos.On Thursday, 25 November 2004, about 2,000 students marched in protest over the decision,() making the local television news. Some even attempted to sell the University on eBay in protest.()  Sir Kroto, a laureate, returned his degree from this institution in protest against this move.,() as did celebrated percussionist Dame Glennie.() The university faced further protest in 2008 when more than 2,000 people signed a petition against plans to get an outside firm to run its profitable and outstanding-rated campus Family Centre.(http://www.thisisexeter.co.uk/displayNode.jsp?nodeId142327&commanddisplayContent&sourceNode142322&contentPK20073846&folderPk79877&pNodeId142332)The future of St LukesIn 2006, the University commissioned a study into the future of the St Lukes site, the location of the Schools of Education and Lifelong Learning, the School of Sports and Health Science, and the universitys part of the Medical School.  The Vice-Chancellor stated that the problem is one of success, that is if these three Schools achieve their planned expansion ... then we will simply run out of space at St Lukes..(Email from the Vice-Chancellor to all students, 4 October 2006)  The options considered were moving the three schools currently located there onto the Streatham campus, with the sale of the St Lukes site; moving one of the Schools to the Streatham campus, and expanding the other two at St Lukes; and attempting to expand all three at St Lukes.  Although media and student attention focussed on the first of these possibilities,() the consultants advice was that the middle path of moving one School was the most financially sensible, and it is likely that this is what university management had always intended.Notable current and former members of academic staffExeter has a large number of leading academics. Sir Tooke, who was knighted in the 2007 Queens New Years Honours list for services to medicine is the inaugural dean of the Medical School. Professor Sambles in the school of physics is a of the Royal Society. Professor Overy, fellow of the British Academy and distinguished Historian specialising in the Third Reich.Notable alumniExeter has a large number of well-known alumni. Both Princess Annes children Peter Phillips and Phillips attended the University in the late 1990s. K. Rowling, the author of the Potter books read French and Classics in the mid 80s. Bolt, playwright and two-time Oscar and BAFTA winning screenwriter (Lawrence of Arabia, Zhivago, Man For All Seasons) also attended Exeter. Band, the Sea Lord of the United Kingdom, the most senior serving officer in the Navy read Economics in the 70s. Shackleton, the divorce case lawyer, read law in the 1970s.  Yorke, lead singer of Radiohead, read English and Fine Arts at the University of Exeter. Frank Gardner, the BBCs security correspondent, shot in Riyadh by jihadist radicals but continuing his work, and especially respected for his Middle East expertise, graduated in Arabic in the 1980s. Prof. Abdulaziz N. Al-Mani, winner of the Arab Nobel Prize, the 2009 King Faisal Prize, in the category of Arabic Literature, and now emeritus professor of Arabic literature at King Saud University, obtained his doctorate in Arabic literature from Exeter in 1976.  Writer and broadcaster OFarrell studied English and Drama in the early 1980s and childrens author Voake obtained a PGCE at Exeter University. Chris Johnson LLB, of Team GB Clay Shooting, also attended the University, from 2006-2009. Felix Barrett, founder and artistic director of Punchdrunk Theatre studied drama from 1997-2000. The mathematical physicist Professor Sir Michael Berry completed a BSc in Physics at Exeter in 1962 and is now known for, amongst other things, the Phase and receiving an Nobel Prize for levitating a frog.Singer Young read politics at Exeter and was a RAG Safer Sex Ball Co-ordinator.See also* dress of the University of Exeter* of Exeter Halls of ResidenceReferencesExternal links*University of Exeter*Exeter Uni** University of Exeter Film footage from 1926 Australian Prime Minister cuts first sod of soil on the site of new building* Film footage of The Queen unveiling Foundation Stone of new Exeter University in 1957van ExeterExeterCaerwysgof ExeterdExetervan Exeterja:de Exeterzh:
241458
Charles_Taylor_(Liberia)
alma_mater  University (B.A.)Charles McArthur Ghankay Taylor (born 28 January 1948) was the 22nd of Liberia, serving from 2 August 1997 until his resignation on 11 August 2003.()Born in Arthington, County, Liberia, Taylor earned a degree at College in the States before returning to Liberia to work in the government of Doe. After being removed for embezzlement, he eventually arrived in Libya, where he was trained as a fighter. He returned to Liberia in 1989 as the head of a Libyan-backed resistance group, the Patriotic Front of Liberia, to overthrow the Doe regime, initiating the Liberian Civil War. Following Does execution, he gained control of a large portion of the country and became one of the most prominent warlords in Africa.() Following a peace deal that ended the war, Taylor terrorized the population into electing him president in the 1997 general election.()During his term of office, Taylor was accused of crimes and against humanity as a result of his involvement in the Leone Civil War. Domestically, opposition to his regime grew, culminating in the outbreak of the Liberian Civil War in 1999. By 2003, he had lost control of much of the countryside and was formally indicted by the Court for Sierra Leone. That year, he resigned as a result of growing international pressure and went into exile in Nigeria. In 2006, the newly elected President Johnson Sirleaf formally requested his extradition. Upon his arrival in Monrovia, he was transferred to the custody of the Nations Mission in Liberia and immediately flown to Leone. He is currently being held in the United Nations Detention Unit on the premises of the Penitentiary Institution Haaglanden in Hague, where he is on trial before the Court for Sierra Leone for his role in the civil war.()Early lifeCharles McArthur Taylor was born in Arthington, a town near Monrovia, on 28 January 1948 to Nelson and Bernice Taylor. He took the name Ghankay later on, possibly to please and gain favor with the indigenous people.() His mother was a member of the Gola ethnic group.  According to most reports, his father was an Americo-Liberian. Taylor was a student at College in Waltham, Massachusetts, from 1972 to 1977, earning a degree in economics.In 1979, he led a demonstration at the Liberian Mission to the Nations in York City, protesting then-president of Liberia Tolbert, who was on a state visit to the U.S. at the time. Tolbert publicly debated Taylor, but when Taylor insinuated that he would seize the Liberian Mission by force, he was arrested by the York Police Department. He was later released and invited back to Liberia by Tolbert.Taylor supported the 12 April 1980 coup led by Doe, which saw the murder of Tolbert and seizure of power by Doe. Taylor was appointed to a high position in Does government in the Services Agency of Liberia, a position that left him in charge of purchasing for the Liberian government. However, he was sacked in May 1983 for embezzling almost $1,000,000 and sending the funds to an American bank account.Taylor fled to the United States but was arrested on 24 May 1984 by two US Deputy Marshals in Massachusetts, on a warrant for extradition to face charges of embezzling $922,000 of government funds intended for machinery parts. Citing a fear of assassination by Liberian agents, Taylor sought to fight extradition from the safety of jail with the help of his attorney, former Attorney General Clark. He was detained in a House of Corrections in Massachusetts.On 15 September 1985, Taylor and four other inmates allegedly escaped from the Plymouth facility, a maximum security prison, by sawing through a bar covering a window in an unused laundry room. After dropping 12 feet to the ground by means of a knotted sheet, the five inmates climbed a fence. Shortly thereafter, Taylor and two other escapees were met at nearby Jordan Hospital by Taylors wife, Enid, and Taylors sister-in-law, Lucia Holmes Toweh. A getaway car was driven to Island, where Taylor then disappeared. All four of Taylors fellow escapees, as well as Enif and Toweh, were later apprehended. Johnson, a Liberian senator and former associate of Taylor, claimed before the countrys Truth and Reconciliation Commission on 27 August 2008 that the United States released Taylor from jail in 1985 to engineer the overthrow of the Doe regime. This charge was later repeated by Taylor himself during his testimony at his trial in The Hague.He has recently said that his escape from the penitentiary in Boston was facilitated by the US government. IntelNews.org identifies DOnofrio Ruggiero, a 40 year CIA agent, as a close ally of Charles Taylor. His smuggling network and money laundering activities provided Taylor with outlets for selling stolen diamonds and buying illegal arms. (US freed Taylor to overthrow Doe, Liberias TRC hears)Civil warTaylor managed to flee the United States and shortly thereafter it is assumed that he went to Libya, where he underwent guerrilla training under al-Gaddafi, becoming Gaddafis protg.()  Eventually, he left Libya and traveled to dIvoire, where he founded the Patriotic Front of Liberia (NPFL).In December 1989, Taylor launched a Libyan-funded armed uprising from Cte dIvoire into Liberia to overthrow the Doe regime, leading to the Liberian Civil War.(Grim legacy of Liberias most isolated town BBC) By 1990, his forces soon controlled most of the country. That same year, Prince Johnson, a senior commander of Taylors NPFL, broke away and formed the National Patriotic Front of Liberia (INPFL). In September 1990, Johnson captured Monrovia, depriving Taylor of outright victory. Doe was captured and tortured to death by Johnson and his forces, resulting in a violent political fragmentation of the country. The war turned into an conflict, with seven factions fighting for control of Liberias resources (especially ore, diamonds, timber, and rubber).According to a 2 June 1999, article in Virginian-Pilot,(Sizemore, Bill.  Robertson, Liberian Leader Hope to Strike Gold in Coastal Africa.  The Virginian-Pilot.  2 June 1999.  ( Copy found at http://groups.google.com/group/misc.activism.progressive/browse_thread/thread/dca03c4012450e0c/f230a667e3ff73d5.) Charles Taylor...) Taylor had extensive business dealings with American televangelist Robertson during the civil war. According to the article, Taylor gave Robertson the rights to mine for diamonds in Liberias mineral-rich countryside. According to two Blessing pilots who reported this incident to the Commonwealth of Virginia for investigation in 1994, Robertson used his Operation Blessing planes to haul diamond-mining equipment to his new mines in Liberia, despite the fact that Robertson was telling his Club viewers that the planes were sending relief supplies to the victims of the genocide in Rwanda. The subsequent investigation by the Commonwealth of Virginia concluded that Robertson diverted his ministrys donations to the Liberian diamond-mining operation, but General of Virginia Earley blocked any potential prosecution against Robertson, as the relief supplies were also sent.()PresidencyAfter the official end of the civil war in 1996, Taylor ran for president in the 1997 general election. He famously campaigned on the slogan He killed my ma, he killed my pa, but I will vote for him. () The elections were overseen by the United Nations peacekeeping mission, Nations Observer Mission in Liberia, along with a contingent from the Community of West African States.() Taylor won the election in a landslide, garnering 75 percent of the vote. Taylors toughest competitor, Johnson Sirleaf, collected only 10 percent of the vote. Taylors victory has been widely attributed to the belief that he would resume the war if he lost.During his time in office, Taylor ran down the Forces of Liberia, dismissing 2,400-2,600 former personnel, many of whom were ethnic Krahn brought in by former President Doe.(Adebayo, Liberias Civil War, International Peace Academy, 2002, p.235) In its place, he installed the Anti-Terrorist Unit, the Special Operations Division of the Liberian National Police (LNP), which he used as his own private army.Numerous allegations were leveled at Taylor during his presidency, particularly regarding his involvement in the Leone Civil War. He was accused of backing the rebel United Front (RUF) and assisting them through weapon sales in exchange for diamonds. Due to a UN embargo against arms sales to Liberia at the time, these weapons were largely purchased on the market through arms smugglers such as Bout.() Furthermore, he was charged with aiding and abetting RUF atrocities against civilians that left many thousands dead or mutilated, with unknown numbers of people abducted and tortured. Moreover, he was accused of assisting the RUF in the recruitment of soldiers. In addition to aiding the RUF in these acts, Taylor reportedly personally directed RUF operations in Sierra Leone.(Merchant of death: money, guns, planes, and the man who makes war possible. Douglas Farah, Stephen Braun. p. 167)Taylor obtained spiritual and other advice from the evangelist Kilari Anand Paul.() As president, he was known for his flamboyant style.( Upon being charged by the UN of being a gunrunner and diamond smuggler during his presidency, he publicly appeared in all white robes and begged God for forgiveness, while at the same time denying the charges.() He was also reported to have said that Jesus Christ was accused of being a murderer in his time.(Rebellion and indictmentIn 1999, a rebellion against Taylor began in northern Liberia, led by a group calling itself United for Reconciliation and Democracy (LURD). This group was frequently accused of atrocities, and is thought to have been backed by the government of neighboring Guinea.() This uprising signaled the beginning of the Liberian Civil War.By early 2003, LURD had gained control of northern Liberia. That year, a second Ivorian-backed rebel group, for Democracy in Liberia (MODEL), emerged in southern Liberia and achieved rapid successes.() By the summer, Taylors government controlled only about a third of Liberia: Monrovia and the central part of the country.On 7 March 2003, the Court for Sierra Leone (SCSL) issued a indictment for Taylor.(The Prosecutor vs. Charles Ghankay Taylor The Special Court for Sierra Leone. Retrieved 2010-03-26)  Earlier that year, Liberian forces had killed Bockarie, a leading member of the RUF in Sierra Leone, in a shootout under Taylors orders. Some have claimed that Taylor ordered Bockarie killed in order to prevent Bockarie from testifying against him at the SCSL.()In June 2003, the Prosecutor to the Special Court unsealed the indictment and announced publicly that Taylor was charged with war crimes. The indictment asserted that Taylor created and backed the RUF rebels in Sierra Leone, who were accused of a range of atrocities, including the use of soldiers.() The Prosecutor also said that Taylors administration had harbored members of Al-Qaeda sought in connection with the 1998 bombings of U.S. embassies in Kenya and Tanzania.()The indictment was unsealed during Taylors official visit to Ghana, where he was participating in peace talks with MODEL and LURD officials. With the backing of the then-African president Mbeki and against the urging of Leone president Tejan Kabbah, Ghana declined to detain Taylor, who returned to Monrovia.ResignationDuring his absence for the peace talks in Ghana, it was alleged that the American government urged Vice President Blah to seize power.() Upon his return, Taylor briefly dismissed Blah from his post, only to reinstate him a few days later.In July 2003, LURD initiated a siege of Monrovia, and several bloody battles were fought as Taylors forces halted rebel attempts to capture the city. The pressure on Taylor increased further as U.S. President W. Bush stated that Taylor must leave Liberia twice that month. On 9 July, Nigerian President Obasanjo offered Taylor safe exile in his country, but only if Taylor stayed out of Liberian politics.()Taylor insisted that he would resign only if American peacekeeping troops were deployed to Liberia. Bush publicly called upon Taylor to resign and leave the country in order for any American involvement to be considered. Meanwhile, several African states, in particular the Community of West African States (ECOWAS) under the leadership of Nigeria, sent troops under the banner of ECOMIL to Liberia.() Logistical support was provided by a California company called PAE Government Services Inc., which was given a $10 million contract by the State Department.( On 6 August, a 32-member U.S. military assessment team were deployed as a liaison with the ECOWAS troops.()On 10 August, Taylor appeared on national television to announce that he would resign the following day and hand power to Vice President Blah. He harshly criticized the United States in his address, saying that the Bush administrations insistence that he leave the country would hurt Liberia.(On 11 August, Taylor resigned, with Blah serving as president until a transitional government was established on 14 October. At the handover were Ghanaian President Kufuor, South African President Mbeki, and Mozambican President Chissano, all representing African regional councils. The U.S. brought Task Force Liberias Ready Group of three warships with 2,300 Marines into view of the coast. Taylor flew to Nigeria, where the Nigerian government provided houses for him and his entourage in Calabar.ExileIn November 2003, the States Congress passed a bill that included a reward offer of two million dollars for Taylors capture. While the peace agreement had guaranteed Taylor safe exile in Nigeria, it also required that he not attempt to influence Liberian politics, a requirement that his critics claimed he disregarded. On 4 December, Interpol issued a notice regarding Taylor, suggesting that countries had a duty to arrest him. Taylor was placed on Interpols Most Wanted list, declaring him wanted for against humanity and breaches of the 1949 Geneva Convention, and noting that he should be considered dangerous. Nigeria stated it would not submit to Interpols demands, agreeing only to deliver Taylor to Liberia in the event that the President of Liberia requested his return.On 17 March 2006, Ellen Johnson Sirleaf, the newly elected President of Liberia, submitted an official request to Nigeria for Taylors extradition. This request was granted on 25 March, whereby Nigeria agreed to release Taylor to stand trial in the Court for Sierra Leone. Nigeria agreed only to release Taylor and not to extradite him, as no treaty existed between the two countries.Disappearance and arrestThree days after Nigeria announced its intent to hand him over to Liberia, Taylor disappeared from the seaside villa where he had been living in exile.() One week prior to his disappearance, Nigerian authorities had taken the unusual step of allowing local press to accompany census takers into Taylors seaside Calabar compound.Nigerian President Obasanjo was scheduled to meet with President Bush less than 48 hours after Taylor was reported missing. Speculation ensued that Bush would refuse to meet with Obasanjo if Taylor were not apprehended. Less than 12 hours prior to the scheduled meeting between the two heads of state, Taylor was reported apprehended and en route to Liberia.On 29 March, Taylor tried to cross the border into Cameroon through the border town of Gamboru in northeastern Nigeria. His Rover with Nigerian diplomatic plates was stopped by border guards, and Taylors identity was eventually established. State Department staff later reported that significant amounts of cash and heroin were found in the vehicle.Upon his arrival at International Airport in Harbel, Liberia, Taylor was arrested and handcuffed by LNP officers, who then immediately transferred custody of Taylor to the Nations Mission in Liberia (UNMIL). Irish UNMIL soldiers then escorted Taylor aboard a UN helicopter to Freetown, Leone, where he was delivered to the SCSL.TrialThe SCSL prosecutor originally indicted Taylor on 3 March 2003 on a 17 count indictment for crimes and crimes against humanity committed during the conflict in Sierra Leone. On 16 March 2006, a SCSL judge gave leave to amend the indictment against Taylor. Under the amended indictment, Taylor was charged with 11 counts. At Taylors initial appearance before the court on 3 April 2006, he entered a plea of not guilty.()In early June 2006, the decision on whether to hold Taylors trial in Freetown or in Hague had not yet been made by the new SCSL president, Gelaga King. Kings predecessor had pushed for the trial to be held abroad because of fear that a local trial would be politically destabilizing in an area where Taylor still had influence.(  The Appeals Chamber of the Special Court dismissed a motion by Taylors defense team, who argued that their client could not get a fair trial there and also wanted the Special Court to withdraw the request to move the trial to The Hague.()()On 15 June 2006, the government agreed to jail Taylor in the Kingdom in the event that he is convicted by the SCSL. This fulfilled a condition laid down by the government, who had stated they were willing to host the trial but would not jail him if convicted. British Foreign Minister Beckett stated that new legislation would be required to accommodate this arrangement.() While awaiting his extradition to the Netherlands, Taylor was held in a UN jail in Freetown.()On 16 June 2006, the United Nations Security Council agreed unanimously to allow Taylor to be sent to The Hague for trial; on 20 June 2006, Taylor was extradited and flown to Airport in the Netherlands. He was taken into custody and held in the detention centre of the Criminal Court, located in the Scheveningen section of The Hague.( ) The Association for the Legal Defense of Charles G. Taylor was established in June 2006 to assist in his legal defense.When Taylors trial opened 4 June 2007, Taylor boycotted the proceeding and was not present. Through a letter which was read by his attorney to the court, he justified his absence by alleging that at that moment he was not ensured a fair and impartial trial.()On 20 August 2007, Taylors defense now led by Griffiths obtained a postponement of the trial until 7 January 2008.() During the trial, the chief prosecutor alleged that a key insider witness who testified against Taylor went into hiding after being threatened for giving evidence against Taylor.() Furthermore, Joseph Zigzag Marzah, a former military commander, testified that Charles Taylor celebrated his new-found status during the civil war by ordering human sacrifice, including the killings of Taylors opponents and allies that were perceived to have betrayed Taylor, and by having a pregnant woman buried alive in sand.(Shock testimony at Taylor trial. Jazeera.) Marzah also accused Taylor of forcing cannibalism on his soldiers in order to terrorize their enemies.(Top aide testifies Taylor ordered soldiers to eat victims. CNN.)In January 2009, the prosecution finished presenting its evidence against Taylor and closed its case on 27 February 2009. On 4 May 2009, a defense motion for a judgment on acquittal was dismissed, and arguments for Taylors defense began in July 2009.(Winter, Renate. Foreword, Sixth Annual Report of the President of the Special Court for Sierra Leone: June 2008 to May 2009. Retrieved 2010-01-11.) Taylor testified in his own defense from July through November 2009.(Press. Taylor: I Didnt Know Sierra Leone Rebel Pre-1991, 2010-01-11. Retrieved 2010-01-11.) The defense rested its case on 12 November 2010, with closing arguments set for early February 2011.()On 8 February 2011, the trial court ruled in a 2-1 decision that it would not accept Taylors trial summary, as the summary had not been submitted by the January 14 deadline. In response, Taylor and his counsel boycotted the trial and refused an order by the court to begin closing arguments. This boycott came soon after the 2010 leak of American diplomatic cables by WikiLeaks, in which the United States discussed the possibility of extraditing Taylor for prosecution in the United States in the event of his acquittal by the SCSL. Taylors counsel cited the leaked cable and the courts decision as evidence of an international conspiracy against Taylor.()On March 3, the appeals court of the SCSL overturned the trial courts decision, ruling that as the trial court had not established that Taylor had been counseled by the court and personally indicated his intent to waive his right to a trial summary, Taylors process rights would be violated by preventing him from submitting a trial summary. The appeals court ordered the trial court to accept the summary and set a date for the beginning of closing arguments.()  On March 11, 2011, the closing arguments ended and it was announced that the court would reach a verdict months later.(http://english.aljazeera.net/news/europe/2011/03/2011311172946791811.html)FamilyIn 1997, Taylor married Taylor, with whom he has one son. She filed for divorce in 2005, citing her husbands exile in Nigeria and the difficulty of visiting him due to a UN travel ban on her.() The divorce was granted in 2006. Jewel Taylor currently serves as the senior senator from County.Phillip Taylor, Taylors son with Jewel, remained in Liberia following his fathers extradition to the SCSL. He was arrested by Liberian police officials on 5 March 2011 and charged with attempted murder in connection with an assault on the son of an immigration officer who had assisted in Charles Taylors extradition. At the time of his arrest, he had been attempting to cross the border into dIvoire.()Taylor has another son, a U.S. citizen named McArther Emmanuel, born to his college girlfriend. Emmanuel was arrested in 2006 after entering the US and was charged with three counts, including participation in torture while serving in the Anti-Terrorist Unit in Liberia during his fathers presidency.The law that prosecuted Taylor was put in place in 1994, before extraordinary rendition in an attempt to prevent US citizens from committing acts of torture overseas. To date, this is the only prosecuted case.( Ex-prisoner: Taylors son laughed at torture. CNN. 30 September 2008.) In October 2008, Emmanuel was convicted on all three counts and sentenced to 97 years in prison.(Couwels, John. Ex-Liberian presidents son convicted of torture. CNN. 30 October 2008.)In popular cultureThe character Andre Baptiste, Sr. from the movie of War is partially based on Taylor.()Taylor appears in the 2008 documentary the Devil Back to Hell.ReferencesFurther reading*External links*Trial proceedings are available directly from: the UN Special Court for Sierra Leone*BBC profile of Charles Taylor*Charles Taylor legal news and resources, JURIST*Handing Over Charles Taylor: Its Time, JURIST (op-ed by David Crane, former Chief Prosecutor for the Special Court for Sierra Leone who signed the indictment for Charles Taylor)*independent blog about the trial of Charles Taylor*Nigeria agrees to hand Taylor over to Liberia*How and Why Did Royal Caribbean Cruise Lines Help Liberian Dictator, Charles Taylor Brutally Kill over 300,000 Individuals in Africa during the 1990s? Did the fees they paid also allow Taylor to assist terrorist groups like al Qaeda? 1.5 million individuals were made homeless or became refugees*Charles Taylor: A wanted man, CNN, 29 March 2006.* Special Court for Sierra Leone* The trial of Charles Taylor - TRIAL WATCH* Charles Taylor on Trial Institute of Peace, 7 April 2006 (Audio)*Charles Taylor - Hague Justice Portal*The Trial of Charles Taylor - trial monitoring blog, Clifford Chance, International Senior Lawyers Project, Open Society Institute.*Special Court for Sierra Leone, Erin Louise Palmer, ABA Year-in-Review, 2008*10 Fascinating Things About Charles Taylor by The Young TurksTaylor (politik)TaylorTaylor (Liberia)Ghankay TaylorGhankay TaylorTaylor ()Ghankay TaylorGhankay TaylorTaylorTaylor (politico) ( )Taylor (president)ja:Taylor (Liberia)Ghankay TaylorTaylor (polityk)Taylor ( )TaylorTaylorTaylor (Liberia)zh:
242087
Ashuapmushuan_River
The Ashuapmushuan River is a river in the SaguenayLac-Saint-Jean region of the Canadian provinces of Quebec. It starts at the outlet of Lake Ashuapmushuan, and flows first in a north-easterly direction for about  whereafter it continues south-east to Saint-Flicien. There it drains into Saint-Jean of which it is the third largest tributary after the Peribonka and Rivers. The river is  long but its source is  from its mouth.(Natural Resources Canada, Atlas of Canada - Rivers)Typical median summer flow is between 200 and 300 m3/s, whereas during spring run-off, the median flow is 1050 m3/s, but the river could swell anywhere from a minimum of 400 to a maximum of 2400 m3/s. Lowest flow conditions occur in March with a median flow of 75 m3/s, and a minimum of 54 to a maximum of 120 m3/s.(The Ashuapmushuan River forms the northern boundary of the Wildlife Reserve for most of its length. As a wild undeveloped river, and accessible from Route 167 close to Lake Ashuapmushuan, it is a popular destination for camping.A new  aquatic reserve is being considered that would protect  of the Ashuapmushuan River, including its floodplain and valley slopes. The reserve prohibits logging, mining, and hydro-electric development, while protecting critical landlocked salmon habitats, biodiversity, and sites of archaeological interest.(EtymologyThe name Ashuapmushuan, which wasnt officially adopted until 1982, is an Innu word meaning place where one lies in wait for moose.()The river was however first called Necouba by Jolliet in 1679. This name was also used by Franquelin and Delisle in 1686 and 1703 respectively. But in 1732 surveyor Normandin considered this an error, who referred to the Necoubeau as a tributary to Lake Ashuapmushuan that was called Lake Chomonchouane by Laure on his maps of 1731 and 1732. Therefore Normandin renamed the river to Chomontchouane. In 1917, the Commission de gographie officially adopted the modernized spelling of Chamouchouane.(GeographyThe Ashuapmushuan basin is part of the Central Laurentians in the natural region of the Lake Manouane Depression. The river is enclosed in narrow valleys for a large part of its course, with powerful rapids and a dozen waterfalls, of which the most impressive are the Chaudire Falls.(TributariesThe major tributaries of the Ashuapmushuan are (in upstream order):* Rivire au Dor* Pmonca River* Cran River* Vermillion River** Grand Portage River* Rivire du Chef** Crochue River** Nestaocano River* Hilarion River* Lake Ashuapmushuan** Normandin River** Marquette RiverHistoryThe Ashuapmushuan River Basin is home to several archaeological sites that show that indigenous people occupied the area for thousands of years. European explorers and missionaries came in the 17th century. For instance, Albanel used the river for his voyage to Bay in 1672.((In 1685, French fur traders set up a trading post on the eastern shore of Lake Ashuapmushuan that remained almost continuously in operation until the middle of the 19th century. It successively came under control of the Traite de Tadoussac (French period), Kings Posts (English period), the West Company (1802), and the Bay Company (1821). During this period, the river became a major link in the fur trade route from Tadoussac to Hudson Bay since its source is just east of Mistassini on the River. The vestiges of the post are considered some of the most valuable and best preserved relics from the era.((After the fur trade, the Ashuapmushuan River was used by logging companies to drive logs downstream.(FaunaThe Ashuapmushuan River and its tributaries provide spawning grounds and habitats for landlocked salmon (Salmo salar ouananiche). Newly hatched salmon remain in the river for 2 to 4 years before migrating to Lake Saint-Jean where it remains for most of its adult life. Then, at age 4 to 8, it will return to the river to spawn. While the Ashuapmushuan River has significantly contributed to salmon production for the lake, the salmon population has seen a sharp decline in the 1990s. Despite conservation measures, its status remains of concern.(ReferencesAshuapmushuanAshuapmushuan
242683
The_Ozarks
220px|thumb|right|The Ozarks, Ouachitas, Black Hills, and Sawtooths.lick view-26aug06.jpg|thumb|220px|The Saint Francois Mountains, viewed here from Knob Lick Mountain, are the exposed geologic core of the Ozarks. The Ozarks (also referred to as Ozarks Mountain Country, the Ozark Mountains, and the Ozark Plateau) are a physiographic and geologic highland region of the central States. It covers much of the southern half of Missouri and an extensive portion of northwestern and north central Arkansas. The region also extends westward into northeastern Oklahoma and extreme southeastern Kansas. The wooded hills of southwest Illinois, though commonly called the Ozarks, are generally not considered part of the true Ozarks.Although  referred to as the Ozark Mountains, the region is actually a high and deeply plateau. Geologically, the area is a broad dome around the Francois Mountains. The Ozark Highlands area, covering nearly , is by far the most extensive mountainous region between the Appalachians and the Mountains. Together, the Ozarks and Mountains form an area known as the Interior Highlands, and are sometimes referred to collectively.  For example, the ecoregion called Mountain Forests includes the Ouachita Mountains, although the Arkansas River valley and the Ouachitas, both south of the Mountains, are not usually considered part of the Ozarks.EtymologyThe etymology of the name is a subject of speculation.Ozarks is a toponym believed to be derived as a linguistic corruption of the French abbreviation aux Arks (short for aux Arkansas, or of Arkansas in English)(Stewart, George R. (1967). Names on the Land: A Historical Account of Place-Naming in the United States, p. 137. Houghton Mifflin, Boston.) in the decades prior to the and Indian War, aux Arkansas originally referring to the post at Post, located in wooded Delta lowland area above the confluence of the White River with the River.(Randolph, Vance. The Ozarks: An American Survival of Primitive Society. New York: The Vanguard Press, p. 14. 1931.)(Arnold, Morris S. Unequal Laws Unto a Savage Race: European Legal Traditions in Arkansas, 1686-1836. University of Arkansas Press, Fayetteville. 1985.)(Arnold, Morris S. Colonial Arkansas 1686-1804: A Social and Cultural History. University of Arkansas Press, Fayetteville. 1991.) Arkansas seems to be the French version of what the Illinois tribe (further up the Mississippi) called the Quapaw, who lived in eastern Arkansas in the area of the trading post. Eventually, the term came to refer to all Ozark Plateau drainage into the Arkansas and Rivers.An alternative origin for the name Ozark involves the French term aux arc.  In the later 1600s and early 1700s, French cartographers mapped the Arkansas and Mississippi Rivers.  The large top most arc or bend in this part of the Arkansas River was referred to as the aux arc - the top or most northern arc in the whole of the lower Arkansas.  Travelers arriving by boat would disembark at this top bend of the river to explore the Ozarks; the town of Ozark, Arkansas is located on the north bank at this very location.Other possible derivations include aux arcs meaning of the arches(E. Joan Wilson Miller. The naming of the land in the Arkansas Ozarks: A study in culture processes. Abstract Annals of the Association of American Geographers, 59 (2), 240251. 1969.) in reference to the dozens of natural bridges formed by erosion and collapsed caves in the Ozark region. These include Clifty Hollow Natural Bridge (actually a series of arches) in Missouri,(Watkins, Conor. Ozarks geology: Clifty Creek Natural Area includes natural bridge, The Ozarks Chronicle, Rolla, Mo.) and Alum Cove in the  St. Francis National Forest. It is even suggested aux arcs is an abbreviation of aux arcs-en-ciel, French for toward the rainbows which are a common sight in the mountainous regions. After the Purchase, American travelers in the region referred to various features of the upland areas using the term Ozark, such as Ozark Mountains and Ozark forests. By the early 20th century, The Ozarks had become a generic term.()(McMillen, Margot Ford. A to Z Missouri: The Dictionary of Missouri Place Names, Columbia, Missouri: Pebble Publishing, 1996. ISBN 0-9646625-4-X)Geographic subdivisionsThe Ozarks consist of four primary physiographic sections: the Springfield Plateau, Salem Plateau, Francois Mountains, and Mountains. Topography is mostly gently rolling, except in the Boston Mountains, along the escarpments separating the Springfield and Salem Plateaus, and the Saint Francois Range where it is rugged. Karst features such as springs,(Jerry D. Vineyard and Gerald L. Feder. Springs of Missouri. Missouri Department of Natural Resources and U.S. Geological Survey. 1974 (revised 1982).) streams, sinkholes and caves are common in the limestones of the Springfield Plateau and abundant in the dolostone bedrock of the Salem Plateau and Boston Mountains.(Karst, Springs and Caves in Missouri, Missouri Department of Natural Resources) Missouri is known as The Cave State with over 6000 recorded caves; the majority of these caves are found in the Ozark counties.(() The Ozark Plateaus aquifer system affects groundwater movement in all areas except the igneous core of the St. Francois Mountains.(Ozark Aquifer Map, United States Geological Survey.)(Rafferty, Milton.The Ozarks as a Region: A Geographers Description, OzarksWatch, Vol. I, No. 4, Spring 1988.)(Project Tour - A quick visit to the Ozarks Stream Geomorphology Project, United States Geological Survey.)(Ground Water Atlas of the United States: Kansas, Missouri, and Nebraska. States Geological Survey) Geographic features include limestone and dolomite glades are rocky, desert-like area on hilltops. Kept open by periodic fires that limit growth of grasses and forbs in shallow soil, glades are home to collared lizards, tarantulas, scorpions, cacti and other species more typical of the desert southwest.(Spatial Interaction Webs in Ozark Glades. John Chase, Assistant Professor. Washington University in St. Louis.)(Ware, Stewart. Rock Outcrop Plant Communities (Glades) in the Ozarks: A Synthesis, Abstract. The Southwestern Naturalist, Vol. 47, No. 4 (Dec., 2002), pp. 585-597.) The Boston Mountains are the highest section of the Ozarks. Summits can reach elevations of just over 2,560 feet (780 m) with valleys 500 to 1,550 feet (472 m) deep (150 m to 450 m). Turner Ward Knob (TWK) is the highest named peak. Located in western Newton County, Arkansas, its elevation is 2,463 feet (751 m). Nearby, five unnamed peaks have elevations at or slightly above 2,560 feet (780 m).GeologyThe Saint Francois Mountain Range rises above the Ozark Plateau and is the geological core of the highland dome. The igneous and volcanic rocks of the Saint Francois Mountains are the exposed remains of a Proterozoic mountain range. The mountains are the exposed portion of an extensive terrane (the terrane in part) of granitic and rhyolitic rocks dating from 1485 to 1350 mya that stretches from Ohio to western Oklahoma.(Denison, Rodger E., et al., Geology and Geochemistry of the Precambrian Rocks in the Central Interior Region of the United States, Geological Survey Professional Paper 1241-C, 1984) The core of the range existed as an island in the Paleozoic seas. Reef complexes occur in the sedimentary layers surrounding this ancient island. These flanking reefs were points of concentration for later ore-bearing fluids which formed the rich lead-zinc ores that have been and continue to be mined in the area. The igneous and volcanic rocks extend at depth under the relatively thin veneer of Paleozoic sedimentary rocks and form the basal crust of the entire region.(A. G. Unklesbay, Jerry D. Vineyard. Missouri Geology  Three Billion Years of Volcanoes, Seas, Sediments, and Erosion, University of Missouri Press, 1992. ISBN 0-8262-0836-3)File:Taum Sauk precambrian-cambrian unconformity.jpg|thumb|right|Grey dolomite laid down c. 500 mya nonconformally overlies reddish rhyolite that formed close to 1500 mya in the St. Francois Mountains.A major unconformity in the region attests that the Ozarks was above sea level for several hundred million years from the time of the volcanism in the Precambrian until the mid-Cambrian with an erosionally produced relief of up to 1500 feet.( The seas encroached during the late Cambrian producing the LaMotte sandstone,  thick, followed by carbonate sedimentation. reefs formed around the granite and rhyolite islands in this Cambrian sea. This carbonate formation, the Bonneterre now mostly dolomite, is exposed around the St. Francis mountains, but extends in the subsurface throughout the Ozarks and reaches a thickness of .(  The Bonneterre is overlain by  of dolomite, often sandy, silty or cherty, forming the Elvins Group and the Potosi and Eminence Formations. Withdrawal of the seas resulted in another unconformity during the latest Cambrian and early Ordovician periods. Hydrothermal mineralizing fluids formed the rich lead ore deposits of the Belt during this time.( Sedimentation resumed in the Ordovician with the deposition of the Gunter sandstone, the Gasconade dolomite and the prominent Roubidoux sandstone and dolomite. The sandstone of the Roubidoux forms prominent bluffs along the streams eroding into the southern part of the Salem plateau. The Roubidoux and Gunter sandstones serve as significant aquifers when present in the subsurface. The source of the sands is considered to be the emerging Wisconsin Dome to the northeast.(  The Ozark region remained as a subsiding shallow carbonate shelf environment with a significant thickness of cherty dolomites as the Jefferson City, Cotter and Powell formations.(Portions of the Ozark Plateau, the Springfield plateau of southwest Missouri and northern Arkansas, are underlain by Mississippian cherty limestones locally referred to as Boone chert consisting  of limestone and chert layers. These are eroded and form steep hills, valleys and bluffs.  During the Pennsylvanian Period the Ozark Plateau was uplifted as a result of the orogeny. During the early Paleozoic a deep ocean basin existed in central and southern Arkansas. Then South America collided with North America creating the folded Mountains and uplifting the Ozark plateau to the north.Ecology and conservation St. Francis National Forest was created by proclamation of President Roosevelt in 1908. In 1939, Congress established Twain National Forest at nine sites in Missouri. In 1976, Congress established Wilderness, the first of 13 designated wilderness areas in the Ozarks. In 1986, Congress established the Ozark Plateau National Wildlife Refuge in northeast Oklahoma. Protected areas ensure the recovery of endangered and threatened species of animals and plants, including the big-eared bat, bat, eastern small-footed bat, southeastern bat, southeastern big-eared bat; darter, cavefish, Ozark cave crayfish, Bowmans cave amphipod, Ozark cave amphipod, bat cave isopod; and Ozark chinquapin. It is a habitat of migratory birds and contains geological, archeological, historical, and paleontological resources.Commercial farms and processing operations are known to raise levels of chemical and biological contaminants in Ozark streams, threatening water supplies, recreational use and endangered native species.()()()()()Lakes and streamsSpring Missouri 1-02Aug08.jpg|thumb|right|Big Spring, the largest freshwater spring in the Ozarks, discharges  of water per day into Current River.File:Current River MO 2009-06-15 n65 below Welch Spring crop2.jpg|thumb|right|Canoers on Current River in the National Scenic Riverways.Image:Big Sugar Creek.jpg|thumb|right|Sugar Creek in Southwest Missouri.The States Army Corps of Engineers lakes that were created by damming the White River beginning in 1911 with Taneycomo have provided a large tourist, boating and fishing economy along the Missouri-Arkansas border. Six lakes were created by dams in the White River basin from 1911 through 1960. White River lakes include Lake Sequoyah,(Boss, Stephen K., Heil-Chapdelaine, Vanessa M. Mapping Landscape Change: An Historic and Bathymetric Study of Lake Sequoyah, Washington County, Arkansas) a small recreational fishing lake east of Arkansas, formed in 1961; Sequoyah is the uppermost impoundment on the White River. Below Sequoyah (northeast of Fayetteville) is Beaver Lake, formed in 1960. The White River continues northeasterly into Rock Lake (1958) in Missouri, which feeds directly into Taneycomo, where the river zigzags southeasterly into Arkansas forming Shoals Lake along the Arkansas-Missouri line.  Completed in 1952, Bull Shoals is the furthest downstream lake on the White River proper. Lake Norfork formed by damming the North Fork River, a tributary of the White River, in 1941.The of the Ozarks, de Terre Lake and Lake in the northern Ozarks were formed by impounding the River and its tributary the Pomme de Terre River in 1931, 1961 and 1979 respectively. Grand Lake in northeast Oklahoma was created in 1940. Lake was formed by damming the River near the city of Missouri in 1969 and supplements the water supply of Springfield in nearby Greene County.  Most of the dams were built for the dual purpose of control and hydropower generation.The creation of the lakes significantly altered the Ozark landscape and impacted traditional Ozark culture through displacement.(Watkins, Conor. The Meramec Basin Project: A Look Back 25 Years Later. Ozark Mountain Experience. Article 69 & 70 Combined. 2006.)(Mountain Home (Baxter County): The Encyclopedia of Arkansas History & Culture.)(Campbell, Rex R. Campbell, Mary. Hughes, Colleen. A Revolution in the Heartland: Changes in Rural Culture, Family and Communities, 19002000. University of Missouri: Department of Rural Sociology. Columbia, Missouri. 2004.)( The streams provided water and power to communities, farms and mills concentrated in the valleys prior to impoundment.(E. Joan Wilson Miller. Abstract The Ozark Culture Region as Revealed by Traditional Materials. Annals of the Association of American Geographers, Volume 58 Issue 1, Pages 51-77. January 3, 1967.) Many farm roads, river fords and railways were lost when the lakes came, disrupting rural travel and commerce. County, Arkansas alone saw nearly four-hundred people displaced to make way for the reservoir created by Dam. The town of Missouri was relocated in its entirety to a spot two miles (3 km) from its previous location. Prior to damming, the White and Osage River basins were similar to the current conditions of the Buffalo, Elk, Niangua, Gasconade, Big Piney, Current, Jacks Fork, Eleven Point and Meramec rivers.(The National River was created by an Act of Congress in 1972 as the nations first National River administered by the Park Service. In Missouri, the National Scenic Riverways,(Ozark National Scenic Riverways) was established in 1964 along the Current and Fork River as the first US national park based on a river system.  The Point River is included in the National Wild and Scenic Riverways System established in 1968.  These river parks annually draw a combined 1.5 million recreational tourists to the least populated counties in Arkansas and Missouri.Missouri Ozark rivers include the Gasconade, Big Piney and the River in the north central region.  The River and its tributaries Huzzah and Courtois Creeks are found in the northeastern Ozarks.  The Black and St. Francis Rivers mark the eastern crescent of the Ozarks.  The James, Spring and North Fork Rivers are in south central Missouri.  Forming the West central border of the Ozarks from Missouri through Kansas and into Oklahoma are Spring River and its tributary Center Creek.  Grand Falls, Missouris largest natural waterfall, a chert outcropping, includes bluffs and glades on Shoal Creek south of Joplin.  All these river systems see heavy recreational use in season, including the Elk River in Southwest Missouri and its tributary Sugar Creek.Ozark rivers and streams are typically clear water, with baseflows sustained by many seeps and springs and flow through forests along limestone and dolomite bluffs.  Gravel bars are common along shallow banks, while deep holes are found along bluffs.(MS Panfil, RB Jacobson.  Hydraulic Modeling of In-channel Habitats in the Ozark Highlands of Missouri:  Assessment of Physical Habitat Sensitivity to Environmental Change.  USGS-Biological Resources Division.) Except during periods of heavy rain or snow melt  when water levels rise quite rapidly  their level of difficulty is suitable for most canoeing and tubing.Fish hatcheries are common due to the abundance of springs and waterways.( The National Fish Hatchery was built in 1888; it was the first Federal hatchery.  The Missouri Department of Conservation operates numerous warm and cold water hatcheries and trout parks;(http://mdc.mo.gov/areas/hatchery/ Missouri Fish Hatcheries and Trout Parks) private hatcheries such as Rockbridge(Rockbridge) are found throughout the region.Regional economyTraditional economic activityMill.jpg|thumb|right|Sly Mill, a grist and saw mill on Spring River in the Springfield Plateau, c. 1860.The Ozarks contain ore deposits of lead, zinc, iron and barite. Many of these deposits have been depleted by historic mining activities, but much remains and is currently being mined in the Lead Belt of southeast Missouri. Historically the lead belt around the Saint Francois Mountains and the district lead-zinc mining area around Missouri, have been very important sources of metals. Mining practices common in the early 20th century left significant undermining and heavy metal contamination in topsoil and groundwater in the Tri-state district.(Lasmanis, Raymond. Tri-State and Viburnum Trend Districts, Rocks & Minerals, 11/1/1997.)(GeoKansas: Lead and Zinc Mining, Geological Survey. Updated May 5, 2005.) Furthermore, active mining in south-central Missouri continues to hazard groundwater and streams.(The Element of Doom. High Plains Films. Doug Hawes-Davis, Director. 32 minutes, Color, 1993.)Much of the area supports beef cattle ranching, and dairy farming is common across the area. Dairy farms are usually cooperative affairs, with small farms selling to a corporate wholesaler who packages product under a common brand for retail sales. Petroleum exploration and extraction also takes place in the Oklahoma portion of the Ozarks, as well as in the east half of the Boston Mountains in Arkansas. Logging of both softwood and hardwood timber species on both private land and in the National Forests has long been an important economic activity.The majority of the Ozarks is forested; oak-hickory is the predominant type; Eastern Junipers are common, with stands of pine often seen in the southern range. Less than a quarter of the region has been cleared for pasture and cropland.(Primary Distinguishing Characteristics of Level III Ecoregions of the Continental United States, U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. Revised April 2000.) Forests that were heavily logged during the early to mid-20th century have recovered; much of the remaining timber in the Ozarks is second-growth forest. However, deforestation of frontier forest contributed through erosion to increased gravel bars along Ozark waterways in logged areas; stream channels have become wider and shallower and deepwater fish habitat has been lost.(The numerous rivers and streams of the region saw hundreds of water powered timber and grist mills.(Index to the old mills of Missouri. Hosted by rootsweb, this incomplete list includes almost 250 old mills in Missouri alone.)(Barry County, MO Mills (Rootsweb)) Mills were important centers of culture and commerce; dispersed widely throughout the region, mills served local needs, often thriving within a few miles of another facility. Few Ozark mills relied on inefficient wheels for power; most utilized a dam, millrace and turbine.(Suggs, George E., Jr. Water Mills of the Missouri Ozarks. of Oklahoma Press: Oklahoma. 1990)During the Deal, the Conservation Corps employed hundreds in the construction of nearly 400 fire lookouts throughout the Ozarks at 121 known sites in Arkansas and 257 in Missouri. Of those lookouts, about half remain, and many of them are in use by the Forest Service. A 2007 report by the National Trust for Historic Preservation deemed these fire lookouts and related structures as one of Americas 11 Most Endangered Historic Places.(National Trust Names Historic Structures in Missouris Mark Twain National Forest One of Americas 11 Most Endangered Historic Places. June 14, 2007.)Current economic activitiesTourism is the growth industry of the Ozarks as evidenced by the growth of the Missouri, entertainment center celebrating the traditional Ozark culture.(Area and Economic Overview: Southwest Missouri Overall Economic Development Program. Southwest Missouri Council of Governments White Paper.)(Snyder, Robert E. Shepherd of the Hills Country: Tourism Transforms the Ozarks, 1880s-1930s. The Journal of American Culture, Volume 27 Issue 1, Pages 117 - 119.) Poultry farming and food processing are significant industries throughout the region.  The Tyson Foods corporation and Foods each operates several hundred poultry farms and processing plants throughout the Ozarks.  Foods has operations throughout southern Missouri.  Stillwell foods has frozen vegetable and other food processing centers in eastern Oklahoma. The trucking industry is important to the regional economy with national carriers based there including B. Hunt, ABF and Inc.. Springfield remains an operational hub for Railway. Logging and timber industries are also significant in the Ozark economy with operations ranging from small family run sawmills to large commercial concerns. 500 companies such as Wal-Mart in Bentonville, Arkansas, & Platt and Auto Parts are based in the Ozarks.The area is also home to several wine regions including the Highlands AVA and Mountain AVAs.CultureOzark also refers to a region of people with a distinct culture, architecture,((Andy Ostmeyer. Original Ozarks: Evidence of settlement before 1830 hard to find. Joplin Globe. June 21, 2009. According to the National Register of Historic Places, the Rice-Upshaw House, ca.1826, is one of the two oldest remaining standing buildings in Arkansas, and a rare surviving example of a building from Arkansas territorial period; Wolf House, ca. 1825, overlooks the junction of the Norfork and White rivers; the Craighead-Henry House, ca. 1816, is one of the oldest known structures in the interior Missouri Ozarks.) and dialect shared by the people who live on the plateau. Early settlers in Missouri were pioneers who came West from the Southern Appalachians at the beginning of the 19th century,((Randolph, Vance. Ozark Magic and Folklore. 367 pages. Courier Dover Publications, 1964.) followed in the 1840s and 50s by Irish and German immigrants. Much of the Ozark population is of German, English and Scots-Irish descent, often including some Native American ancestry, and the Ozark families from which the regional culture derived( tend to have lived in the area since the 19th century.(Rafferty, Milton D. The Ozarks: Land and Life, University of Arkansas Press, 2nd ed., 2001. ISBN 1-55728-714-7)vesca close-up 3.jpg|thumb|left|Wild strawberriesFile:Persimmon 0375.jpg|thumb|left|Persimmon flowerEarly settlers relied on hunting, fishing, and trapping, as well as foraging to supplement their diets and incomes.( Today hunting and fishing for recreation are common activities and an important part of the tourist industry. Foraging for mushrooms (especially morels) and for ginseng is common and financially supported by established buyers in the area. Other forages include poke, watercress, persimmons and pawpaw; wild berries such as blackberry, raspberry, raspberry, Red Mulberry, Black Cherry, wild strawberry and dewberry; and wild nuts such as black walnut and even acorns.(Phillips, Jan. Wild Edibles of Missouri. Missouri Department of Conservation, 2nd edition (1998). Cover, Introduction, Acknowledgments and Preface; Chapters; Color Plates.) Edible native legumes, wild grasses and wildflowers are plentiful, and beekeeping is common.(The Naturalist. High Plains Films. Doug Hawes-Davis, Director. 32 minutes, Color/B&W, 2001.)Print and broadcast media have explored Ozark culture broadly. Books set in the Ozarks include the Red Fern Grows, the of the Hills( and As a Friend.(Gander, Forrest. As a Friend. York City: New Directions Publishing Corporation. 2008.) The 1999 film Ride with the Devil, based on the book Woe to Live On,(Woodrell, Daniel. Woe to Live On. Henry Holt, 1987.) depicts warfare in Southwest Missouri during the Civil War.(Ward L. Schrantz. Jasper County, Missouri in the Civil War. 1923.) Bone,(Woodrell, Daniel. Winters Bone. Little, Brown and Company, 2006) a novel by Woodrell (author of Woe to Live On) reflects on contemporary methamphetamine culture and its impact on families on the plateau. Released as a feature film in 2010, Bone received the Grand Jury Prize at the Film Festival, as well as other awards. Several early and influential country-music television and radio programs originated from Springfield in the 1950s and 1960s, including ABC-TVs Jubilee and The Wilson Show on KYTV. The Clampett clan of Beverly Hillbillies TV show provide a stereotypical depiction of Ozark people. Ozark musicians include Wagoner and old-time fiddler Bob Holt.(Henigan, Julie. Play Me Something Quick and Devilish: Bob Holt - Old-Time Square Dance Fiddler, Musical Traditions, Article MT021, June 1998.)Examples of commercial interpretations of traditional Ozark culture include the two major family theme parks in the region, Dollar City and the now defunct Dogpatch U.S.A.; and the resort entertainment complex in Branson. Ozark Folkways in Arkansas and Ozark Folk Center in View, Arkansas interpret regional culture through musical performance and exhibitions of pioneer skills and crafts.Traditional Ozark culture includes stories and tunes passed orally between generations through community music parties and other informal gatherings.(Aunt Shelle Stormoe. How to Spot a Genuine Ozark Hillbilly. October 23, 2008.) Many of these tunes and tales can be traced to having British origins(Smith, Vic. Review of Ozark Folksongs, Musical Traditions, January 2001.) and to folklore. Moreover, historian Randolph attributes the formation of much Ozark lore to individual families when backwoods parents begin by telling outrageous whoppers to their children and end by half believing the wildest of these tales themselves.( Randolph collected Ozark folklore and lyrics in volumes such as the national bestseller Pissing in the Snow and Other Ozark Folktales (University of Illinois Press, 1976), Ozark Folksongs (of Missouri Press, 1980), a four-volume anthology of regional songs and ballads collected in the 1920s and 30s,( and Ozark Magic and Folklore (Courier Dover Publications, 1964).( Evidenced by Randolphs extensive work, many Ozark anecdotes from the tradition are often bawdy, full of wild embellishments on everyday themes.(University of Illinois Press Catalog Entry on Pissing in the Snow and Other Ozark Folktales)(Florer, Faith L. Book Review. Pissing in the snow and other Ozark folktales. Whole Earth Review.  Summer, 1987. Because of their--ahem--subject matter, the tales contained in this volume could not be published with Randolphs four great collections of Ozark material published in the 1950s, and have till recently been circulating only in manuscript and on elusive microfilm.) In 1941-42, commissioned by Lomax of the of Folk Culture, Randolph returned to the Ozarks with a portable recording machine from the Library of Congress and captured over 800 songs, ballads and instrumentals.(Rounder Records Catalog Entry.) Selected from among these several hundred recordings, 35 tracks were released on Various Artists: Ozark Folksongs (Rounder Records) in 2001.( Square dances were an important social avenue throughout the Ozarks into the 20th century.(Karen Mulrenin, Rita Saeger and Terry Brandt. Old-Time Ozark Square Dancing. Bittersweet, Volume II, No. 1, Fall 1974.)(Foreman, Diana. Fiddlin Around. Bittersweet, Volume V, No. 2, Winter 1977.)(Edited and photography by Allen Gage. Old-Time Fiddling: A Traditional Folk Art With Four Ozark Musicians, Bittersweet, Volume IX, No. 3, Spring 1982.)  Square dances sprang up wherever people concentrated around mills and timber camps, springs, fords, and in towns small and large. Geographically isolated communities saw their own local dance tunes and variations develop.(( Of all the traditional musicians in the Ozarks, the fiddler holds a distinct place in both the community and folklore.(( Community fiddlers revered for carrying local tunes; regionally, traveling fiddlers brought new tunes and entertainment, even while many viewed their arrival as a threat to morality.(((( In 2007, Gordon McCann, a chronicler of Ozarks folklife and fiddle music for over four decades, donated a collection of audio recordings, fieldnotes and photographs to State University in Springfield.( Gordon McCann pledges collection to Missouri State University: Four decades of material will be housed in Meyer Library. Missouri State University Press Release. September 26, 2007.) The collection includes more than 3,000 hours of fiddle music and interviews recorded at jam sessions, music parties, concerts and dances in the Ozarks. Selected audio recordings along with biographical sketches, photographs and tune histories were published in the 2008 book/CD set Ozarks Fiddle Music: 308 Tunes Featuring 30 Legendary Fiddlers,(Beisswenger, Drew. McCann, Gordon. Ozarks Fiddle Music: 308 Tunes Featuring 30 Legendary Fiddlers. Book/CD Set. Mel Bay Publications, Inc. 2008.) with selections from 50 other Ozark fiddlers.From 1973 to 1983, the Bittersweet project, which began as an English class at Missouri High School, collected 476 taped and transcribed interviews, published 482 stories and took over 50,000 photographs documenting traditional Ozark culture.(Bittersweet)Population influx since the 1950s,(( coupled with geographically lying in both the Midwest and South, proximity to the embayment, the Osage and Plains, contributes to changing cultural values in the Ozarks. Theme parks and theatres seen to reflect regional values have little in common with traditional Ozark culture. Community tradition bearers remain active, in decreasing numbers, far afield of commercial offers.(Jam Sessions in Southwest Missouri. Missouri State University Libraries.)(Bob Holt: Fiddler from the Missouri Ozarks. Local Legacies project of the Library of Congress.)ReligionOzark religion, like that of Appalachia, was predominantly Baptist and Methodist during periods of early settlement; it tends to the conservative or individualistic, with Anglicans, of God, Baptists including Southern Baptists, of Christ and other Protestant Pentecostal denominations present, as well as Catholics.()() Religious organizations headquartered in the Ozarks include the of God and the Bible Fellowship International in Springfield, and the Church of God in Joplin. The 1960s and 1970s saw back-to-the-land farms and communes established in rural counties.See also;National Forests of the Ozarks* Twain National Forest*  St. Francis National Forest;Ozark National Rivers and Wild Scenic Riverways* National River* National Scenic Riverways* Point National Wild and Scenic River;Hiking Trail Systems of the Ozarks* Ozark Trail* Highlands Trail::* Mountain Wilderness::* National River Wilderness::* Backbone Wilderness::* Fork Wilderness::* Wilderness::* Creek Wilderness::* Wilderness::* Wilderness::* Creek Wilderness::* Creek Wilderness::* Creek Wilderness::* Mountain Wilderness::* Buffalo Wilderness::* Arkansas Scenic 7 Byway::* Ozark Highlands Scenic Byway::* Pig Trail Scenic Byway::* Sylamore Scenic Byway::* Blue Buck Knob Scenic Byway::* Glade Top Trail::* Sugar Top Scenic Byway* States physiographic regions* List of U.S. multistate regions* Ozark Forest Ecosystem Project* The Old Ozark Auto Trail* Country* Hills* Underground* USS Ozark (1863)* USS Ozark (BM-7)* USS Ozark (LSV-2)ReferencesExternal links*Ozark Mountain Forests Ecoregion*Ozark National Scenic Riverways*Ozark Plateau National Wildlife Refuge*Underground Ozarks*Ozark Mountains, Encyclopedia of Arkansas History & Culture, The Central Arkansas Library System.*The Intimate Wild: Ozark Highlands Trail, National Geographic, 10/2008.*Closest to Everlastin: Ozark Agricultural Biodiversity and Subsistence Traditions, 9/2010.Ozarksde:Ozark-Plateaude OzarkOzarksdOzarkja:no:Ozark(wyyna)Ozarkru:Ozarkssv:Ozarkplatn
245286
Kutn_Hora
Kutn Hora (; medieval Czech: Hory Kutn; ) is a city in Bohemia, now the Republic in the Bohemian Region. HistoryThe town began in 1142 with the settlement of the first Cistercian Monastery in Bohemia, Kloster Sedlitz, brought from the Imperial immediate Cistercian Abbey. By 1260 German miners began to mine for silver in the mountain region, which they named Kuttenberg, and which was part of the monastery property. The name of the mountain is said to have derived from the monks cowls (the Kutten) or from the word mining (kutn in old Czech). Under Abbot Heidenreich the territory greatly advanced due to the silver mines which gained importance during the economic boom of the 13th century. The earliest traces of silver have been found dating back to the 10th century, when Bohemia already had been in the crossroads of long-distance trade for many centuries. Silver dinars have been discovered belonging to the period between 982-995 in the settlement of Maln, which is now a part of Kutn Hora.From the 13th to 16th centuries the city competed with Prague economically, culturally and politically.() Since 1995 the city center has been a UNESCO Heritage Site.() In 1300 when King II of Bohemia issued the new royal mining code regale montanorum. This was a legal document that specified all administrative as well as technical terms and conditions necessary for the operation of mines.() The city developed with great rapidity, and at the outbreak of the Wars in 1419 was next to Prague the most important in Bohemia, having become the favourite residence of several Bohemian kings. It was here that, on January 18, 1409, Wenceslaus IV signed the famous of Kutn Hora, by which the Czech university nation was given three votes in the elections to the faculty of Prague University as against one for the three other nations.In 1420 Emperor Sigismund made the city the base for his unsuccessful attack on the Taborites during the Hussite Wars; Kuttenberg (Kutn Hora) was taken by ika, and after a temporary reconciliation of the warring parties was burned by the imperial troops in 1422, to prevent its falling again into the hands of the Taborites. ika nonetheless took the place, and under Bohemian auspices it awoke to a new period of prosperity.Along with the rest of Bohemia, Kuttenberg (Kutn Hora) passed to the Monarchy of Austria in 1526. In 1546 the richest mine was hopelessly flooded; in the insurrection of Bohemia against Ferdinand I the city lost all its privileges; repeated visitations of the plague and the horrors of the Years War completed its ruin. Half-hearted attempts after the peace to repair the ruined mines failed; the town became impoverished, and in 1770 was devastated by fire. The mines were abandoned at the end of the 18th century.At Kuttenberg (Kutna Hora) groschen were minted until 1547.Kuttenberg became part of the Empire in 1806 and the Austro-Hungarian Empire in 1866. The city became part of Czechoslovakia after War I and the collapse of Austria-Hungary. Kutn Hora was incorporated into the of Bohemia and Moravia by Germany from 1939-1945, but was restored to Czechoslovakia after War II. The city became part of the Czech Republic in 1993 during the of Czechoslovakia.ArchitectureKutn Hora and the neighboring town of Sedlec are a World Heritage Site.  Among the most important buildings in the area are the Gothic, five-naved St. Barbaras Church, begun in 1388, and the Italian Court, formerly a royal residence and mint, which was built at the end of the 13th century.  The Gothic Stone Haus, which since 1902 has served as a museum, contains one of the richest archives in the country. The Gothic St. Jamess Church, with its 86 metre tower, is another prominent building.  Sedlec is the site of the Gothic Cathedral of Our Lady and the famous Ossuary.Main sights*Cathedral of Our Lady (Chrm Nanebevzet Pany Marie) *St. Barbaras Church (Kostel Svat Barbory)*Ossuary (Kostnice Sedlec)*Church of St. James (Kostel sv. Jakuba)*Church of St. John Nepomuk (Kostel sv. Jana Nepomuckho)*Church of Ursuline Convent (Kostel Kltera Vorilek)*Jesuit College (Jezuitsk kolej)*Court (Vlask dvr)*Marian column (Morov sloup) Gallery File:KUTNA HORA (js) 11.jpg|Barbara ChurchFile:St.Barb.jpg|Barbara ChurchFile:Stained glass - Kutna Hora.jpg|Stained glass in the Church of St. BarbaraFile:Sedlec-Ossuary.jpg|Chandelier made out of human bones inside OssuaryFile:Kostel Archandla Michaela-Sobn.JPG|Saint Michaels church in SobnFile:Sedlec Ossuary - Kutn Hora.jpg |Bones inside OssuaryFile: Kutna Hora bd memorial.JPG|Death memorialInternational relationsTwin towns  Sister citiesKutn Hora is twinned with:*  Bamenda, Cameroon*  Eger, Hungary*  Fidenza, Italy*  Podolsky, Ukraine*  Kremnica, Slovakia*  Pushkin, Russia*  Reims, France*  Ringsted, Denmark*  Stamford, Kingdom*  Gry, PolandSee also* Park ehuice  natural reserve with deer, located 15 km to the eastReferencesExternal links* Municipal website* HoraHoraHoraHoraHoraHorako:HoraHoraHoraka:-kk:-HoraHoraHoraja:HoraHoraHoraHoraHoraru:-HoraHoraHoraHoraHoraHoraHorazh:
246816
Blue-collar_worker
A blue-collar worker is a member of the class who typically performs manual labor and earns an hourly wage. Blue-collar workers are distinguished from those in the sector and from workers, whose jobs are not considered manual labor.Blue-collar work may be skilled or unskilled, and may involve manufacturing, mining, building and construction trades, mechanical work, maintenance, repair and operations maintenance or technical installations. The white-collar worker, by contrast, performs non-manual labor often in an office; and the service industry worker performs labor involving customer interaction, entertainment, retail and outside sales, and the like.Origin of the termleft|thumb|U.S. Navy sailors load a cargo container onto a container ship.Industrial and manual workers wear durable clothing that can be dirty, soiled, or scrapped at work. A popular element of such clothes has been, and still is, a light or navy blue work shirt. Blue is also a popular color for coveralls, and will frequently include a name tag of the company/establishment on one side, and the individuals name on the other. Often these items are bought by the company and laundered by the establishment as well.The popularity of the color blue among manual laborers is in contrast to the white dress shirt that is standard attire  in office environments. Color-coding has been used to identify a difference in socio-economic class. This distinction is becoming more blurred, however, with the increasing importance of labor, and the growth of non-laboring, yet low-paying, sector jobs. Blue-collar may also be used as an adjective to describe the environment of the blue-collar worker: a blue-collar neighborhood, job, restaurant, bar; or any situation describing the use of manual effort and the strength required to do so.()Education requirementsA distinctive element of work is the lesser requirement for formal academic education which is needed to succeed in other types of work, with many blue-collar jobs requiring only a school diploma or (in the USA and Canada) GED.() Blue-collar work typically is hourly wage-labor. Usually, the pay for such occupation is lower than that of the white-collar worker, although higher than many entry-level service occupations. Especially skilled blue-collar jobs may pay very well compared to white collar jobs. Sometimes the work conditions can be strenuous or hazardous, also known as the three Ds: Dirty, Demanding, and Dangerous. Blue collar jobs may be represented by unions or regulated by state and/or federal statutes.Shift of blue-collar jobs from industrialized countries to developing regionsWith the move Western nations towards a basis of economy, the number of blue-collar jobs has steadily decreased. Another main cause for the decrease in blue-collar jobs in the West is due to the revolution. Perhaps the biggest cause is that many low-skill manufacturing jobs have been outsourced to developing nations with lower wages. Outsourcing of manufacturing jobs is resulting in a growing class of blue-collar workers in developing nations, changing these regions from an agrarian to an industrial job base.Economic consequence in the United StatesThe job base in several regions of the United States, especially in the Midwest and in New York and Pennsylvania, was predominantly in the manual labor and manufacturing sectors until de-industrialization began in the 1960s. Cities like Ohio; Michigan; New York; Falls, New York and Louis, Missouri, have fallen on hard times, with many blue-collar workers out of a job, and populations slowly decreasing each year. These cities, which formerly boomed with industry, have high unemployment rates and issues with poverty and urban blight. However, many of these cities have begun revitalizing their downtowns, and have become cities of professional business.See also* blue collar workersReferencesay:Irnaqirica:Treballadorde:Arbeitereo:Laboristoes:Trabajadorfr:Ouvriergl:Traballadorhr:Radnikit:Operaionl:Arbeiderja:no:Blsnipparbeiderkonierzykisv:Arbetare zh:
248718
st_nad_Labem
st nad Labem (; ) is a city of the Republic, in the nad Labem Region. The city is the 7th-most populous in the country.st is situated in a mountainous district at the confluence of the Blina and the Elbe (Labe) Rivers, and, besides being an active port, is an important railway junction. It is the birthplace of the painter Raphael Mengs. History st nad Labem was mentioned as a trading centre as early as 993. The city was founded by King Otakar II of Bohemia in the latter part of the 13th century, who called German settlers into the country and granted them German city law. In 1423 it was pledged by Emperor Sigismund to Elector Frederick I of Meien, who occupied it with a Saxon garrison. In 1426 it was besieged by the Hussites, who on June 16, 1426, though only 25,000 strong, defeated with great slaughter a German army of 70,000 which had been sent to its relief; the town was stormed and sacked the next day. After lying waste for three years, it was rebuilt in 1429. It suffered much during the Years War and Years War.Not far from st is the village of Chlumec, where, on August 29-August 30, 1813, a battle took place between the French Empire under Vandamme and an allied army of Austrians, Prussians, and Russians. The French were defeated and Vandamme surrendered with his army of 10,000 men.During the 19th century the city became heavily industrialized and due to the large-scale immigration the number of inhabitants grew from 2,000 to over 40,000 making st one of the biggest cities in Bohemia. Mining, chemical industry and river transport were its most important assets. The local river port became the busiest one in the whole Austro-Hungarian Empire surpassing the seaport in Trieste. Nowadays it is the industrial city with chemical establishments, metallurgy manufacture, machinetool industries, textiles and nutriment industry.st was a center of early German National Socialism. On November 15, 1903, the Deutsche Arbeiterpartei in sterreich (German Workers Party in Austria) was formed; it would become the basis for the German National Socialist Party and National Socialism. Much of their literature and books were printed in st.From April 17 to April 19, 1945 the city was bombed by the Allied Forces and over 500 people lost their lives. On July 31, 1945, the Massacre against German civilians occurred. In 1945 and 1946, over 53,000 Germans were expelled from the area. Emigrants from the Union, Slovakia, and Romania settled in the city, among them many Roma and Sinti. During the 1970s-1980s large numbers of panelks were constructed in st. After the fall of communism in Czechoslovakia in the Revolution of 1989, the citys heavy industry suffered economic troubles.The castle is located in a southern suburb of the city. st is a center for tourism owing to the romantic landscape of the Highlands (esk stedoho) and the vcarsko national park. Transportation Road TransportationThe city is connected to the international highway E 442(Liberec, Dn, st, Dresden) and first class highways (I/8, I/30, I/13).The city is directly connected to the express highway D8 (Berlin  Prague) that intersects the western border of the city.  Some sections of the highway are already in operation, with the completion of the entire highway in Czech territory currently planned for 2016.City Mass TransportationThe city has a network of mass transportation that includes bus and bus lines.Railway TransportationUsti nad Labem is an important railway node with four railway stations that is intersected by international lines Berlin-Vienna and Berlin-Budapest-Beograd-Sofia (Baltic-Orient).  The backbone international line is the national railway line No. 090  I. transit railway corridor State frontier Decin  Usti nad Labem  Prague  Breclav  state frontier which is part of the IV. Trans-European Multimodal Corridor. The re-construction on the way and the modernization of the line to meet the parameters of increased line speed will add quality to personal and commercial transportation. On the line section that intersects the city center interregional railway transpor-tation, suburban transportation and the backbone city mass transportation will come together.  The Eurocity (EC) and Intercity (IC) trains connected to the European railway network stop regularly in Usti nad Labem Central Station.River TransportationThe Elbe River Line is a junction with the West-European river lines opening access to Germany, Benelux countries, northern France and to important sea ports.  The River Line is a part of the IV. Trans-European Multimodal Corridor.  Freight transportation and pleasure cruises are run on the water line section Pardubice  Chvaletice  Usti nad Labem  Hrensko  Hamburg.Air TransportationCurrently, an airport for small sports planes is under construction. The nearest airport for airliners is in Prague (92 km) or Dresden, Germany (75 km).Matin Street WallThe city gained notoriety in the late 1990s when a 150 m long wall was constructed along part of the Matin Street separating family houses on one side from the tenement houses on the other. Since the latter were homes mainly to Roma, it turned into an international racist scandal. Mayor Ladislav Hruka promised local homeowners representatives that the wall would be finished by the end of September, 1998. Foreign press arrived in st to investigate, and were told by aldermen that the wall was not meant to segregate by race, but to keep respectable citizens safe from noise and rubbish coming from the opposite side of the street.(Usti nad Labem / Maticni Street romove.radio.cz, 26-02-2000)In September, city representatives announced that plans would be changed from a four meter soundproof wall to a 1.8 meter wall of ceramic bricks, and a childrens playground would also be constructed in front of the tenement houses. Despite these changes, the Civic Initiative and Deputy Prime Minister pidla vocally opposed the construction.(Hiding Gypsies behind a wall, BBC,  February 26, 1999) The wall was criticized by Congressman Christopher Smith, and a delegation from the of Europe described it as a racist and drastic solution.(The new plans slated construction to begin August 30, 1999, but a decision by the district council delayed the move because a wall that large would require a permit, and threatened to damage the root systems of trees along Matini Street. On October 5, however, construction began regardless of the opposition by foreign observers and members of the Czech government. The following day, 50 Roma physically blockaded construction of the wall and dismantled parts that had already been set up.( Nonetheless, the wall was completed on October 13. Domestic and international pressure eventually convinced the city to dismantle the wall, and it was destroyed six weeks after it was erected.Officials in Preov, Slovakia considered building a similar wall in 2005. http://www.euro-reporters.com/index.php?optioncom_content&taskview&id150&Itemid0Mariansky BridgeMariansky Bridge was opened in 1998. The bridge was built over a period of five years. The city has invested over CZK 750 million ($37,500,000) to build it. The bridge won an award of the European Association of Steel Structures - ECCS (European Convention for constructional Steelwork) European Steel Design Awards. International Association for Bridges and Civil Engineering ranked Mariansky Bridge between the 10 best structures of the world for the last decade.thumb|none|Mariansky Bridge.Famous Natives and Residents* Raphael Mengs, painter.* Ullmann, composer, conductor and pianist.* Edelmann, illustrator and designer.* Pral, prozaic.* Vopnka, mathematician.* Hejduk, hockey player for Avalanche.* Neuvirth, hockey player for Capitals.* Jarok, ex Chelsea FC and Celtic FC player, currently of Zaragoza.International relationsTwin towns  Sister citiesst is twinned with:*  Halton, Kingdom*  Chemnitz, Germany*  Vladimir, Russia Footnotes References* External links*Municipal website*Architecture in st nad Labemnad Labem nad Labemnad Labemnad Labemnad Labemnad Labem nad Labemnad Labemnad Labemnad Labemna Labinad Labemnad Labemnad Labemkk:--prie Labsnad Labem nad Labemja:nad Labemnad Labemnad abnad Labemnad Labemru:--nad Labem nad Labemnad Labemtg:--uk:--nad Labemnad Labemzh:
249827
Witten
Witten is a university city in Rhine-Westphalia, Germany. It is the home of the University, the first private university in Germany.GeographyWitten is situated in the Ruhr valley, in the southern area.Bordering municipalities* Bochum* Dortmund* Herdecke* (Ruhr)* Sprockhoevel* HattingenDivision of the townWitten is divided into 8 boroughs and every of these boroughs is divided into city-districts. Every district has it own district-number:* Witten-Mitte: 11 Innenstadt, 12 Oberdorf-Helenenberg, 13 Industriegebiet-West, 14 Krone, 15 Crengeldanz, 16 Hauptfriedhof, 17 Stadion, 18 Industriegebiet-Nord, 19 Hohenstein* Dueren: 21 Dueren-Nord, 22 Dueren-Sued* Stockum: 31 Stockum-Mitte, 32 Dorney, 33 Stockumer Bruch, 34 Wilhelmshoehe* Annen: 41 Tiefendorf, 42 Wullen, 43 Annen-Mitte-Nord, 44 Annen-Mitte-Sued, 45 Kohlensiepen, 46 Wartenberg, 47 Gedern* Ruedinghausen: 51 Industriegebiet-Ost, 52 Ruedinghausen-Mitte, 53 Buchholz, 54 Schnee* Bommern: 61 Steinhausen, 62 Bommerbank, 63 Bommerfeld, 64 Wettberg, 65 Buschey, 66 Bommeregge* Heven: 71 Papenholz, 72 Hellweg, 73 Wannen, 74 Heven-Dorf, 75 Lake* Herbede: 81 Herbede-Ort, 82 Vormholz, 83 Bommerholz-Muttental, 84 Durchholz, 85 Buchholz-KaempenReligionsRoman CatholicWhen Witten was first mentioned in historical documents, it was part of the of Cologne. Since 1821 it has been a part of the of Paderborn; however, the borough of Herbede belongs to the of Essen. In the 19th century the Ruhr area drew up to 500,000 Poles from Prussia and Silesia, most of whom were Catholic. Hundreds settled in Witten, leading to a growth in the Catholic community. Today, between 30 and 40 per cent of the population is Catholic.ProtestantIn the 16th century Witten was influenced by Luthers Reformation, and until the late 19th century, Witten was a predominantly Protestant town with just a few Catholic inhabitants. Between 30 and 40 percent of the population is Protestant today.MuslimsThere are four mosques in Witten, Annen and Herbede today, founded by immigrants from Turkey who arrived in the 1970s and 1980s. Between five and eight percent of the population is Muslim.JewsIn 1815 the first Jewish community was mentioned in Witten. In 1938 the synagogue was destroyed during the so-called Reichspogromnacht (also known as Kristallnacht) of 910 November 1938. Today, only about a dozen Jews live in Witten. They belong to the Jewish community in Bochum.Since 1985 the place of the former synagogue is shown by a memorial for the victims of the holocaust.Population 1739 - 2005{|| valigntop || valign  top || valign  top ||}HistoryWitten was first mentioned in historic sources in 1214, however the borough Herbede (which was incorporated into the city in 1975) dates back to 851. The city was a mining town from 1578. In 1946, it was included in Westphalia on its establishment. In 1975 Witten was included in the administrative district Ennepe-Ruhr-Kreis and it is now its biggest city. 1975 was also the year Witten was first counted to have more than 100,000 inhabitants, the threshold to be considered a large city (Grostadt) in Germany.Roburit ExplosionIn the late 19th century Witten was known for the Roburit dynamite. This dynamite was once used by coal mines around the world. In 1906 an explosion occurred, resulting in the deaths of 41 people.PoliticsThe Council of Witten64 councillors form the council of Witten. In the local elections of 2004 the German Labour Party, SPD, gained 24 councillors in the borough and form the largest party represented on the council, followed by the Christian Democratic Party, CDU with 18 and the Greens with 7. They are followed by the WBG (a conservative list) with 4, FDP 4, FLW (also a conservative list) 3, NPD 2, PDS/WAL (socialists) 1 and AUF Witten (a left wing list) also 1.Since 2004 for the first time in its history the council is led by a female mayor: Sonja Leidemann, SPD.Members of ParliamentLandtag* 2005 - today: Stotko, MdL (SPD)German Bundestag*1998 - today: Dr. Ralf Brauksiepe, MdB (CDU)*1998 - today: Humme, MdB (SPD)*2005 - today: Schewe-Gerigk, (B 90/Die Grnen)*2005 - today: Schily, (FDP)TransportWitten is connected to the Autobahn network by the A 43 and A 44 motorways. It has a central station, connecting the city to the regional-train-network of Bahn.Local service is carried out by the BOGESTRA, a joint venture between the cities of Bochum and Gelsenkirchen, to which most of the bus lines in Witten belong. There is a tram line connecting to Bochum. Public transport in the city is carried out according to the fare system of the VRR transport association.Coat of armsThe coat of arms of Witten with its two lions once belong to the Everhards von Witten-Steinhausen and was first mentioned in 1283. The family of Witten-Steinhausen belongs to the founders of the town of Witten. Their slogan was: Sigillum Hermanni de Wittene. Because of its long history this Coat of arms was the only one in the Ruhr area, that was not forbidden by the Allies in May 1945, after the End of the World War.Culture* Hebezeug-Museum - A museum dedicated to cranes and hoist founded by D. Neuhaus and is located on the der Industriekultur.* Tage fr neue Kammermusik, festival for contemporary chamber music, held annually at the end of AprilTwin towns - sister citiesWitten is twinned with:()*  Beauvais, France, since 1975(*  Borough of Barking and Dagenham, Kingdom, since 1979(*  Mallnitz, Carinthia, Austria, since 1979(*  Lev HaSharon district, Israel, since 1979(*  Wolfen, Germany, since 1990(*  Kursk, Russia, since 1990(*  Tczew, Poland, since 1990(*  San Carlos, Nicaragua (since 1990, friendship contract)References;Notesaf:Wittenar:bg:ca:Wittenda:Wittende:Wittenet:Wittenes:Witteneo:Wittenfa:fr:Wittenko:it:Wittenkk:sw:Wittenlt:Vitenas(Duitsland)ja:frr:Wittenno:Wittennn:Wittenpnb:nds:Wittenpl:Wittenpt:Wittenro:Wittenru:simple:Wittensr:fi:Wittensv:Wittenvo:Wittenwar:Wittenzh:
250839
Thomas_Chandler_Haliburton
thumb|Thomas Chandler HaliburtonThomas Chandler Haliburton (December 17, 1796 &ndash; August 27, 1865) was the first international best-selling author from Canada. He was also significant in the of Nova Scotia.LifeHaliburton was born in Nova Scotia, the son of Hersey Otis Haliburton,  a lawyer, judge and political figure, and Lucy Chandler Grant.  His mother died when he was a small child, and his father remarried when he was seven, giving him as stepmother Susanna Davis, the daughter of Francklin, who had been Scotias Governor.(Dictionary of Canadian Biography Online) He attended of Kings College in Windsor and became a lawyer, opening a practice in Annapolis Royal, the former capital of the colony. Haliburton became a noted local businessman and a judge, but his great fame came from his writing. He wrote a number of books on history, politics, and farm improvement.  He rose to international fame with his Clockmaker serial, which first appeared in the Novascotian and was later published in book form throughout the Empire. The books recounted the humorous adventures of the character Slick and became extremely popular light reading.From 1826 to 1829, Haliburton represented County in the Scotia House of Assembly.Haliburton retired from law and moved to England in 1856. In that same year he married Sarah Harriet Owen Williams. In 1859, Haliburton was elected the of Parliament for Launceston, Cornwall as a member of the Tory minority; he did not stand for re-election in 1865. Haliburton received an degree from Oxford for service to literature and continued writing until his death on 27 August 1865, at his home in Isleworth, near London.FamilyFile:Mrs Louisa Haliburton wife of Thomas Chandler Haliburton.jpg|thumb|Mrs Louisa Haliburton (nee Neville) first wife of Chandler HaliburtonFile:Amelia Gilpin by William Notman.jpg|thumb|Mrs. Amelia Gilpin by NotmanWhile in England, Thomas Chandler Haliburton met Louisa Neville, daughter of Captain Laurence Neville, of the Eighth Dragoons, whom he married in 1816 and brought back to Scotia. Her story before marriage is related in the Haliburton Chaplet, edited by their son, Robert Grant Haliburton (Toronto: 1899). The couple had two sons and five daughters: *Susannah Lucy Anne, later Weldon, 1817-1899, ceramic collector(Dictionary of Canadian Biography Online)*Mrs. A. F. Haliburton*Mrs. Bainbridge Smith*Amelia (Jul 25, 1829-Jan 14, 1902), landscape artist, married the Rev. Edwin Gilpin, Dean of Nova Scotia, in 1849; the couple had four sons and one daughter,(Morgan,  Henry James Types of Canadian women and of women who are or have been connected with Canada : (Toronto, 1903) http://www.archive.org/details/typesofcanadianw01morguoft) including Edwin Gilpin (1850-1907), a mining engineer and author(Dictionary of Canadian Biography Online)*Robert Grant Haliburton, Q.C., D.C.L., 1831-1901, lawyer, author, and anthropologist(Dictionary of Canadian Biography Online)*Arthur (18321907), later 1st Baron Haliburton, G.C.B., civil servant*Laura Charlotte, artist, married William Cunard, son of the shipping magnate Sir Cunard at Windsor, Nova Scotia, 30 December 1851; three sons, one daughter. Exhibited her pictures at the Academy, the of British Artists, and at other institutions in London. Louisa died in 1840, and was buried at Windsor. Haliburton married a second time in 1856, to Sarah Harriet Owen Williams, and died in England. (Morgan,  Henry James Types of Canadian women and of women who are or have been connected with Canada : (Toronto, 1903) http://www.archive.org/details/typesofcanadianw01morguoft)LegacyCounty, Ontario, is named after Haliburton in recognition of his work as the first chair of the Land and Emigration Company.In 1884, faculty and students at his alma mater founded a society in honour of the Colleges most celebrated of letters. The Haliburton Club, still active at College, Halifax, is now the longest-standing collegial literary society in the of Nations or America.His comment of him remembering playing hurley on the ice is the first known reference to hockey in Canada and is the basis of Windsors claim to being the town that fathered hockey.A memorial to Thomas and his first wife was erected in 1902 in Christ Church, Windsor, by four of their children: Laura Cunard, Lord Haliburton, and two surviving sisters.Works*A General Description of Nova Scotia - 1823*An Historical and Statistical Account of Nova Scotia - 1829*The Clockmaker - 1836*The Clockmaker, 2nd Series - 1838*The Bubbles of Canada - 1839*A Reply to the Report of the Earl of Durham - 1839*The Clockmaker, 3rd Series - 1840*The Old Judge, Or Life in a Colony - 1849*The English in America - 1851*Rule and Misrule in English America - 1851*Sam Slicks Wise Saws and Modern Instances - 1853*Nature and Human Nature - 1855 External links * *Biography at the Dictionary of Canadian Biography Online* *Photos of 1937 plaque by Historic Sites and Monuments Board* The Haliburton Club*Haliburton House Museum Museum dedicated to the life, writings and time period of T. C. Haliburton. Part of the Nova Scotia Museum.ReferenceChandler HaliburtonChandler HaliburtonHaliburtonChandler Haliburton
252282
Maurice_Andr
Maurice Andr (born May 21, 1933) is a French trumpeter, active in the classical music field.BiographyHe is a classical virtuoso trumpeter, born in Als, France in the Cvennes into a mining family. His father was an amateur musician.He studied trumpet with a friend of his fathers, who suggested that he be sent to the conservatory. In order to gain free admission to the conservatory, he joined a band. After only six months at the conservatory, he won his first prize.At the conservatory, Maurices professor beat him out of frustration and told him to return when he could excel in his playing. A few weeks later, he returned to play all fourteen etudes found in the back of the Arbans book without a single mistake.()Andr won the International Music Competition in 1955 and the International Music Competition in Munich in 1963.  He was made an honorary member of the Delta chapter of Mu Alpha Sinfonia at Ithaca College in New York in 1970.He rose to international prominence in the 1960s and 1970s with a large series of recordings of Baroque works on trumpet for Erato and other labels. Not content to limit himself to the standard Baroque trumpet repertoire, he also performed many transcriptions of works for oboe, flute, and even voice and string instruments.  These recordings were (and remain) very popular, and were a strong component of the rebirth of interest in Baroque music in the 1960s.  Fellow trumpeters and music lovers the world over have praised Andr for his clear, bright, ringing tone on the piccolo trumpet.His flawless and graceful performances have inspired many brass musicians, young and old. (Marsalis, for example, was strongly influenced by Andrs style and tone in his own recordings of Baroque trumpet pieces.) He has over 300 audio recordings to his name, from the mid 1950s to the present.He has two children: Nicolas, who plays trumpet; and Batrice, who plays oboe. Both perform with their father in concert.One of Andrs students, Touvron wrote a biography on him entitled Maurice Andr: Une trompette pour la renomme (Maurice Andr: A Trumpet for Fame), which was published in 2003.( accessdate  2010-12-15)ReferencesExternal links*Maurice Andr website, part of the French Ministry of Cultures portal (French/English)*Webpage with rich information about Maurice Andr*A French documentary about Maurice Andr by Alain Duault. 2009AndrAndrAndrAndrAndrAndrAndrja:AndrAndrAndrAndrAndr
254084
Alan_Cumyn
Alan Cumyn (born 8 Jan 1960) is a Canadian novelist who lives in Ottawa, Ontario.Alan Cumyn studied at Roads Military College in 1983, and Queens University before earning an M.A. in Creative Writing and English Literature at the University of Windsor. He has lived across Canada and in China and Indonesia, and worked variously as a geologists assistant, group home manager, tai chi instructor, English teacher, program officer in international development, human rights researcher and freelance writer. Cumyns fiction focuses on personal and political relations, often in a cross-cultural context. He now lives in Ottawa with his wife and two daughters.Works*Waiting for Li Ming - 1993*Between Families and the Sky - 1995*Man of Bone - 1998 - (Winner of the Book Award)*Burridge Unbound - 2000 - shortlisted for the 2000 Prize*Losing It - 2001*The Secret Life of Owen Skye - 2002 (Nominated for a Governor Generals Award)*The Sojourn - 2003*After Sylvia - 2004 (Nominated for the 2005 TD Canadian Childrens Literature Award)*The Famished Lover - 2006 (longlisted for the Prize)*Dear Sylvia - 2008  (Winner 2009 Silver Birch Express Award; short-listed Canadian Library Associations Book of the Year for Children)*Tilt - 2011 (selected by the Junior Library Guild as one of the best young adult novels of 2011)Additional Background from Alan Cumyns Web Page (http://alancumyn.com/acumyn.html)Alan Cumyn was born in Ottawa, Canada in 1960, and began writing poetry and short stories in high school. In 1979 he attended Royal Roads Military College in Victoria, British Columbia, but found that a year of miltary life was sufficent. By 1984 he had a degree in English and History from Queens University in Kingston, Ontario, and an M.A. in Creative Writing and English Literature from the University of Windsor, where he studied under Alistair MacLeod.For the next two years Alan Cumyn ran a group home in Toronto for the national youth volunteer organization Katimavik. In 1986 he married and spent the next year in the coal-mining, train station town of Xuzhou, China, teaching English. The year abroad launched a career in various posts in international development, and was the inspiration for both Cumyns first novel, Waiting for Li Ming, published by Goose Lane Editions in 1993, and for his popular guide to work and study abroad, What in the World is Going On?, first published in 1988 by the Canadian Bureau for International Education (CBIE).From 1991 to 1999 Cumyn worked for the Immigration and Refugee Board (IRB) of Canada, researching and writing papers on human rights conditions in various countries.On leave, Cumyn spent the first half of 1994 teaching in Salatiga, Indonesia. His second novel, Between Families and the Sky, was published in 1995, and explores themes of love, family connections and the coming of age. Man of Bone, a harrowing tale of kidnapping and survival inspired by Cumyns human rights reporting, was published in the spring of 1998. It won the Ottawa-Carleton Book Award a year later, and was short-listed for the Trillium Award.Burridge Unbound was published in 2000 by McClelland & Stewart. The story continues from Man of Bone, but leaps ahead two years and features a vastly changed central character, torture survivor Bill Burridge, who builds a human rights organization but continues to struggle with inner demons. Burridge Unbound was a finalist for the Giller Prize in 2000 and won the Ottawa Book Award in 2001.In 2001 Cumyn published Losing It, a darkly funny novel about the eccentric sub-surfaces of contemporary life. A middle-aged English professor, whose wife is coping with a mentally failing mother and a highly-demanding two-year-old, seeks refuge in a bizarre affair with a beautiful, mad poet, in a week that threatens every aspect of his life. Losing It was shortlisted for the Ottawa Book Award.In 2002, Cumyn published his first novel for children, The Secret Life of Owen Skye, about three brothers whose adventures always seem to spin out of control in unusual ways. The novel was published by Groundwood Books. It won the Mr. Christies Book Award and the Hackmatack Childrens Choice Award, and was shortlisted for the Governor Generals Award, the Ruth Schwartz Award, the Rocky Mountain Book Award and the Pacific Northwest Libraries Association Young Readers Choice Award.After Sylvia, the sequel to The Secret Life of Owen Skye, was published in 2004. It was nominated for four national awards, including the prestigious TD Childrens Literature award and the Canadian Library Associations Book of the Year for Children. In 2005 Cumyn adapted After Sylvia for the stage. The play was produced beautifully by the Ottawa School of Speech and Drama and performed at the University of Ottawa under the direction of Janet Irwin. Dear Sylvia, the long-awaited third and final novel in the Owen Skye series for children, was published in 2008. It consists entirely of Owens hilarious and often moving letters to his true love Sylvia Tull, who has moved away to far-off Elgin. Dear Sylvia won the 2009 Silver Birch Express Award and was short-listed for the Canadian Library Associations Book of the Year for Children. Filmmaker Jasmine Murray-Bergquists tribute to Dear Sylvia can be found on Youtube.  In 2003 Cumyn published The Sojourn, a novel about Ramsay Crome, a young Canadian private in the Great War who gets an unexpected leave to London. It was awarded the Words Worthy Book Award for best Canadian novel in 2003, was shortlisted for the Ottawa Book Award, and was named among the top Canadian novels of 2003 by The Globe and Mail, The Vancouver Sun, Macleans and Quill & Quire.2006 brought The Famished Lover, a sequel to The Sojourn. The novel finds Ramsay Crome trying to support a family as an artist in Montreal in the Great Depression while also struggling to come to grips with his past as a prisoner of war in the Kaisers Germany. At its heart the novel is about the beautiful, corrosive, ambiguous nature of longing. Taken with The Sojourn, the pair of novels examines in both the short and long term the nature of what we are asking of a person when we send them to war. The Famished Lover has been long-listed for the International IMPAC Dublin Literary Award and the Giller Prize.Tilt, Alan Cumyns most recent novel, pitches readers into the wild and often comic romantic obsessions of Stan Dart, a high school basketball player digging in his heels, against high odds, to try to deny the hormonal onslaught of adolescence. The book has been selected by the Junior Library Guild as one of the best young adult novels of 2001.Alan Cumyn is married to author Suzanne Evans, and they live in Ottawa. He teaches part-time in the writing for children program of the Vermont College of Fine Arts. He is a past chair (2010-2011) of The Writers Union of Canada and of the writers in prison committee of PEN Canada. He has also been a board member of the Ottawa School of Speech and Drama, and is a current member of the Canadian Society of Childrens Authors, Illustrators and Performers (CANSCAIP), and Multicultural Artists for Schools and Communities (MASC), through which school bookings for readings and workshops in eastern Ontario and western Quebec can be made. References* W. H. New, ed. Encyclopedia of Literature in Canada. Toronto: University of Toronto Press, 2002.* Authors Website: http://alancumyn.com/acumyn.html (as of September 3, 2011)External links* Alan Cumyns entry in The Canadian Encyclopedia* Online interview from CBC Words at Large* Alan Cumyns web page* Writers Union profile on Alan Cumyn
255840
National_Gallery_of_Australia
The National Gallery of Australia is the national gallery of Australia, holding more than 120,000 works of art. It was established in 1967 by the Australian government as a national public art gallery. Establishment File:Tom Roberts-Allegro con brio, Bourke Street west c 1885-86.jpg|thumb|200px|Roberts: Allegro con brio, Bourke Street west (1886)Roberts, a famous Australian painter, had lobbied various Australian prime ministers, starting with the first, Barton.  Prime Minister Fisher accepted the idea in 1910, and the following year Parliament established a bipartisan committee of six political leadersthe Historic Memorials Committee.  The Committee decided that the government should collect portraits of Australian governors-general, parliamentary leaders and the principal fathers of federation to be painted by Australian artists.  This led to the establishment of what became known as the Commonwealth Art Advisory Board (CAAB), which was responsible for art acquisitions until 1973.  Nevertheless, the Parliamentary Library Committee also collected paintings for the Australian collections of the Commonwealth Parliamentary Library, including landscapes, notably the acquisition of Tom Roberts Allegro con brio, Bourke St West in 1918.  Prior to the opening of the Gallery these paintings were displayed around Parliament House, in Commonwealth offices, including diplomatic missions overseas, and State Galleries.From 1912, the building of a permanent building to house the collection in Canberra was the major priority of the CAAB.  However, this period included two World Wars and a Depression and governments always considered they had more pressing priorities, including building the initial infrastructure of Canberra and Old Parliament House in the 1920s and the rapid expansion of Canberra and the building of government offices, Burley Griffin and the Library of Australia in the 1950s and early 1960s.  Finally in 1965 the CAAB was able to persuade Prime Minister Menzies to take the steps necessary to establish the gallery.(, pp2-9)  On 1 November 1967, Prime Minister Holt formally announced that the Government would construct the building. Location The design of the building was complicated by the difficulty in finalising its location, which was affected by the layout of the Parliamentary Triangle.  The main problem was the final site of the new Parliament House.  In Canberras original Griffin 1912 plan, Parliament House was to be built on Camp Hill, between Capital Hill and the Provisional Parliament House and a Capitol was to be built on top of Capital Hill.  He envisaged the Capitol to be either a general administration structure for popular receptions and ceremony or for housing archives and commemorating Australian Achievements.(, p12)  In the early 1960s, the Capital Development Commission (NCDC) proposed, in accordance with the 1958 and 1964 Holford plans for the Parliamentary Triangle, that the site for the new Parliament House be moved to the shore of Lake Burley Griffin, with a vast National Place, to be built on its south side, to be surrounded by a large mass of buildings.  The Gallery would be built on Capital Hill, along with other national cultural institutions.(Parliamentary Zone Development Plan, pp20-1)In 1968, Madigan of Edwards Madigan Torzillo and Partners won the competition for the design, even though no design could be finalised, as the final site was now in doubt. Prime Minister Gorton stated that,:The Competition had as its aim not a final design for the building but rather the selection of a vigorous and imaginative architect who would then be commissioned to submit the actual design of the Gallery.(Green: p.339)Gorton proposed to Parliament in 1968 that it endorse Holfords lakeside site for the new Parliament House, but it refused and sites at Camp Hill and Capital Hill were then investigated. As a result, the Government decided that the Gallery could not be built on Capital Hill.(Parliamentary Zone Development Plan, p23)  In 1971, the Government selected a 17 hectare site on the eastern side of the proposed National Place, between King Edward Terrace and for the Gallery.  Even though it was now unlikely that the lakeside Parliament House would proceed, a raised National Place (to hide parking stations) surrounded by national institutions and government offices was still planned.(Parliamentary Zone Development Plan, pp23-4) Madigans brief included the Gallery, a building for the Court of Australia and the precinct around them, linking to the raised National Place at the centre of the Land Axis of the Parliamentary Triangle, which then led to the National Library on the western side.Development of the designMadigans final design was based on a brief prepared by the Capital Development Commission (NCDC) with input from Johnson Sweeney and Mollison.  Sweeney (19001986) was Director of the Guggenheim Museum between 19521960 and Director of Museum of Fine Arts, Houston and had been appointed as a consultant to advise on issues concerning the display and storage of art.  Mollison said in 1989 that the size and form of the building had been determined between Colin Madigan and J.J. Sweeney, and the National Capital Development Commission.  I was not able to alter the appearance of the interior or exterior in any way...Its a very difficult building in which to make art look more important than the space in which you put the art.(Green : pp.37980)  The construction of the building commenced in 1973, with the unveiling of a plaque by Prime Minister Whitlam, and it was officially opened by Queen Elizabeth II in 1982, during the premiership of Whitlams successor, Fraser. The building cost $82 million.In 1975, the NCDC abandoned the plan for the National Place, leaving the precinct five metres above the natural ground level, without the previously proposed connections to national institutions () and next to a vast space only partially taken up by Place, which does not substitute for the grand mass of buildings originally envisaged.Appointment of an acting directorThe CAAB recommended that Laurie Thomas, a former Director of the Gallery of Western Australia and of the Art Gallery be appointed Director, but the Prime Minister Gorton took no action on this recommendation, as he apparently favoured the appointment of Johnson Sweeney, although he was already 70.Mollison had become executive officer for the CAAB and exhibitions officer in the Prime Ministers Department in 1969.  The Governments failure to appoint a director of the NGA required that Mollison become involved in the development of the design for the building with the architects led by Colin Madigan.  In November 1970, the CAAB decided that he would be re-designated as assistant director (development).  In May 1971, following Gortons fall from power, the Government endorsed Madigans sketches for the building.  The new Prime Minister, McMahon announced the appointment of Mollison as Acting Director of the NGA in October 1971.  Tenders for construction were called in November 1972, just before the McMahon governments defeat in the December 1972 election.(Green : pp14-17) The building The National Gallery building is in the late 20th-century Brutalist style.  It is characterised by angular masses and raw concrete surfaces and is surrounded by a series of sculpture gardens planted with Australian native plants and trees.The geometry of the building is based on a triangle, most obviously manifested for visitors in the coffered ceiling grids and tiles of the principal floor. Madigan said of this device that it was the intention of the architectural concept to implant into the grammar of the design a sense of freedom so that the building could be submitted to change and variety but would always express its true purpose.  This geometry flows throughout the building, and is reflected in the triangular stair towers, columns and building elements.The building is principally constructed of reinforced brush hammered concrete, which was also originally the interior wall surface.  More recently, the interior walls have been covered with painted wood, to allow for increased flexibility in the display of artworks.The building has 23,000m2 of floor space.  The design provides space for both the display and storage of works of art and to accommodate the curatorial and support staff of the Gallery.  Madigans design is based on Sweeneys recommendation that there should be a spiral plan, with a succession of galleries to display works of art of differing sizes and to allow flexibility in the way in which they were to be exhibited.There are three levels of galleries.  On the principal floor, the galleries are large, and are used to display the Indigenous Australian and International (meaning European and American) collections. The bottom level also contains a series of large galleries, originally intended to house sculpture, but now used to display the Asian art collection. The topmost level contains a series of smaller, more intimate galleries, which are now used to display the Gallerys collection of Australian art.  Sweeney had recommended that sources of natural light should not detract from the collections, and so light sources are intended to be indirect.The High Court and National Gallery Precinct were added to the National Heritage List in November 2007.(Australian National Heritage listing for the High Court-National Gallery Precinct)thumb|500px|center|Lobby area of the National Gallery of AustraliaLater extensionsThe Gallery has been extended twice, the first of which was the building of new temporary exhibition galleries on the eastern side of the building in 1997, to house large-scale temporary exhibitions, which was designed by Andersons of Architects.  This extension includes a sculptural garden, designed by Fiona Hall.There have also been proposals, during the tenure of Director Brian Kennedy, for the construction of a new front entrance, facing King Edward Terrace.  Madigan made known his concerns about these proposals and their interference with his moral rights as the architect and also expressed concerns about these changes.() A former Director, Churcher, was particularly critical of the building and reportedly told a Sydney journalist that the dead hand of an architect cannot stay clamped on a building forever. When Ron Radford became Director, he expanded the brief to include a suite of new galleries to display the collection of indigenous art. The Minister for the Arts and Sport, Senator Kemp, announced on 13 December 2006 that the Australian Government would provide $92.9 million for a major building enhancement project at the National Gallery of Australia, including around $20 million for previously approved building refurbishments.  The building enhancements were designed to create new arrival and entrance facilities to improve public access to the Gallerys building and significantly increase display space, particularly for the collection of Australian Indigenous art.()Stage 1 of the indigenous galleries and new entrance project was officially opened on 30 September 2010 by Her Excellency, Bryce, the of Australia.()According to a well known architecture critic, the new extension had three main tasks: how to dock amicably with the existing architecture; how to provide the resulting whole with a new street address; how to create a logical, legible and deferential hanging space for the collection.() Development of the collection In 1976, the newly established ANG Council advertised for a permanent Director to fill the position that Mollison had been acting in since 1971.  The new Prime Minister Fraser announced the appointment of Mollison as Director in 1977.James MollisonMollison is notable for establishing the Gallery and building on the collection that had already been assembled of mainly Australian paintings by purchasing icons of modern western art, most famously the 1974 purchases of Poles by Pollock ($1.3m), and Woman V by de Kooning ($650,000).  These purchases were very controversial at the time, but are now generally considered to be visionary acquisitions.He also built up the other collections, often with the help of donations.  In 1975, Boyd presented several thousand of his works to the Gallery.  in 1977 Mollison persuaded Reed to donate Nolans remarkable Kelly series to the ANG.  Nolan had long disputed Reeds ownership of these paintings.( p350) In 1981, Albert Tucker and his wife presented a substantial collection of Tuckers collection to the Gallery.  As a result the ANG now has one of the finest collections of Australian art.He also arranged many touring exhibitions, most famously the The Great Impressionist Exhibition of 1984.His successor, Churcher has said that when she took over in 1990 he was of almost legendary stature and had single-handedly built a great and comprehensive collection from the ground up; indeed he had presided over the collection for more than twenty years with great flair, and over the institution for seven yearsit was in the truest sense, his Gallery, his professional achievement. (Green: p175)Betty ChurcherChurcher became Director in 1990.  She had been formerly Director of the Gallery of Western Australia.  While director of the National Gallery, she was dubbed Betty Blockbuster because of her love of blockbuster exhibitions.Churcher initiated the building of new galleries on the eastern side of the building, opened in March 1998, to house large-scale temporary exhibitions.  She changed the name of the Gallery from the Australian National Gallery to its current title.During her period the Gallery purchased, among many other artworks, Golden Summer, Eaglemont by Streeton for $3.5 million.  This was the last great School painting still in private hands.(Green: p174)Brian KennedyBrian Kennedy was appointed Director in 1997.  He expanded the traveling exhibitions and loans program throughout Australia, arranged for several major shows of Australian art abroad, increased the number of exhibitions at the museum itself and oversaw the development of an extensive multi-media site.  On the other hand, he discontinued the emphasis of his predecessor, Churcher, of showing blockbuster exhibitions.During his directorship, the NGA gained government support for improving the building and significant private donations and corporate sponsorship.  Private funding supported his notable acquisitions of Hockneys A Bigger Grand Canyon for $4.6 million in 1999, Freuds After Czanne for $7.4 million in 2001 and Pregnant Woman by Mueck for $800,000.He also introduced free admission to the gallery, except to major exhibitions.  He campaigned for the construction of a new front entrance to the Gallery, facing King Edward Terrace, but this did not come to pass during his tenure.Kennedys cancellation of the exhibition (scheduled at the NGA from 2 June 2000 to 13 August 2000) was controversial, as it was seen by many as censorship.  This exhibition was created by the British Artists of the Gallery.  Its most controversial work was Ofilis Holy Virgin Mary, a painting which used elephant dung and was accused of being blasphemous.  The then Mayor of New York, Giuliani campaigned against the exhibition, claiming it was Catholic-bashing and an aggressive vicious, disgusting attack on religion.  In November 1999, Kennedy cancelled the exhibition and stated that the events in New York had obscured discussion of the artistic merit of the works of art.  ()Kennedy was also repeatedly under attack over allegations that the NGAs air-conditioning was exposing its staff to cancer.  Despite his denials that there was any problem with the air-conditioning, claims that the issue had been swept under the carpet persisted.  The air-conditioning was finally renovated in 2003.()Kennedy announced that he would not seek extension of his contract in 2002.  He has denied that he was under any government pressure to do so.Ron RadfordRadford was appointed Director in late 2004.  He was formerly Director of the Gallery of South Australia.Radford has announced his intention to lend out old masters (European art, prior to the 19th century) for long-term display to state galleries.  He considers the collection of less than 30 paintings, put together by Mollison to give context to the modern collection, as too small to make any impact on the public. He has been quoted as saying that the gallery should concentrate on its strengths  European Art of the first half of the 20th century, 20th-century American art, photography, Asian art and the 20th-century drawing collection, and to fill the gaps in the Australian collection.()In September 2005, there was considerable publicity about an offer to the gallery of Sketch for Deluge II by Kandinsky for $35 million. The gallery did not subsequently go through with the purchase.In 2010, the NGA purchased its 113th John Olsen artwork, Olsen being one of Australias most recognised and expensive painters. Major displays The collections of the National Gallery of Australia include:* art** Australian Aboriginal and Strait Islander art (mostly recent, but in traditional forms)** Art in the European Tradition (from European settlement to the present day)* Western art (from Medieval to Modern, mostly Modern)* Eastern art (from South and East Asia, mostly traditional)* Art (international)* Pacific Arts (from Melanesia and Polynesia mostly traditional)* Photography (International & Australian)* Crafts (dishes to dresses, international)* the Sculpture Garden (Rodin to Modern)* Visiting exhibitsAustralian Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander artImage:Aboriginal holllow log tombs02.jpg|thumb|250px|Ramingining Artists: The MemorialThis collection is dominated by the Memorial of 200 painted tree trunks commemorating all the indigenous people who had died between 1788 and 1988 defending their land against invaders.  Each tree trunk is a dupun or log coffin, which is used to mark the safe tradition of the soul of the deceased from this world to the next.  Artists from Ramingining painted it to mark the Bicentenary and it was accepted for display by the of Sydney in 1988.  Mollison agreed to purchase it for permanent display at the NGA before its completion.(Green : pp199-204) Australian Art in the European Tradition This includes works by:*John Glover  Mount Wellington and Hobart Town from Kangaroo Point*McCubbin  Afterglow*Roberts  Going Home, Storm Clouds, In a Corner on the Macintyre, An Australian Native, The Sculptors Studio, Allegro con brio, Bourke St West*Streeton  From McMahons Point  Fare 1 Penny, The Selectors Hut, Golden Summer, Spirit of the Drought*Conder  The Yarra, Heidelberg, Bronte Beach, Under a Southern Sun*Preston  Flying over the Shoalhaven River, Flapper*Cossington Smith  Interior in Yellow*Rees  A South Coast Road*Dobell  The Red Lady*Albert Tucker   Pick up, Images of modern evil (collection), Victory Girls*Drysdale  The Drovers Wife, The Rabbiter and his Family*Nolan  Ned Kelly, The Slip, The Burning Tree, Constable Fitzpatrick and Kate Kelly, Stringybark Creek, The Chase, Kelly Crossing the Bridge (and many other Ned Kelly paintings), Kiata, Head of a Soldier*Boyd  The Mining Town, Boat Builders, Eden*Hester  Nude in Hat, Mother and Child*Perceval  Boy with CatSculptureImage:Henry moore hill arches at the NGA.JPG|thumb|250px|Moore: Hill Arches in the Sculpture GardenThe sculpture garden includes works by:*Flugelman  Cones*Nakaya  Fog sculpture, this only operates between noon and 2pm. It has been seen as a work of sculpture.*Moore  Hill Arches*di Suvero  Ik Ook*Rodin  Burghers of Calais (1 of 12 sets)*Maillol  La Montagne (The Mountain)*Meadmore  Virginia Western ArtThe focus of the Gallerys international collection is primarily on late 19th century and 20th century art ( )although many are not on display at present, due to refurbishment work.  There is a strong collection of modern works. It includes works by:*Czanne  Afternoon in Naples*Monet  Heystacks, Miday, Water lilies*Lger  Trapeze Artists*Pollock  Poles, Totem lesson 2*de Kooning  Woman V*Warhol  Elvis, Electric chair*Rothko  Multiform, Black,brown on maroon or Deep red and black*Lichtenstein  Kitchen stove*Hockney  A Bigger Grand Canyon*Freud  After Czanne*Mueck  Pregnant WomanThe Gallery has a small collection of European Master paintings, which are not regularly displayed. Major exhibitions *The Great Impressionist Exhibition (1984)*Ken Tyler: Printer Extraordinary (1985) (E. Tyler)*New Worlds from Old 19th Century Australian and American Landscapes (1998)*Rembrandt, A Genius and his Impact (199798)*An Impressionist Legacy, Monet to Moore, The Millennium Gift of Sara Lee Corporation (1999)*Robinson, A Retrospective (200102)*Rodin, A Magnificent Obsession, Sculpture and Drawings (200102)*Monet & Japan (2001)*Preston, Australian printmaker (200405)*No ordinary place, the art of Malangi (2004)*The Edwardians, secrets and desires (2004)*Viola, The Passions (2005)*Gleeson, Beyond the screen of sight (2005)*Constable, impressions of land, sea and sky (2005)*Tillers: inventing postmodern appropriation (2006) ( )*W. Lambert Retrospective : heroes & icons (2007) ()*Turner to Monet, The Triumph of Landscape (2008)*Degas: Master of French Art (2009)*McCubbin: Last Impressions 1907 - 1917  (2009)*Masterpieces from Paris (2010), on loan from dOrsay.*Russes, the Art of Costume (2011)See also* Gallery of South Australia* of Australia* Gallery of Victoria, the major art gallery in Melbourne and Australias oldest and largest public art gallery* Gallery of New South Wales, the major art gallery in Sydney* National Portrait Gallery, also in Canberra* of sculpture parks* Gallery of Australia Research LibraryNotesReferencesExternal links* Home page of the National Gallery of Australia* * National Gallery of Australia on ArtabaseGallery of Australianationale dAustralieGallery of AustraliaGallery of AustraliaNacional da Austrlia zh:
257271
Belmont,_Massachusetts
Belmont is a town in Middlesex County, Massachusetts, a suburb of Boston. The population was 24,729 at the 2010 census. History Belmont was founded on March 18, 1859 by former citizens of, and land from the bordering towns of Watertown, to the south; Waltham, to the west; and Arlington, then known as West Cambridge, to the north. The town was named after Bellmont, the 200 acre (0.8 km) estate of one of the leading advocates of and largest donor to its creation, Perkins Cushing. The easternmost section of the town, including the western portion of Fresh Pond, was annexed by Cambridge in 1880((17)) in a dispute over a slaughterhouse licensed in 1878(Belmont Historic District Commission, Belmont, Massachusetts: The Architecture and Development of The Town of Homes, 1984) on Fresh Pond, so that Cambridge could protect Fresh Pond, a part of its municipal water system. Much of that area is now a major commercial and office center for the city of Cambridge.Preceding its incorporation, Belmont was an agrarian based town, with several large farms servicing Boston for produce and livestock. It remained largely the same until the turn of the twentieth century, when trolley service and better roads were introduced, making the town more attractive as a residential area, most notably for the building of large estates.Belmonts population grew by over 90 percent during the 1920s.(Schaeffer, K. H. and Elliott Sclar. Access for All: Transportation and Urban Growth. University Press, 1980. Accessed on Books. 86. Retrieved on January 16, 2010. ISBN 0231051654, 9780231051651.)The economics of the town shifted from purely agrarian to a commercial greenhouse base: much of the flower and vegetable needs of Boston were met from the Belmont hothouses which persisted until about 1983 when Edgars, the last large greenhouse firm in the area, closed. Other commercial enterprises in Belmont included mining and waste management. The reclamation of a large dump and quarry off Concord Avenue into sites for the Belmont High School and the Clay Pit Pond stands as a lasting example of environmental planning. With the introduction of automobiles and highways Belmont continued its transition to a commuter-based suburb throughout the twentieth century.Belmont was the home of the headquarters of the Birch Society from the organizations founding in 1958 until its relocation to Wisconsin in 1989. Present day Belmont remains a primarily residential suburb with little growth since the 1950s. It is best known for the mansion-filled Belmont Hill neighborhood, although most residents live in more densely settled, low-lying areas around the Hill. There are three major commercial centers in the town: Belmont Center in the center, Cushing Square in the south, and Waverley Square in the west. Town Hall and other civic buildings are located in Belmont Center. Large tracts of land from former farms and greenhouse estates form public or public-accessible areas such as Rock Meadow, Habitat (Mass Audubon), portions of the Hospital tract and various town fields.The major roads in the town are Concord Avenue, which bisects the town from east to west, Common Street and Pleasant Street (Route 60) which travel north-south through Belmont, and Trapelo Road and Belmont Street which run along the southern edge of the town. Massachusetts Route 2 runs along the northern border of the town. Belmont is also served by the Bay Transportation Authoritys Fitchburg Commuter Rail line and Bus line numbers 72/75, 73, 74, 75, 78, 84, and 554.The town is home to Hospital, a hospital and research center, and the Massachusetts Temple of Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints.Geographythumb|right|200px|Topography of Belmont and environsBelmont is located at  (42.391546, -71.174712).According to the States Census Bureau, the town has a total area of 4.7 square miles (12.2 km), of which, 4.7 square miles (12.1 km) of it is land and 0.1 square miles (0.1 km) of it (1.06%) is water.Belmont is bordered by Cambridge on the East, Arlington on the North, Lexington on the Northwest, Waltham on the West, and Watertown on the South.Demographics footnote*  population estimate.  Source: States Census records and Estimates Program data.()()()()()()()()()As of the census of 2010, there were 24,729 people. The 2000 census lists 9,732 households and 6,452 families residing in the town. The density was 5,190.2 people per square mile (2,004.6/km). There were 9,980 housing units at an average density of 2,141.0 per square mile (826.9/km). The racial makeup of the town was 91.19% White, 1.10% Black or African American, 0.13% Native American, 5.76% Asian, 0.01% Pacific Islander, 0.41% from other races, and 1.41% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.82% of the population. There were 9,732 households out of which 31.0% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 54.9% were married couples living together, 8.8% had a female householder with no husband present, and 33.7% were non-families. 25.9% of all households were made up of individuals and 11.9% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.45 and the average family size was 3.01.In the town the population was spread out with 22.7% under the age of 18, 4.5% from 18 to 24, 31.0% from 25 to 44, 25.1% from 45 to 64, and 16.7% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 40 years. For every 100 females there were 87.5 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 82.8 males.According to a 2007 estimate,(http://factfinder.census.gov/servlet/ACSSAFFFacts?_eventChangeGeoContext&geo_id06000US2501705070&_geoContext01000US%7C04000US36%7C16000US3663264&_street&_countybelmont&_cityTownbelmont&_state04000US25&_zip&_langen&_sseon&ActiveGeoDivgeoSelect&_useEV&pctxtfph&pgsl010&_submenuIdfactsheet_1&ds_nameACS_2007_3YR_SAFF&_ci_nbrnull&qr_namenull&regnull%3Anull&_keyword&_industry) the median income for a household in the town was $85,981, and the median income for a family was $102,964. Males had a median income of $64,579 versus $45,505 for females. The capita income for the town was $42,485. About 3.6% of families and 4.4% of the population were below the line, including 3.9% of those under age 18 and 5.3% of those age 65 or over. Education Belmont is served by the Public Schools, governed by an independently elected school committee.(http://town.belmont.ma.us/Public_Documents/BelmontMA_WebDocs/govt)There are four public elementary schools in Belmont, the Mary Lee Burbank, Daniel Butler, Winn Brook, and Roger Wellington  schools. Two other public elementary schools, Payson Park and Kendall, were closed in the 1970s and 1980s, respectively. The former closed after being destroyed by fire, the latter closed due to population shifts and was converted to an arts center, which was later also destroyed by fire. There is one public middle school, the Winthrop L. Chenery Middle School, which was rebuilt on the same location after an electrical fire damaged the auditorium in 1995, and one public high school, Belmont High School. Belmont High has an outstanding reputation for college placement, strong athletics, academics, music, and theater arts; a typical class size of about 290 students; and average SATs for the class of 2004 of 1179. Belmont students also have the option to attend Minuteman Career and Technical High School in Lexington. Minuteman High also offers adult education courses. In 2009, US News and World Reports gave Belmont High School a gold medal and named it the 100th best non-private high school in the United States and the second best in the state of Massachusetts.Hill School is a private, non-sectarian all-male high school, grades 7-12. Belmont Day School is a private, non-sectarian PK-8 school. There are several smaller private schools.GovernmentThe executive branch of the town government consists of a three-person Board of Selectmen elected by the residents.  The Selectmen appoint a Town Administrator who is in charge of daily operations. The legislative branch is a town meeting, with eight districts each electing 36 representatives, plus ex-officio members and a Town Moderator to run the annual meeting.(Belmont is part of the 24th Middlesex District (for the House of Representatives), the 2nd Middlesex and Suffolk District (for the Senate), and 7th congressional district (for the States House of Representatives).TransportationBelmont is served directly by two state routes. Running close to the middle of town is Route 60, locally known as Pleasant Street. On the northern border, Route 2 predominantly outlines Belmonts boundary with the neighboring town of Arlington. Other nearby major routes include I-95/MA-Route 128, Route 16, Route 3, and Route 20 .Several MBTA bus routes serve Belmont directly:*72/75 &mdash; Center - Harvard Station via Concord Ave.*73 &mdash; Waverley Square - Harvard Station via Trapelo Road (trolleybus)*74 & 75 &mdash; Belmont Center - Harvard Station via Concord Ave.*78 &mdash; Arlmont Village - Harvard Station via Park Circle*554 &mdash; Downtown Boston - Waverley Square via Newton CornerThese MBTA bus routes have one or two stops in Belmont along the Route 2 corridor (eastbound):*62 &mdash; Bedford V.A. Hospital - Alewife Station*67 &mdash; Turkey Hill - Alewife Station*76 &mdash; Hanscom/Labs - Alewife Station*84 &mdash; Arlmont Village - Alewife StationTwo rail stationsWaverley and Belmont Center on the Commuter Railare located in the town. Belmont is roughly sixteen minutes away from the rail lines terminus at Station, Boston.Nearby in Cambridge lies Alewife Station, the western terminus of the Red Line; providing a connection to Boston and the entire metropolitan rapid transit system.Railroad Historythumb|right|250px|Boston & Maine Railroad Station at Belmont Center Belmont was once served by two railroads, the Railroad and the Massachusetts Railroad, both of which were later to become part of the & Maine system.  Originally the two railroads had their own tracks through town, but in 1952 the Central Mass tracks were lifted between Hills Crossing and Clematis Brook (Waltham).(The Rail Lines of Southern New England - Ronald Dale Karr 1995) Traffic was then rerouted over the Fitchburg Line. Today the MBTA owns the trackage that runs through Belmont.  It is known Fitchburg Route.  Passenger service on this line currently ends at Fitchburg, but it once was the areas main route into York state.  As of 2011, the MBTA was planning to extend future service to West Fitchburg.thumb|left|150px|Wellington Hill StationThe station stops at Belmont Center and Waverley were once grade crossings, meaning pedestrian and vehicular traffic had to cross directly over rails that were in public roads.  In 1907 the grade at Belmont Center was eliminated by constructing a stone bridge to carry the tracks past a new station building.  At Waverley, the grade was lowered so that the tracks ran under Trapelo Road.A second railroad station building exists in Belmont, though it is not obvious.  The Wellington Hill Station was originally built in the 1840s as a private school, not far from its current location.  It was then used by the Fitchburg Railroad from 1852-1879.  When the railroad decided to replace the station with a larger structure, the building was moved to the Underwood Estate and used as a summer house.  In 1974, the station was donated to the Belmont Historical Society.  It was restored and relocated to its current location in 1980.EnvironmentBelmont was ranked in 2002 to be included in the worst 10% of polluted counties in the united states in terms of air and water pollution.(http://scorecard.goodguide.com/community/who.tcl?fips_county_code25017&nameMIDDLESEX&zip_code02478) Some of the top polluters were the Cambridge Plating Company in Belmont, and the nearby Corporation in Waltham.The chemicals released were trichlorothyrene and dichloromethane, both of which are harmful and have been shown to cause cancer. Because these chemicals are released into the air it is difficult to trace them and their exact source, as there are also several other industries in the area that release the same pollutants. It is also estimated that 3% of homes in Belmont are at risk of having lead hazards.In 2004 the town of Belmont hosted a community environmental fair to encourage environmentally friendly behavior for its residents(http://www.town.belmont.ma.us/Public_Documents/F0001046A/townlinks/envfair.)Notable residentsImage:PostcardBelmontMATownHall1913.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Belmont Town Hall circa 1913, architects and Richardsonthumb|right|250px|A recent photograph.Somewhat due to its proximity to Cambridge and Boston, Belmont has often had a dozen Nobel Prize winners in residence at one time or another. Well-known past and present residents include:Business* Founder of MAPS Doblin* China trader Perkins Cushing* Deviled ham-maker William Underwood, founder of the Underwood Company* Businessman and philanthropist P. Mugar, founder of the Star Market chain* Sugar Daddy inventor and Birch Society founder W. Welch, Jr.* Derek J. Birt, Co-owner of Network Services (BNS)Politics and government* Former Massachusetts Governor and 2008,2012 Republican presidential candidate, Romney and his wife Romney* Secretary of State Kissinger, Prize 1973 - Peace* Former Director of CIA Deutch* Crown Princess of Japan Masako OwadaArts and music* Painter Homer* Landscape architect Law Olmsted* Musician Justman of J. Geils Band* Composer Piston* Composer Goolkasian Rahbee* Cellist Ma* Singer-songwriter and guitarist TaylorMedia* Bergeron - Radio and TV personality* E. Kelley- TV producer and writer* Powell - Actor()* Mary Richardson - WCVB-TVs Chronicle anchor* Rogers- ActressSports* Major League pitcher, Sox and White Sox Wood* Major League catcher/Hall of Famer, Red Sox and White Sox Fisk* Major League baseball player and two time NL MVP, Murphy* Red Sox pitcher Bill Spaceman Lee* York Rangers defenseman Mara* York Rangers Forward RissmillerLiterature* Author Perrotta* Author Dean Howells* Author/journalist Junger* Author and educator Warner Brace* Author and psychologist Damon* Author/explorer/photographer WashburnAcademics* Physicist Baez, and his daughters folksingers Baez and Farina* Business School professor and author M. Christensen* Engineer Bush* Young University-Idaho President and Business School Dean B. Clark* Catholic bishop Vose Daily* Scientist and photographer Harold Doc Edgerton* Professor Feldstein, former chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers* Molecular biologist Gobind Khorana, Prize 1968 - Medicine* Harvard professor Knoll -- Medal 2007* Scientist/inventor/author Cohen* Theoretical physicist E. Low* Reformationist scholar and novelist Marius* MIT economics professor Modigliani, Memorial Prize in Economics, 1985* Philosopher Nozick* Professor O. Reischauer, East Asia scholar and Ambassador to Japan* Sacco, astronaut and chemical engineer* Economist A. Samuelson, Memorial Prize in Economics, 1970* HUAC victim and MIT mathematician Jan Struik* Computer scientist Valiant* Mathematician Wiener* Organic chemist Burns Woodward -- Prize 1965 - Chemistry* Astronomer Lawrence Whipple http://www.news.harvard.edu/gazette/2006/02.16/18-mm.html* Dudley White, founder of Heart Association* Bach scholar Wolff* E. TillotsonProfessor, Food Policy Friedman School of Nutrition Science and Policy University* Gordon Scannell, thoracic surgeon, President of the England Surgical Society* O. Light, Former Dean of the Business School(http://drfd.hbs.edu/fit/public/facultyInfo.do?facInfoovr&facId6501 Jay O. Light Harvard Business School)Points of interest* Redtop, home of Dean Howells.* O. Reischauer Memorial House.* Boston & Maine Railroad Station, now known as the MBTA Commuter Rail Belmont stop, now owned by the Lions Club.* Hill Railroad Station, circa 1840, located across the street from the current MBTA stop at Belmont Center.* Massachusetts Temple of the LDS Church.Local mediaThe Belmont Citizen-Herald is a newspaper covering Belmont since 1988. The print edition of the newspaper is available in stores on Thursday. The Citizen-Herald was actually two newspapers at one time. The Belmont Citizen began publishing in 1920, and the Belmont Herald started in 1930. The Boston Globe and Boston.com publish a Belmont Your Town website that provides local news and information. It is found at www.boston.com/belmont.See also* Public Library (Massachusetts)ReferencesFurther reading* Somerville, Arlington and Belmont Directory. 1869; 1873; 1876.External links* Town of Belmont* Belmont Public Schools* Belmont Public Library* Belmont Police Department* Belmont Citizen-Herald* Your Town Belmont website* McLean Hospital* Habitat* Town Of Belmont / Mass.gov * Boy Scout Troop 304 Belmont(Massachusetts)(condado de Middlesex, Massachusetts)(Massachusetts)MassachusettsMassachusetts(Massachusetts)(Massachusetts)(Massachusetts)(Massachusetts)
260050
Gouverneur_(village),_New_York
Gouverneur is a village in St. Lawrence County, York, States. The population was 4,263 at the 2000 census.  The village is named after Morris, one of the authors of the of the United States, as well as a prominent landowner and part-time resident of the area. The Village of Gouverneur is in the Town of Gouverneur in the southeast part of both the town and the county.  The community is called the Marble Village because of the many structures made from marble and the importance of marble in the early economy. History Morris, his relative Samuel Ogden, and partner William Constable were all early landowners in northern York, and Morris established a summer home in the town.  Mining the local marble was one of the first big industries in the area.  Later, mining talc and zinc became important. The Village of Gouverneur was incorporated in 1850. Notable residents Scozzafava, New York State Assemblywoman and former mayor and village trustee of Gouverneur.John Noble, developer and marketer of the Savers candy treat. Edward J Noble was born in Gouverneur and educated in the public schools. He also attended Syracuse University and graduated from Yale in 1905.He also was part of the Seaway project and was appointed to the advisory board by president Dwight Eisenhower in 1952. He also at one time owned Boldt Castle in Alexandria Bay New York. Also in 1913 he was the co-founder of the life saver. There are three hospitals named in his honor and a foundation. Noble died very peacefully in his sleep in 1958. The ornamental street lights in the village parkare all that remain of the gift of the new street lights that were given to the village by Edward and his brother. The lights are in memory of their father.Pangle, who holds the Joe R. Long Chair in Democratic Studies at the of Texas, is a famous educator, and the author of many books.Orrin Kinney, founder of Drugs.Leonard, is an American football player for the Bengals, and a former athlete from University. He was the Scarlet Knights three-year star, earning numerous awards for his play in the Big East Conference. Leonard is renowned for his athleticism due to his size, hands, speed, as well as his leadership, unselfish play and high character. He is well known for jumping over would-be tacklers. This trademark hurdle has been dubbed the Leonard Leap.Tyler Jones, participant in the Scripps National Spelling Bee. He is also a geologist who did research in Antarctica in 2010. GeographyAccording to the States Census Bureau, the village has a total area of 2.2 square miles (5.7 km), of which 2.1 square miles (5.5 km) are land and 0.1 square mile (0.2 km) (2.74%) is water.US Route 11 passes through the village, where it converges with York State Route 58 and York State Route 812. County Road 11 leads into the village from the north, and County Road 12 leads in from the west. The River flows westward through the village.The Oswegathchie river runs all threw the village of Gouverneur, it flows from adjoing villages like Harrisville NY. On route 11 going south the village has small towns like Sparagville with in it they also consider this to be part of Gouverneur. Going up on new york state 58 from Gouverneur the next little town or village is called Hammond this is going east from Gouverneur. If you were to go straight threw the village on route 11 going north then the next village would be Hermon Dekalb which is about 15 miles from gouverneur. Going west on the new york state route 812 it will bring you into a town called fowler which is also connected to Gouverneur and this little town is about 10 miles from it.DemographicsAs of the census of 2000, there were 4,263 people, 1,667 households, and 1,093 families residing in the village.  The density was 2,004.4 people per square mile (772.7/km).  There were 1,815 housing units at an average density of 853.4 per square mile (329.0/km).  The racial makeup of the village was 94.39% White, 1.78% Black or African American, 0.38% Native American, 0.40% Asian, 0.23% Pacific Islander, 1.06% from other races, and 1.76% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 2.28% of the population.There were 1,667 households out of which 36.3% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 47.6% were married couples living together, 13.9% had a female householder with no husband present, and 34.4% were non-families. 29.2% of all households were made up of individuals and 15.2% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 2.52 and the average family size was 3.09.In the village the population was spread out with 29.8% under the age of 18, 9.5% from 18 to 24, 27.3% from 25 to 44, 19.7% from 45 to 64, and 13.7% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 33 years. For every 100 females there were 90.6 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 82.9 males.The median income for a household in the village was $25,174, and the median income for a family was $29,192. Males had a median income of $31,768 versus $20,064 for females. The capita income for the village was $12,482.  About 17.6% of families and 18.3% of the population were below the line, including 22.6% of those under age 18 and 10.2% of those age 65 or over.Kinney DrugsThe headquarters of Drugs is located in Gouverneur, along with Store #1, Store #34, the distribution center, and the Health Direct Services store.  Store #1 used to be located beneath corporate headquarters at 29 E. Main Street, but was moved to the former Rite-Aid store at 17 Clinton Street after it closed.  Kinney Drugs is a major employer in the village, and the original store is still an important aspect of its business district.(Kinney Drugs Online)Footnotes(External links*  The Village of Gouverneur website*  Gouverneur area informationca:Gouverneur(villa)vo:Gouverneur
260482
Mineral_Point,_Wisconsin
Mineral Point is a city in Iowa County, Wisconsin, States. The population was 2,617 at the 2000 census. In 2008 the citys population had taken a decline and is currently only 2,462, but still the second most populous community in Iowa County. One of Wisconsins oldest cities, Mineral Point was settled in 1827 and became a lead and zinc mining center during the 19th and early 20th centuries. Today the citys historical character has made it a regional tourist destination. The city is located within the Town of Mineral Point. Mineral Point is part of the Madison Metropolitan Statistical Area. History The first European settlement at Mineral Point began in 1827. During the following year, large quantities of galena, or lead ore, were discovered around the settlement in shallow deposits. Lead had many uses at the time, and settlers began to flock to the region hoping to make a living by extracting the easily accessible mineral. Lead deposits extended throughout an area that also included Iowa and Illinois, but Mineral Point became the center of lead mining operations within the bounds of present day Wisconsin (then part of Territory). By 1829, the regions growing population led to the creation of Iowa County, which included all of the lead mining lands within the borders of Michigan Territory at the time. Mineral Point was established as the seat later that year. The young settlements importance was further confirmed in 1834 when it was selected as the site of one of two federal land offices responsible for distributing public land to settlers within the area that now encompasses Wisconsin. When Territory was created in 1836, Mineral Point hosted the inauguration of the first territorial governor, Dodge, and the territorial secretary, S. Horner. During the ceremony, a design by Horner was officially recognized as the Great Seal of Wisconsin Territory. The seal displayed an arm holding a pickaxe over a pile of lead ore, demonstrating the importance of Mineral Points early mining economy to the new territory. A census conducted in the months after the inauguration showed that Iowa County had  5,234 inhabitants, making it the most populous county in the Wisconsin Territory east of the Mississippi River.(Thwaites 1895, p.249.)Mineral Point remained an important lead mining center during the 1840s. Although the most easily accessible lead deposits on the surface were being exhausted by this time, new immigrants began to arrive with more refined techniques for extracting ore. The largest group came from Cornwall, which had been a mining center for centuries. Experienced Cornish miners were attracted to the lead mining opportunities in Mineral Point, and by 1845 roughly half of the towns population had Cornish ancestry.(Nesbit 1989, p.114.) The original dwellings of some of these early Cornish immigrants have been restored at the Pendarvis Historic Site in Mineral Point. Lead continued to be produced in abundant quantities by the Cornish miners, and in 1847, the Mineral Point Tribune reported that the towns furnaces were producing 43,800 pounds (19,900 kg) of lead each day.(Fiedler 1973, p.84.)Mining activity in Mineral Point began to decline in the following years. In 1848, the same year that Wisconsin achieved statehood, gold was discovered in California. Many experienced miners left Mineral Point to look for gold, and in all, the town lost 700 people during the Gold Rush.(Fiedler 1973, p.95.) While the lead industry in Mineral Point continued into the 1860s, the town never recovered its former importance. A further blow was struck in 1861 when the county seat of Iowa County was relocated to nearby Wisconsin, where it remains today. Afterwards there was an intense rivalry between the two cities, during which Mineral Point fired a cannon towards Dodgevilles direction. As lead mining declined in Mineral Point, zinc mining and smelting became important new industries. Zinc ore was discovered with increasing frequency near the bottoms of old lead mines. The Mineral Point Zinc Company was founded in 1882, and by 1891 it was operating the largest oxide works in the United States at Mineral Point.(Fiedler 1973, p.147.) Zinc mining and processing continued on a large scale until the 1920s.GeographyMineral Point is located at  (42.860465, -90.183204).According to the States Census Bureau, the city has a total area of 3.0 square miles (7.8 km), all land.DemographicsAs of the census of 2000, there were 2,617 people, 1,092 households, and 693 families residing in the city. The density was 868.1 people per square mile (335.7/km). There were 1,192 housing units at an average density of 395.4 per square mile (152.9/km). The racial makeup of the city was 99.01% White, 0.19% Black or African American, 0.04% Native American, 0.23% Asian, 0.15% from other races, and 0.38% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.42% of the population.There were 1,092 households of which 29.6% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 51.0% were married couples living together, 8.9% had a female householder with no husband present, and 36.5% were non-families. 30.5% of all households were made up of individuals, and 13.2% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.33, and the average family size was 2.91.In the city the population was spread out with 24.5% under the age of 18, 7.7% from 18 to 24, 28.8% from 25 to 44, 21.2% from 45 to 64, and 17.7% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 38 years. For every 100 females there were 90.5 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 86.2 males.The median income for a household in the city was $43,182, and the median income for a family was $52,137. Males had a median income of $31,750 versus $23,396 for females. The capita income for the city was $21,097. About 3.8% of families and 4.9% of the population were below the line, including 1.5% of those under age 18 and 15.6% of those age 65 or over. Cuisine Mineral Point claims to serve authentic Cornish food, such as pasties and figgyhobbin.(Pendarvis - Shops & Restaurants) However, the differences between pasties from Cornwall and those from Mineral Point are stark. Cornish author Rich Smith has noted that Mineral Point pasties are served in polystyrene boxes (not bags), are presented with forks (Cornish pasties are eaten with bare hands), and have no crimped crust (a quintessential element of a Cornish pasty). Smith also observed that the pasties in Mineral Point are served with chili sauce and are distinctive in taste. Smith wrote: It wasnt so much the ingredients that were wrong; it was the texture and the taste. It was dry and quite stodgy and I almost regretted declining the chilli sauce - a difficult thing for a Cornishman to admit.()RecreationThe city is home to an endpoint of the Country Trail. Sister city * Mineral Point is twinned with Redruth in Cornwall, England.Notable people* Catlin, Acting Governor of the Wisconsin Territory* Samuel Crawford, Wisconsin Supreme Court* Cobb, U.S. Representative* Lee Croft, NFL player* Bill Dyke, former U.S. vice presidential candidate* Enzenroth, MLB player* William Hutchison, Air Force Major General* M. Jackson, jurist and diplomat* Ludden, host of the show, Password, was born in Mineral Point.* G. Monahan, U.S. Representative* B. Moore, of Honor recipient* Ovitz, baseball player* Thomas Rawleigh, Illinois State Representative* Rudolph Smith, Pennsylvania State Senator, Attorney General of Wisconsin* C. Washburn, U.S. Representative, founder of MillsHistorical buildingsPractically the entire city is a historical district, with block after block of charming stone cottages and businesses crafted by the Cornish settlers in the 1800s.  A more recent building is the City Hall, built in 1914, which includes the Library and the Opera House.  The Opera House underwent a $2 million renovation in 2010.  Pendarvis is a historically accurate preservation of some of the original cottages, and is a state historical site, open for tours in the summer months.  Shake Rag Alley contains seven historic structures, and is a community owned center for the arts, with a robust childrens art program, adult classes, and an outdoor summer theatre - Alley Stage.* Fort Jackson* Walker House* Orchard Lawn - home of the Mineral Point Historical Society* Mineral Point Opera House* Shake Rag Alley Center for the ArtsNotesReferences***External links* Mineral Point** Gundry House** Pointer Dog* Pendarvis State Historic Site* Mineral Point Railroad SocietyPoint (Wisconsin)PointPointPoint, WisconsinPoint (Wisconsin)Point (Wisconsin)Point (Wisconsin)
261785
Dutch_disease
In economics, the Dutch disease is a concept that purportedly explains the apparent relationship between the increase in exploitation of resources and a decline in the manufacturing sector.  The claimed mechanism is that an increase in revenues from natural resources (or inflows of foreign aid) will make a given nations currency stronger compared to that of other nations (manifest in an rate), resulting in the nations other exports becoming more expensive for other countries to buy, making the manufacturing sector less competitive. While it most often refers to natural resource discovery, it can also refer to any development that results in a large inflow of foreign currency, including a sharp surge in natural resource prices, foreign assistance, and foreign direct investment.()The term was coined in 1977 by Economist to describe the decline of the manufacturing sector in the Netherlands after the discovery of a large gas field in 1959.(The Dutch Disease (November 26, 1977). The Economist, pp. 82-83.) The Core Model The classic economic model describing Dutch Disease was developed by the economists Max Corden and Peter Neary in 1982. In the model, there is the non-traded good sector (this includes services) and two traded good sectors: the booming sector, and the lagging sector, also called the non-booming tradable sector. The booming sector is usually the extraction of oil or natural gas, but can also be the mining of gold, copper, diamonds or bauxite, or the production of crops, such as coffee or cocoa. The lagging sector generally refers to manufacturing, but can also refer to agriculture.A resource boom will affect this economy in two ways. In the resource movement effect, the resource boom will increase the demand for labor, which will cause production to shift toward the booming sector, away from the lagging sector. This shift in labor from the lagging sector to the booming sector is called direct-deindustrialization. However, this effect can be negligible, since the hydrocarbon and mineral sectors generally employ few people.() The spending effect occurs as a result of the extra revenue brought in by the resource boom. It increases the demand for labor in the non-tradable, shifting labor away from the lagging sector. This shift from the lagging sector to the non-tradable sector is called indirect-deindustrialization.( As a result of the increased demand for non-traded goods, the price of these goods will increase. However, prices in the traded good sector are set internationally, so they cannot change. This is an increase of the real exchange rate.() Effects In simple trade models, a country ought to specialise in industries in which it has a advantage, so theoretically a country rich in natural resources would be better off specialising in the extraction of natural resources. In reality, however, the shift away from manufacturing can be detrimental.If the natural resources begin to run out or if there is a downturn in prices, competitive manufacturing industries do not return as quickly or as easily as they left. This is because technological growth is smaller in the booming sector and the non-tradable sector than the non-booming tradable sector.(Van Wijnbergen, Sweder (1984). The Dutch Disease: A Disease After All? The Economic Journal 94 373:41. ) Since there has been less technological growth in the economy relative to other countries, its comparative advantage in non-booming tradable goods will have shrunk, thus leading firms not to invest in the tradables sector.(Krugman, Paul (1987). The Narrow Moving Band, the Dutch Disease, and the Competitive Consequences of Mrs. Thatcher. Journal of Development Economics 27 1-2:50. ) Also, volatility in the price of natural resources, and thus the real exchange rate, may prevent more investment from firms, since firms will not invest if they are not sure what the future economic conditions will be.(Gylfason, T., Herbertsson, T.T., Zoega, G. (1999). A mixed blessing. Dynamics. 3 June:212.) Minimization There are two basic ways to reduce the threat of Dutch disease: by slowing the appreciation of the real exchange rate and by boosting the competitiveness of the manufacturing sector.One approach is to sterilize the boom revenues, that is, not to bring all the revenues into the country all at once, and to save some of the revenues abroad in special funds and bring them in slowly. Sterilisation will reduce the spending effect. Another benefit of letting the revenues into the country slowly is that it can give a country a stable revenue stream, rather than not knowing how much revenue it will have from year to year. Also, by saving the boom revenues, a country is saving some of the revenues for future generations. Especially in developing countries, this can be politically difficult as there is often pressure to spend the boom revenues immediately to alleviate poverty, but this ignores broader macroeconomic implications. Examples of these wealth funds include the Government Pension Fund in Norway, the Fund of the Russian Federation, the Oil Fund of Azerbaijan, and the Future Generations Fund of the State of Kuwait established in 1976. Recent talks led by the Nations Development Programme in Cambodia  International Oil and Gas Conference on fueling poverty reduction  point out the need for better education of state officials and energy cadres linked to a possible Sudden Wealth Fund to avoid the curse (Paradox of plenty).Another strategy for avoiding real exchange rate appreciation is to increase saving in the economy in order to reduce large capital inflows which are able to cause an appreciation of the real exchange rate. This can be done if the country runs a budget surplus. A country can encourage individuals and firms to save more by reducing income and profit taxes. By increasing saving, a country can reduce the need for loans to finance government deficits and direct investment.Investments in education and infrastructure have the ability to increase the competitiveness of the manufacturing sector. An alternative is that a government can resort to protectionism, that is, increase subsidies or tariffs. However, this could be a dangerous strategy and could worsen the effects of Dutch Disease, as large inflows of foreign capital are usually provided by the export sector and bought up by the import sector. Imposing tariffs on imported goods will artificially reduce that sectors demand for foreign currency, leading to further appreciation of the real exchange rate.(Collier, Paul (2007). The Bottom Billion. University Press, pp. 162) Diagnosis It is rather difficult to definitively say that a country has Dutch Disease because it is difficult to prove the relationship between an increase in natural resource revenues, the real-exchange rate, and a decline in the lagging sector. There are a number of different things that could be causing this appreciation of the real exchange rate. The effect occurs when productivity-increases affect the real exchange rate. Also important are changes in the of trade and large capital inflows.(De Gregario, Jos, Wolf, Wolger C. (1994). Terms of trade, productivity, and the real exchange rate. NBER Working Paper 4807. Cambridge, MA.) Often these capital inflows are caused by foreign direct investment or to finance a countrys debt.Similarly, it is difficult to show what is causing a decrease in the lagging sector. A case in point is the Netherlands. Though this effect is named after the Netherlands, economists have argued that the decline in the Dutch manufacturing industry was actually caused by unsustainable spending on social services.(Corden (1984), 359) Examples *gold rush in the 19th century, first documented by Cairns in 1859(*Australian mineral commodities in the 2000s()*Australian mineral boom in 2011()*Signs of emerging Dutch disease in Chile in the late 2000s, due to the boom in mineral commodity prices (http://www.economia.puc.cl/docs/luders_27_01_10.pdf)*Azerbaijani oil in the 2000s()*Canadas rising dollar hurting the manufacturing sector in the 2000s due to foreign investment in oil, particularly the oil sands.()()*Greatly increased export revenues for Indonesia after the oil booms in 1974 and 1979(Peter McCawley, Indonesias New Balance of Payments Problem: a Surplus to get rid of, Ekonomi dan Keuangan Indonesia, 28(1), March 1980, pp. 39-58.)*Property Bubble in the 2000s(The Irish Economy and the Inconvenient Truth http://www.finfacts.com/irelandbusinessnews/publish/article_10009014.shtml)*Zealand industry boom in the 2000s ()*Nigeria and other post-colonial African states in the 1990s(Our Continent, Our Future, Mkandawire, T. and C. Soludo. In most recent attempts to explain Africas performance with growth and investment regressions, studies find that inaccessible location, poor port facilities, and the Dutch Disease syndrome, caused by large natural-resource endowments, constitute serious impediments to investment and growth.)*The Philippines strong exchange market inflows in the 2000s leading to appreciation of currency and loss of competitiveness(Strong forex inflows now hurting economy, GMANews.TV.)*Russian oil and natural gas in the 2000s(Dutch Disease Hits Russia,  Latsis, O. (2005).  Moscow News, June 814.)(Mining accounts for most of the economic growth)*Gold and other wealth imported to Spain during the 16th century from the Americas(Using data on 118 countries over the period 1970-2007, a study by economists at the University of Cambridge provides evidence against the Dutch disease operating in  primary commodity abundant countries.() They also show that it is the volatility in commodity prices, rather than abundance per se, that drives the curse paradox. See also * curse References Further reading* External links * Norways Government Pension Fund* State Oil Fund of the Azerbaijan RepublicsindromuholandsKrankheittbiholandsmalsanohollandaiseBelandaveikinolandeseslimbaziekte (economie)ja:sykesjukeholenderskaholandesatautisjukanhastalbnh H Lanzh:
263220
Ancash_Region
Ancash is a region in northern Peru. It is bordered by the Libertad region on the north, the Hunuco and Pasco regions on the east, the Lima region on the south, and the Ocean on the west. Its capital is the city of Huaraz, and its largest city and port is Chimbote. The name of the region originates from the Quechua word anqash, which means blue. Geography File:Taulliraju.JPG|thumb|250px|left|Mt. Taulliraju is a beautiful mountain in Ancash at 5,885 metersAncash is a land of contrasts. It has two, great longitudinal valleys, which combine the mountain characteristics of the Callejn de Huaylas (Alley of Huaylas) with the sylvan ones of the Maran. Miles of sandy beaches abut the blue waters of the Pacific.  The territory of the coast, high plateaus and Andean punas of the Ancash Region are flat, while the rest of the territory, in the Andes, is very rough. In the west, slopes with strong declivity form narrow canyons with abrupt and deserted sides.  The rough territory of the region is crossed by two ranges: on thewestern side, its the Negra (the Black Mountain Range), which has peaks without glaciers, and on the eastern side, its the Blanca (the White Mountain Range), which has many peaks covered with snow and ice, like the Huascarn and the Alpamayo. Between these two mountain ranges, the River flows through the so-called Callejn de Huaylas. This alley narrows to form the del Pato (Duck Canyon). Also along the Pacific slopes, the Santa River has shaped a wide valley in the punas which narrows into the Cordillera Negra where the Can del Pato canyon was formed. The snow-covered peak of Huascarn, highest summit of Peru and second of the Americas, reaches a height of 6,768 m (22,205 ft, 4.2 miles) and contrasts with the 6,263 m (20,548 ft) deep trough of Chimbote found in the ocean west of Ancash. Remnants of glaciers created many lagoons, such as Llanganuco and Paron.Following the highway north from Lima, the territory of the region of Ancash begins just beyond the of Paramonga, between wide fields of sugarcane, and across the River, 206 kilometres (128 mi) from Lima. Along the coast of Ancash, from the Fortaleza River to the Santa River, the Pacific exerts great influence. The Peruvian current and the El Nio current exert considerable and sometimes tragic effect on local lives and regional economies.  Normally, the Peruvian current, also known as the Current, brings cold water and lots of fish. With the development of the shoals of anchoveta, the Ancash ports and creeks became commercial fishing centers. During the 1950s, the bay of Chimbote was the top fishing port of the world.(http://www.dreancash.gob.pe/ugel_santa.php Peru Ministry of Education, Resea histrica. Retrieved on August 7, 2007.) However, when warmer waters from the north, such as the current of El Nio, bring catastrophic rains to the coast and sea, the shoals of anchoveta disappear, leaving the fleets plants paralyzed; and flooding rivers cause serious damage to the lands and cities. The cycles of these two sea currents that affect Peru are hard to predict.(http://www.imn.ac.cr/publicaciones/estudios/Nino_rev_bibliog.pdf Villalobos, Roberto  Flores and Alberto, Jos Retana, El Nio: Una Revisin Bibliogrfica. Retrieved on August 7, 2007.) Further north along the Pan-American highway, numerous islands and islets dot the sea near the coast. Most are home only to guano seabirds. From south to north, the most important islands include:* Tortuga Island (Turtle Island)* Viuda Island (The Widow Island)* Island (White Island)* Island (Holy Island)The coastal region of Peru includes many peninsulas, creeks, warm bays and sand beaches, full of color. Because of the lack of roads and difficult terrain, many of these are inaccessible by land.  The most important beaches include:* Beach* Gramita Beach* Salinas BeachMuch of this coast is a monotonous stretch of huge sand deserts, a common denominator in all Peruvian coastal regions because of the influence of the Humboldt Current.Along the rivers, there are green valleys, cultivated mainly with sugarcane, rice and cotton.From south to north, the main rivers of the Ancash coast are the following:* River* River* River* River* River* River*  Santa RiverOf these rivers, the only one with water year-round is the Santa River; its sources are the Cordillera Blancas glaciers and lagoons. The other rivers, as with most rivers of the Peruvian coast, are intermittent, depending on the highland rains or the advance of El Nio. Pativilca-Caraz-Huallanca Route The historical village of Pativilca (department of Lima), where Simn Bolvar planned his Peruvian liberty expedition, is 202 kilometres (126 mi) north of Lima on the Pan-American Highway. At this point begins the highway that leads to the Callejn de Huaylas. This road is completely paved, although it often has to be repaired because of the extreme damage caused by the huaycos (avalanches) and the rains. The same problem affects most Peruvian roads, especially the ones in the mountains and rainforest.   This highway is 287 kilometres (178 mi) long, with an extremely comfortable course, especially in the steep climbing stretches through the Cordillera Negra (Black Range) up to the summit of Conococha, 4,100 metres (13,451 ft) above sea level. From there, the road begins to go down toward the Callejn de Huaylas.    The trip Lima-Huaraz-Caraz of 468 kilometres (254 mi) can be made in seven hours by car. Modern buses take eight hours in the same stretch.   East of Pativilca, for about 20 kilometres (12 mi) the highway passes between wide fields planted with sugarcane in extensive fields, parallel to the river bed.    At Huaricanga town, the road enters the department of Ancash. At this point, the highway begins a slow ascent of the first spurs of the Cordillera Negra. This stretch continues for about 50 kilometres (31 mi). The climb gets suddenly steeper beyond the towns of Chasquitambo and Chaucayn, with many bends and serpentines.    The White Mountain Range File:Huascaran norte.JPG|thumb|left|300px|Huascarn, the highest summit in Peru   This range is composed by gigantic summits covered with snow, which are among the most beautiful of the world. The White mountain range is considered the highest tropical mountain range in the world. It borders the de Huaylas to the east. It has a length of 180 km.   It has 35 peaks that are higher than 6000 m and many other smaller ones, a real symphony of summits with different grades of difficulty in climbing.   This mountain range was called White, not only for its eternal snow but also for the chemical constitution of its quartz and feldspar rocks. It has the highest summit in Peru and the fifth one in America after Aconcagua, del Salado, Bonete and Mercedario: Huascarn, whose south peak reaches 6768 msnm. Huascarns north peak reaches 6655 m.   Alpamayo, which height has been estimated in 5,947 m, has been considered as the most beautiful snow mountain of the world. This statement was achieved by the distinguished Peruvian mountaineer Morales Arnao, who sent the photo of Alpamayo to the world contest of scenic beauty made in 1966 in Mnich, Germany.   North Huandoy reaches 6395 m, Huantsn reaches 6410 m, Chopicalqui reaches 6354 m, North Copa reaches 6173 m, Artesonraju reaches 6025 m, South Santa Cruz reaches 6259 m and Hualcn reaches 6126 m.   The beauty of the Blanca is largely determined by the Negra, because this range soften the winds that come from the ocean. The Negra, acting as a shield, avoids the thaw of the big glaciers from the Blanca.   The Negra has rocky peaks with very little winter snowfall, reaching a maximum height of 5500 m. Its name comes from the comparison with the white snowy peaks of the Blanca.  Huascarn National Park File:PuyaRaimondi2.JPG|thumb|right|250px|The raimondii, a gigantic inflorescence, unique to Peru and BoliviaThe National Park is one of the most outstanding conservation parks in Peru, due to its landscapes that are full of peaks, lakes, canyons, torrents and waterfalls. Inside its borders, it can be observed the whole Blanca and seven peaks of more than 6000 m height. They constitute one of the main international focuses for climbers and mountaineers. It was stated as a Park on July 1, 1975 with a surface of 340,000 ha and a length of 158 km. This Park includes parts of the following provinces: Recuay, Huaraz, Carhuaz, Yungay, Huaylas, Pomabamba, Mariscal Luzuriaga, Huari, Corongo, Sihuas and Bolognesi. This park has also been stated as a reservation and as a Heritage Site by the UNESCO.The park territory is very uneven. It has snowy summits, which altitudes vary between 5000 and 6768 msnm. It also has gullies, that are deeply encased because of the fluvioglacial erosion, and a great number of lagoons. Inside the borders of the park, there are 663 glaciers that are distributed throughout 180 km, from the Tuco peak in the south up to Champar in the north.Regarding its climate, there are two very well defined seasons:   * The season, from April to September, becoming worse between the months of June and August; and* The season, from October to May, which highest rainfall is between January and March.Its flora is countless and beautiful, including important groups of Puya Raimondi. In its fauna, there are brown brockets, tarucas, bears, vicuas, pumas, foxes, vizcachas, weasels, mountain cats, opossums, skunks, etc.   There is also a great number of birds, predominating ducks, coots and hummingbirds.    Extreme sports in the Callejn de Huaylas and the Huascarn National Park * Mountaineering: The glaciers of the Blanca constitute one of the most important world scenarios for ice climbing. Mountaineering can be practiced the whole year but the weather is best between the months of May and September.* Trekking: The prehispanic paths offer excellent opportunities for trekking during the whole year. On the way, it can be observed varied flora, fauna, impressive snowy mountains, gullies and deep canyons, sites and several typical villages. There are several routes that last from one day to three weeks.* Camping: It is a pleasant and a relaxing experience to spend the night under the moonlight, having as a unique companion: the stars and some constellations like Capricornus, Crux, Centaurus and others. This sport can be practiced at any time of the year.* Canoeing: The river has the technical characteristics and different difficulty grades for practicing river sports as canoeing, kayak and others. For example, there are some rapids between Anta and Caraz that are good for those who are just beginning to practice this sport. The lagoons of Langanuco and Querococha also offer some special characteristic for a boat ride.* Cycling: The cyclists that ride on the highways and roads enjoy the practice of this sport by traveling inside and outside the National Park. This sport can be practiced at any time of the year. The north area, near Caraz, offers the best rides, single tracks and down hill tracks.* climbing: The granite belt that goes round the glaciers of the Blanca (White Mountain range) constitutes the suitable place for practicing this sport. There are walls from 100 m to 1000 m of height that have many kinds of technical difficulties to get through. There is an odd scenario for this sport called de Monterrey.* skiing: It consists on slipping from the glaciers. The most favorable ones for practicing this sport are: Pastoruri, Copa, Hualcn, Huascarn, Vallunaraju and Perlilla, the latter being recently discovered and promoted by the local government of the province of Asuncin, with 6 km of moderate and steep slopes where competitions were held soon snowboarding and alpine skiing. These snowcapped mountains are ideal for practicing the slide on snow (also known as siquiesqui) and for making snowmen.* Paragliding - gliding: Along the de Huaylas, there are several places that are favourable for the practice of these flight sports. They can be practiced at any time of the year.* riding: It is a sport of big emotions. It is practiced on paths with Peruvian horsess that were raised in the de Huaylas.* Fishing: The rod fishing of trouts can be practiced in rivers and lagoons of the Blanca and Negra at any time of the year. The Black Mountain Range The route Casma-Huaraz is not a very highly travelled road. The highway begins with a paved path that arrives up to Yautn. Then it quickly begins to ascend through an unpaved path by the sides of the Negra (Black mountain range), following the course of the River. This route becomes more steep once it arrives to Pariacoto. Along the road, there are not important towns at all, except for Pira that offers some travelers services.This route, extremely steep and narrow, goes between big abysses and gullies. It can be seen small rural districts with chacras (smallholdings) that have been sown with potatoes, wheat, barley and other food products. It can also be seen livestock and a lot of human activity.The gullies of the Negra -that goes, simultaneously, with the Blanca throughout 150 km- are gloomy and dark. Most of them are dry or their flow is scarce. From north to south, there are some hills like Rumicruz (5020 m), Rocarre (5187 m), Cerro Rico (5015 m), and Chonta (4810 m).The Blancas beauty is largely determined by the Negra, because this range soften the winds that come from the ocean. The Negra, acts like a shield and avoids the thaw of the big glaciers that are located in the Blanca.   The Negra has rocky peaks with very little winter snow, reaching a maximum height of 5500 m. Its name comes from the comparison with the white snowy peaks of the Blanca. The Santa River and the Caon del Pato (Duck Canyon) From Chimbote to Huallanca, there are approximately 140 km. This unpaved and very little travelled highway is a provisional line over the embankment of the old railroad. This railway and several tunnels were destroyed by the catastrophe of 1970.The highway, outside Chimbote, goes through the wide flat and fertile embankments of the valley and it continuous its course up to Huallanca.From Chuquicara, the highway becomes narrower. The river is a big Santas tributary for its right bank. Its waters are black because they contain abundant coal sediments proceeding from the heights of Pallasca.From Huallanca, it is possible to travel through the del Pato. This canyon is one the many canyons that are along the 370 km of the river. The river has its source in the lagoon. This river is the most important river in the coast, because its annual water mass is 6100 millions of m3. As centuries went by, it has formed a narrow pass of 2000 m of altitude in the Negra.In this place, the waters turn into whirlpools and rapids before going out from a narrow gorge of 500 m that is called del Pato (Duck Cannyon). This water fall constitutes the source of hydroelectric energy in the Power station of the del Pato, in Huallanca.From Huallanca, it is possible to enter to the de Huaylas by the highway that takes to Caraz. It is also a way to enter to the de Conchucos (Conchucos alley). The Callejn de Conchucos The Callejon de Conchucos is a beautiful succession of valleys located to the east of the Blanca. It is connected by a highway that goes from Catac to Huallanca.There are eight provinces of the Ancash Region that cover the Callejon de Conchucos. They are Huari, Asuncin, Antonio Raimondi, Mariscal Luzuriaga, Pomabamba, Sihuas, Corongo and Pallasca. This Callejn is located to the east of the Blanca, that is to say, to the other side of the Callejon of Huaylas, before the Maraon river.The topography of the soil presents high summits, deep valleys and inhospitable punas, making it a rough zone, such as most of the highland in Peru.The northern provinces of Pallasca and Corongo have their own direct access towards Chimbote and the of Huaylas. The other provinces have a longitudinal highway of double entry, one from Huari and the other one from Huallanca and Sihuas, joining Pomabamba, Luzuriaga and Raimondi. History File:Chavn de Huntar.JPG|thumb|250px|de HuantarBetween the years 400 and 600 BC, the first Peruvian civilization, known as Chavn, originated and flourished in this zone. The importance of this culture lies not only in its antiquity but in the history and culture it shares with other cultures along the Andean and Amazonian territories. As archaeologist C. Tello put it, Chavn was the mother of all the cultures that later bloomed in the old Peru. The name Chavn comes from the Quechua word Chaupin, which translates as center or headquarters. Tello believed that people came from the Amazonas, scaled the Andes, and developed the Chavn culture. During the Inca age, the population of the Santa valley was assimilated into the Inca empire by Pachacuti.The first Spaniards came to Huaylas attracted by the fame of the silver veins of the region. In time, the Spanish destroyed the Inca cities.  It was during this time that de Alvarado founded the city of Huaraz. Though in the Colonial Age this city held little importance and its artistic and cultural life did not have much relevance, it became the headquarters for Bolvar during his campaign to liberate Peru.The Ancash earthquake devastated the region, killing more than 50,000 people and damaging 186,000 houses in one of the deadliest natural disasters in Peru.Today, most of the Ancash population is concentrated in the de Huaylas. Economy Ancashs economy the third largest in Peru is largely made up of gold, copper and zinc mining. Its coast is rich in fishing resources and it is Perus most productive fishing region (Peru is the worlds largest exporter of Meal). Crops cultivated in Ancash include potatoes, wheat and barley. Tourism File:Chacas Sur.jpg|250px|thumb|Panoramic view of the town of Chacas Ancashs geographical center, the Callejn de Huaylas, is an area of intense interest to tourists. This is due to its large variety of natural attractions, its sport and recreational facilities, and the nearby archaeological remains of the ancient cultures that once flourished there. The Cordillera Blanca, the highest peak in the Peruvian Andes, offers an interesting attraction for tourists visiting Peru. Visitors also come to see the natural beauty of the areas glaciers and valleys and to enjoy the many lagoons and thermal fountains. Ancash is sometimes referred to as the Switzerland of Peru. There is the four mile high Huascarn, home to the National Park. There is also the Alpamayo peak, considered one of the most beautiful in the world. Among archaeological sites of interest, Ancash has many vestiges of old cultures, including the Guitarrero Cave (10,000 BC), the pre-Columbian ruins of Chavn de Huntar. Hunsakay, Willkawain, Sechn, and Paamarca are also well-known. Tours There are a few tours in the Ancash Region that will let us know the main turistic and historical places inside this Region. Among the principal ones are:* Huaraz - Recuay - Catac - ravine and Pastoruri.* Yungay - Llanganuco - Vaquera - Huaripampa - Santa Cruz and Caraz.* Caon del Pato.* Huaraz - Pitec - Quillcay and Juanca.* Puya Raimondi at Mirador de Huinchus* Huaraz - Olleros - Yanashallash - de Huantar - Querococha and Catac.* Paron lake* Catac and Carpa.* Huaraz - Wilkawain and ravine.* Huaraz - Carhuaz - Chacas - Perlilla Transportation There are five main highways that cross the region: * The North Pan-American highway, that crosses the coast of Ancash longitudinally.* Three east-west highways that connect the coast with the region of the highlands, most importantly the Callejn de Huaylas:** Pativilca - Huaraz - Caraz - Huallanca** Nepea - Pamparomas - Caraz** Huarmey - Aija - Recuay** Casma - Huaraz** Chimbote - Huallanca - Caraz* One highway that crosses the de Conchucos (Conchucos Alley) longitudinally, to the east of the Cordillera Blanca.In addition, the region has a network of local roads. Political division The region is divided into 20 provinces (provincias, singular: provincia), which comprise 166 districts (distritos, singular: distrito). Its capital is Huaraz. The provinces and their capitals are: Additional facts  References  External links * Ancash Region, Traveljacha suyube-x-old:bs:Ancashbg:dAncash(region)de:Ancashde AncashdAncashAncashdi Ancash()Ancatiensisdepartamentas()Ancashnah:Ancax(regio)ja:no:Ancash-regionennn:Ancash-regionenpnb:Ancash(regio)suyu()fi:Ancashsv:Ancashth:()(rehiyon)zh:
264549
Tracked_vehicle
A tracked vehicle (also called: track-type tractor, tractor crawler, or track-laying vehicle) is a vehicle that runs on tracks instead of wheels.  Tracked vehicles include vehicles, military vehicles and ground vehicles.   The principal design advantages of tracked over wheeled vehicles are that they are in contact with a larger surface area than would generally be the case with a wheeled vehicle, and as a result exert a much lower force per unit area on the ground being traversed than a conventional wheeled vehicle of the same weight. This makes them suitable for use on soft, low friction and uneven ground such as mud, ice and snow. The principal disadvantage is that tracks are a more complex mechanism than a wheel, and relatively prone to failure modes such as snapped or derailed tracks.HistoryA long line of patents disputes who the originator was of this concept.There were a large number of designs that attempted to achieve a track laying mechanism, although these designs do not generally resemble modern tracked vehicles.()()()BlinovFile:Blinov.jpg|220px|thumb|The draft of Blinovs steam-powered track tractorIn 1877 Russian Fyodor Abramovich Blinov created tracked vehicle called wagon moved on endless rails (caterpillars).(The inventor of tractor ) It lacked self-propelling and was horse-drawn. Blinov got a patent for his wagon the next year. Later, in 1881-1888 he created steam-powered caterpillar-tractor. This self-propelled crawler was successfully tested and showed at farmers exhibition in 1896.(DinsmoorAccording to Scientific American it was Dinsmoor of Pennsylvania that invented a vehicle that was of endless tracks. The article gives a detailed description of the endless tracks and the illustration looks much like todays tracked vehicles.(Scientific American, December 18, 1886, Vol. LV, No. 25) The invention has been patented as No. 351,749 on November 2, 1886.(Kane, Joseph Nathan, Famous First Facts, H. W. Wilson Company (1950),  p. 47)( A design for a tracked vehicle.)LombardImage:Lombard steam log hauler.jpg|thumb|right|Restored Steam Log HaulerAlvin O. Lombard of Maine was issued a patent in 1901 for the Steam Log Hauler that resembles a regular railroad steam locomotive with sled steerage on front and crawlers in rear for hauling logs in the Northeastern United States and Canada. The haulers allowed pulp to be taken to rivers in the winter. Prior to then, horses could be used only until snow depths made hauling impossible. Lombard began commercial production which lasted until around 1917 when focus switched entirely to gasoline powered machines. A gasoline powered hauler is on display at the Maine State Museum in Maine.Hornsby/Holt/PhoenixAfter Lombard began operations, Hornsby in England manufactured at least two full length track steer machines, and their patent was later purchased by Holt in 1913, allowing Holt to claim to be the inventor of the crawler tractor.() Since the tank was a British concept it is more likely the Hornsby, which had been built and unsuccessfully pitched to their military, was the inspiration.In a patent dispute involving rival crawler builder Best, testimony was brought in from people including Lombard, that Holt had inspected a Lombard log hauler shipped out to a western state by people who would later build the Phoenix log hauler in Eau Claire, Wisconsin, under license from Lombard. The Phoenix Centipeed typically had a fancier wood cab, steering wheel tipped forward at a 45 degree angle and vertical instead of horizontal cylinders.LinnIn the meantime a gasoline powered home was built by Lombard for Holman Harry (Flannery) Linn of Town, Maine to pull the equipment wagon of his dog & pony show, resembling a trolley car only with wheels in front and Lombard crawlers in rear. Linn had experimented with gasoline and steam powered vehicles and six wheel drive before this, and at some point entered Lombards employment as a demonstrator, mechanic and sales agent. This resulted in a question of proprietorship of patent rights after a single rear tracked gasoline powered road engine of tricycle arrangement was built to replace the larger motor home in 1909 on account of problems with the old picturesque wooden bridges. This dispute resulted in Linn departing Maine and relocating to Morris, New York, to build an improved, contour following flexible lag tread or crawler with suspension of halftrack type, gasoline and later diesel powered. Although several were delivered for military use between 1917 and 1946, Linn never received any large military orders. Most of the production between 1917 and 1952, approximately 2500 units, was sold directly to highway departments and contractors. Steel tracks and payload capacity allowed these machines to work in terrain that would typically cause the poorer quality rubber tires that existed before the mid 1930s to spin uselessly, or shred completely.Linn was a pioneer in snow removal before the practice was embraced in rural areas, with a nine foot steel v-plow and sixteen foot adjustable leveling wings on either side. Once the highway system became paved, snowplowing could be done by wheel drive trucks equipped by improving tire designs, and the Linn became an off highway vehicle, for logging, mining, dam construction, exploration, etc.SloanOnce steel cleats became unpopular on paved roads, in 1938 a limited experiment began to bridge the gap between truck and tractor, a convertible vehicle patented by Phillip Sloan, the C5 Catruk, suffered design flaws and limited production before it was finally abandoned.Fate of pioneer companiesLombard gasoline production was more limited as they never managed to diversify use away from log hauling; it is believed a diesel built in 1934 was their last unit.Phoenix, of Claire, Wisconsin, appears to have built at least one gasoline powered machine before fading into history.Holt and Best ended up merging. Holt had registered the trademark Caterpillar. The merged company produced a version of the Best 60 tractor, which later became the 60. The new corporation took the name Inc. in approximately 1925, and remains in business today.Current manufacturersFor certain tasks, such as soil preparation and maintenance on very steep slopes, crawler tractors are still used. A notable example is vineyards, e.g. in Italy.(Crawler tractors for vineyards) Today, the pioneer manufacturers have been replaced mostly by large tractor companies such as Deere, New Holland, Kubota,(Kubota crawler tractor) Case, Inc., CLAAS.(CASE, Caterpillar, CLAAS crawler tractors) Also, there are some crawler tractor companies specialising in niche markets. Examples are Otter Mfg. Co. and Struck Corporation.(Otter & Struck manufacturing niche crawler tractors)Examples* The crawler tractor was the basis of the first designs of tank.* Crawlers equipped with a  blade are called bulldozers, and used for construction and earthmoving projects.* tracked machines equipped with a shovel or bucket are often called a Traxcavator, but are a Tracked Shovel or Loader. The Traxcavator name was a brand of the Trackson company and was bought by Inc. in the 1950.* Crawler design have been intermittently popular for farm use.**Track Marshall being a brand built in Britain till the 1980s.* The shuttle is transported to its launch site by a large crawler-transporter.* One of the largest crawlers in the world is the German 288 excavator.Other types of tracks*trackSee also* vehicle* Snowmobiles* Tanks* Tracs* Snowcat* Sno-Cat* coach* 202* 206* Half-track References External links*Blinovs crawler *F. A. Blinov - in Russianroda rantaivozidloda:Bltekretjde:Kettenfahrzeug(mcanique)movilohe:nl:Rupsbandnn:Beltekjretyukad bienyfi:Telaketjusv:Bandfordon
265202
Rutherglen,_Victoria
NSW)Rutherglen  is a small town in north-eastern Australia, near the River border with South Wales.  The town was named after the Scottish town of Rutherglen which lies just outside Glasgow.  At the 2006 census, Rutherglen had a population of 1,990.(FeaturesRutherglen is located north of Wangaratta and west of Wodonga, just 10 kilometres from the Murray River at the state border towns of Wahgunyah and Corowa.Originally a gold-mining town of the mid-19th century, Rutherglen Post Office opening on 1 November  1860,()it has since developed into a major wine producing area, with 17 wineries all located within a short drive from the town centre,the best of which are highly regarded by wine critics (Halliday, Parker). The muscat and tokay styles are sometimes described as having no worldwide equal. The region produces a good port style of fortified wine. The largest winery in the region is the All Saints Winery, located just a short drive north-west outside of Wahgunyah. Established in 1864, it features landscaped gardens, ponds, a restaurant and wine tasting facilities. The Rutherglen Wine Experience Visitor Information Centre, located in the town centre on Main Street, offers displays of the towns rich history, how wines are made, and comprehensive tourist information.The main street of Rutherglen maintains its historical charm, with most of the shop fronts retaining the same look they had a century ago. Attractions within the town include Lake King which is surrounded by Apex Park and Rutherglen Park, as well as the historical wine bottle shaped water tower in Campbell Street.SportThe town in conjunction with nearby town Corowa has an Rules football team (Corowa-Rutherglen) competing in the & Murray Football League.( ) Another Australian rules football team, Football Club, play in the & District Football League.Golfers play at the course of the Rutherglen Golf Club on Murray Street.()FestivalsEvery Queens Birthday long weekend in June, Rutherglen swells to the size of nearly 20,000 people on the occasion of the Country Fair/Winery Walkabout.The Tour de Rutherglen event, a cycle tour to various wineries,takes place here on the first weekend in November.Both are organised by the Rutherglen Rotary Club.See also*wineReferences*Heritage citation for the Victoria Hotel in the National Trust (Victoria) Register*Wine styles of Rutherglen by Australian wine critic, James Halliday*Rutherglen Tokay and Muscat by U.S. wine critic M. Parker, Jr.External links*http://www.rutherglenrotary.org(Australie)(Australi)
266241
Launceston,_Tasmania
Campbell TownLaunceston (, often mispronounced )(Macquarie Dictionary, Fourth Edition (2005). Melbourne, The Macquarie Library Pty Ltd. ISBN 1-876429-14-3)(In Australian English, the difference is between  and . )(The Cornish Launceston is  or , with the ses elided (and sometimes the t as well).) is a city in the north of the state of Tasmania, Australia at the junction of the North Esk and South Esk rivers where they become the Tamar River. Launceston is the second largest city in Tasmania after the state capital Hobart.( ) With a population (greater urban and statistical sub division) of 106,153,( Estimated resident population (ERP) at 30 June 2010.) Launceston is the ninth largest non-capital city in Australia. Settled by Europeans in March 1806, Launceston is one of Australias oldest cities and is home to many historic buildings.() Like many Australian places, it was named after a town in the United Kingdom  in this case, Cornwall.Launceston has also been home to several firsts such as the first use of anaesthetic in the Hemisphere, the first Australian city to have underground sewers and the first Australian city to be lit by hydroelectricity.() The city has a temperate climate with four distinct seasons. History The first inhabitants of the area of Launceston were largely nomadic Aborigines believed to have been part of the North Midlands Tribe. However, the first white visitors did not arrive until 1798, when Bass and Flinders were sent to explore the possibility that there was a strait between Australia and Diemens Land (now Tasmania).( ) They originally landed in Port Dalrymple (the mouth of the Tamar River),  to the north-west of Launceston.(The first significant colonial settlement in the region dates from 1804, when the commandant of the British garrison Lt. Col. William Paterson, and his men set up a camp where George Town now stands. A few weeks later, the settlement was moved across the river to York Town, and a year later they eventually settled in Launceston.()Initially the settlement was called Patersonia; however, Paterson later changed the name to Launceston in honour of the New South Wales Governor Captain Gidley King, who was born in Cornwall.( The name still survives in the tiny hamlet of Patersonia  north-west of Launceston. Paterson himself also served as Lieutenant-Governor of northern Van Diemens Land from 1804 to 1808.(By 1827, Launcestons population had climbed to 2,000 and the town had become an export centre, mainly for the colonys northern pastoral industry.( Tin was discovered at Bischoff in 1871 in north-western Tasmania, starting a minerals boom. Gold mining commenced approximately  away in Beaconsfield in 1877.( During the following two decades Launceston grew from a small town into an urban centre. In 1889, Launceston was the second town in Tasmania to be declared a city, after state capital Hobart.()Small hotels and breweries began to emerge in the 1820s, before larger, more substantial hotels were built in the 1830s. Sporting groups, political groups, churches and schools were often established is these hotels; however, they also hosted plays, musical soirees and readings, until theatres were built.New popular team sports such as cricket and football failed to be sustained in Launceston before the population grew substantially. The sports were initially middle class recreations, as the working class found it difficult to participate after a six day working week. Nevertheless, a demand for facilities lead to the upgrade of the Northern Tasmanian Cricket Association Ground (NTCA Ground) amongst other sporting facilities in the 1860s. Not long beforehand, Tasmania played Victoria in Australias first cricket match at the NTCA Ground in 1851.(Green (2006), p. 813.) Geography Launceston is located at  in the Tamar Valley, Northern Tasmania. The valley was formed by volcanic and glacial forces over 10 million years ago.(Wooley and Tatlow, p. 1.)()The city is located approximately  south of the Strait, with its closest neighbour-city being Devonport, approximately  to the north west.()Launceston combines steep (originally heavily wooded) ridges and low-lying areas (originally wetlands  with parts of the suburbs of Inveresk and Invermay below high-tide level).()As a result, areas of Launceston are subject to landslip problems, while others are liable to poor drainage and periodic flooding. The topography of the area is not conducive to easy dispersion of airborne pollution, due to the phenomenon of inversion.()During recent years the citys air quality has improved. Studies indicate that 73% percent of air pollution in Launceston and surrounding areas during the winter period is caused by wood smoke, while about 8% is from motor vehicle pollution. During the early 1990s about 60% per cent of households used wood heaters, but now only 2530% of households use wood heating.()() The 2008 winter was the first time Launcestons air quality did not exceed PM10, since air quality monitoring began in 1997.()Launceston is situated at the confluence of the Tamar River and its tributaries; the Esk River and the Esk River. The Tamar River is a navigable estuary, and is still used for tourist cruises. For many years, ocean going shipping used the river to obtain access to the Port of Launceston located in the city centre. The Port of Launceston is now located at Bell Bay, some  by road from the city, on the east bank of the Tamar estuary, close to its mouth. The South Esk River is the longest river in Tasmania. It starts in the mountains of Fingal and flows through Avoca, Evandale, Longford, Hadspen and finally Launceston. The river is dammed at Lake Trevallyn although some water flows into the Gorge and eventually merges with the Tamar River. The North Esk River starts in the mountains in Tasmanias north-east and winds its way to Launceston. Flooding and levee system Since the 1960s, parts of Launceston have been protected by a series of flood levees that reach up to  in height. The reason for this is because large portions of Invermay and Newstead sit within a plain. The last major flood occurred in 1929, when Invermay was completely devastated. More than 4,000 people were left homeless after just one night of flooding. Since then, there have been minor floods but nothing as severe.(Flood Warning Markers, Launceston City Council Brochure) Work is underway on a $59 million flood levee upgrade that should protect the city from 1-in-200 year events, that is expected to take five to six years to construct.() The council has acquired land used by eighteen businesses on the south side of Lindsay Street in Invermay, with businesses having until July 2009 to leave.()() Climate Launceston has a cool, climate,()with four distinct seasons. The city is located in the Tamar Valley and is surrounded by many large hills and mountains. With this type of topography, Launcestons weather patterns can change considerably in a short period of time.The warmest months are in January and February with an average air temperature range of . Throughout the year there is an average of 4.3 days a year over . The maximum recorded temperature was  on 30 January 2009, with Launceston Airport reaching  on that same day, during the Southeastern Australia heat wave.Winters are cool with minimum temperatures dropping below  an average of 61 days a year. The coldest month is July, with an average temperature range of .The lowest recorded minimum at Launcestons current weather station, Ti Tree Bend was . Launceston very rarely receives snowfall, the last cases of snow were in 1951 and 1986.Winter, for Launceston, is also the season with the least amount of wind. Because of this and the topographical affect of the Tamar Valley, Launceston winters are renowned for foggy mornings, with Launceston Airport the most fog-bound commercial airport in Australia. The average annual rainfall, with moderate to low variability, is , falling on an average of 88.4 days a year. The most rain Launceston received in a year was  in 1992, with 2006 being the driest year when just  fell.(()()The Bureau of Meteorology reported that 2007 was the warmest year ever recorded in Launceston since temperatures were first recorded in 1884. Temperatures ranged from a minimum of  to a maximum of .During 2006 and 2007, Launceston had the warmest maximums throughout the state. In 2008, Launceston had the highest average maximum temperature out of all Tasmanian cities with .()()()()dateAugust 2010 ArchitectureMany of the buildings in the Citys central business district (CBD) were constructed in the nineteenth and early twentieth centuries.()( )( )Launcestons many well preserved Victorian and Georgian buildings (including the synagogue, a rare example of architecture in Revival style) together with its diverse collection of art-deco architecture (such as Holyman House and Lucks Corner in the CBD, the former Star Theatre in Invermay and the former Launceston General Hospital)() give the city an unusual period ambience. The Brutalist architecture of the mid-to-late 20th and early 21st centuries, that dominates most large modern cities and many smaller ones, is relatively rare. The more interesting exceptions to this include the Government offices of Henty House in Charles Street, the Police Station Building and the ANZ Building on the corner of Brisbane & George Street. This is at least in part a matter of deliberate policy  concerns that high rise development might compromise the essential character of the city centre have led to strictly enforced building regulations that restrict the height of new structures in the city, so that most buildings in the CBD have fewer than five storeys. Governance A large portion of Launceston is contained within the of Launceston Local Government Area, however some outer suburbs are part of adjacent council districts: for instance Riverside and Legana are part of the Tamar Council; Prospect Vale and Blackstone Heights are included in the Valley Council.Launceston City Council meetings are held in the Launceston Town Hall. In 2002, Dickenson became the youngest female elected mayor in Australia.( )( ) The current mayor, Van Zetten, who was initially elected in 2007, before being re-elected in 2009, became Launcestons 91st mayor.State Upper House seats that incorporate parts of Launceston are the Electoral Divisions of Paterson, Windermere and Rosevears. For federal elections, Launceston falls within the of Bass, with the sitting member being Lyons for the Labor Party. The state Lower House seat is also called the Division of Bass, and is one of the five electorates in the House of Assembly. Both federal and state seats share common boundaries. Flag The Launceston flag design is based on the citys Coat of Arms granted by the College of Arms, London on 11 June 1957.() The Brisbane Street Mall, the War memorial at Royal Park, atop the Council Chambers and on top of the Albert Hall are places in the city where the flag is regularly flown. The three intersecting lines in the flag represent the citys three rivers (North Esk, South Esk and Tamar) and the two rectangles in the lines represent tin ingots. The strip across the top with the jagged edge is green to represent the citys parks, gardens and surrounding countryside. Waratah flowers at the top symbolise all flowers and similar beauties of nature. The ingots are included because Launceston used to be a large tin smelting centre. The little circle at the river junction is Launceston. Economy Along with being a major retail centre with an average of 75% of market share in surrounding local councils, Launceston is a major service centre for the north of Tasmania.( ) The city is home to a campus of the of Tasmania including the Maritime College; and has a minor minerals and manufacturing base.Launceston is a major hub for the regional agricultural and pastoral activities. Historically, this has been connected with the growing of apples  in recent years the stress has moved to viticulture. Superfine wool remains an important part of the rural economy of north-east Tasmania and wool sales in Launceston attract many international buyers.() The various agricultural industries in the district are supported by the Institute of Agricultural Research which operates the Mount Pleasant Research Laboratories in the Launceston suburb of Prospect. Tourism Launceston serves as the commercial hub for the north of Tasmania, and like many parts of the state, is becoming a major tourist centre. Visitors to the city have grown over the past few years, during 2004 Launceston attracted 412,800 visitors, up 51% from 2001. The United Kingdom is the origin of 25% of all international visitors to the city and 17% originate from the USA.() The Gorge is Launcestons largest tourist attraction and is in close proximity to the city. It is home to the longest single span chairlift in the world, stretching  across the gorge.( )()Launceston has many parks throughout the city including City Park, located next to the city centre. City Park is home to Albert Hall. The park also has a large enclosure for Macaque monkeys, a gift from sister city Ikeda, Japan.() The Launceston Post Office dates back to the 1880s, with a clock tower added in the early twentieth century. The GPO clock chime chimes every quarter hour.() Zoo, which is known for its wildlife conservation work, including a breeding program for Devils, is located near the city.() Culture  Arts and entertainment Launceston is home to the Victoria Museum and Art Gallery, which was established in 1891.()( )Now the largest museum located outside a capital city in Australia, the Queen Victoria Museum and Art Gallery is located at two sites across the city: the original purpose built building at Royal Park and another at the Inveresk Cultural Precinct, on the grounds of the former railway station and rail yards in buildings largely converted from the former Railway Workshops.() The precinct also includes the Launceston Tramway Museum, which houses the No. 29 tram, the Mary St shelter shed and a host of other memorabilia.(Tram No 29 Inveresk 2004) The states largest preservation railway, the Don River Railway, also has a carriage rebuilding workshop on the site. Australias oldest bookshop, A.W. Birchall & Sons (Birchalls) dating from November 1844, is still located at its original site in Brisbane Street (now the Brisbane Street Mall).()Located in the Southern Launceston suburb of Prospect, the Country Club Casino is a hotel, casino and golf course complex. It was the second casino to be built in Tasmania and one of the first in Australia.Aquatic, a $26.3 million regional aquatic centre was completed in July 2009. The site, just outside the central business district spans approximately .()( )( )( )From 1999 to 2003, Launceston was the home of three of the four South music festivals. Since 2006, it has hosted the Fest, a music festival held at the Inveresk Show grounds each summer to raise funds for sclerosis research.() Sport Sport is a popular recreational and spectator activity in Launceston and like most of the state cricket and rules football are popular sports. The city has been the birthplace of two prominent Australian cricketers; the former Australian cricket captain Ponting and the retired cricketer and Australian selector Boon. The first cricket match played in Australia was at the Northern Tasmania Cricket Association Ground between the Cricket Club and the Cricket Club in 1851.()rules football (commonly known locally as football or footy) is very popular in Launceston, and is often played at York Park (Aurora Stadium). Holding 20,000 peoplemore than any other stadium in TasmaniaYork Park was swampland before becoming Launcestons showgrounds in 1873. Hawthorn has played between two and five AFL matches each season since 2001, and the Kilda Football Club played two games a year between 2003 and 2006. In 2007, the Government signed a A$16.4 million, five-year sponsorship deal with Hawthorn, under which the club will play four regular season games and one Australia Bank Cup pre-season match at the venue each year. Throughout its history, York Park has hosted major pop concerts and other entertainments. Since 2001 it has been a venue for international sports events, and in 2005 was redeveloped at a cost of $23.6 million. Association football (commonly known in Launceston as soccer) is also played and watched in Launceston Parkthe only place in Tasmania to have hosted national league soccer matches. A Soccer League game was held at Aurora Stadium in 2002 between Perth Glory and Knights.() A-Leagues Victory have held a pre-season cup game at the venue each year since 2006. The record crowd is 8,061.()Since 2004, the Supercars (Tasmanian Challenge) has been annually held at the recently re-developed Plains Raceway.() A number of other sports have notable presence in Launceston, including basketball (mens, womens and indoor) and hockey. In 2009 Launceston redeveloped the cities swimming facilities which now include a modern indoor multi-million dollar swimming centre at windmill hill, now named Aquatic. Media Launcestons local newspaper The Examiner was founded by James Aikenhead in 1842, and has been continually published ever since.() The newspaper is currently owned by Fairfax media. Along with the rest of the state, the city has four free-to-air analogue television stations, including two government funded channels from the Broadcasting Corporation (ABC1), the Broadcasting Service (SBS ONE) and two commercial stations; (Southern Cross Tasmania & WIN) These services are also available in digital format as well as eleven digital only stations, one carrying Network Ten programming (Tasmanian Digital Television), and nationwide digital-only stations ABC2, ABC3, News 24, Two, 7Two, Go!, 7mate (HD), HD, HD (in high definition only) and the new Eleven channel from Network Ten. Radio stations aired around Launceston are: LAFM and Chilli FM  part of the Broadcasters radio network, Sport Radio  Racing Radio, J  ABC, Northern Tasmania  (ABC), NewsRadio  (ABC), Classic FM  (ABC), National  (ABC), Park Radio  Radio, Radio  (SBS), Way FM  Christian Radio and 7RPH which is a relay of 864 AM from Hobart.()()InfrastructureHealthLaunceston General Hospital is Launcestons 300-bed public hospital, located just south of the city centre. Every year, LGH treats over 24,000 inpatients and over 225,000 outpatients. St Lukes Private Hospital and St Vincents Hospital are the major private facilities. Launceston was also the location of the first use of anaesthesia in the Southern Hemisphere.()Launceston is also the hub for the states medical retrieval service. The Flying Doctor Service is serviced by the states ambulance service and doctors from the Launceston General Hospital.()TransportThe car is by far the most dominant form of transport in Launceston, with the city having 721 km of urban and rural roads, even though much of the CBD has narrow one-way streets.()( )( )Since February 1998, Launceston has been serviced by the Tasmanian government-owned and operated public bus service Tasmania. In addition, Redline offers school services and travels to many destinations across Tasmania.()( )Because of its central location, Launceston is the hub of five of the states major highways. The Midland Highway is the primary route to Hobart. The Bass Highway is the primary route to Devonport and Burnie. The Highway is an alternate scenic route to Hobart via Scottsdale, the East Coast, the Tamar Highway and Tamar Highway.( )The city is served by the small curfew-free Airport,  south-east of the city. The airport serves over one million passengers annually. Airways, Australia, Airlines, air Express and QantasLink all operate scheduled services at the airport. There are currently direct flights to and from Melbourne, Sydney and Brisbane.()There is a freight rail system in operation which links Launceston to Burnie and Hobart.()Tram and rail networkLaunceston operated a suburban tramway system between 1911 and 1952, which consisted of 29 trams. It was first conceived in 1909, after observations of efficiently working systems in Melbourne and Adelaide. A decade before the tram system was abandoned, Launceston had begun converting to trolleybuses, especially for the hilly routes. It was one of the most extensive trolleybus networks in Australia. The network was finally removed in 1952 to make way for cars and buses. A tramway museum in Inveresk is all that remains of Launcestons trams. Launcestons streets, most of which were planned in the early nineteenth century, were probably always too narrow for trams to be fully successful, in many cases little of the roadway remained for other forms of transport.()A regional passenger rail system operated in Tasmania, of which Launceston was a major hub; however, after many years of gradual retrenchment it was closed in July 1978.();Former passenger railway lines servicing Launceston* and Western Railway (18711873)* LauncestonDeloraine (18751978)* LauncestonHobart (via Evandale) (18761978)* LauncestonDevonport (18851978)* LauncestonBurnie (19011978)UtilitiesFile:Trevallyn Dam.JPG|thumb|right|Dam in flood in August 2009Launcestons electricity is primarily generated by renewable electric power plants including the Dam. The major retailer is Energy. Historically, Launceston was powered by gas from the Launceston Gas Company (later Gas Corporation of Tasmania). The first gas plant was built in 1860 as a horizontal retort Gas Works house made from brick and sandstone on the sites SW corner. This was followed by keepers cottages, labs, the Headquarters Building and the iconic 1930s vertical retort recognised by the wording COOK WITH GAS written it its brickwork.() The Duck Reach power station replaced gas for street lighting in when it was completed in 1895. Both Gas Works and Hydro facilities have been preserved as museums.Launcestons water comes from the Launceston Water Catchment. The majority is sourced from St Patricks River, a tributary of the Esk River which flows through Launceston. The main retailer is Lomond Water. The first reticulated water supply constructed in 1857 still serves the CBD.(http://www.engineersaustralia.org.au/shadomx/apps/fms/fmsdownload.cfm?file_uuidED329DA3-C2B8-C7D5-9CA2-DC9C9440ADAA&siteNameieaust) There were fears that the Valley Pulp Mill might adversely affect Launcestons water supply.()Like many Australian cities, several major companies provide mobile telecommunications services and wireless internet services to Launceston. Launcestons communication infrastructure was upgraded in 1997 through the federal Networking the Nation program. There are plans to upgrade further to a optic network.() Sister cities Launceston has three sister cities.() See also *of Mayors of Launceston Notes :References using The Examiner may require registration for access. References * External links * * Launceston City Council* Original video of the Cataract Gorge in flood, August 2009* Accommodation portalcs:LauncestonTasmania(Tasmanien)(Tasmania)eo:Launceston(Tasmanie)ga:Launcestonko:Tasmaniaka:(Tasmani)ja:no:Launcestonpnb:pl:Launcestonpt:Launcestonru:Tasmaniasr:fi:Launcestonsv:Launcestonuk:TasmaniaTasmania()
267901
Timeline_of_Albanian_history_to_1993
Chronology of Important Events of Albania:2nd century AD 1 to 11th century*In the AD,(Madrugearu A, Gordon M. The wars of the Balkan peninsula. Rowman & Littlefield, 2007. p.146) Ptolemy, the geographer and astronomer from Alexandria drafts a map. This map shows the city of Albanopolis (located Northeast of Durrs). Ptolemy also mentions the Illyrian tribe named Albanoi, who lived around this city.(William Smith, LLD, Ed., Dictionary of Greek and Roman Geography, 1854. Ptolemy is the earliest writer in whose works the name of the Albanians has been distinctly recognised. He mentions (3.13.23) a tribe called ALBANI () and a town ALBANOPOLIS (), in the region lying to the E. of the Ionian sea; and from the names of places with which Albanopolis is connected, it appears clearly to have been in the S. part of the Illyrian territory, and in modern Albania. There is no means of forming a conjecture on how the name of this obscure tribe came to be extended to so considerable a nation.) The area was part of Roman Macedon, specifically the Nova subdivision. Epirus nova or New Epirus or Illyria Graeca(The Loeb Editors Notes, 28 Nova Epirus or Illyris Graeca)(A new classical dictionary of Greek and Roman biography, mythology, and geography: partly based upon the Dictionary of Greek and Roman biography and mythology by Sir William Smith,1851,page 392)(Catholic Encyclopedia - Durazzo) or Illyris proper was a province of the Empire established by Diocletian (244-311) during his restructuring of provincial boundaries. The province, belonged to the Roman province of Macedonia.(Handbook of Ancient Geography and History by Ptz Wilhelm, ISBN 1-113-19974-1, The (734) southern portion, or Illyria Graeca, belonged to the province of Macedonia.)(Atlas of Classical History by R. Talbert, 1989, page 175: ... divided the diocese of Moesia into two, styled Thracia and Macedonia, the latter consisting of the provinces from Epirus Nova and Macedonia southward. But there is evidence that Constantine considered ...) Later it became a theme(Encyclopedia of ancient Greece by Nigel Guy Wilson, 2006, ISBN 0-415-97334-1, page 246) of the Empire. Dyrrachium (or Epidamnus) was established as the capital of Epirus nova.(Hendry, p. 299. The geography is entirely correct for Servius time, since Diocletians rearrangement of provincial boundaries included the creation of the province of Epirus Nova out of southern Illyricum with Dyrrachium (Epidamnus) as its capital.) The region of Epirus Nova corresponded(Wilkes, J. J. The Illyrians, 1992,ISBN 0-631-19807-5,Page 210) to a part of Illyria that was now  partly Hellenic(American journal of philology,  98-99, by JSTOR (Organization), Project Muse, 1977, page 263, the partly Hellenic and partly Hellenized Epirus Nova) and partly Hellenized.(American journal of philology,  98-99, by JSTOR (Organization), Project Muse,1977, page 263, the partly Hellenic and partly Hellenized Epirus Nova) The area was the line of division between the provinces of Illyricum and Macedonia.(Migrations and invasions in Greece and adjacent areas by Nicholas Geoffrey Lemprire Hammond, 1976, ISBN 0-8155-5047-2, page 54: The line of division between Illyricum and the Greek area Epirus nova)11th to 15th centuries* The Arbanasi people are recorded as being half-believers (non-Orthodox Christians) and speaking their own language in the Fragment of Origins of Nations between 1000-1018 by an anonymous author in a Bulgarian text of the 11th century.(R. Elsie: Early Albania, a Reader of Historical Texts, 11th - 17th Centuries, Wiesbaden 2003, p. 3)* In History written in 1079-1080, Byzantine historian Attaliates referred to the Albanoi as having taken part in a revolt against Constantinople in 1043 and to the Arbanitai as subjects of the duke of Dyrrachium. It is disputed, however, whether the Albanoi of the events of 1043 refers to Albanians in an ethnic sense or whether Albanoi is a reference to Normans from Sicily under an archaic name (there was also tribe of Italy by the name of Albanoi).(The wars of the Balkan Peninsula: their medieval origins G - Reference, Information and Interdisciplinary Subjects Series  Authors Alexandru Madgearu, Martin Gordon  Editor Martin Gordon  Translated by Alexandru Madgearu  Edition illustrated  Publisher Scarecrow Press, 2008 ISBN 0810858460, 9780810858466 It was supposed that those Albanoi from 1042 were Normans from Sicily, called by an archaic name (the Albanoi were an independent tribe from Southern Italy), p. 25) However a later reference to Albanians from the same Attaliates, regarding the participation of Albanians in a rebellion in 1078, is undisputed.(The wars of the Balkan Peninsula: their medieval origins  G - Reference, Information and Interdisciplinary Subjects Series  Authors Alexandru Madgearu, Martin Gordon  Editor Martin Gordon  Translated by Alexandru Madgearu  Edition illustrated  Publisher Scarecrow Press, 2008  ISBN 0810858460, 9780810858466 It was supposed that those Albanoi from 1042 were Normans from Sicily, called by an archaic name (the Albanoi were an independent tribe from Southern Italy). The following instance is indisputable. It comes from the same Attaliates, who wrote that the Albanians (Arbanitai) were involved in the 1078 rebellion of... p. 25)* Arbanitai of Arbanon are recorded in an account by Comnena of the troubles in that region during the reign of her father I Comnenus (10811118) by the Normans.(Comnena, Anna. The Alexiad, Book IV.)* 12th century - Local Albanian noble families begin to emerge. Kingdom of Serbia occupies parts of northern Albania.* 1190 - of Arbr was created. * 1204 - In the aftermath of the Crusade, Venice wins control over most of Albania, but the Byzantines regain control of the southern portion and establish the of Epirus.* 1258 - The of Sicily seizes the Albanian coast and much of the hinterland from Epirus* 1272 - Forces of the I of Naples occupy Dyrrhachium (Durrs) and establish the of Albania.* 1280s - The Angevins launch an offensive toward Constantinople, but are repulsed by the Byzantines at Berat. Byzantine forces retake the country, but after ca. 1290, it begins to come under Serbian attack.* 1304 - The Angevins recapture the Kingdom of Albania.* 1368 - Thopia captures Durrs from Angevins.* 1385 - Thopia, the Albanian ruler of Durrs, invites the Ottoman forces of I to intervene against his rival Balsha II.* 1389 - Albanians join Serbian-led Balkan army that is crushed by Ottoman forces at the of Kosovo; coordinated resistance to Ottoman expansion into the western Balkans collapses.* 1405 - Kastrioti born, later becomes Albanian national hero known as Skanderbeg.* 1430 - Kastrioti led an unsuccessful uprising against the Empire. He was defeated again by the Ottoman forces of Isak-Beg.* 1433 - Arianiti rebels against Ottoman Empire with several successes. * 1443 - After being sent in a battle near Nis, Skanderbeg turns in Albania, starts the long war against the Empire and reembraces Roman Catholicism.* 1444 - Skanderbeg proclaimed chief of the of Lezh.* 1450 - The Albanians, under Skanderbeg, rout Ottoman forces under Sultan Murad II.* 1466 & 1467 - The Albanians under Skanderbeg, defend Kruj against massive Ottoman armies led by Sultan II* 1468 - Skanderbeg dies.* 1478 - Kruj falls to the Ottoman Turks; Shkodr falls a year later. Subsequently, many Albanians flee to southern Italy, Greece, Egypt, and elsewhere; many remaining are forced to convert to Islam.17th CenturyEarly 17th centurySome Albanians who convert to Islam find careers in the Empires government and military service.17th century - 18th centuryAbout two-thirds of Albanians convert to Islam.18th century1785Mahmud Bushati, Albanian noble from the Bushati family, based in Shkodr, attacks Montenegrin territory; subsequently named governor of Shkodr by Ottoman authorities.19th century1822Albanian leader Pash Tepelena assassinated by Ottoman agents for promoting an autonomous state.1830500 Albanian leaders were invited to meet with Ottoman general in Monastir. They were trapped and killed in an ambush.1835Ottoman Sublime Porte divides Albanian-populated lands into vilayets of Janina and Rumelia with Ottoman administrators.1848Uprising of Albanians against Tanzimat reform.1861First school known to use language in modern times opens in Shkodr.1877-1878Russo-Turkish War. The Empire is defeated by its rival Empire, seriously weakening Ottoman power over Albanian-populated areas.1878Albanian leaders met in Prizren, Kosovo, to form the of Prizren, initially advocating a unified Albania under Ottoman suzerainty, with the intention to oppose the of San Stefano, signed after the Russo-Turkish War, a treaty which assigned Albanian-populated lands to the of Bulgaria, the of Montenegro, and the of Serbia; but Austria-Hungary and the Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland block the treatys implementation. During the of Berlin, the Great Powers overturn the Treaty of San Stefano and divided Albanian lands among several states. The of Prizren begins to organize resistance to the Treaty of Berlins provisions that affect Albanians.1879Society for Printing of Albanian Writings, composed of Roman Catholic, Muslim, and Orthodox Albanians, founded in Constantinople.1881Ottoman forces crush Albanian resistance fighters at Prizren. Prizren Leagues leaders and families arrested and deported.1897Ottoman authorities disband a reactivated of Prizren, execute its leader later, then ban Albanian language books.20th century1900-19181906Albanians begin joining the of Union and Progress (Turks), which formed in Constantinople, hoping to gain autonomy for their nation within the Empire.1908Albanian intellectuals meet in Bitola and choose the alphabet as standard script rather than Arabic or Cyrillic.1911April 6Albanian Highlanders (Malsort) battle against the Turks regime of the Empire by the command of Turgut Pasha in the town of Tuzi, Montenegro. The highlanders were claimed victorious after raising the Albanian flag for the first time in over 400 years of Ottoman occupation. The commander/flagbearer for the Albanians was Gjo Luli. Dedas word of victory later sparked to other events for the independence of Albania, which was finally reached the very next year.1912 MayAlbanians rise against the Ottoman authorities and seize Skopje.OctoberBalkan War begins, and Albanian leaders affirm Albania as an independent state.NovemberMuslim and Christian delegates at Vlor declare Albania independent and establish a Government of Albania.DecemberAmbassadorial conference opens in London and discusses Albanias fate. Half of Albanian territories are given to neighboring states, the of Serbia and of Greece.1913 MayThe Treaty of London ends First Balkan War. Balkan War begins.AugustThe Treaty of Bucharest ends Second Balkan War. Great Powers recognize an independent Albanian state ruled by a constitutional monarchy.1914MarchPrince of Albania, German army captain, installed as head of the new of Albania by the Commission of Control, arrives in Albania.SeptemberNew Albanian state collapses following outbreak of War I; Prince Wilhelm is stripped of authority and departs from Albania.1918NovemberWorld War I ends, with the Italian Army occupying most of Albania and Serbian, Greek and French forces occupying remainder. Italian and Yugoslav powers begin struggle for dominance over Albanians.DecemberAlbanian leaders meet at Durrs to discuss presentation of Albanias interests at the Peace Conference, 1919.1919-19381919JanuaryThe of Serbia attack Albanias inhabited cities. Albanians adopt guerrilla warfare.JuneAlbania denied official representation at the Peace Conference, 1919; British, French, and Greek negotiators later decide to divide Albania among the of Greece, Italy, and the new of Yugoslavia.1920JanuaryAlbanian leaders meeting at Lushnj reject the partitioning of Albania by the Peace Conference, 1919, warn that Albanians will take up arms in defense of their territory, and create a bicameral parliament.FebruaryThe Albanian government under Delvina moves to Tirana, which becomes the capital.SeptemberAlbania forces Italy to withdraw its troops and abandon territorial claims to almost all Albanian territory.DecemberAlbania admitted to the of Nations as sovereign and independent state.1921NovemberThe Yugoslav Army invades Albanian territories they had not previously occupied; League of Nations commission forces Yugoslav withdrawal and reaffirms Albanias 1913 borders.DecemberPopular Party, headed by Bej Ypi, forms government with Ahmet Zogu, the future King Zog, as internal affairs minister.1922AugustMeletius IV of Constantinople recognizes the Autocephalous Church of Albania.SeptemberZogu assumes position of prime minister of government; opposition to him becomes formidable.1923Albanias Sunni Muslims break last ties with the disbanding Empire and Constantinople, pledging primary allegiance to native country.1924MarchZogus party wins elections for National Assembly, but Zogu steps down after financial scandal and an assassination attempt.JulyA peasant-backed insurgency wins control of Tirana; S. Noli becomes prime minister; Zogu flees to Yugoslavia.DecemberZogu, backed by the Yugoslav Army, returns to power and begins to smother parliamentary democracy; Noli flees to Italy.1925MayItaly, under Mussolini, begins penetration of Albanian public and economic life.192627 NovemberItaly and Albania sign First Treaty of Tirana, which guarantees Zogus political position and Albaniasboundaries.1928AugustZogu pressures the parliament to dissolve itself; a new constituent assembly declares Albania a kingdom and Zogu becomes Zog I, King of the Albanians.1931Zog, standing up to Italians, refuses to renew the First Treaty of Tirana; Italians continue political and economic pressure.1934After Albania signs trade agreements with Greece and Yugoslavia, Italy suspends economic support, then attempts to threaten Albania.1935Mussolini, Prime Minister of Italy, presents a gift of 3,000,000 gold francs to Albania; other economic aid follows.1939-19451939March :March 17 In Rome, the German Ambassador to the Kingdom of Italy informs Mussolini, Prime Minister of Italy that Germany is ready to support Italy in occupying Albania.:March 25 In Tirana, the Italian Ambassador to Albania hands over to King Zog an ultimatum demanding the surrender of Albania to an Italian protectorate.April In the beginning of April, the Albanian army mobilizes.:April 5 Crown Prince of Albania, the heir to the Albanian throne, is born.:King Zog appeals to the democracies.:April 6 King Zog appeals to the Pact.:April 7 invasion of Albania: 50,000 Italian marines land in the ports of Durrs, Vlor, Shngjin and Sarand. The Albanian army resists, especially in Durrs.:King Zogs wife, Queen Apponyi de Nagyappony, and their infant son Crown Prince of Albania flee to the of Greece. King Zog follows them.:April 8 Italian troops occupy Tirana at 9:30 AM. During the afternoon motorized columns reach Shkodr and Elbasan. The Italian commander, General Guzzoni, lands in Tirana and shortly afterwards the Italian foreign minister, Ciano, also arrives by air and tells an Albanian delegation that the Italian troops have come to ensure order, prosperity, and progress, without interfering with Albanias existence as a nation.:April 12 A Assembly, summoned by the provisional committee of pro-Italian notables which has taken over the administration, meets in Tirana and approves a union with Italy: Italys King Victor Emmanuel III is to become the King of Albania.:Bej Verlaci becomes prime minister. His cabinet includes Dino (foreign minister), Alizoti (finance), Ypi (justice), Bea (economy), and Koliqi (education).:Shefqet Bej Verlaci also becomes the acting Head of State until Victor Emmanuel III comes to the throne.:April 14 Albania withdraws from the of Nations.:April 16 An Albanian delegation headed by the new prime minister goes to the Quirinale in Rome to formally offer the crown of Albania to Victor Emmanuel III. The King accepts the crown, holding the crowns of Italy, Ethiopia and Albania in union.:April 22 Jacomoni di San Savino is appointed the kings lieutenant-general (viceroy) in Albania.1940 The constitution of Albania is voided. The Fascist Party is established. The Albanian army is merged into the Royal Italian Army. The National Assembly and the government are subject to the Italian viceroy and his officials. Italy wins partial support of the Albanian public by defending Albanias claims to Kosovo and Chameria. Respectively held at the time by the of Yugoslavia and the of Greece.  October The War begins. Royal Italian Army invades the of Greece through Albania.:October 28 From Albania, Italian forces (157,000 men) commanded by General Visconti Prasca invade Greece. A contingent of Albanian auxiliary forces (12,000 men) participate in Italys campaign against Greece.1941April Germany, the Kingdom of Italy, the Kingdom of Hungary, the of Bulgaria, the of Romania and the Croatian Ustae perform a successful of Yugoslavia. Germany proceeds to invade Greece. The of Greece ends with an Axis victory, with Crete holding out until June. The Axis occupation of Greece effectively partitions the country between Germany, Italy and Bulgaria. The Italians occupied the bulk of the Greek mainland and most of the islands. The Italians orchestrate the annexation of areas of Greek Epirus by Albania, citing the presence of a significant Albanian minority (the Albanians). This plan is vetoed by Germany.(Fischer (1999), pp. 70-75, 85)October Broz Tito, Yugoslav communist leader, directs organizing of Albanian communists.November Communist Party founded; Hoxha becomes first secretary.:November 8 The Communist Party is founded.December:December 3 Merlika-Kruja becomes Prime Minister.1942September 1942The Communist Party organizes the National Liberation Movement, a front resistance organization.September 16, 1942At the of Pez, the National Liberation Movement is established.October 1942Noncommunist nationalist groups form to resist the Italian occupation.1943AugustThe Kingdom of Italy signs an Armistice with the of World War II. The Royal Italian Army and the Aeronautica mostly disintegrate, the Marina joins the Allies in Malta and Sardinia. The Co-Belligerent Army, Co-Belligerent Navy and Co-Belligerent Air Force form in Italy, joining the Allied cause. Germany establishes a state in Italy, the Social Republic. Its armed forces form the Nazionale Repubblicano, the Nazionale Repubblicana, with a very small naval force forming the Nazionale Repubblicana. Italian hold on areas outside the Peninsula weakens. This includes Albania; Albanian resistance fighters overwhelm five Italian divisions.SeptemberWehrmacht forces invade and occupy Albania. The Albanian Kingdom becomes a state of Germany1944JanuaryThe Communist partisans, supplied with British weapons, gain control of the southern Albania.May 1944The Communists meet to organize an Albanian government; Hoxha becomes chairman of executive committee and supreme commander of the National Liberation Movement.July 1944The Communist forces enter central and northern Albania.October 1944The Communists establish a provisional government with Hoxha as prime minister.November 1944The Wehrmacht withdraw from Tirana, the Communists move into the capital.December 1944The Communist provisional government adopts laws allowing state regulation of commercial enterprises, foreign and domestic trade.1945JanuaryCommunist provisional government agrees to restore Kosovo to Yugoslavia as an autonomous region; tribunals begin to condemn thousands of war criminals and enemies of the people to death or to prison. Communist regime begins to nationalize industry, transportation, forests, pastures.AprilYugoslavia recognizes communist government in Albania.AugustSweeping agricultural reforms begin; about half of arable land eventually redistributed to peasants from large landowners; most church properties nationalized. Nations Relief and Rehabilitation Administration begins sending supplies to Albania.NovemberSoviet Union recognizes provisional government; Britain and United States make full diplomatic recognition conditional.DecemberIn elections for the Peoples Assembly only candidates from the Democratic Front are on ballot.1946-19891946JanuaryPeoples Assembly proclaims the Peoples Republic of Albania; purges of noncommunists from positions of power in government begins.SpringPeoples Assembly adopts new constitution, Hoxha becomes Prime Minister of Albania, foreign minister, defense minister, and commander-in-chief; Soviet-style central planning begins.JulyTreaty of friendship and cooperation signed with Yugoslavia; Yugoslav advisers and grain begin pouring into Albania.October26 October: Two British ships destroyed by mines off Albanias coast in the of Corfu, see Channel Incident, .NovemberAlbania breaks diplomatic relations with the United States after the latter withdraws its informal mission.1947April*Economic Planning Commission draws up first economic plan that established production targets for mining, manufacturing and agricultural enterprises.*Nations Security Council Resolution 22 recommends that the Court of Justice settle the dispute between the UK and Albania regarding the sinking of two British ships in the Straits of Corfu in the Channel Incident.MayA Nations commission concludes that Albania, together with Bulgaria and Yugoslavia, supported communist guerrillas in the Civil War; Yugoslav leaders launch verbal offensive against anti-Yugoslav Albanian communists, including Hoxha; pro-Yugoslav faction begins to wield power.JulyAlbania refuses participation in the Plan of the United States.1948February-MarchAlbanian Communist Party leaders vote to merge Albanian and Yugoslav economies and militaries.JuneCominform expels Yugoslavia; Albanian leaders launch anti-Yugoslav propaganda campaign, cut economic ties, and force Yugoslav advisers to leave; Stalin, Secretary of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union and Minister of the Soviet Union, becomes national hero in Albania.SeptemberHoxha begins purging high-ranking party members accused of Titoism; treaty of friendship with Yugoslavia abrogated by Albania; Soviet Union begins giving economic aid to Albania and Soviet advisers replace ousted Yugoslavs.NovemberFirst Party Congress changes name of the Communist Party of Albania to of Labour of Albania.1949JanuaryRegime issues Decree on Religious Communities.FebruaryAlbania joins Council for Mutual Economic Assistance (Comecon); all foreign trade conducted with membercountries.DecemberAlbanian communists considered supporters of Broz Tito, Minister of Yugoslavia, are purged.1950Britain and United States begin inserting anticommunist Albanian guerrilla units into Albania; all are unsuccessful.JulyA new constitution is approved by Peoples Assembly. Hoxha becomes minister of defense and foreign minister.1951FebruaryAlbania and Soviet Union sign agreement on mutual economic assistance.1954JulyHoxha relinquishes post of Prime Minister to Shehu but retains primary power as First Secretary of the of Labour of Albania.1955MayAlbania becomes a founding member of the Pact.1956FebruaryIn February, Khrushchevs delivers his famous speech the Personality Cult and its Consequences. In the speech, Khrushchev criticized actions taken by the regime of Stalin, particularly the purges of the military and the upper Party echelons, and the development of Stalins cult, while maintaining support for the ideals of Communism by invoking Lenin. He also introduced the concept of coexistence between Communist and Capitalist states. Hoxha adopts an Anti-Revisionism stance, comdemning these ideological moves; close relations with Soviet Union become strained.1959Large amounts of economic aid from Soviet Union, East European countries, and China begin pouring into Albania.MayKhrushchev visits Albania.1960JuneAlbania sides with China in the split; consequently Soviet economic support to Albania is curtailed and Chinese aid is increased.NovemberHoxha rails against Khrushchev and supports China during an international communist conference in Moscow.1961FebruaryHoxha harangues against the Soviet Union and Yugoslavia at Albanias Fourth Party Congress.DecemberSoviet Union breaks diplomatic relations; other East European countries severely reduce contacts but do not break relations; Albania looks toward China for support.1962Albanian regime introduces austerity program in attempt to compensate for withdrawal of Soviet economic support; China incapable of delivering sufficient aid; Albania becomes Chinas spokesman at UN.1964Khrushchev, Secretary of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union and Minister of the Soviet Union, is forced to resign in October. He was facing considerable opposition by an alliance led by Brezhnev, Shelepin and Semichastny. Hoxha hails the fall of Khrushchev; diplomatic relations between Albania and the Soviet Union fail to improve.1966FebruaryHoxha initiates Cultural and Ideological Revolution.MarchAlbanian Party of Labor open letter to the people establishes egalitarian wage and job structure for all workers.1967Hoxha regime conducts violent campaign to extinguish religious life in Albania; by years end over two thousand religious buildings were closed or converted to other uses.1968AugustAlbania condemns the Pact invasion of Czechoslovakia, subsequently Albania withdraws from Warsaw Pact.1976SeptemberZedong, of the Communist Party of China, dies. A period of power struggles begins. The so-called of Four (Qing, Hongwen, Chunqiao, Wenyuan) maintains power for about a month, ousted by a coup in October. Guofeng rises to power and begins abandoning the mandates of the Revolution. He is replaced by Xiaoping in 1978, which also marks the beginning of a major reform in the Peoples Republic of China. Hoxha becomes increasingly critical of the new Chinese regime(s), leading to a cooling of the relations between Albania and China.DecemberA new constitution promulgated superseding the 1950 version; Albania renamed to Peoples Republic of Albania.1977Top military officials purged after Chinese conspiracy is uncovered.1978JulyChina terminates all economic and military aid to Albania.1980Hoxha selects Alia as the next party head, bypassing Shehu.1981DecemberShehu, after rebuke by Politburo, kills himself, possibly murdered on Hoxhas orders.1982NovemberAlia becomes chairman of Presidium of the Peoples Assembly.1983Hoxha begins semiretirement; Alia starts administering Albania.1985AprilHoxha dies.1986NovemberAlia featured as partys and countrys undisputed leader at Ninth Party Congress.1987AugustGreece ends state of war that existed since World War II.NovemberAlbania and Greece sign a series of long-term agreements.1989SeptemberAlia, addressing the Eighth Plenum of the Central Committee, signals that radical changes to the economic system are necessary.1990-19931990JanuaryNinth Plenum of the Central Committee; demonstrations at Shkodr force authorities to declare state of emergency.AprilAlia declares willingness to establish diplomatic relations with the Soviet Union and the United States.MayPrez de Cullar, of the United Nations, visits Albania.MayRegime announces desire to join the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe. Peoples Assembly passes laws liberalizing criminal code, reforming court system, lifting some restrictions on freedom of worship, and guaranteeing the right to travel abroad.SummerUnemployment throughout the economy increases as a result of governments reform measures; drought reduces electric-power production, forcing plant shutdowns.JulyYoung people demonstrate against regime in Tirana, and 5,000 citizens seek refuge in foreign embassies; Central Committee plenum makes significant changes in leadership of party and state. Soviet Union and Albania sign protocol normalizing their relations.AugustGovernment abandons its monopoly on foreign commerce and begins to open Albania to foreign trade.SeptemberAlia addresses the Nations General Assembly in New York.OctoberTirana hosts the Balkan Foreign Ministers Conference, the first international political meeting in Albania since the end of World War II. Kadare, Albanias most prominent writer, defects to France.DecemberUniversity students demonstrate in streets and call for dictatorship to end; Alia meets with students; Thirteenth Plenum of the Central Committee of the APL authorizes a multiparty system; Party of Albania, first opposition party established; regime authorizes political pluralism; draft constitution is published; by years end, 5,000 Albanian refugees had crossed the mountains into Greece.1991JanuaryFirst opposition newspaper Rilindja Demokratike begins publishing. Thousands of Albanians seek refuge in Greece.MarchAlbania and the United States reestablish relations after a 35-year break. Thousands more Albanians attempt to gain asylum in Italy.March-AprilFirst multiparty elections held since the 1920s; 98.9 percent of voters participated; Albanian Party of Labor wins over 67 percent of vote for Peoples Assembly seats; Albanian Democratic Party wins about 30 percent.AprilCommunist-dominated Peoples Assembly reelects Alia to new presidential term. Ministry of Internal Affairs replaced by Ministry of Public Order; Frontier Guards and Directorate of Prison Administration are placed under the Ministry of Defense and the Ministry of Justice, respectively. Peoples Assembly passes Law on Major Constitutional Provisions providing for fundamental human rights and separation ofpowers and invalidates 1976 constitution. Peoples Assembly appoints commission to draft new constitution.JunePrime Minister Nano and rest of cabinet resign after trade unions call for general strike to protest worsening economic conditions and killing of opposition demonstrators in Shkodr. Coalition government led by Prime Minister Bufi takes office; Tenth Party Congress of the Albanian Party of Labor meets and renames party the Party of Albania (SPA); Albania accepted as a full member of the Minsk Group; Baker, Secretary of State of the United States, visits Albania.JulySigurimi, notorious secret police, is abolished and replaced by National Information Service.AugustUp to 18,000 Albanians cross the Sea to seek asylum in Italy; most are returned. Peoples Assembly passes law on economic activity that authorizes private ownership of property, privatizing of state property, investment by foreigners, and private employment of workers.OctoberUnited States Embassy in Tirana opened. Albania joins Monetary Fund.DecemberCoalition government dissolves when opposition parties accuse communists of blocking reform and Albanian Democratic Party withdraws its ministers from the cabinet. Prime Minister Bufi resigns and Alia names Vilson Ahmeti as Prime Minister. Alia sets March 1992 for new elections.1992FebruaryThe Peoples Assembly prevents OMONIA, the party representing Greek Albanians, from fielding candidates in the elections planned for March.March 22 and 29In the midst of economic freefall and social chaos, a decisive electoral victory is won by the anticommunist opposition led by the Democratic Party. The Democrats win 62% of the votes and achieve an overall majority with 92 of the 140 seats in the parliament. The Socialists, with 26% of the vote, win 38 seats. Turnout is 90%.April 3Alia resigns as president and is succeeded on April 9 by Berisha, the first democratic leader of Albania since Bishop Noli. The first non-Communist government, headed by Meksi, is elected on April 13. Its stated priority is to establish law and order to transform the paralyzed economy through a reform program emphasizing a free-market economy and privatization.April 16Selami is elected chairman of the Democratic Party.JuneAlbania signs the Black Sea Economic Cooperation Pact with ten other countries, including six former Soviet republics. The Pact establishes the of the Black Sea Economic Cooperation.Mid-JulyThe Albanian Communist Party is outlawed, and its chairman, Milloshi, is arrested in Tirana and charged with illegally carrying a gun.July 26Four months after its March defeat, the Socialist Party makes impressive gains in the countrys first democratic local elections. The Democratic Party wins 43.2% of the vote, compared to 41.3% cast for the Socialists. Continued economic hardships, general apathy, and a split within the Democratic Party contributed to its poor showing. It holds local administrative control in most large cities, while the Socialists control much of the countryside.Mid-SeptemberFormer President Alia is detained, joining eighteen other former communist officials, including Hoxha, who are charged with corruption and other offenses.November 3The split in the Democratic Party grows into a rift when a group of reform-minded Democrats break away and form a new party, the Democratic Alliance.DecemberAlbania is granted membership of the Organisation of the Islamic Conference and in the same month applies to join NATO, becoming the first former Pact country formally to seek membership in the Western alliance.1993January 27Nexhmije Hoxha is sentenced to nine years imprisonment, having been found guilty of embezzling state funds.FebruaryFormer prime minister Ahmeti is placed under house arrest, following charges of corruption.MarchWrner, Secretary General of NATO visits Tirana.AprilAlbania recognizes the of Macedonia.April 25Pope John Paul II makes a historic visit. (The last pope to travel to Albania - in 1464 - died en route.)MayNexhmije Hoxhas prison sentence is increased by two years.JulyAlbania expels a Orthodox cleric, who is alleged to have distributed maps showing southern Albania as Greek territory. Greece subsequently deports thousands of illegal Albanian workers.July 30The leader of the Socialist Party, former prime minister Nano, is arrested on allegations of abuse of power.AugustAlia is arrested on charges of abuse of power.SeptemberAhmeti is sentenced to two years imprisonment.SeptemberPresident Berisha and President Bulatovic of Montenegro meet in Tirana to discuss ways of improving Albanian-Montenegrin relations.OctoberGreece recalls its ambassador for consultations after a series of border incidents and alleged rights abuses in Albania.See also* of Albania* of Albanian history from 1994Sources*ReferencesData as of 1993. External links*Country Studies On-Line at the Library of Congress*Books about Albania and the Albanian people (scribd.com) Reference of books (and some journal articles) about Albania and the Albanian people; their history, language, origin, culture, literature, etc. Public domain books, fully accessible online.
268997
History_of_the_Republic_of_China
:This article is about the history of the state which currently governs Area. For the history of Taiwan, see of Taiwan:For the history of China / China, see of China and of Peoples Republic of China.Image:LA2-NSRW-1-0148.jpg|thumb|right|350px|A McNally map of the Republic of China in  1914 File:Flag of the Republic of China 1912-1928.svg|thumb|180px|of the ROC - Five-colored flag (1912-1928), means Races Under One Union.File:Flag of the Republic of China.svg|thumb|180px|Flag of the ROC (1928-present), Blue Sky, White Sun with 12 rays, and Wholly Red field.The History of the Republic of China begins after the Dynasty in 1912, when the formation of the of China put an end to over two thousand years of Imperial rule. The Qing Dynasty, also known as the Manchu Dynasty, ruled from 1644 to 1912. Since the republics founding, it has experienced many tribulations as it was dominated by numerous warlords and fragmented by foreign powers. In 1928, the republic was nominally unified under the Kuomintang (KMT, the Nationalist Party) after the Expedition, and was in the early stages of industrialization and modernization when it was caught in the conflicts between the Kuomintang government, the Party of China which was converted into a nationalist party, remnant warlords, and Japan. Most nation-building efforts were stopped during the full-scale War of Resistance against Japan from 1937 to 1945, and later the widening gap between the Kuomintang and the Chinese Communist Party made a coalition government impossible, causing the resumption of the Civil War.A series of political, economic, and military missteps led the Kuomintang to defeat and retreat to Taiwan in 1949, establishing an authoritarian one-party state that considered itself to be the sole legitimate ruler of all of China. However, since political liberalization began in the late 1970s, the Republic of China has transformed itself into a multiparty, representative democracy on Taiwan.Early republic (1912-1916)Founding of the republicof China Flags.jpg|thumb|220px|right|Three different flags were originally used during the revolution. The bottom message says Long live the republic! with the five races represented by the Five-Color Flag of the Republic.The last days of the Dynasty were marked by civil unrest and foreign invasions. Various internal rebellions caused millions of deaths, and conflicts with foreign powers almost always resulted in humiliating treaties that exacted costly reparation and compromised the countrys territorial integrity. In addition, there were feelings that political power should return to the majority Chinese from the minority Manchus. Responding to these civil failures and discontent, the Qing Imperial Court did attempt to reform the government in various ways, such as the decision to draft a constitution in 1906, the establishment of provincial legislatures in 1909, and the preparation for a national parliament in 1910. However, many of these measures were opposed by the conservatives of the Qing Court, and many reformers were either imprisoned or executed outright. The failures of the Imperial Court to enact such reforming measures of political liberalization and modernization caused the reformists to steer toward the road of revolution.There were many revolutionary groups, but the most organized one was founded by Yat-sen, a republican and anti-Qing activist who became increasingly popular among the Chinese and Chinese students abroad, especially in Japan. In 1905 Sun founded the Tongmenghui in Tokyo with Xing, a popular leader of the Chinese revolutionary movement in Japan, as his deputy. This movement, generously supported by overseas Chinese funds, also gained political support with regional military officers and some of the reformers who had fled China after the Days Reform. Suns political philosophy was conceptualized in 1897, first enunciated in Tokyo in 1905, and modified through the early 1920s. It centered on the Principles of the People: nationalism, democracy, and peoples livelihood. The principle of nationalism called for overthrowing the Manchus and ending foreign hegemony over China. The second principle, democracy, was used to describe Suns goal of a popularly elected republican form of government. Peoples livelihood, often referred to as socialism, was aimed at helping the common people through regulation of the ownership of the means of production and land.thumb|210px|left|Bonds that Sun Yat-sen used to raise money for revolutionary cause. The Republic of China was also once known as the Chunghwa Republic.Image:ROC calendar.jpg|thumb|210px|A calendar that commemorates the first year of the Republic as well as the election of Yat-sen as the provisional President.The Republican Era of China began with the outbreak of revolution on October 10, 1911, in Wuchang, the capital of Hubei Province, among discontented modernized army units whose anti-Qing plot had been uncovered. This would be known as the Uprising which is celebrated as Tenth Day in Taiwan. It had been preceded by numerous abortive uprisings and organized protests inside China. The revolt quickly spread to neighboring cities, and Tongmenghui members throughout the country rose in immediate support of the Wuchang revolutionary forces. On October 12, the Revolutionaries succeeded in capturing Hankou and Hanyang.However this euphoria over the revolution was short-lived. On October 27, Shikai was appointed by the Qing Court to lead his New Armies, including the First Army led by Guozhang and the Second Army led by Qirui, to retake the city of Wuhan, which was taken by the Revolutionary Army on October 11. The Revolutionary Army had some six thousand troops to fend off nearly fifteen thousand of Yuans New Army. On November 11, the Revolutionaries retreated from Wuhan to Hanyang. By November 27, Hanyang was also lost and the Revolutionaries had to return to their starting point, Wuchang. However, during some fifty days of warfare against Yuans army, fifteen of the twenty-four provinces had declared their independence of the Qing empire. A month later, Sun Yat-sen returned to China from the States, where he had been raising funds among overseas Chinese and American sympathizers. On January 1, 1912, delegates from the independent provinces elected Sun Yat-sen  as the first Provisional President of the Republic of China.Because of the short period and fervor in which the provinces declared independence from the Qing Court, Yuan Shikai felt that it was in his best interest to negotiate with the Revolutionaries. Yuan agreed to accept the Republic of China, and as such most of the rest of the New Armies were now turned against the Qing Dynasty. The chain of events forced the last emperor of China, Puyi, to abdicate, on February 12 upon Yuan Shikais suggestion to Dowager Longyu, who signed the abdication papers. Puyi was allowed to continue living in the Forbidden City, however. The Republic of China officially succeeded the Qing Dynasty.Early RepublicOn January 1, 1912, Sun officially declared the establishment of the Republic of China and was inaugurated in Nanjing as the first Provisional President. But power in Beijing already had passed to Shikai, who had effective control of the Army, the most powerful military force in China at the time. To prevent war and possible foreign intervention from undermining the infant republic, Sun agreed to Yuans demand that China be united under a Beijing government headed by Yuan. On March 10, in Beijing, Yuan Shikai was sworn in as the second Provisional President of the Republic of China.Image:Chinese republic forever.jpg|thumb|270px|A poster that commemorates the permanent President of the Republic of China Shikai and the provisional President of the Republic Yat-sen.The republic that Sun Yat-sen and his associates envisaged evolved slowly. Although there were many political parties each vying for supremacy in the legislature, the revolutionists lacked an army, and the power of Yuan Shikai began to outstrip that of parliament. Yuan revised the constitution at will and became dictatorial. In August 1912, the Kuomintang (Nationalist Party) was founded by Jiaoren, one of Suns associates. It was an amalgamation of small political groups, including Suns Tongmenghui. In the national elections held in February 1913 for the new bicameral parliament, Song campaigned against the Yuan administration, whose representation at the time was largely by the Republican Party, led by Qichao. Song was an able campaigner and the Kuomintang won a majority of seats.Second RevolutionSome people believe that Yuan Shikai had Song assassinated in March; it has never been proven, although he had already arranged the assassination of several pro-revolutionist generals. Animosity towards Yuan grew. In April, Yuan secured the Reorganization Loan of twenty-five million sterling from Great Britain, France, Russia, Germany and Japan, without consulting the parliament first. The loan was used to finance Yuans Beiyang Army. On May 20, Yuan concluded a deal with Russia that recognized special Russian privilege in Mongolia and restricted Chinese right to station troops there. Kuomintang members of the Parliament accused Yuan of abusing his rights and called for his removal. On the other hand, the Progressive Party (), which was composed of constitutional monarchists and supported Yuan, accused the Kuomintang of fomenting an insurrection. Yuan then decided to use military action against the Kuomintang.In July 1913, seven southern provinces rebelled against Yuan, thus beginning the Second Revolution (). There were several underlying reasons for the Second Revolution besides Yuans abuse of power. First was that many Revolutionary Armies from different provinces were disbanded after the establishment of the Republic of China, and many officers and soldiers felt that they were not compensated for toppling the Qing Dynasty. Thus, there was much discontent against the new government among the military. Secondly, many revolutionaries felt that Yuan Shikai and Li Yuanhong were undeserving of the posts of presidency and vice presidency, because they acquired the posts through political maneuvers, rather than participation in the revolutionary movement. And lastly, Yuans use of violence (such as Songs assassination), dashed Kuomintangs hope of achieving reforms and political goals through electoral means.However, the Second Revolution did not fare well for the Kuomintang. The leading Kuomintang military force of Jiangxi was defeated by Yuans forces on August 1 and Nanchang was taken. On September 1, Nanjing was taken. When the rebellion was suppressed, Sun and other instigators fled to Japan. In October 1913 an intimidated parliament formally elected Yuan Shikai of the Republic of China, and the major powers extended recognition to his government. Qirui and other trusted Beiyang generals were given prominent positions in cabinet. To achieve international recognition, Yuan Shikai had to agree to autonomy for Mongolia and Tibet. China was still to be suzerain, but it would have to allow Russia a free hand in Outer Mongolia and Tanna Tuva and Britain continuation of its influence in Tibet.Mass Banditry, Yuan Shikai, and the National Protection WarImage:Yuan shikai.jpg|thumb|200px|Shikai as the Emperor of the of China (19151916).Mass bandit leaders with popular movements like the Lang Rebellion broke out, with the support of Yatsens revolutionaries from Canton, the Bandit leader Bai Lang ransacked and destroyed much of central China before he was crushed by the Army of Yuan Shikai, the Muslim Clique and Tibetan militia. These bandits were associated with the Gelaohui.In November Shikai, legally president, ordered the Kuomintang dissolved and forcefully removed its members from parliament. Because the majority of the parliament members belonged to the Kuomintang, the parliament did not meet quorum and was subsequently unable to convene. In January 1914 Yuan formally suspended the parliament. In February, Yuan called into session a meeting to revise the Provisional Constitution of the Republic of China, which was announced in May of that year. The revision greatly expanded Yuans powers, allowing him to declare war, sign treaties, and appoint officials without seeking approvals from the legislature first. In December 1914, he further revised the law and lengthened the term of the President to ten years, with no term limit. Essentially Yuan was preparing for his ascendancy as the emperor.On the other hand, since the failure of the Second Revolution, Sun Yat-sen and his allies were trying to rebuild the revolutionary movement. In July 1914, Sun established the Revolutionary Party (). Sun felt that his failures at building a consistent revolutionary movement stemmed from the lack of cohesiveness among its members. Thus, for his new party, Sun required its members to be totally loyal to Sun and follow a series of rather harsh rules. Some of Suns earlier associates, including Huang Xing, balked at the idea of such authoritarian organization and refused to join Sun. However, they agreed that the republic must not revert back to imperial rule.Besides the revolutionary groups associated with Sun, there were also several other groups aimed at toppling Yuan Shikai. One was the Progressive Party, the originally constitutional-monarchist party which opposed the Kuomintang during the Second Revolution. The Progressive Party switched their position largely because of Yuans sabotage of the national parliament. Secondly, many provincial governors, who had declared their independence from the Qing Imperial Court in 1912, found the idea of supporting another Imperial Court utterly ridiculous. Yuan also alienated his Beiyang generals by centralizing tax collection from local authorities. In addition, public opinion was overwhelmingly anti-Yuan.When War I broke out in 1914, Japan fought on the Allied side and seized German holdings in Shandong Province. In 1915 the Japanese set before the government in Beijing the so-called Demands. The Demands aimed to install Japanese economic controls in railway and mining operations in Shandong, Manchuria, Fujian, and pressed to have Yuan Shikai appoint Japanese advisors in key positions in the Chinese government. The Twenty-One Demands would have made China a Japanese protectorate. The Beijing government rejected some of these demands but yielded to the Japanese insistence on keeping the Shandong territory already in its possession. Beijing also recognized Tokyos authority over southern Manchuria and eastern Mongolia. Yuans acceptance of the demands was extremely unpopular, but he continued his monarchist agenda nevertheless.On 12 December 1915, Yuan, supported by his son Keding, declared himself emperor of  a new Empire of China. This sent shockwaves throughout China, causing widespread rebellion in numerous provinces. On 25 December, former Yunnan governor E, former Jiangxi governor Liejun (), and Yunnan general Jiyao formed the Protection Army () and declared Yunnan independent. Thus began the Protection War (). Yunnans declaration of independence also encouraged other southern provinces to declare independence. Yuans Beiyang generals, who were already wary of Yuans imperial coronation, did not put up an aggressive campaign against the National Protection Army. On 22 March 1916, Yuan formally repudiated monarchy and stepped down as the first and last emperor of his dynasty. Yuan died on 6 June of that year. Vice President Yuanhong assumed presidency and appointed Beiyang general Qirui as his Premier. Yuan Shikais imperial ambitions finally ended with the return of republican government.Warlord Era (1916-1928)After Yuan Shikais death, shifting alliances of regional warlords fought for control of the Beijing government.  Despite the fact that various warlords gained control of the government in Beijing during the warlord era, this did not constitute a new era of control or governance, because other warlords did not acknowledge the transitory governments in this period and were a law unto themselves.  These military-dominated governments were collectively known as the government.  The warlord era is considered by some historians to have ended in 1927.World War I and brief Manchu restorationAfter Yuan Shikais death, Yuanhong became the President and Qirui became the Premier. The Provisional Constitution was reinstated and the parliament convened. However, Li Yuanhong and Duan Qirui had many conflicts, the most glaring of which was Chinas entry into War I. Since the outbreak of the war, China had remained neutral until the States urged all neutral countries to join the Allies, as a condemnation of Germanys use of submarine warfare. Premier Duan Qirui was particularly interested in joining the Allies, because he would then use the opportunity to secure loans from Japan to build up his Clique army. The two factions in the parliament engaged in ugly debates regarding the entry of China and, in May 1917, Li Yuanhong dismissed Duan Qirui from his government.Duans dismissal caused provincial military governors loyal to Duan to declare independence and to call for Li Yuanhong to step down as the President. Li Yuanhong summoned Zhang Xun to mediate the situation.  Zhang Xun had been a general serving the Qing Court and was by this time the military governor of Anhui province. He had his mind on restoring Puyi (or Emperor) to the imperial throne.  Zhang was supplied with funds and weapons through the German legation who were eager to keep China neutral.File:PartidariosDeLaMonarquaJuntoAlTemploDelCielo1917--historywartimes14londuoft.jpg|thumb|right|Monarchist supporters gather at the of Heaven in Beijing during Zhang Xuns attempted restoration of the Qing Dynasty.On July 1, 1917, Zhang officially proclaimed that the Dynasty has been restored and requested that Li Yuanhong give up his seat as the President, which Li promptly rejected. During the restoration affair, Duan Qirui led his army and defeated Zhang Xuns restoration forces in Beijing.  One of Duans airplanes bombed the Forbidden City, in what was possibly the first aerial bombardment in East Asia.   On July 12 Zhangs forces disintegrated and Duan returned to Beijing.The Manchu restoration ended almost as soon as it began. During this period of confusion, Vice President Guozhang, also a Beiyang general, assumed the post of Acting President of the republic and was sworn-in in Nanjing. Duan Qirui resumed his post as the Premier. The Clique of Feng Guozhang and the Clique of Duan Qirui emerged as the most powerful cliques following the restoration affair.Duan Qiruis triumphant return to Beijing essentially made him the most powerful leader in China. Duan dissolved the parliament upon his return and declared war on Germany and Austria-Hungary on August 13, 1917.  German and Austro-Hungarian nationals were detained and their assets seized.  Around 175,000 Chinese workers volunteered for labour battalions after being enticed with money, some even years before war was declared.  They were sent to the Western Front, East Africa, and Mesopotamia and served on supply ships.  Some 10,000 died including over 500 due to U-boats.  No soldiers were sent overseas though they did participate with the Allies in the Intervention under Japanese General Otani.Constitutional Protection WarIn September, Duans complete disregard for the constitution caused Sun Yat-sen and the deposed parliament members to establish a new government in Guangzhou and the Constitutional Protection Army () to counter Duans abuse of power. Ironically, Sun Yat-sens new government was not based on the Provisional Constitution. Rather, the new government was a military government and Sun was its Grand Commander of the Armed Forces (, translated in the Western press as Generalissimo). Six southern provinces became part of Suns Guangzhou military government and repelled Duans attempt to destroy the Constitutional Protection Army.The Constitutional Protection War continued through 1918. Many in Sun Yat-sens Guangzhou government felt Suns position as the Generalissimo was too exclusionary and promoted a cabinet system to challenge Suns ultimate authority. As a result, the Guangzhou government was reorganized to elect a seven-member cabinet system, known as the Governing Committee. Sun was once again sidelined by his political opponents and military strongmen. He left for Shanghai following the reorganization.Duan Qiruis Beijing government did not fare much better than Suns. Some generals in Duans Anhui Clique and others in the Zhili Clique did not want to use force to unify the southern provinces. They felt negotiation was the solution to unify China and forced Duan to resign in October. In addition, many were distressed by Duans borrowing of huge sums of Japanese money to fund his army to fight internal enemies. President Feng Guozhang, with his term expiring, was then succeeded by Shichang, who wanted to negotiate with the southern provinces. In February 1919, delegates from the northern and southern provinces convened in Shanghai to discuss postwar situations. However, the meeting broke down over Duans borrowing of Japanese loans to fund the Anhui Clique army and further attempts at negotiation were hampered by the Fourth Movement. The Constitutional Protection War essentially left China divided along the north-south border.May Fourth MovementImage:May Fourth.jpg|thumb|right|270px|Students in Beijing rallied during the Fourth Movement.In 1917, China declared war on Germany in the hope of recovering its lost province, then under Japanese control. On May 4, 1919, there were massive student demonstrations against the Beijing government and Japan. The political fervor, student activism, and iconoclastic and reformist intellectual currents set in motion by the patriotic student protest developed into a national awakening known as the Fourth Movement. The intellectual milieu in which the May Fourth Movement developed was known as the Culture Movement and occupied the period from 1917 to 1923. The student demonstrations of May 4, 1919 were the high point of the New Culture Movement, and the terms are often used synonymously. Chinese representatives refused to sign the of Versailles, due to intense pressure from the student protesters and public opinion alike.Fight against warlordism and the First United FrontThe May Fourth Movement helped to rekindle the then-fading cause of republican revolution. In 1917 Sun Yat-sen had become commander-in-chief of a rival military government in Canton in collaboration with southern warlords. In October 1919, Sun reestablished the Kuomintang (KMT) to counter the government in Beijing. The latter, under a succession of warlords, still maintained its facade of legitimacy and its relations with the West. By 1921, Sun had become president of the southern government. He spent his remaining years trying to consolidate his regime and achieve unity with the north. His efforts to obtain aid from the Western democracies were ignored, however, and in 1920 he turned to the Union, which had recently achieved its own revolution. The Soviets sought to befriend the Chinese revolutionists by offering scathing attacks on Western imperialism. But for political expediency, the Soviet leadership initiated a dual policy of support for both Sun and the newly established Communist Party (CCP).In 1922 the Kuomintang-warlord alliance in Guangzhou was ruptured, and Sun fled to Shanghai. By then, Sun saw the need to seek Soviet support for his cause. In 1923, a joint statement by Sun and a Soviet representative in Shanghai pledged Soviet assistance for Chinas national unification. Soviet advisers  the most prominent of whom was an agent of the Comintern, Borodin  began to arrive in China in 1923 to aid in the reorganization and consolidation of the Kuomintang along the lines of the Party of the Soviet Union and establish the United Front. The CCP was under Comintern instructions to cooperate with the Kuomintang, and its members were encouraged to join while maintaining their party identities to form a bloc within.The policy of working with the Kuomintang and Kai-shek had been recommended by the Dutch Communist Sneevliet, chosen in 1923 to be the Comintern representative in China due to his revolutionary experience in the Indies, where he had a major role in founding the Komunis Indonesia (PKI) - and who felt that the Chinese party was too small and weak to undertake a major effort  on its own.The CCP was still small at the time, having a membership of 300 in 1921 and only 1,500 by 1925. The Kuomintang in 1922 already had 150,000 members. Soviet advisers also helped the Kuomintang set up a political institute to train propagandists in mass mobilization techniques and in 1923 sent Chiang Kai-shek, one of Suns lieutenants from Tongmenghui days, for several months military and political study in Moscow. After Chiangs return in late 1923, he participated in the establishment of the Military Academy outside Guangzhou, which was the seat of government under the Kuomintang-CCP alliance. In 1924 Chiang became head of the academy and began the rise to prominence that would make him Suns successor as head of the Kuomintang and the unifier of all China under the right-wing nationalist government.Chiang consolidates powerImage:Countermand concession.jpg|thumb|250px|The Revolutionary Army soldiers marched into the British concessions in Hubei during the Northern Expedition.Sun Yat-sen died of cancer in Beijing in March 1925, as the Nationalist movement he had helped to initiate was gaining momentum. During the summer of 1925, Chiang, as commander-in-chief of the Revolutionary Army, set out on the long-delayed Northern Expedition against the northern warlords. Within nine months, half of China had been conquered. By 1926, however, the Kuomintang had divided into left- and right-wing factions, and the Communist bloc within it was also growing. In March 1926, after thwarting a kidnapping attempt against him (Warship Incident), Chiang abruptly dismissed his Soviet advisers, imposed restrictions on CCP members participation in the top leadership, and emerged as the preeminent Kuomintang leader. The Soviet Union, still hoping to prevent a split between Chiang and the CCP, ordered Communist underground activities to facilitate the Northern Expedition, which was finally launched by Chiang from Guangzhou in July 1926.In early 1927, the Kuomintang-CCP rivalry led to a split in the revolutionary ranks. The CCP and the left wing of the Kuomintang had decided to move the seat of the Nationalist government from Guangzhou to Wuhan. But Chiang, whose Northern Expedition was proving successful, set his forces to destroying the Shanghai CCP apparatus and established an anti-Communist government at Nanjing in April 1927 - bloody events. There now were three capitals in China: the internationally recognized warlord regime in Beijing; the Communist and left-wing Kuomintang regime at Wuhan; and the right-wing civilian-military regime at Nanjing, which would remain the Kuomintang capital for the next decade.The Comintern cause appeared bankrupt. A new policy was instituted calling on the CCP to foment armed insurrections in both urban and rural areas in preparation for an expected rising tide of revolution. Unsuccessful attempts were made by Communists to take cities such as Nanchang, Changsha, Shantou, and Guangzhou, and an armed rural insurrection, known as the Harvest Uprising, was staged by peasants in Hunan Province. The insurrection was led by Zedong, who would later become chairman of the CCP and head of state of the Republic of China.But in mid-1927, the CCP was at a low ebb. The Communists had been expelled from Wuhan by their left-wing Kuomintang allies, who in turn were toppled by a military regime. By 1928, all of China was at least nominally under Chiangs control, and the Nanjing government received prompt international recognition as the sole legitimate government of China. The Kuomintang government announced that in conformity with Sun Yat-sens formula for the three stages of revolution  military unification, political tutelage, and constitutional democracy  China had reached the end of the first phase and would embark on the second, which would be under Kuomintang direction.Nanjing Decade (1928-1937)cooperation.png|thumb|220px|With help from Germany, Chinese industry and military was improved just prior to the war against Japan.The Nanjing Decade of 1928-37 was one of consolidation and accomplishment under the leadership of the Nationalists, with a mixed but generally positive record in the economy, social progress, development of democracy, and cultural creativity. Some of the harsh aspects of foreign concessions and privileges in China were moderated through diplomacy. In May 1930 the government regained the right to set its tariff, which before then had been set by the foreign powers. The Nationalist government acted also energetically to modernize the legal and penal systems, stabilize prices, amortize debts, reform the banking and currency systems, build railroads and highways, improve public health facilities, legislate against traffic in narcotics, and augment industrial and agricultural production. On November 3, 1935 the government instituted the currency (fapi) reform, immediately stabilizing prices and also raising revenues for the government. Great strides also were made in education and, in an effort to help unify Chinese society, in a program to popularize Standard Chinese and overcome other of Chinese. Newspapers, magazines, and book publishing flourished, and the widespread establishment of communications facilities further encouraged a sense of unity and pride among the people. Laws were passed and campaigns mounted to promote the rights of women, The ease and speed of communication also allowed a focus on social problems, including those of the villages. The Reconstruction Movement was one of many which took advantage of the new freedom to raise social consciousness. On the other hand, political freedom was considerably curtailed because of the Kuomintangs one-party domination through political tutelage and often violent means in shutting down anti-government protests.During this time a series of massive wars took place in western China, the Rebellion, War, Invasion of Xinjiang, and War (1897).Although the central government was nominally in control of the entire country during this period, large areas of China remained under the semi-autonomous rule of local warlords, provincial military leaders, or warlord coalitions. Nationalist rule was strongest in the eastern regions of China around the capital Nanjing, but regional militarists such as Yuxiang and Xishan retained considerable local authority. The Plains War in 1930, the Japanese aggression in 1931, and the Red Armys March led to more power for the central government, but there continued to be foot dragging and even outright defiance, as in the Fujian Rebellion of 1933-34.Second Sino-Japanese War (1936-1945)Image:NRA marching and aircraft.jpg|thumb|250px|right|A group of Revolutionary Army soldiers, from Li-jen New First Army, marching off while a plane flies by overhead during the campaign.Few Chinese had any illusions about Japanese designs on China. Hungry for raw materials and pressed by a growing population, Japan initiated the seizure of Manchuria in September 1931 and established ex-Qing emperor Puyi as head of the state of Manchukuo in 1932. The loss of Manchuria, and its vast potential for industrial development and war industries, was a blow to the Kuomintang economy. The of Nations, established at the end of World War I, was unable to act in the face of the Japanese defiance. The Japanese began to push from south of the Great Wall into northern China and into the coastal provinces. Chinese fury against Japan was predictable, but anger was also directed against Chiang and the Nanking government, which at the time was more preoccupied with anti-Communist extermination campaigns than with resisting the Japanese invaders. The importance of internal unity before external danger was forcefully brought home in December 1936, when Kai-shek, in an event now known as the Incident was kidnapped by Xueliang and forced to ally with the Communists against the Japanese in the Second Kuomintang-CCP United Front against Japan.and Stilwell.jpg|thumb|250px|Generalissimo and Madame Chiang Kai-shek with General Stilwell in Burma (1942).The Chinese resistance stiffened after July 7, 1937, when a clash occurred between Chinese and Japanese troops outside Beijing (then named Beiping) near the Polo Bridge. This skirmish led to open, though undeclared, war between China and Japan. Shanghai fell after a three month battle which ended after severe Japanese naval and army casualties. The capital of Nanjing fell in December 1937. It was followed by a series of mass killings and rape of civilians in the Massacre. The national capital was briefly at Wuhan, then removed in an epic retreat to Chongqing, the seat of government until 1945. In 1940 the collaborationist Jingwei regime was set up with its capital in Nanjing, proclaiming itself the legitimate Republic of China in opposition to Chiang Kai-sheks government, though its claims were significantly hampered due to its nature as a Japanese state controlling limited amounts of territory, along with its subsequent defeat at the end of the war.The United Front between the Kuomintang and CCP took place with salutary effects for the beleaguered CCP, despite Japans steady territorial gains in northern China, the coastal regions, and the rich River Valley in central China. After 1940, conflicts between the Kuomintang and Communists became more frequent in the areas not under Japanese control. The entrance of the United States into the War after 1941 changed the nature of their relationship. The Communists expanded their influence wherever opportunities presented themselves through mass organizations, administrative reforms, and the land- and tax-reform measures favoring the peasants and the spread of their organizational network, while the Kuomintang attempted to neutralize the spread of Communist influence. Meanwhile northern China was infiltrated politically further more by the Japanese politicians in Manchukuo.  Facilities such as Huang Gong is an example.In 1945, the Republic of China emerged from the war nominally a great military power but actually a nation economically prostrate and on the verge of all-out civil war. The economy deteriorated, sapped by the military demands of foreign war and internal strife, by spiraling inflation, and by Nationalist profiteering, speculation, and hoarding. Starvation came in the wake of the war, and millions were rendered homeless by floods and the unsettled conditions in many parts of the country. The situation was further complicated by an Allied agreement at the Conference in February 1945 that brought Soviet troops into Manchuria to hasten the termination of war against Japan. Although the Chinese had not been present at Yalta, they had been consulted and had agreed to have the Soviets enter the war in the belief that the Soviet Union would deal only with the Kuomintang government. After the end of the war in August 1945, the Nationalist government moved back to Nanjing. With American help, Nationalist troops moved to take Japanese surrender in North China. The Soviet Union, as part of the Yalta agreement allowing a Soviet sphere of influence in Manchuria, dismantled and removed more than half the industrial equipment left there by the Japanese. The Soviet presence in northeast China enabled the Communists to move in long enough to arm themselves with the equipment surrendered by the withdrawing Japanese army. The problems of rehabilitating the formerly Japanese-occupied areas and of reconstructing the nation from the ravages of a protracted war were staggering.See also: Manchukuo, MengjiangCivil War and annexation of Taiwan (1945-1949)During World War II, the United States emerged as a major actor in Chinese affairs. As an ally it embarked in late 1941 on a program of massive military and financial aid to the hard-pressed Nationalist government. In January 1943 the United States and Britain led the way in revising their treaties with China, bringing to an end a century of unequal treaty relations. Within a few months, a new agreement was signed between the United States and Republic of China for the stationing of American troops in China for the common war effort against Japan. In December 1943 the Exclusion Acts of the 1880s and subsequent laws enacted by the United States Congress to restrict Chinese immigration into the United States were repealed.The wartime policy of the United States was initially to help China become a strong ally and a stabilizing force in postwar Asia. As the conflict between the Kuomintang and the Communists intensified, however, the United States sought unsuccessfully to reconcile the rival forces for a more effective anti-Japanese war effort. According to the Declaration, the Republic of China annexed Taiwan on October 1945 (Day).Toward the end of the war, States Marines were used to hold Beiping (Beijing) and Tianjin against a possible Soviet incursion, and logistic support was given to Kuomintang forces in north and northeast China.Through the mediatory influence of the United States a military truce was arranged in January 1946, but battles between the Kuomintang and Communists soon resumed. Public opinion of administrative incompetence of the Republic of China government was escalated and incited by the Communists in the nationwide student protest against mishandling of a rape accusation in early 1947 and another national protest against monetary reforms later that year. Realizing that American efforts short of large-scale armed intervention could not stop the war, the United States withdrew the American mission, headed by General C. Marshall, in early 1947. The Civil War, became more widespread; battles raged not only for territories but also for the allegiance of cross sections of the population. The United States aided the Nationalists with massive economic loans and weapons but no combat support.Image:Movement.png|thumb|300px|The Nationalists retreat to Taipei: after the Nationalists lost Nanjing (Nanking) they next moved to Guangzhou (Canton), then to Chongqing (Chungking), Chengdu (Chengtu) and Xichang (Sichang) before arriving in Taipei.Belatedly, the Republic of China government sought to enlist popular support through internal reforms. The effort was in vain, however, because of the rampant corruption in government and the accompanying political and economic chaos. By late 1948, the Kuomintang position was bleak. The demoralized and undisciplined Kuomintang troops proved no match for the communist Liberation Army, earlier known as the Red Army. The Communists were well established in the north and northeast. Although the Kuomintang had an advantage in numbers of men and weapons, controlled a much larger territory and population than their adversaries, and enjoyed considerable international support, they were exhausted by the long war with Japan and in-fighting among various generals. They were also losing the propaganda war to the Communists, with the population weary of Kuomintang corruption and yearning for peace.In January 1949, Beiping was taken by the Communists without a fight, and its name changed back to Beijing. Between April and November, major cities passed from Kuomintang to Communist control with minimal resistance. In most cases, the surrounding countryside and small towns had come under Communist influence long before the cities. Finally, on October 1949, Communists founded the Republic of China. After 1 October 1949,  Chiang Kai-shek and a few hundred thousand Republic of China troops and 2 million refugees, predominantly from the government and business community, fled from mainland China to Taiwan, there remained only isolated pockets of resistance. On December 1949, Chiang proclaimed Taipei, Taiwan, the temporary capital of the Republic of China.Republic of China on Taiwan (1949-present)Cross-straits relations and international position in 1949-1970At the end of 1943, the Declaration was issued, including among its clauses that all territories of China, including Formosa (Taiwan), that Japan had occupied would be returned to Republic of China.  This declaration was reiterated in the Declaration, issued in 1945.  Later that year, World War II ended, and Japan accepted the Potsdam Declaration, surrendering unconditionally.  The Supreme Commander of the Allied Forces commanded that the Japanese forces in Taiwan surrender to the government of the Republic of China.()  On October 25, 1945 in Zhongshan Hall, the Japanese government in Taiwan surrendered to the representative of the Republic of China, Chen Yi, the Republic of China formally receiving Taiwan.  In 1951, Japan formally signed the of San Francisco, but, due to the unclear situation of the Chinese civil war, the peace treaty did not clearly indicate to whom Taiwans sovereignty belonged.  In the second article of the 1952 of Taipei, following the Treaty of San Francisco, Japan reiterated its abandonment of sovereignty of Taiwan, the Pescadores, the Spratlys and the Paracels.The Republic of China (PRC) and the Republic of China (ROC) continued a state of war until 1979. In October 1949 a PRC attempt to take the ROC controlled island of Kinmen was thwarted in the of Kuningtou halting the PLA advance towards Taiwan. The Communists other amphibious operations of 1950 were more successful: they led to the Communist conquest of Hainan Island in April 1950,capture of Wanshan Islands off the Guangdong coast (MayAugust 1950) and of Island off Zhejiang (May 1950).(MacFarquhar, Roderick. Fairbank, John K. Twitchett, Denis C. 1991 (1991). The Cambridge History of China. Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0521243378. pg 820.)In June 1949 the ROC declared a closure of all mainland China ports and its navy attempted to intercept all foreign ships. The closure covered from a point north of the mouth of Min river in province to the mouth of the Liao river in Manchuria.(Tsang, Steve Yui-Sang Tsang. The Cold Wars Odd Couple: The Unintended Partnership Between the Republic of China and the UK, 19501958. 2006 (2006). I.B. Tauris. ISBN 1850438420. p 155, p 115-120, p 139-145) Since mainland Chinas railroad network was underdeveloped, north-south trade depended heavily on sea lanes. ROC naval activity also caused severe hardship for mainland China fishermen.After losing mainland China, a group of approximately 12,000 KMT soldiers escaped to Burma and continued launching guerrilla attacks into south China. Their leader, General Li Mi, was paid a salary by the ROC government and given the nominal title of Governor of Yunnan. Initially, the United States supported these remnants and the Intelligence Agency provided them with aid. After the Burmese government appealed to the Nations in 1953, the U.S. began pressuring the ROC to withdraw its loyalists. By the end of 1954, nearly 6,000 soldiers had left Burma and Li Mi declared his army disbanded. However, thousands remained, and the ROC continued to supply and command them, even secretly supplying reinforcements at times.During the War, some captured Communist Chinese soldiers, many of whom were originally KMT soldiers, were repatriated to Taiwan rather than mainland China. A KMT guerrilla force continued to operate cross-border raids into south-western China in the early 1950s. The ROC government launched a number of air bombing raids into key coastal cities of mainland China such as Shanghai.Though viewed as a military liability by the United States, the ROC viewed its remaining islands in Fujian as vital for any future campaign to defeat the PRC and retake mainland China. On September 3, 1954, the Taiwan Strait crisis began when the PLA started shelling Quemoy and threatened to take the Islands.( On January 20, 1955, the PLA took nearby Island, with the entire ROC garrison of 720 troops killed or wounded defending the island. On January 24 of the same year, the States Congress passed the Resolution authorizing the President to defend the ROCs offshore islands.( The First Taiwan Straits crisis ended in March 1955 when the PLA ceased its bombardment. The crisis was brought to a close during the Bandung conference.(The Taiwan Strait Crisis began on August 23, 1958 with air and naval engagements between the PRC and the ROC military forces, leading to intense artillery bombardment of Quemoy (by the PRC) and Amoy (by the ROC), and ended on November of the same year.( PLA patrol boats blockaded the islands from ROC supply ships. Though the United States rejected Chiang Kai-sheks proposal to bomb mainland China artillery batteries, it quickly moved to supply fighter jets and anti-aircraft missiles to the ROC. It also provided amphibious assault ships to land supply, as a sunken ROC naval vessel was blocking the harbor. On September 7, the United States escorted a convoy of ROC supply ships and the PRC refrained from firing. On October 25, the PRC announced an even-day ceasefire &mdash; the PLA would only shell Quemoy on odd-numbered days.Despite the end of the hostilities, the two sides have never signed any agreement or treaty to officially end the war.After the 1950s, the war became more symbolic than real, represented by on again, off again artillery bombardment towards and from Kinmen. In later years, live shells were replaced with propaganda sheets. The bombardment finally ceased in 1979 after the establishment of diplomatic relations between the Peoples Republic of China and the United States.During this period, movement of people and goods virtually ceased between PRC- and ROC-controlled territories. There were occasional defectors. One high profile defector was Yifu Lin, who swam across the Kinmen strait to mainland China and is now Chief Economist and Senior Vice President of the Bank.Most observers expected Chiangs government to eventually fall in response to a Communist invasion of Taiwan, and the United States initially showed no interest in supporting Chiangs government in its final stand. Things changed radically with the onset of the War in June 1950. At this point, allowing a total Communist victory over Chiang became politically impossible in the United States, and President S. Truman ordered the States Seventh Fleet into the straits to prevent the ROC and PRC from attacking each other.(Bush, Richard C. 2005 (2005). Untying the Knot: Making Peace in the Taiwan Strait. Brookings Institution Press. ISBN 081571288X.)After the ROC complained to the Nations against the Union supporting the PRC, the General Assembly Resolution 505 was adopted on February 1, 1952 to condemn the Soviet Union.Tensions between people of Mainland China and people of TaiwanAfter War II, Order No. 1 ordered the forces of the of Japan in Taiwan to surrender to Generalissimo Kai-shek. The Republic of China appointed Chen Yi as the Chief Executive of Taiwan.  He arrived in Taiwan on October 24, 1945 and received the last Japanese governor, Rikichi, who signed the document of surrender on the next day.  On the next day, Chen Yi proclaimed Taiwan Day. The validity of the proclamation is subject to some debate however, with some supporters of independence arguing that it is invalid, and that the date simply marks the start of a occupation by the Republic of China.During the immediate postwar period, the Chinese Kuomintang administration on Taiwan was inept and corrupt, while soldiers were breaking the laws.(http://www.gio.gov.tw/taiwan-website/5-gp/history/tw08.html In addition, the fact that many mainland Chinese officials were incompetent and corrupt and soldiers broke the law aroused antipathy and disdain from Taiwans people, heightening antagonism between the public and government officials.)  Many Taiwanese people were disillusioned with the incoming Kuomintang administration, which proved to be as harsh as Japanese imperial rule. Anti-mainlander violence flared on February 28, 1947 following an accidental shooting of a cigarette vendor by the police. The resulting Incident became a pivotal event in the shaping of modern Taiwanese identity. For several weeks after the incident, many Taiwanese rebelled, participating in island-wide riots protesting the governments corruption and harsh rule. The governor, Chen Yi, while pretending to negotiate in good faith with leaders of the protest movement, called for troops from mainland China.  The Kuomintang, allegedly fearing a Communist infiltration, assembled a large military force to quell the disturbance in Taiwan, in the process killing many and imprisoning thousands of others. Many of the Taiwanese who had formed home rule groups under the Japanese were the victims of the incident, as were civilian mainlanders who bore the brunt of vigilante retaliation. This was followed by law and the terror in which many thousands of people were imprisoned or executed for their political opposition to the Kuomintang.  Many victims of the white terror were Taiwanese elitepolitical leaders, wealthier families, intellectuals, etc. In addition, mainlanders were not spared either, as many had real or perceived associations with communists before they came to Taiwan. For example, some mainlanders who had joined book clubs in mainland China, deemed leftist by the government, were liable to be arrested and many served long prison sentences for these real or perceived threats.Martial law, among other things, included sedition laws against supporters of communism or independence, leading to very substantial political repression. It also prohibited the formation of new parties (though opposition figures could run as independents or tangwai). Second, because of the ROCs claim to rule all of China, the vast majority of the seats in the Yuan (parliament) and National Assembly (electoral college for the president, now abolished) were held by those elected from mainland China constituencies in 1947 and 1948. The regime argued that these legislators should keep their seats until elections in their original constituencies were possible. Although supplemental elections that increased the ethnically Taiwanese representation in these bodies were held starting in 1969, the huge majorities of senior legislators continued through 1990, guaranteeing KMT control whether or not the party won on election day. More informally, the long term residents of Taiwan prior to the late 1940s remained distinctly under-represented in the top ranks of government(http://www.gio.gov.tw/taiwan-website/5-gp/history/tw08.html With regard to politics, Chen worked under the assumption that the Taiwanese people had been enslaved by the Japanese and actively promoted a campaign to re-Sinicize () them, ignoring their strong desire to participate in the islands politics after the ending of colonial rule. Thus, with the exception of one half-mainlander deputy director appointed to the Education Department, almost all of the higher positions were held by the mainlanders. Furthermore, although the speaker of the Taiwan Provincial Assembly only had the right of consultation, Chen Yi still chose his favorite confidant, another half-mainlander named Huang Chao-cin (), to hold this post, instead of Lin Sian-tang (), a Taiwanese leader who had long enjoyed public support. As mainlanders took most of the higher positions within the government hierarchy while Taiwanese could only serve at low-level ones, the provincial governor was viewed as a new version of the Japanese governor (), and Taiwans return to the ROC was viewed as merely a change of bosses ().)(http://www.gio.gov.tw/taiwan-website/5-gp/history/tw08.html In 1946, one year after the Japanese surrender, the TPGO abolished Japanese editions of newspapers, forbade the use of the Japanese language in both writing and speech, and began to use proficiency in Chinese as an important consideration when recruiting people for government jobs. Taiwanese intellectuals suddenly became semi-literate, therefore, and most were excluded from the civil service, which added to peoples feelings of resentment.)(http://www.gio.gov.tw/taiwan-website/5-gp/history/tw10.html With successful formation of the DPP on September 28, 1986, the supplementary election of central public representatives held that year marked the true beginnings of party politics and a competing two-party democracy in Taiwan.  In addition, the Nationalist government was accelerating the process of localization, with the number of Taiwanese taking important government posts slowly increasing to better reflect the general demographic structure of the island.) and the party through the early 1990s, suggesting a significant limit to democratization.Economic developmentsPartially with the help of the Aid Act of 1948 and the Joint Commission on Rural Reconstruction, the Republic of China government implemented a far-reaching and highly successful land reform program on Taiwan during the 1950s. They redistributed land among small farmers and compensated large landowners with commodities certificates and stock in state-owned industries. These rural reforms, such as the rent reduction program, were never implemented with much force in mainland China but were very successful in Taiwan.Overall, although the reforms left some large landowners impoverished, others turned their compensation into capital and started commercial and industrial enterprises. These entrepreneurs were to become Taiwans first industrial capitalists. Together with refugee businessmen from mainland China, they managed Taiwans transition from an agricultural to a commercial, industrial economy.Taiwans phenomenal economic development earned it a spot as one of the four Asian Tigers, along with Kong, Singapore and Korea, though as of late, much work remains in the on-going process of privatization of state-owned industries and in financial sector reforms.Diplomatic setbacksthumb|100px|1960s ROC slogan: The times test the youth. The youth create the times.The 1970s saw many switches in diplomatic recognition from the Republic of China to the Republic of China. After World War II, the Republic of China had been one of the founding members in the Nations and held Chinas seat on the Council until 1971, when it was expelled by General Assembly Resolution 2758 and replaced in all UN organs with the Republic of China government. (Multiple attempts by the Republic of China to re-join the UN have not made it past committee. See and the United Nations.) Since the 1980s, the number of nations officially recognizing the Republic of China has decreased to 24. The Peoples Republic of China refuses to maintain diplomatic relations with any government which formally recognizes the Republic of China, leading to a complex status of Taiwan (see also China policy and relations of the Republic of China). United States troops were stationed in Taiwan after the victory of the Communists in mainland China in order to aid in the defense of Taiwan against invasion by the Peoples Republic of China. The United States military continued to be stationed in Taiwan until diplomatic relations were broken with the Republic of China in 1979 but to this day maintains a significant intelligence presence.Democratic reformsEven though Kai-shek operated an autocrat government, as part of securing Taiwan, he also slowly began democratization progress in Taiwan, beginning with the elections of local offices . He also reformed the top Kuomintang leadership, transforming the party from a democratic centralist organization to one with many factions, each with differing opinions. Ching-kuo, succeeding his father Chiang Kai-shek, accelerated to liberalize the political system in Taiwan. Events such as the Incident in 1979 highlighted the need for change and groups like International were mobilizing a campaign against the government and President Chiang Ching-kuo. Chiang Ching-kuo, although a mainlander, pronounced that he was also a Taiwanese and also introduced many ethnically Taiwanese people into top echelons of the party. He also named Teng-hui, an ethnic Taiwanese, as his vice president and likely successor. In 1986, the permission to form new political parties was granted, and the Progressive Party (DPP) was inaugurated as the first opposition party. However, a political crisis appeared imminent as the Ministry of Justice filed charges against the DPP for violating law restrictions, but President Chiang defused it by announcing that martial law would end and that new parties could be formed as long as they supported the Republican Constitution and renounced both communism and Independence. The lifting of Martial Law Decree and the ban on veterans to visit their China relatives was approved in 1987; the removal of the ban on registration of new newspapers in 1988 was also a historical event.After the 1988 death of Chiang Ching-kuo, his successor Teng-hui continued to hand more government authority over to the ethnically Taiwanese and to democratize the government. In 1990, Lee held the National Affairs Conference which led to the abolishment of the national emergency period the following year and paved the way for both the total re-election for the National Assembly in 1991 and the Yuan in 1992. Full democracy in the sense that citizens are able to select their legislators, not just local officials, in free and fair elections was achieved in 1991 when the senior legislators were forced to retire. In 1994, again under the urging of President Lee, the presidency of the of China was changed via constitutional revision into a position popularly elected by the people on Taiwan.Under Lee, Taiwan underwent a process of localization in which local culture and history was promoted over a pan-China viewpoint. Lees reforms included printing banknotes from the Central Bank rather than the Provincial Bank of Taiwan and freezing the Taiwan Provincial Government (i.e., stripping the provincial government of much of its powers and merging those powers into either the central governments powers or local governments powers without abolishing the provincial government altogether). Restrictions on the use of Hokkien in the broadcast media and in schools were lifted as well.However, democratization had its problems. During the early stages of the process, political parties were still banned, but independent candidates, some including those who had splintered off from the Kuomintang, were allowed to run for offices, provided that they would not receive any campaign funding from the party. As a result, many of these candidates resorted to borrowing money from businessmen, local elite, or even gangsters, in exchange for political and economic favors. This was the beginning of the black gold phenomena in Taiwan in which dishonest politicians were backed by businessmen  and criminal elements at the expense of the society. In opposition to this, some former Kuomintang members formed the New Party to combat the Kuomintang, which had liberalized but had also introduced widespread corruption.Another stage was reached when the first direct elections for the powerful president were held in 1996. Lee ran as the incumbent in the ROCs first direct presidential election against DPP candidate and former dissident, Ming-min, which prompted the Republic of China to conduct a series of missile tests in the Strait to intimidate the ROC electorate. The aggressive tactic prompted States President Clinton to invoke the Relations Act and dispatch an aircraft carrier into the region off Taiwans southern coast to monitor the situation.For the Republic of China on Taiwan, political liberalization and democratization was completed rather smoothly. The country transformed from an authoritarian state to developing fully democratic institutions without major incidents such as coups by either revolutionaries or reactionaries. This was because the Kuomintang itself stated that, in its political roadmap, one-party dictatorship must end and that the ultimate form of the government would be a constitutional democracy, provided that the system was ready for one. Therefore, democratization proceeded smoothly, without major changes to the constitution or massive restructuring of the government.Political transitionthumb|The Presidential Building in Taipei.The 2000 presidential election marked the end of the Kuomintangs status as the ruling party. Opposition DPP candidate Shui-bian won a three way race that saw the Pan-Blue vote split by independent Soong (formerly of the Kuomintang) and Kuomintang candidate Chan. Chen garnered 39% of the vote. After the election, Soong formed the First Party (PFP).Chen Shui-bian was re-elected by a narrow 0.2% of the vote the 2004 presidential election over Kuomintang Chairman Lien, who had PFP Chairman Soong as his running mate. On the day before the election, both Chen and Vice President Lu were shot while campaigning in Tainan. Their injuries were not life threatening, but the incident is believed by Pan-Blue to have gained them enough sympathy to influence the result. That incident might also gave president Chen the ability of declaring martial emergency, which allegedly prevented the police and military, which were strongly Pan-Blue, from voting. Lien refused to concede, alleging voting irregularities. Kuomintang and PFP supporters held mass protests throughout the following weeks. Subsequently, Kuomintang and PFP took the case to the court. The High Court ordered a recount and found no evidence to support the accusation made by Kuomintang and PFP. The Court decided that the election result was legitimate and valid.During the legislative elections held on 8 December 2004, the Kuomintang-PFP dominated Pan-Blue alliance gained a slim majority in the elections which resulted into President Chen resigning as DPP chairman. The cabinet of Premier Shyi-kun resigned, and Hsieh assumed premiership on 25 January 2005.In a move that some saw as a reaction to Chens re-election, the Peoples Republic of China enacted a proposed anti-secession law that allows the use of force on Taiwan and the Republic of China government if it formally declares independence. However, this law was met with overwhelming protest from nearly all political parties and public figures of the Republic of China and disapproval from the western countries. Negotiations in January in Macau between the aviation authorities from both the Republic of China and Peoples Republic of China resulted in direct-cross strait charter flights between mainland China and Taiwan during the Lunar New Year Period. In a twist of events, President Chen and PFP Chairman Soong held a summit and the independence-leaning president indicated that eventual reunification with mainland China would be an option. Against the anti-secession law proposed by the Peoples Republic of China, President Chen held a video conference with the Parliament in Brussels urging the Union not to lift the arms embargo on the Peoples Republic of China.Domestic politics during the Chen administration has largely been a political stalemate as the Kuomintang and PFP together hold a pan-Blue majority in the legislature.  Among the many items that have made little progress due to the political stalemate are a stalled arms procurement bill, which would advance defense capabilities of the Republic of China through the purchase of weaponry, such as sub-hunting Orions, from the US government, and banking reform legislation, which would help in the consolidation of the many banks in the Republic of China, none of which hold even 10% shares of the local market. It is important to note that the of the Republic of China, unlike the of the United States, does not wield veto power, providing him with little to no leverage in negotiating with an opposition legislature, regardless of how slim the majority.The constitution was further amended in 2005, creating a two-vote electoral system, with member plurality seats and proportional representative seats, and abolishing the National Assembly, transferring most of its former powers to the Yuan, and leaving further amendment voting to public referendums. The issue of formally declaring the independence of Taiwan is also a constant constitutional question. Arms purchases from the States are still a controversial political question, with the Coalition camp favoring the purchase, and the Coalition opposing it. Recent allegations about corruption inside the Family had led to three motions votes in the Yuan aimed at ousting President Shui-bian. All of them had failed since the Coalition lacked the two thirds majority required to complete the process and the parties voted according to political lines. The lady, Shu-chen was prosecuted for corruption, namely illegally using state funds for personal reasons. The president faced similar accusations as his wife, but was protected from prosecution by immunity. He had promised to resign if his wife was found guilty. However, after his wife fainted in the preparation hearing, she had sought and obtained absence of leave from the Court 16 times citing health concerns before President Chen Shui-bians term was complete.(Former first lady Wu to appear in court, China Post)In December 2006, municipal and mayoral elections were held in Taipei and Kaohsiung. The KMT retained a clear majority in the capital, while the DPP and the KMT obtained very close results in the southern city of Kaohsiung. Chun-ying lost to Chu by a margin of 0.14 percent, 378,303 votes to 379,417 votes, making Chu the first female mayor of a municipality in the of China.In 2007, the ROC applies for membership in the United Nations under the name Taiwan, and is rejected by the General Assembly.In the 2008 presidential election, KMT candidate Ying-jeou defeated DPP candidate Hsieh with 58.48% of the vote. Ma ran on a platform supporting friendlier relations with mainland China and economic reforms.  Many voters boycotted the referendum; this caused the level of voter participation required for referendum to be lower than expected and thus not considered valid.See also* Kuomintang* status of Taiwan* relations of the Republic of China* history of Modern China* of leaders of the Republic of ChinaGeneral:* of China* of Peoples Republic of China* of Republic of China history* of Chinese historyReferencesFurther reading* Bergere,  Marie-Claire. Sun Yat-Sen (1998),  480pp, the standard biography, based on rigorous modern scholarship* Boorman, Howard L., ed.  Biographical Dictionary of Republican China. (Vol. I-IV and Index. 1967-1979).  600 valuable short scholarly biographies excerpt and text search** Boorman, Howard L. Sun Yat-sen in Boorman, ed. Biographical Dictionary of Republican China (1970) 3: 170-89, excellent starting place.  complete text online* Dreyer, Edward L.  China at War, 1901-1949. (1995). 422 pp.* Duara, Prasenjit, State Involution: A Study of Local Finances in North China, 1911-1935, in Comparative Studies in Society and History, Vol. 29, No. 1 (Jan., 1987), pp. 132161, Cambridge University Press* Eastman Lloyd. Seeds of Destruction: Nationalist China in War and Revolution, 1937- 1945. (1984)* Eastman Lloyd et al. The Nationalist Era in China, 1927-1949 (1991) excerpt and text search* Fairbank, John K., ed.  The Cambridge History of China, Vol. 12, Republican China 1912-1949. Part 1. (1983). 1001 pp., the standard history, by numerous scholars* Fairbank, John K. and Feuerwerker, Albert, eds.  The Cambridge History of China. Vol. 13: Republican China, 19121949, Part 2. (1986). 1092 pp., the standard history, by numerous scholars* Feis, Herbert, The China Tangle: The American Effort in China from Pearl Harbor to the Marshall Mission, Princeton University Press, 1953.* Fenby, Jonathan. Chiang Kai Shek: Chinas Generalissimo and the Nation He Lost (2005) extract and text search* Gordon, David M.  The China-Japan War, 19311945, The Journal of Military History v70#1 (2006) 137-182; major historiographical overview of all important books and interpretations; in Muse* Hsiung, James C. and Steven I. Levine, eds. Chinas Bitter Victory: The War with Japan, 1937-1945 (1992), essays by scholars; http://www.questia.com/library/book/chinas-bitter-victory-the-war-with-japan-1937-1945-by-james-c-hsiung-steven-i-levine.jsp online from Questia; also excerpt and text search* Hsi-sheng, Chi. Nationalist China at War: Military Defeats and Political Collapse, 19371945 (1982)* Hung, Chang-tai. War and Popular Culture: Resistance in Modern China, 1937-1945 (1994) complete text online free* * Pakula, Hannah. The Last Empress: Madame Chiang Kai-shek and the Birth of Modern China (2009)  excerpt and text search* Rubinstein, Murray A., ed. Taiwan: A New History (2006), 560pp* Shiroyama, Tomoko. China during the Great Depression: Market, State, and the World Economy, 1929-1937 (2008)* Schurmann, F. and Schell, O. (eds) Republican China (Random House, 1967).* Taylor, Jay. The Generalissimo: Chiang Kai-shek and the Struggle for Modern China (2009)* Westad, Odd Arne.  Decisive Encounters: The Chinese Civil War, 1946-1950.  (2003). 413 pp.  the standard history* Young, Arthur Nichols. Chinas nation-building effort, 1927-1937: the financial and economic record (1971) 553 pages full text onlineExternal links*Modern China - Washington State University*Searching for Chinese History Journals Online - Comprehensive list of journals and research portals}de la Repblica de la Xinade China (1912-1949)de la Rpublique de ChineRespublikos istorijaja:da Repblica da China (1912 - 1949) tasavallan historiaKinas historias Trung Hoa Dn Quczh:
270937
Gary_Doer
Gary Albert Doer, OM (born March 31, 1948) is a Canadian diplomat and politician from Manitoba, Canada. Since October 19, 2009, he has served as Canadas Ambassador to the United States. Doer previously served as the 20th of Manitoba from 1999 to 2009, leading a New Democratic Party government.Early life and careerGary Doer was born to a class family in Winnipeg, Manitoba. His background is German and Welsh. He graduated from St. Pauls High School and went on to study science and sociology at the of Manitoba for one year, but left to become a corrections officer at the Vaughan Street Detention Centre. He later rose to become deputy superintendent of the Manitoba Youth Centre.(Profile: Gary Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 17 April 1995.) Doers work environment was not always safe: he once had to deal with a hostage taking situation, and was attacked with a bat on another occasion.(Geoffrey York, New leader of Manitoba NDP rose through union movement, Globe and Mail, 31 March 1988, A4.  For the date of Doers departure from university, see David Roberts, Doer practices for last kick at the political can, Globe and Mail, 3 April 1995, A4.)Doer became president of the Government Employees Association in 1979, and served in this capacity until 1986.(National union of civil workers acclaims head, Globe and Mail, 4 April 1979, P2.)  He also held prominent positions with the Federation of Labour and the Union of Provincial Government Employees, served as a director of the Blue Bombers, and became a governor of the University of Manitoba.(Geoffrey York, New leader of Manitoba NDP rose through union movement, Globe and Mail, 31 March 1988, A4.)  In 1983, he negotiated an agreement with the provincial government of Pawley in which civil servants agreed to delay a wage increase in return for a guarantee of no layoffs or wage rollbacks.(The Manitoba Government and the union representing about 12,000 civil servants ..., Globe and Mail, 16 February 1983, P8; Manitoba workers opt for job security, Globe and Mail, 24 February 1983, P13.)  The following year, he openly criticized McDermotts leadership of the Labour Congress.(Brian Cole, Antagonism to McDermott voiced by Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 October 1983.)Doer first joined the New Democratic Party in the 1970s, and worked for the party in the 1973 provincial election.(Alison Mayes, The province is his office, Winnipeg Free Press, 20 May 2007, B3.) He discontinued his membership in 1975 to preserve the neutrality of his union, and was later courted by both the New Democrats and Progressive Conservatives to run for public office.(Richard Cleroux and Geoffrey York, Doer favored to win Manitoba NDP leadership race, Globe and Mail, 15 March 1988, a4.)  He rejoined the NDP in 1986, and was a candidate in that years provincial election.(Geoffrey York, Filmon describes rival as a slick individual, Globe and Mail, 16 March 1988, A4.)(Jordan Timm, The Gary Doer phenomenon, Macleans, 24 May 2007, accessed 18 August 2007.)Cabinet ministerDoer was elected to the Assembly of Manitoba in the 1986 provincial election for the northeast Winnipeg division of Concordia. He joined the government of Premier Pawley on April 17, 1986 as Minister of Urban Affairs, and was given additional responsibilities as responsible for the Manitoba Telephone System on December 2 of the same year.   Doer ordered a Canadian Mounted Police probe of the MTS soon after his appointment, and worked to reform its practices following a failed investment in Arabia.(RCMP probes latest scandal in Manitoba telephone firm, Toronto Star, 15 December 1986, A18; Janet McFarland, Chance meetings spark merger, Globe and Mail, 19 March 2004, B4.  Outgoing MTS minister Mackling had previously commented that Doer would make a good replacement.  See Ritchie Page, Five top officials ousted over Manitoba telephone fiasco, Globe and Mail, 22 November 1986, A4.)  He soon developed a reputation as a fixer, working as a trouble-shooter in difficult fields.(Derek Ferguson, Ex-rebel seems likely to succeed Pawley, Toronto Star, 29 March 1988, A24.)Doer was given further responsibilities as Minister of Crown Investments on February 5, 1987,(He was also named to chair a new committee of cabinet called the Crown Reform Committee.  See Geoffrey York, Pawley hauls in reins on Crown companies after MTX write-off, Globe and Mail, 6 February 1987, A3.) and was later named as Minister responsible for the Accountability of Crown Corporations (August 19, 1987) and Minister responsible for the Liquor Control Act (September 21, 1987). Seen as a rising star in the party, he was sometimes mentioned as a future leader.(Geoffrey York, Life sweet again for Pawley as NDP widens lead in polls, Globe and Mail, 17 March 1987, A9.)The Pawley government was sustained by a narrow legislative majority after the 1986 election, and was defeated on March 8, 1988 when disgruntled backbencher Walding voted with the opposition on a budget non-confidence motion. Pawley resigned as NDP leader the next day, and called a new general election for April 26.(Ross Howard, Courageous move called best hope, Globe and Mail, 10 March 1988, A1.)NDP leader;Leadership electionDoer was the first declared candidate in the Manitoba New Democratic Partys 1988 leadership contest. He was supported by cabinet ministers Schroeder, Phillips, Smith, Evans, Storie and Parasiuk, and by federal Members of Parliament Murphy and Orlikow.(Geoffrey York, Senior ministers back Doers leadership bid in New Democrat race, Globe and Mail, 26 March 1988, A8; Geoffrey York, NDP delegates pick leader tomorrow, Globe and Mail, 29 March 1988, A4.)  He also received an endorsement from the Manitoba Federation of Labour.(Ex-rebel seems likely to succeed Pawley.)  Doer emphasized his experience in managing large organizations, and called for equity legislation to be introduced within a year of his election.(Attack on Meech pact given warm welcome, Globe and Mail, 29 March 1988, A4; Richard Cleroux and Geoffrey York, Doer favored to win Manitoba NDP leadership race, Globe and Mail, 15 March 1988, A4.)  He narrowly defeated rival candidate Harapiak on the third ballot of the partys leadership convention in Winnipeg.(Geoffrey York, Doer captures NDP helm in tight Manitoba race, Globe and Mail, 31 March 1988, A1.)  He was not sworn in as premier, as the legislature had already been dissolved.(Geoffrey York, Pawley to stay until Manitoba election, Globe and Mail, 1 April 1988, A3.  The rules of succession were unclear in this situation. It is possible that Doer could have been sworn in as premier, but he accepted Howard Pawleys decision to remain as a caretaker premier until the election.)Doer became leader of the Manitoba NDP when the party was at a low ebb of popularity.  An internal poll before the election showed that they had only 6% popular support, and some NDP workers privately worried that they could lose all of their legislative seats.(Tim Harper, Manitoba parties stagger to the starting line, Toronto Star, 13 March 1988, B1; Geoffrey York, Manitoba NDP in uphill battle, Globe and Mail, 26 March 1988, D1; Richard Cleroux and Geoffrey York, NDPs 12 seats might have been 0, official admits, Globe and Mail, 28 April 1988, A19; Richard Cleroux, Party bounced from office to third place, Globe and Mail, 29 April 1988, A8.  The party was also $1 million in debt.  See Doug Nairne, Doer Die, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 January 1999, A1.)  Many believed Doer was their best hope for a recovery.(Doer himself later acknowledged that he was not yet ready for the take a position of leadership.  Daniel Lett, Opposition leader knows he has to win this time, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 September 1999, A17.)  Support for the NDP increased to 19% during the leadership campaign, and to 23% after Doer was chosen as Pawleys successor.  The party nevertheless remained in third place, and faced an uphill struggle in the 1988 election.(Geoffrey York, Party still running a poor third in popularity, Globe and Mail, 8 April 1988, A4.);1988 electionDoer promised a $58 million tax cut, and opposed the federal governments free trade deal with the States of America.  He indicated that he was open to the possibility of amending the Lake Accord, a federal proposal for constitutional reform.(Derek Ferguson, Tough fighting starts now in Manitoba election race, Toronto Star, 4 April 1988, A16; Geoffrey York, New Manitoba NDP leader promises tax cut if returned, Globe and Mail, 5 April 1988, A4.)  He also promised to build more community health centres, and supported home renovations for senior citizens and the disabled.(Geoffrey York, Tories pledge additional tax cuts, Globe and Mail, 8 April 1988, A4.)The NDP won 12 out of 57 seats, while the Progressive Conservatives under Filmon won 25 seats and the Liberals under Carstairs jumped from one seat to twenty. Doer rejected the possibility of forming a government with the Liberals, and the Progressive Conservatives were able to form a government with the NDP holding the balance of power.(Geoffrey York, Manitobas NDP will permit Tories to assume power, Globe and Mail, 28 April 1988, A1.)  He was not personally blamed for his partys loss, and continued as party leader.  The NDP chose not to defeat Filmons government during confidence votes in late 1988 and early 1989, as Doer argued the public would not support another election so soon.(Geoffrey York, NDP critical, but wont kill Manitoba Tories budget, Globe and Mail, 18 August 1988, A4; Doer goes against non-confidence vote, Globe and Mail, 25 May 1989, A13; Manitoba NDP foils Liberal bid to force election, Toronto Star, 25 May 1989, A15; Geoffrey York, NDP cites tax breaks, backs Manitoba budget, Globe and Mail, 8 June 1989, A14.);Meech Lake AccordThe dominant political issue in Manitoba between 1988 and 1990 was the Lake Accord, which recognized Quebec as a society in Canada and devolved some powers from the federal government to the provinces.  The accord required approval from all ten provincial legislatures to become law.  The provincial Liberals initially opposed the accord, which meant that Doers support was necessary for its passage.(Thomas Walkom, The man in the drivers seat, Globe and Mail, 27 February 1989, A7.)  In November 1988, Doer indicated that his party would not support the accord unless certain amendments were introduced.(Geoffrey York, Amendments demanded Will kill Meech Lake, Manitoba NDP warns, Globe and Mail, 24 November 1988, A1.)  He was later appointed to a provincial panel that held a series of public meetings, and recommended significant changes to the deal.(Edison Stewart, Meech Lake pacts future: Manitobans have their say, Toronto Star, 6 April 1989, A30; Edison Stewart, Meech Lake pact suffers a major setback, Toronto Star, 23 October 1989, A1.  Doer also participated in a federal Democratic Party internal review of its position on the accord.  See Ross Howard, NDP support for Meech accord should stay, review concludes, Globe and Mail, 13 September 1989, A14; Ross Howard, NDP still split on constitutional accord, Globe and Mail, 14 September 1989, A14.)  The Filmon government also expressed skepticism about the accord, and announced that it too would seek amendments from the federal government.All three Manitoba party leaders agreed to a federally brokered compromise in June 1990, shortly before the accords official deadline.(Tim Harper, Manitoba leaders back plan, Toronto Star, 9 June 1990, A8; Tim Harper, Manitoba troika say theyll pass accord in time, Toronto Star, 10 June 1990, A14.)  The accord nonetheless failed to pass in the Manitoba legislature because of a procedural motion from Harper, a Cree member of the NDP caucus who argued that it did not give fair representation to indigenous Canadians.  Doer described Harpers decision as a fundamental issue of conscience, and blamed Prime Minister Mulroney for delaying negotiations until the deadline had almost expired.(Geoffrey York, Native MLA blocks debate on Meech, Globe and Mail, 13 June 1990, A1.)  One year later, he indicated that he felt betrayed by federal negotiators, and described the entire Meech Lake process as dishonest from start to finish.(Geoffrey York, Harper deals crushing blow to Meech deal, Globe and Mail, 23 June 1990, A6.);1990 electionIn the aftermath of the accords defeat, Filmon called a new provincial election for September 11, 1990.  Doer promised a ten-year freeze on personal income taxes, and argued that the Progressive Conservatives would pursue a hidden right-wing agenda if they won a government.(Manitoba Liberals vow to back research, Globe and Mail, 21 August 1990, A7; David Roberts, Filmon plan nasty, NDP says, Globe and Mail, 18 August 1990, A3.)  He also promised legislation that would make it more difficult for companies based in Manitoba to close down.(Mr. Filmon, and weaker options editorial, Globe and Mail, 10 September 1990, A12.)An early poll showed the NDP in third place with 18% support, well behind the governing Progressive Conservatives and also behind the Liberals.(David Roberts, Manitoba Premier calls general election, Globe and Mail, 8 August 1990, A2.)  The Liberal campaign faltered, however, and the New Democrats were able to make strong gains in the elections final days, partly buoyed by the unexpected victory of Raes New Democrats in the neighbouring province of Ontario.(David Roberts and Miro Cernetig, Filmons Tories win narrow majority, Globe and Mail, 12 September 1990, A1.  Doer took an aggressive approach in a televised party leaders debate and sought to link Filmon with Mulroneys increasingly unpopular federal government, highlighting the premiers support for the federal Progressive Conservatives in the 1988 federal election.  See David Roberts, Gloves come off in Manitoba race, Globe and Mail, 31 August 1990, A4; David Roberts, 3 Manitoba party leaders to debate aboriginal issues, Globe and Mail, 4 September 1990, A3.)  The Progressive Conservatives won a narrow majority with 30 seats, while the New Democrats won 20 and the Liberals seven.  Doer succeeded Carstairs as Leader of the Opposition in the legislature.Leader of the Opposition;First term, 199095Doer criticized the Filmon governments cutbacks to health and education, and drew attention to the provinces rising unemployment and child poverty rates in the early 1990s.(Paul Samyn, NDP itching to hit hustings, Winnipeg Free Press, 14 November 1994.)  Opposing Filmons austerity measures, he argued it was inappropriate for the government to cut jobs at a time of high unemployment.(David Roberts, Manitoba slashes 1,000 jobs, Budget pleases business leaders, Globe and Mail, 17 April 1991, A6; Tories slash spending on provincial highways, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 March 1993.)  In 1993, he opposed the governments decision to end funding for groups such as the Foster Family Association, the Assembly of Manitoba Chiefs, the Manitoba Anti-Poverty Organization and the Manitoba Environmental Council.(Tories pull plug on agencies, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 March 1993.  Doer also called for Ontarios $13 billion hydro purchase from Manitoba to be renegotiated in 1992, following reports that the Ontario Hydro Board was considering delaying the deal, and in light of the fact that environmental-assessment research was running behind schedule.  See David Roberts, Manitoba NDP leader wants hydro deal delayed, Globe and Mail, 22 September 1992, A4.)  Doer announced in late 1992 that his caucus would support the Accord, a comprehensive package on constitutional reform that was introduced by the federal government after the failure of Meech Lake.(No will doom Canada, PM warns, Financial Post, 29 September 1992, p. 6.)  The Accord was defeated in a national referendum.Doer released an election platform in November 1994, highlighted by a ten-point preventive health-care program for children and a six-point Manitoba Works plan to reduce unemployment.(Frances Russell, Hot times under the Dome, Winnipeg Free Press, 1 December 1994.);1995 electionDoer focused on health issues in the 1995 provincial election.  He promised that he would replace walk-in clinics with neighbourhood health organizations, to be staffed with salaried doctors, nurses, midwives and social workers.(Doer has prescription for community health, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 March 1995.)  He pledged to negotiate with pharmaceutical companies to reduce prescription drug costs, and to review some of the hundreds of drugs that had been delisted in recent years.(Alice Krueger, Doer targets drug costs, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 April 1995.)  He also promised to create a new group of health providers called practitioners, to carry out some doctors responsibilities.(Alice Krueger, New role favored in care, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 April 1995.)  On economic issues, Doer promised a balanced budget with no personal or sales tax increases over four years and indicated that he would cut nearly $119 million from government programs to fund health, education, and job creation.(Alice Krueger, Doer sets spending priorities, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 March 1995.)  An early poll from the Reid firm showed the Progressive Conservatives with 37% support, the Liberals with 35%, and the NDP with 21%.(If election was held yesterday, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 March 1995.  Some questioned this polls accuracy.  See David Roberts, Doer practices for last kick at the political can, Globe and Mail, 3 April 1995, A4.)  The Liberal campaign faltered once again, however, and a poll released only days before the election showed the NDP had again surpassed the Liberals for second place.(Frances Russell, Health issues push NDP past Liberals, Winnipeg Free Press, 19 April 1995.  The poll showed the Progressive Conservatives at 40%, the NDP at 33%, and the Liberals at 27%.)  The Progressive Conservatives were re-elected with 31 seats, the NDP increased their total to 23, and the Liberals fell to only three.In the closing days of the campaign, Doer asked the provinces chief electoral officer to investigate reports that three independent candidates from an unregistered party known as Native Voice had received assistance from a Progressive Conservative campaign official. Some believed these candidates would split the progressive-left vote in their ridings, and give the Progressive Conservatives a greater chance of winning.(Alice Krueger, Dirty politics alleged, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 April 1995.)  Little was done at the time, but the story emerged as a prominent provincial scandal following an expos from the Broadcasting Corporation in June 1998.  Doer called for an inquiry, which the Filmon government granted; the presiding officer determined that at least one of the candidates had been illegally induced to run to by a local agents of the Progressive Conservative Party.(David Kuxhaus, Who bankrolled native candidate in 95 campaign?, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 June 1998, A1; David Kuxhaus, PCs yield, call vote inquiry, Winnipeg Free Press, 26 June 1998, A1; David Kuxhaus, Vote charge haunts Tories NDP demands probe, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 June 1998, A1.);Second term, 199599Despite an improving economy, the Filmon governments 1996 budget introduced further cuts to social assistance, health care, and post-secondary and public school education.  Doer argued that the cuts were ideological in nature, and not based on financial necessity.(Dan Lett, Social program cuts unnecessary: critics, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 April 1996, A3.)  The government also introduced legislation permitting unionized workers to shield their dues from being donated to political parties.  Doer suggested that corporate shareholders should also be allowed to opt out of party donations.(Alice Krueger, Union workers can say no, Winnipeg Free Press, 13 April 1996, A4.)  Doer opposed the Filmon governments decision to privatize the Telephone System in 1996, arguing that it would cause Manitobans to lose control over a vital part of their economy.(Paul Samyn, MTS sale rings alarm, Winnipeg Free Press, 1 November 1996, B4.  A poll in November 2006 showed that 67% of Manitobans opposed the sale, including 78% of rural Manitobans.  See David Roberts, Opposition keeps bill to sell Manitoba Telephone on hold, Winnipeg Free Press, 13 November 1996, A5.)  He called for a referendum, which Filmon rejected.(Frances Russell, PCs caught in paradox, Winnipeg Free Press, 13 November 1996, A10.)  Doer nonetheless accepted the finality of the sale, telling party delegates in 1999 that buying back the service would be too expensive and carry too many risks.(David Kuxhaus, Bid to buy back MTS dead: Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 28 February 1999, A3.)Doer also opposed the Filmon governments proposal to water-down the single-desk marketing powers of the Wheat Board.(Paul Samyn, Tories hang up on MTS, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 May 1996, A1; Paul Samyn, NDP demands Tories back wheat board, Winnipeg Free Press, 19 September 1996, B8.)  He argued there could be no middle-of-the-road position on the Wheat Board, adding that continued single-desk marketing would be in the economic interests of producers and the economic interests of Winnipeg.(Paul Samyn, Filmon straddles fence in wheat board showdown, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 September 1996, A1.)Some New Democrats expressed discontent with Doers leadership in late 1997.  Most notably, a group led by policy committee chairman Victor Olson issued a statement on party renewal that was generally interpreted as a challenge to his leadership.(Frances Russell, NDP gets knives out for Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 October 1997, A8; Frances Russell, , Winnipeg Free Press, 8 October 1997, A10; Alice Krueger, Discontent rumbling in NDP, Winnipeg Free Press, 5 November 1997, A1; Doer may have to fight off dissidents as party meets, Winnipeg Free Press, 15 November 1997, A4.)  This came to nothing, but there was general agreement among party members that Doer would need to win the next election to continue as party leader.(Dan Lett, Doer closes in on the do-it stage, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 November 1997, A4: Doer continues as NDP boss, Toronto Star, 17 November 1997, p. 1.  There was an abortive challenge to Doers leadership at the partys 1997 convention.  Party activist Eduard Hiebert was unable to get the fifty signatures required for a leadership review.  See Alice Krueger, Doer quest goes on, Winnipeg Free Press, 17 November 1997, A3.);1999 electionIn the buildup to the 1999 provincial election, Doer unveiled a platform that called for balanced budgets, debt repayment and a freeze on taxes.(Frances Russell, NDP tries out a new tune, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 December 1998, A14; Brian Cole, Doers Democrats, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 December 1998, A10.)  He again emphasized health care as a priority,(David Kuxhaus, Fears about health system spreading, survey finds, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 December 1998, A4.) and said that his government would stop the practice of using public monies for politically motivated polls and advertisements.(NDP doesnt want taxes used to fund political ads, Winnipeg Free Press, 27 March 1999, A9.)  He also expressed concern that the Progressive Conservatives could privatize Hydro,(Frances Russell, Hydro sparks to fly in election, Winnipeg Free Press, 8 March 1999, A10.) and criticized a provincial workfare initiative as giving too much discretionary power to government overseers.(Douglas Nairne, Workfare framework set as legislature passes bill, Winnipeg Free Press, 15 July 1999, 10.)  The NDP voted to support the Filmon governments 1999 budget, citing the premiers decision to increase health spending with money from a provincial rainy day fund.(David Kuxhaus, NDP backs Tory budget, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 May 1999, A5.)  Doer added that, if elected, his party would replace Filmons budgeted income tax cut with a property tax cut.(Frances Russell, Doer crosses his fingers, Winnipeg Free Press, 12 May 1999, A14.)The NDP entered the 1999 election in a much stronger position than in the three previous campaigns.  A poll taken three years earlier had shown the NDP leading the Progressive Conservatives for the first time since the Pawley administration.(Paul Samyn, NDP tops Tories in poll, Winnipeg Free Press, 30 March 1996, A5.)  The Tories regained their lead by 1998, but fallout from the vote-splitting scandal gave the NDP an 8% lead in a Probe/Free Press poll issued in March 1999.(There were several provincial polls released between 1996 and 1999.  A poll issued in February 1997 indicated that the NDP had fallen to third place. Doer dismissed this as meaningless, citing the polls small sample size of one hundred people and its large margin of error. See Frances Russell, Feuding NDP trail Tories, Grits: poll, Winnipeg Free Press, 25 February 1997, A4. In a December 1997 Free Press/Probe Research Inc. poll, the Progressive Conservatives had 36%, the NDP 35%, the Liberals 20%.  The Reform Party was at 7%; this party did not have an official provincial wing, but some party members had unofficially fielded a candidate in 1997 by-election. A January 1998 poll, from Angus Reid, showed the PCs and NDP tied at 36% with the Liberals at 28%.  See Doug Nairne, Manitobans flee Liberals, poll suggests, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 December 1997, A1; Alice Krueger, Tories, NDP tied in provincial poll, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 January 1998, A7; Frances Russell, PCs show wear and tear, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 January 1998, A10. Another Angus Reid poll in March 1998 showed the Progressive Conservatives with 38%, the NDP with 28%, and the Liberals with 23%.  Doer suggested the latter poll was inconsistent with internal surveys. See Stevens Wild, Provincial leaders scoff at poll showing large Tory lead, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 March 1998, A3.  A Free Press/Probe Research Inc. poll in March 1998 showed the NDP and Progressive Conservatives at 35% and the Liberals at 26%. In December 1998, a Free Press/Probe Research poll showed the Progressive Conservatives with 38% and the NDP with 35%. See David Kuxhaus, Filmons Tories take a licking, but they keep on ticking, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 December 1998, A1. For the March 1999 poll, see Brian Cole, Poll results rub Tories raw, Winnipeg Free Press, 20 March 1999, A14.)  In this period, many began to regard the NDP as a possible government-in-waiting.(Frances Russell, Harsh new light on PCs, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 March 1989, A10; Brian Cole, The same old dress, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 March 1989, B4; Paul Sullivan, Gary Doers star shines bright in Manitoba, Globe and Mail, 3 April 1999, D2; David Roberts, It will be close, Filmon says of next election; Manitoba Premier admits the rival NDP has a chance to form the government, Globe and Mail, 11 May 1999, A4.)  Later polls showed the gap between the parties narrowing to a virtual tie.(David Roberts, Tories, NDP race neck and neck toward Manitobas election day, Globe and Mail, 4 September 1999, A5; Doug Nairne, Manitoba race gets serious as parties enter home stretch, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 September 1999, A7.)  Doer pledged $13 million to shorten health-care waiting times in the 1999 campaign, and said that he would work to end hallway medicine in overcrowded hospitals.  He also pledged an additional $2 million to hire more nurses and provide incentives for rural doctors.(David Kuxhaus, Doer touts $15-M plan to repair health care, Winnipeg Free Press, 20 August 1999, A1.)  In education, he promised to cut college and university tuition fees by 10% and to invest $24 million to the provinces three community colleges.(David Kuxhaus, NDP to boost college funding, Winnipeg Free Press, 28 August 1999, A1.)  On election reform, he promised to ban campaign donations from corporations and unions.(Daniel Lett, End big campaign donations, Doer says, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 September 1999, A10.)  Doer also criticized the Filmon governments handling of a contract with Urban Shared Services Corp., which attempted to save the province money by reheating food for hospitals and seniors homes at a centralized location.  The project went well over-budget, and the food was often criticized as inedible.(Scott Edmonds, Front-runners in Manitoba vote focus on health care, tax cuts, Globe and Mail, 26 August 1999, A6.)A poll released a week before the election showed the NDP and Progressive Conservatives tied with 42% support, and the election was considered too close to call until the actual day of voting.(Doug Nairne, Manitoba poll shows NDP and Tories in dead heat, Globe and Mail, 17 September 1999, A1.)  The NDP ultimately won 32 seats, against 24 for the Progressive Conservatives and only one for the Liberals.  A collapse of the Liberal vote worked to the NDPs advantage.(Douglas Nairne, Doer to gain from Liberals pain, Winnipeg Free Press, 17 September 1999, A1; Douglas Nairne, Its Premier Doer! Collapse of Liberal vote swings province to NDP, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 September 1999, A1.)PremierMore than eleven years after declining the option, Doer was sworn in as of Manitoba on October 5, 1999.  He also took the position of Minister of Federal/Provincial Relations.(David Roberts, Doer takes the stage as Manitobas new Premier, Globe and Mail, 6 October 1999, A1.);Re-election campaignsAfter governing for just under four years, Doer called a new provincial election for June 2003.  He brought forward a five point re-election plan highlighted by promises to reduce property and income taxes, hire more nurses and doctors and make reductions in medical waiting lists, take a cautious approach to managing the economy, and improve the provinces education and law enforcement systems.  Many journalists noted similarities to the NDPs 1999 platform.(Daniel Lett, Doer touts 5-point plan, Winnipeg Free Press, 6 May 2003, A1; NDP: Day 4, Winnipeg Free Press, 6 May 2003, A4; Daniel Lett, NDP taking aim at nurse shortage, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 May 2003, A4; Daniel Lett, Doer promises to unveil new property tax plan, Winnipeg Free Press, 12 May 2003, A5; Scott Edmonds, NDP unwraps tax cut plans as Manitoba election campaign almost at mid point, Canadian Press, 16 May 2003, 16:35; Mia Rabson, Doer promises additional police, Crown attorneys, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 May 2003, A6.)  The NDP held a massive lead in the polls throughout the campaign, and most observers agreed that its re-election was a foregone conclusion.(For instance Thomas Walkom, In moody Manitoba, election is far from mind, Toronto Star, 17 May 2003, H1; Scott Edmonds, NDP shows commanding lead in Manitoba election campaign, says poll, Canadian Press, 23 May 2003, 16:10; Peter Schroedter, Political fans left without team to cheer, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 May 2003, A17; John Dafoe, Bland diet for Manitoba voters, Winnipeg Free Press, 27 May 2003, A12; Daniel Lett, NDP heads for landslide, Winnipeg Free Press, 29 May 2003, A1; Scott Edmonds, Second poll shows Manitobas N-D-P heading for huge election win, Canadian Press, 29 May 2003, 17:44.)  Even the Free Press, not traditionally supportive of the NDP, urged voters to re-elect Doers government.(Re-elect Mr. Doer editorial, Winnipeg Free Press, 31 May 2003, A16.)  The NDP won an increased majority with 49.47% support and 35 of 57 seats, and made inroads into traditionally Progressive Conservative areas of south Winnipeg.Four years later, Doer called another election for May 2007.(Joe Friesen, Manitoba heads to the polls, Globe and Mail, 21 April 2007, A6.  The election call took place on the same day that Doer stood with Prime Minister Harper to announce new funding for the Museum for Human Rights.  See Mary Agnes Welch, Izzy Aspers dream lives, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 April 2007, B1; Mia Rabson, Doers timing as good as it gets, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 April 2007, A5.)  The NDP campaign focused on Doers personal popularity and his governments record in office.(Steve Lambert, Manitobas Doer seeks third straight majority, Calgary Herald, 21 April 2007, A15.)  The party released a seven-point re-election plan, focused on health care, the environment, education, tax cuts, public safety, money for highways, and keeping Manitoba Hydro as a public institution.(Mia Rabson, 700 new nurses pledged, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 April 2007, A5.)  Doer promised to hire 700 nurses and nurse practitioners, 100 new police officers, 20 new crown prosecutors, and 20 new workplace safety inspectors.  He also promised to improve Manitobas record on vehicle emissions, provide tax credits for caregivers, and phase out the provincial small business tax over three years.(Manitoba NDP promises to hire 700 new nurses and nurse practitioners if re-elected, Canadian Press, 23 April 2007, 11:05; Mia Rabson, NDP pledges more police, prosecutors to tackle crime, Winnipeg Free Press, 26 April 2007, A4; Mia Rabson, Doer pounds on job safety, Winnipeg Free Press, 28 April 2007, A7; Mia Rabson, Doers drive to clear the air, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 April 2007, A1; Mary Agnes Welch, NDP offers caregiver $1,020 tax credit, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 May 2007, A5; Mary Agnes Welch, Small business tax to go, Doer says, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 May 2007, A4.  The Winnipeg Free Press again supported Doer.  See Bob Cox, Editorial - Tipping to Mr. Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 19 May 2007, A16.)  The NDP was again re-elected with an increased majority, this time taking 36 of 57 seats.;Prominent cabinet membersProminent members of Doers first cabinet included Selinger in Finance, Mackintosh in Justice, Chomiak in Health and Wowchuk in Agriculture.(David Roberts, Doer takes the stage as Manitobas new Premier: Five women, two natives included in streamlined 15-member cabinet, Globe and Mail, 6 October 1999, A2; Scott Edmonds, Doer cabinet parties in Manitoba --- Rookies, veterans hit theatres stage for swearing-in, Toronto Star, 6 October 1999, 1.)  Tim Sale replaced Chomiak at Health in October 2004, and was in turn succeeded by Oswald in 2006.(Doer shuffles cabinet, changes Health Minister, Globe and Mail, 13 October 2004, A12.)  Chomiak replaced Mackintosh at Justice in 2006.(Joe Friesen, Doer unveils his pre-election cabinet shuffle, Globe and Mail, 22 September 2006, A8.)  Selinger remains as Finance Minister in 2009, while Wowchuk remains in Agriculture.Friesen served as Doers Deputy Premier in his first term.  She retired in 2003, and Doer chose Rosann Wowchuk as her replacement.(David Kuxhaus, Doer names Wowchuk deputy premier, Winnipeg Free Pres, 7 June 2003, A3.)  She continues to hold this position as of 2009.;Financial policyThe Doer government has introduced an uninterrupted succession of budgets since its first election in 1999.  These budgets have generally been cautious, and have sought to balance tax concerns with spending increases.  Doers first budget, delivered in 2000, removed 15,000 low-income Manitobans from the tax rolls and introduced $150 million in tax breaks over three years while projecting a $10 million surplus.(David Roberts, Manitoba raises health-care spending, Globe and Mail, 11 May 2000, A2.  The actual surplus for 2000-01 was $26 million.  See David Roberts, Manitoba budget promises more spending, faster tax cuts, Globe and Mail, 11 April 2001, A7.  His second budget, in 2001, pursued a consciously middle-of-the-road path by increasing government spending on education, health and infrastructure, while also bringing forward tax cuts for corporations and individuals.  See David Roberts, Manitoba budget promises more spending, faster tax cuts, Globe and Mail, 11 April 2001, A7; Helen Fallding, NDP plays it safe, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 April 2001, A1.  The 2002 budget made use of $288 million from Hydro over a period of three years, and increased taxes on cigarettes on maintain a balanced budget.  See Smokers suffer big tax hit to keep Manitoba in black, Kitchener-Waterloo Record, 23 April 2002, A5; David Kuxhaus, Tapping Hydro profits best approach, NDP says, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 April 2002, A13.  Doer defended the Hydro decision as a bold move that allowed the province to balance its budget without dipping into the Fiscal Stabilization Fund.  See Manitoba legislature wraps up lengthy spring session, Canadian Press, 9 August 2002, 12:25.)  His 2003 budget, the last of his first term, reduced provincial taxes by $82.7 million and increased spending by about 5%, mostly in health and education.(Daniel Lett, Spending up, taxes down, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 April 2003, A1; Frances Russell, NDP does just enough to survive, Winnipeg Free Press, 25 April 2003, A14.  Manitoba later announced that it would post a deficit for the fiscal year ending in 2003, using a clause in the provinces balanced-budget legislation that permits deficit spending to cover emergency expenses.  Greg Selinger, Doers finance minister, cited the damage caused to Manitobas economy by forest fires, drought and Spongiform Encephalopathy (mad cow disease). See Mia Rabson, Provincial government faces deficit, Winnipeg Free Press, 27 March 2004, A3.)Despite a series of economic setbacks, the government was able to post a balanced budget in 2004 through increased taxes and drug premiums as well as civil service reduction through attrition.  Tobacco and liquor taxes were increased and the provincial sales tax expanded to cover more services,(Michelle Macafee, Manitoba increases taxes, drug premiums to balance 2004-05 budget, Canadian Press, 19 April 2004, 17:45.) although Doer rejected a panel recommendation to increase the sales tax by 1%.(Leah Janzen, Doer rejects tax plan, Winnipeg Free Press, 5 May 2004, A1.)  The government was able introduce a more expansive budget in 2005 after an infusion of federal revenues, reducing personal and property taxes, increasing spending by 3.5%, and putting $314 million into a rainy day fund.(Mia Rabson, Doers bonanza budget, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 March 2005, A1.)  Doers 2006 and 2007 budgets introduced further tax cuts, and the 2007 budget offered increased education spending and a new child benefit to assist low-income families.(Steve Lambert, Manitoba government plans small tax cuts and new law on drug-addicted kids, Canadian Press, 5 March 2006, 11:11; Steve Lambert, Tax cuts, new spending promised, Globe and Mail, 5 April 2007, A10.)At the Manitoba NDPs March 2009 convention, Doer announced that Manitoba would continue its commitment to education, training and research despite a global economic downturn and a slowing economy.  He argued that the province was still recovering from the Filmon governments spending cuts during the economic downtown of the 1990s, and that his policies would allow Manitoba to emerge from the recession in a strong, competitive position.(Steve Lambert, Recession requires more, not less, social spending: Doer, Layton, Canadian Press, 7 March 2009, 04:52pm.)  His government introduced a balanced budget with economic stimulus programs a few weeks later, even as the global recession forced other provincial governments across Canada into deficit.(Doer accessed the provinces rainy day fund, and committed less money than in past years to paying down the provinces debt.  See Bruce Owen, Manitoba tables balanced budget in face of recession, Winnipeg Free Press, 25 March 2009, Canwest News Service; Manitoba announces surplus budget, National Post, 26 March 2009, A4.)Doer encouraged the of Canada to lower its rates in late 2003, saying that the rising strength of the dollar in relation to the States dollar was causing increased unemployment.(Marian Stinson and Heather Scoffield, Bank faces pressure to trim rates; But most experts expect no cut, Globe and Mail, 15 October 2003, B1.)  He later criticized Bank Governor David Dodge for doing nothing to save Canadian jobs and profits.(Daniel Lett, Doer lashes Dodge on buck, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 November 2003, A1.)  In early 2008, he called for a national strategy to offset the disruptions caused by Canadas soaring dollar.(Mia Rabson, Doer urges joint effort on loonie Ottawa, provinces must work together, Winnipeg Free Press, 8 January 2008, A4.)In 2004, provincial Auditor General Singleton argued that Manitoba was actually running a deficit due to costs associated with crown corporations, utilities and arms-length agencies that were not officially counted in the budget. He recommended that Manitoba adopt a system of Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP).  Greg Selinger, Doers Finance Minister, noted that the existing rules were set in place by the Filmon government, and indicated that the NDP had included a summary financial statement to its budget including many of the costs Singleton identified.(Daniel Lett, Auditor general urges changes to budget legislation, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 January 2004, B4.)  The Doer government nevertheless announced in 2005 that it would adopt GAAP.(Mia Rabson, Manitobas rosy finances questioned, Winnipeg Free Press, 10 September 2005, A6.)For the first seven years of his administration, Doer was assisted on financial matters by Kostyra, a cabinet minister from the Pawley government.  Kostyra resigned from his position as secretary of Manitobas Community and Economic Development Committee in late 2006,(Paul Samyn, Key Doer aide Kostyra heads for retirement, Winnipeg Free Press, 26 July 2006, B4.) and Angela Mathieson was appointed as his replacement.(Martin Cash, Premier names his replacement for Kostyra, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 August 2006, A5.);HealthDoer has frequently argued in favour of Canadas public health system.(For instance, at the NDPs 2000 annual meeting, he said that Manitoba would lead a national charge to prevent the erosion of medicare.  See Douglas Nairne, NDP delegates vow to lead charge against any erosion of medicare, Winnipeg Free Press, 5 March 2000, A4.)  He criticized Albertas plan to introduce more private health provisions in 2002, and defended the public system as efficient and less expensive.(Manitobas health facts, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 January 2002, A10; Helen Fallding, Public care is cheaper: Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 25 January 2002, A1.)  In the same year, he endorsed Romanows assessment that the federal government must play a stronger role in health care to prevent more encroachments by the private system.(Medicare sickness not fatal: Romanow, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 February 2002, B1.)  At a presentation before the Romanow Commission in 2002, Doer called for the federal government to double its health care commitment.(Thomas Walkom, Romanow gets earful on medicare reform, Toronto Star, 7 March 2002, A6.  Doer later argued for Canadas publicly funding medical system at a 2003 meeting of federal and provincial first ministers.  The meeting resulted in a significant infusion of new money from the federal government, although not as much as the Romanow commission on health care had recommended.  See Daniel Lett, In the health-care debate, accountability means cash, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 January 2003, A6; Dennis Bueckert, Federal proposal could change agenda of premiers health-care meeting, Canadian Press, 23 January 2003, 03:06; Tim Harper and Les Whittington, Premiers complain cash doesnt match Romanow findings, Toronto Star, 6 February 2003, A1. He later indicated that he was disappointed with the level of health funding included in the Martin governments first federal budget in 2004.  See Unacceptable: Premiers disappointed by lack of new money for health care, National Post, 24 March 2004, A6.)  Two years later, he played a significant role in negotiations that saw the federal government contribute $18 billion in new funding to the provinces over six years.(Tonda MacCharles and Mary Gordon, Tough talk did the trick, National Post, 16 September 2004, A1; Paul Samyn, Health talks proved Doer an emerging political giant, Winnipeg Free Press, 19 September 2004, B3.)The Doer governments first budget included a $135 million increase in health spending, taking total provincial spending to $2.43 billion.(David Roberts, Manitoba raises health-care spending, Globe and Mail, 11 May 2000, A2.)  In October 2002, the government announced a long-anticipated $100 million expansion to the Health Sciences Centre in Winnipeg, with new operating rooms and emergency departments.(Manitobas largest hospital gets new operating rooms and emergency department, Canadian Press, 10 October 2002, 13:40.)  The government was unable to end hallway medicine in the six-month period it had promised during the 1999 election, and faced the problem of nursing vacancies in the early 2000s.(Mia Rabson, NDP still has health-care vows to keep, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 September 2002, A13.)  Nevertheless, most observers agreed that the provincial situation improved significantly between 1999 and 2003.(Daniel Lett, NDP has hallway medicine down but not out, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 May 2003, A4.  A Winnipeg Free Press article in 2007 argued that hallway medicine may be properly applied in some circumstances, as a means of monitoring patients who dont necessarily need to be admitted to hospital.  See Daniel Lett, Successful politicians survive the Big Lie, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 September 2007, A4.)  Health spending continued to increase during Doers second term; a report in December 2004 indicated that Manitobas per capita health spending was the highest in Canada for the seventh continuous year.(Mia Rabson, Manitoba tops nation in health spending, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 December 2004, A12.)Doer emerged as a defender of Manitobas burgeoning internet pharmaceutical industry in the mid-2000s.  This industry was very popular among American clients, but nonetheless provoked opposition within both countries.(Steve Lambert, Canadas Internet drug industry gets thumbs-up from Minnesota governor, Canadian Press, 12 November 2003, 17:13.)  In 2004, Doer accused federal Health Minister Dosanjh of capitulating to American interests by agreeing to increased restrictions on the industry.(Paul Samyn, Doer slams health czar, Winnipeg Free Press, 17 December 2004, A1; Graeme Smith, Doer fights crackdown on Internet pharmacies, Globe and Mail, 11 January 2005, A10.)  He later argued that the Canadian government could protect its national drug supply and maintain Manitobas pharmaceutical sector simply by banning bulk exports.(Mia Rabson, Ban bulk drug exports to save jobs: premier, Winnipeg Free Press, 1 February 2005, A3.)Doers government introduced a landmark anti-smoking bill in 2004, banning smoking in all indoor public places and workplaces across the province. Supported by all parties, the legislation was the first of its kind in Canada.(Mia Rabson, Smoking ban historic, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 March 2004, A1; Mia Rabson, Health issues trump business complaints, Winnipeg Free Press, 19 November 2004, A10.)  It did not cover Manitobans working in federal government buildings or living on Nations territory, as these were not under provincial jurisdiction.(Leah Janzen, Smoke-ban loophole under fire, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 March 2004, A3; One law for Manitobans editorial, Globe and Mail, 16 August 2006, A16.)Doer welcomed Prime Minister Martins decision to name Winnipeg as the site of Canadas new public health agency in 2004.(Mary Gordon, Winnipeg wins health agency HQ, Toronto Star, 18 May 2004, A12.);Social policyThe Doer government passed a bill granting full adoption rights to gay and lesbian couples in 2002.  The NDP and Liberals supported the bill, while the Progressive Conservatives voted against it.(Bill gives same-sex couples the right to adopt children, Guelph Mercury, 2 August 2002, A6.)In 2004, the federal government announced that it would introduce legislation to permit the legalization of marriage in Canada.  Federal Justice Minister Cotler initially indicated that civic officials would be allowed to opt out of performing same-sex marriages if the practice offended their beliefs.  Doer criticized this, arguing that provincial employees should not be permitted to discriminate.(Campbell Clark, Prairie officials compelled to perform gay marriages, Globe and Mail, 18 December 2004, A5.)  Doer initially declined to express his personal views on the subject, but announced in late 2004 that he supported same-sex marriage as a human right.(Manitoba premier says same-sex marriage a right, Kitchener-Waterloo Record, 29 December 2004, A3.)In April 2005, Doer signed a $176 million deal with the federal government of Martin to expand the provincial day-care sector.(Historic accord to boost day care, Winnipeg Free Press, 30 April 2005, A1.)  The project was canceled in 2006 by the new Conservative government of Harper, over Doers objections.(Philip Authier, Premiers talk tough over cuts: Billions lost for child care, Montreal Gazette, 25 February 2006, A4; Nicholas Read, Stay-at-home parents will be the biggest beneficiaries of the new federal plan, Vancouver Sun, 3 May 2006, A4.)Unlike some within the NDP, Doer is personally opposed to the decriminalization of marijuana, which he has said could result in economic difficulties with the States.(Premier no fan of pot motion, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 February 2007, A4.)As premier, Doer encouraged several Manitoba corporations to donate money to the Museum for Human Rights in Winnipeg; Public Insurance, Hydro, Lotteries and the Liquor Control Commission subsequently made donations of one million dollars each.  Opposition leader McFadyen and some journalists questioned Doers involvement in the matter, arguing that he was effectively directing the corporations to make these donations.(Tamara King, Doer government grilled on Crown donations to Canadian Museum for Human Rights, Canadian Press, 28 April 2008, 6:52pm; Daniel Lett, Do you think donations pass the `smell test?, Winnipeg Free Press, 29 April 2008, A3.);EducationDoers government cut university tuition by 10% during its first term, and later provided universities with a property tax exemption.(Helen Fallding, NDP will try to minimize budget pain, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 January 2002, A9.)  It also amalgamated several school divisions prior to the 2002 municipal elections,(Nick Martin, New divisions not drawn up, Doer govt says, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 July 2000, A6.) and began to phase out education property taxes in the same period.(Helen Fallding, Education tax phase-out in spring likely, Winnipeg Free Press, 12 October 2001, A3.)In 2006, the Doer government introduced a proposal for Manitoba university graduates to receive a tuition rebate of up to 60% if they chose to stay and work in the province after graduation.(Paul Samyn, Major tuition rebate in works, Winnipeg Free Press, 14 November 2006, A7; Mia Rabson, Tuition rebates will be as high as 60 per cent, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 November 2006, A7.)A 2008 Free Press article indicated that Manitoba and Alberta were investing more money in public education per student than all other provinces of Canada.  Teachers wages in Manitoba were also noted to be healthy in relation to the average national wage.(Nicholas Hurst, Education spending works for Doers NDP, Winnipeg Free Press, 31 July 2008, A11.);AgricultureShortly after being sworn in as premier, Doer led an all-party delegation to Ottawa to seek a $1.3 billion financial bailout for western farmers to help mitigate an economic downturn in the sector.  He was joined by Saskatchewan Premier Romanow, Progressive Conservative MLA Maguire, and Manitoba Liberal leader Gerrard.(David Kuxhaus, Prairie politicians band together to plead farmers case, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 October 1999, A3; Paul Adams, Romanow, Doer want $1.3-billion in farm aid, Globe and Mail, 28 October 1999, A8.)  The federal government introduced $170 million in funding shortly thereafter, a figure that Doer and Romanow described as heartless.(Valerie Lawton, Farmers get $170 million more in aid, Toronto Star, 5 November 1999, 1; Mathew Ingram, Farm bailouts are no real answer, Globe and Mail, 5 November 1999, B2.)  In February 2000, Romanow and Doer stood with Chrtien to announce their support for a compromise bailout of $400 million.(Brian Laghi and David Roberts, One-time cash payout to help prairie farmers with spring crop, Globe and Mail, 25 February 2000, A4; Paul Samyn, Help on way for cash-poor grain farmers, Winnipeg Free Press, 25 February 2000, A3. Doer called for an additional $500 million bailout for grain and oilseed farmers in 2001. See Helen Fallding, Doer finds little support for farm aid, Winnipeg Free Press, 1 June 2001, A3. In 2002, Doer joined with Calvert, Romanows successor as Premier of Saskatchewan, to call for the federal government to oppose an American farm subsidy bill that threatened the ability of Canadian farmers to access the American market. See Paul Samyn, Provinces unite to fightfarm bill, Winnipeg Free Press, 8 May 2002, A13; Mia Rabson, Leaders to discuss U.S. farm subsidies, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 May 2002, A3; David Kuxhaus, Wowchuk warns farm bill designed to reap U.S. votes, Winnipeg Free Press, 10 May 2002, A5.  He criticized another federal farm bailout plan later in the year, arguing that it put too much economic pressure on the provincial governments.  See Paul Samyn, `Its half a loaf, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 June 2002, B1.)Shortly after his re-election in 2003, Doer criticized the federal government for failing to respond to an agriculture crisis caused by the discovery of Spongiform Encephalopathy in a Canadian cow and the subsequent closure of the American border to beef products produced in Canada.(Daniel Lett, Liberals fiddling while economy dives: Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 10 June 2003, A5.)  The federal and provincial governments subsequently agreed on a $50 million bailout to the industry.(Daniel Lett, Manitoba farmers to get $50M in aid, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 September 2003, A1.)  The border was reopened to live cattle in December 2004.(Mia Rabson, Border reopens to live cattle, Winnipeg Free Press, 30 December 2004, A1.)Doer strongly supports the Wheat Boards policy of single-desk marketing, and has opposed efforts by some on the political right to weaken its status.(Mia Rabson, Doer issues challenge over wheat board, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 January 2006, A12.)  In late 2006, Doer accused federal Agriculture Minister Strahl of interfering in the Wheat Boards elections.(Paul Samyn and Mia Rabson, Doer, directors cast Strahl as a bully, Winnipeg Free Press, 17 November 2006, A10.  In the same period, Doer and Saskatchewan Premier Calvert challenged the federal Conservative government to hold a national referendum on the Wheat Boards future.  See Martin Cash, Saskatchewan joins call for referendum, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 November 2006, A5.  See also Larry Kusch, More barley lawsuits likely, Tories told, Winnipeg Free Press, 1 March 2008, A4.)The Doer government has rejected a return to single-desk hog marketing, which was eliminated during the years of the Filmon government.(Helen Fallding, Tempers flare over hog fracas, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 February 2001, A3.)   During its second term, the government supported plans to establish an OlyWest hog processing plant in northeast Winnipeg.  This measure was extremely controversial among party members, and area NDP MLAs Reid and Jha indicated that they opposed the measure.  In response to criticism, Doer withdrew his support for OlyWest in 2007.(Mia Rabson and Bartley Kives, Doer puts nail in OlyWests coffin, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 May 2007, A6.)  The Doer government introduced a temporary ban on new hog farms throughout most of the province in March 2008, following the release of a provincial environmental report.(Manitoba bans new hog farms, Calgary Herald, 4 March 2008, C1.)  Around the same time, Doer announced new funding for waste-water treatment plants that would allow two existing hog-processing plants to expand their operations.(Matt Goerzen, Waste-water treatment upgrades enable hog-plant expansions, Winnipeg Free Press, 8 March 2008, B9.)Doer is a vocal opponent of the American Country of Origin Labelling initiative, which would require American producers to separate meat from hogs slaughtered in Canada and increase packing and labelling cost.(Manitoba premier promises farm group hell lobby for them on US food labelling law, Canadian Press, 23 January 2008, 23:19; Larry Kusch, U.S. food labelling could hurt hog farmers, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 January 2008, B6; Mia Rabson, Doer confident hogs will flow, Winnipeg Free Press, 26 January 2008, A9.);JusticeDoer opposed the Chrtien governments decision to implement a federal gun registry, and his government joined with other provinces to raise a constitutional challenge against the law in 2000.(High noon at high court for gun law, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 February 2000, A1.)Doer called for the federal government to strengthen its laws against pornography in 2002, after the Columbia Supreme Court ruled that Robin Sharpes fictional writings involving children met the legal definition of artistic merit.(Erin Anderssen, Ottawa urged to tighten porn laws, Globe and Mail, 28 March 2002, A4.)  Doer was quoted as saying, We believe that the rights of children should be superior rights in our country to the rights of perverts.(Helen Fallding, Manitoba justice officials to study, Winnipeg Free Press, 28 March 2002, A3.)  The following year, the Manitoba government unveiled a website that included photographs and profiles of high-risk sex offenders.(Man. unveils Web site with photos, profiles of high-risk sex offenders, Canadian Press, 11 April 2003, 20:54.)Also in 2002, Doer argued that persons who kill police officers should spend the rest of their natural lives in jail, without access to Canadas so-called Faint Hope Clause for early release.(Mia Rabson, Kill officer, go to jail for life, Doer urges, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 May 2002, A11.)  Three years later, he argued that the provisions of the federal Criminal Justice Act were too lenient.(Doer says youth law puts public at risk, Winnipeg Free Press, 8 November 2005, A4. In the summer of 2001, Doer promised that his government would pass legislation to shut down outlaw gang clubhouses, if the federal government would not do the same.  See David Kuxhaus, Doer takes on gangs, Winnipeg Free Press, 29 June 2001, A1. The legislation was brought forward in November of the same year; Mia Rabson, NDP cracks down on biker bunkers, Winnipeg Free Press, 20 November 2001, A1.)  In 2007, Doer led an all-party task force to Ottawa to seek greater federal penalties for gang-related crime, youth offenses and car theft.(Bartley Kives, Top cops, politicians to press Ottawa for crackdown on crime, Winnipeg Free Press, 19 September 2007, A8.)In 2004, the Doer government increased funding for the hiring of police officers and Crown prosecutors.(Manitoba Legislature acts on some promises, Globe and Mail, 10 December 2004, A9.)  Following increased urban violence in 2005, the province announced funding for 54 more officers.(Paul Egan, Biggest-ever funding boost comes amid fears of gang war, Winnipeg Free Press, 15 March 2005, A1; Jason Markusoff, Meth problem becomes hot topic: Drug should be classified as absolutely the worst because of its damaging and addictive components, Edmonton Journal, 6 May 2005, A6.)  The government also launched an initiative to hire seven recreational directors for inner-city Winnipeg neighbourhoods in 2008, to provide sports opportunities for youth as an alternative to crime.(Bartley Kives, City, province hoping sports will keep kids out of trouble, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 April 2008, A3.)Doer announced the creation of an all-party task force on security following the attacks of September 11, 2001.(Helen Fallding, All parties get involved in strengthening security, Winnipeg Free Press, 5 October 2001, A3.)  The following month, he announced that he would work with the Governors of Minnesota and Dakota for a co-ordinated security strategy.(Scott Edmonds, Manitoba, North Dakota and Minnesota look at co-ordinated security, Canadian Press, 19 October 2001, 15:15.)In 2009, Doers government introduced legislation to provide civilian oversight of Manitoba police officers.  This followed an inquiry into the 2005 death of Crystal Taman, who was struck and killed by an off-duty Winnipeg police officer while waiting at a traffic stop.  (The inquirys report strongly criticized the police investigation into Tamans death.)(Bruce Owen, Provinces new police act would boost civilians role, Winnipeg Free Press, 5 February 2009, A7; Bruce Owen, Decades in the making: New police law has its roots in years of tragic history, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 April 2009, A6.);EnvironmentDoer has been a strong and consistent supporter of the Accord on climate change.(Helen Fallding, Province reaffirms Kyoto accord support, Winnipeg Free Press, 19 February 2002, A14; Charlie Gillis, Six Premiers, six agendas: Western conference, National Post, 4 June 2002, A4; Charlie Gillis, Premiers warm to hearing Kleins Kyoto alternative, National Post, 6 June 2002, A5 identified Doer as Kleins primary opponent; Helen Fallding, Well beat Kyoto target, Doer vows, Winnipeg Free Press, 20 June 2002, A7; Gary Doer, Canadians should embrace Kyoto vision, Winnipeg Free Press, 29 June 2002, A15.)  In February 2004, his government signed an agreement with the Climate Exchange pledging Manitoba to create a trust fund to pay for projects that reduce greenhouse gas emissions.(Mia Rabson, Manitoba to create Canadas first climate trust, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 February 2004.)  In 2007, he announced that Manitoba would pursue a plan with other provinces and states to push greenhouse gas emissions to 15% below 2005 levels by 2020.(Doer pushes green deadline back to 2020, Edmonton Journal, 23 August 2007, A5; Mia Rabson, Manitoba in emissions pact, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 August 2007, A4.)  The next year, Doer legislated his provinces commitment to meet its targets under the Protocol by 2012.(Joe Friesen, Manitobas Kyoto bill will be a first in Canada, Globe and Mail, 12 April 2008, A5.)Doer announced that Manitoba would increase ethanol production in 2002, and held consultations on a plan requiring Manitoba drivers to use ethanol-blended gasoline.(Helen Fallding, $35M to fund clean gasoline, Winnipeg Free Press, 20 April 2002, A1; Helen Fallding, Public gets say in mandating new gas blend, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 July 2002, A9; Manitoba: Ethanol production to be increased, Premier says, National Post, 3 July 2002, A6; Public gets a chance to share its thoughts on the use of ethanol, Winnipeg Free Press, 20 September 2002, A16; Daniel Lett, Manitoba a prime location to produce ethanol: panel, Winnipeg Free Press, 12 December 2002, A5.)  In October 2002, the government instructed its provincial fleet drivers to switch to ethanol fuels.(Manitoba government angers fuel dealers with mandatory ethanol switch, Canadian Press, 11 October 2002, 20:52)  These plans stalled due to limited production, but were revived when a new facility was constructed in late 2005.(Mia Rabson, Ethanol fuel plan back on the road, Winnipeg Free Press, 27 October 2005, A1.)  In March 2004, the government introduced enabling legislation on water protection, allowing for the introduction of specific regulations on water protection zones, water quality standards, and related matters.(Mary Agnes Welch, Water bill steams mayor, reeves, Winnipeg Free Press, 15 March 2004, B6.)Doer signed the Midwestern Regional Greenhouse Gas Reduction Accord with seven American governors in November 2007.(John Ibbitson, Regions take action as federal leaders dither, Globe and Mail, 16 November 2007, A24.)  The following month, he announced that Manitoba would introduce vehicle emission standards similar to those in California.(Steve Lambert, Manitoba to adopt California-like vehicle emission limits: Doer, Canadian Press, 27 December 2007, 15:56.)  In late January 2008, he agreed to a blueprint proposal with the premiers of Columbia, Ontario and Quebec for a market-based trading system to cut greenhouse gas emissions.(Justine Hunter, Karen Howlett & Ian Bailey, Campbell leads the charge on emissions pact, Globe and Mail, 30 January 2008, S1.)  He later became an enthusiastic supporter of North American and trade programs to reduce energy emissions, while at the same time criticizing the idea of a tax.(Mary Agnes Welch, Being green far from black and white, Winnipeg Free Press, 6 July 2008, B1; Marianne White, Doer pushing cap-and-trade, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 July 2008, A7; Unpopularity of carbon tax responsible for Liberal demise: Premier Gary Doer, Canadian Press, 15 October 2008, 2:15pm.)Doer introduced plans to eliminate coal-burning factories in his 2008 budget.  The budget also included a new program for water conservation, and a $7 million fund directed toward climate change issues.(Bartley Kives, Doer stands up to King Coal, Winnipeg Free Press, 10 April 2008, A1.)  He also called for an independent review of the Manitoba Clean Environment Commission in 2008, arguing that the renewal process for hydroelectric projects was too long.(Mary Agnes Welch, Approval process frustrates premier, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 April 2008, A4.  He added that any changes would protect the publics right to oppose and cross-examine energy projects.)In November 2008, Doer announced that his government would ban new logging in provincial parks and phase out existing projects.  He also announced a ban on plastic shopping bags, and on the use of cellphones while driving.  Parents were also forbidden to smoke when children were in the car.   The opposition Progressive Conservatives indicated that it would support all of these initiatives.(Bruce Owen and Mary Agnes Welch, NDP gets into the banning business - Measures will impact every Manitoban, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 November 2008, A5; Manitoba introduces bill to limit cellphone use, smoking in cars, Canadian Press, 27 November 2008, 05:04pm.)In late 2005, the American magazine Week listed Doer as one of the top twenty international leaders fighting climate change.(Paul Samyn, Magazine lauds Doers green policies, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 December 2005, A3.)(In 2001, Doer appointed former federal cabinet minister Axworthy to chair a task force on climate change and reducing greenhouse gas emissions.  See Helen Fallding, Axworthy named to chair task force to develop blueprint for action, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 March 2001, A7; A plan for the warm century editorial, Winnipeg Free Press, 25 March 2001, B4; In late 2005, Doer and Quebec Premier Charest co-authored a piece outlining strategies for reversing climate change.  See Gary Doer and Jean Charest, Seize the climate-friendly day, Globe and Mail, 7 December 2005, A27.)  ;Aboriginal issuesIn November 1999, Doer appointed a two-person panel to advise his government on implementing the findings of the Aboriginal Justice Inquiry, which had been published eight years earlier.(David Roberts, Commission launched on 1991 native report, Globe and Mail, 30 November 1999, A5. Doer indicated that he was disappointed with the Filmon governments inaction on the file.  See Manitoba government establishes Aboriginal Justice Implementation Commission press release, M2 Presswire, 30 November 1999.)  In April 2000, Manitoba took steps to provide indigenous Manitobans with their own child and family-service agencies.(Aboriginals to get own family services, Globe and Mail, 18 April 2000, A9.)  Doer convened a provincial summit on aboriginal commerce in November 2004.(Daniel Lett, Aboriginal business summit set, Winnipeg Free Press, 28 September 2004, B8.)  He indicated that the summit was intended to showcase successful businesses, and to forge greater links between the aboriginal and non-aboriginal communities.(Martin Cash, Summit to encourage more aboriginal-owned businesses, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 November 2004, C9; Martin Cash, Aboriginal biz summit may deliver the goods, Winnipeg Free Press, 5 May 2005, A9.)Doer is a strong supporter of the Accord signed in late 2005 by the federal government of Martin, provincial premiers and aboriginal leaders.(Mia Rabson, NDP ready to provide balance, says Layton, Winnipeg Free Press, 5 February 2006, A3.)  After the Martin government was defeated in the 2006 federal election and replaced by the government of Harper, Doer criticized Harpers failure to implement the accord.(Alexander Panetta, Critics slam Tory budget over lack of support for natives, Kyoto, Canadian Press, 2 May 2006, 18:40; Paul Samyn, Natives outraged Angered at apparent end to $5.1-B Kelowna accord, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 May 2006, A11; Ian Urquhart, Premiers pressure Harper on native deal, Toronto Star, 30 May 2006, A4.)In late 2008, the Doer government introduced legislation to give sixteen bands on the east shore of Winnipeg greater authority over the management of their traditional lands.  The bill requires that plans for development be approved by both the province and the bands chief, and extends the range of influence well beyond the areas small reserves.(Mary Agnes Welch, Bands get east-side planning authority - Bill paves way for world heritage site, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 December 2008, A6.)  Some chiefs in the affected area later objected to the bill on procedural grounds, arguing that they were not properly consulted.(Bruce Owen, First Nations threaten to snub bill, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 June 2009, A4.)Following consultations with the of Manitoba Chiefs in 1999, the Doer government established a selection committee to oversee proposals for setting up casinos in Manitoba first nations.(Daniel Lett, Play fair on native casinos, NDP told, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 June 2000, A1.)  The process subsequently became stalled, and only one of the casinos was up and running by 2003.  The government subsequently appointed a panel to review the situation and recommend a change in strategy;(Daniel Lett, NDP to overhaul native casino plan, Winnipeg Free Press, 13 November 2002, A5; Daniel Lett, NDP, chiefs join forces to look at casinos, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 December 2002, A3; Daniel Lett, Nominees for native casino panel confirmed, Winnipeg Free Press, 28 January 2003, A6; NDP gives free rein to casino review, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 April 2003, B1.) the panel argued that the province should consider creating one large casino, instead of several small on-reserve casinos.(Daniel Lett, Report bets on one large native-run casino, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 September 2003, A1.)  A second casino was opened in 2005, while the larger issue remained unresolved as of 2007.(Daniel Lett, Confusion in the NDPs native casino file, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 August 2007, A6.);EnergyDoer has often referred to hydroelectric power as playing a major role in Manitobas long-term economic strategy,(Mia Rabson, Manitobas political parties are revving up for a close election, Winnipeg Free Press, 19 January 2007, A11; Mia Rabson, Black gold on tap, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 February 2007, A6.) and has advocated a national east-west power grid to export Manitobas plentiful hydroelectric power to Ontario and other provinces in Canada.(Helen Fallding, Doer pushes power grid to link West, Winnipeg Free Press, 31 May 2001, A3; Paul Samyn, Manitoba to study grid of electrical transmission, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 June 2001, B4; John Spears, Hydro One considers Manitoba power line, Toronto Star, 19 November 2004, D3; Leah Janzen, Doer excited by potential for lucrative power sales, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 February 2005, A1.  Ontario announced its support for an east-west grid in 2007.  See Mia Rabson, Premiers power grid dream gets energized, Winnipeg Free Press, 31 January 2007, A6.  In August 2002, Manitoba Hydro signed a $1.7 billion deal with its largest American consumer.  See David Kuxhaus, $1.7-B Hydro deal, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 August 2002, A1.)Doer announced Manitobas first farm project in November 2004, near the community of St. Leon.  This was a private-public partnership arranged between Manitoba Hydro and AirSource Power Fund.(Helen Fallding, Province launches first wind farm in private-public deal, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 November 2004, A5.)  It was officially started in April 2005.(Mia Rabson, Wind farm generating excitement, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 April 2005, A1.)In September 2007, Hydro indicated that it would construct a new transmission line to connect north and south Manitoba on the west side of Winnipeg.  Hydros initial plan had been to construct the line on the east side, but Doers government rejected this approach, arguing that it would damage pristine forest territories.  The local aboriginal community is divided on the issue, with some leaders supporting the governments conservation approach and others arguing that east side construction would help combat poverty in the area.(Mary Agnes Welch, East side, west side, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 March 2008, B1.)  The Progressive Conservative Party has strongly criticized Doers decision.(Mia Rabson, West side story for Manitoba Hydro, Winnipeg Free Press, 26 September 2007, A1; Mia Rabson, International pressure part of decision: Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 27 September 2007, A6.  See also Bryan Schwartz & Elijah Harper, East side advantage, Winnipeg Free Press, 13 October 2007, A19; Mary Agnes Welch, More chiefs oppose west-side decision, Winnipeg Free Press, 17 October 2007, A7; Manitoba premier faces more criticism over planned hydro line, Canadian Press, 31 October 2007, 16:31.  See also Madelaine Drohan, The long arm of the U.S., Globe and Mail (Breaking News), 22 February 2008.)  In April 2008, Manitoba Hydro announced a $2 billion agreement to sell surplus energy to Wisconsin once the construction is complete.(Tamara King, Manitoba inks $2-billion electricity deal with Wisconsin, Canadian Press, 17 April 2008, 2:54p; Daniel Lett, Doer multiplies the stakes in Hydro battle with Tories, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 April 2008, A4.)Doer asked Hydro and the Public Utilities Board to provide an analysis of natural gas prices in July 2008, with the intent of limiting price increases during the winter.  He also indicated that his government would intervene to protect consumers from high prices.(Mia Rabson, Doer dumps on huge gas hike, Winnipeg Free Press, 12 July 2008, A1.)  Finance Minister Selinger later indicated that the government would provide some relief for consumers, but would not use Manitoba Hydros profits to offset rate increases.(Mary Agnes Welch, Doer promises gas pain relief, Winnipeg Free Press, 30 July 2008, A1.);Labour issuesThe Doer government introduced a number of labour reforms early in its first mandate, making it easier for unions to obtain certification and giving employees increased powers to move disputes to binding arbitration.  Business leaders opposed the changes, though Doer argued that the bill was far less contentious than opponents made it out to be.(David Kuxhaus, Premier tries to placate business riled by contentious labour law changes, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 August 2000, A1; David Kuxhaus, Voters seem satisfied with Doer government, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 October 2000, A4.)  In 2004, Doer rejected a call by party members to introduce legislation that would ban replacement workers in labour disputes.(Premier wont ban replacement workers, Winnipeg Free Press, 8 March 2004, A5.)Doers government increased Manitobas minimum wage from $6.00 to $6.25 in November 2000, and brought in subsequent increases of 25 cents on an annual basis.(Manitoba bumps up minimum wage in the province by 25 cents an hour, Canadian Press, 29 November 2000, 20:55; Survival above all editorial, Winnipeg Free Press, 29 December 2001, A14.)  By April 2005, the minimum wage had been increased to $7.25.  Some argued that this was still short of a living wage.(Dennis Howlett, The call for a living wage: activists fighting for fair wages across the country, Canadian Dimension, 1 May 2005, p. 25.)  The minimum wage was increased to $8.50 in 2008.(What is the minimum wage?, Government of Manitoba, accessed 12 December 2007.)  In 2005, the Doer government introduced a bill to expand provincial workers compensation coverage.(Paul Egan, Compensation plan to cover all workers, Winnipeg Free Press, 13 April 2005, A1.) The Doer government announced in late 2007 that temporary foreign workers and modeling agencies would be included under the Employment Standards Act, to prevent worker exploitation.(Legislation to Protect Models and Foreign Workers, Manitoba Federation of Labour, 21 November 2007.) ;Science and infrastructureDoers government introduced a biotechnology training strategy in October 2002, to address a skilled-worker shortage in the industry.(Helen Fallding, NDP to boost biotech training, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 October 2002, A16.)In early 2003, Doer signed a $160 million deal with the federal government for expansion work on the River Floodway.  The floodway expansion was described as the largest infrastructure project in Manitoba history,(Paul Samyn, Our polite premier gets extra $20M, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 April 2003, A3; Daniel Lett, Floodway deal sealed, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 April 2003, A3.) and was started in late 2005.(Helen Fallding, Doubling Duffs Ditch, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 August 2005, B1; Mia Rabson, Sod turned for $665-M expansion ..Roblin hailed for vision, perseveramce sic, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 September 2005, B1.)Doer took part in discussions in 2007-08 with media mogul Asper and officials from other levels of government, regarding the location of a new stadium for the Blue Bombers football team.  He was skeptical about Aspers initial plan for a stadium in the Polo Park region of Winnipeg, and was more supportive of an abortive plan to construct the stadium in the economically depressed area of Point Douglas.(Daniel Lett, Stadium proposal depends on mayor, Winnipeg Free Press, 30 June 2008, A1; Bruce Owen, U of M stadium the last option?, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 August 2008, A11.)  Asper eventually chose site in Fort Garry, next to the of Manitoba.(Manitoba premier says Canwests Asper has discussions about new football stadium, Canadian Press, 14 August 2008, 10:32pm; Bartley Kives, Stadium finds home at U of M, Winnipeg Free Press, 13 September 2008, A3.)  The deal was finalized in early 2009, with the province providing $20 million in funding; provincial officials believe that all but $1 million will be recovered before the stadium opens in 2011.(Bartley Kives, Bombers finally getting a new home, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 April 2009.)In September 2008, Doer and Winnipeg Mayor Katz announced $138 million for a transit plan that will eventually link downtown Winnipeg with the of Manitoba.(Bartley Kives, Bus corridor plan rolled out - $138-M first section to run from downtown to Jubilee, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 September 2008, B1; Bartley Kives, City eyes $90-million loan to finance bus corridor - rapid transit, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 October 2008, B2.)  In the same month, Doer designated a piece of land in northwest Winnipeg as the site of a future inland port.(Manitoba designates land in Winnipeg as proposed location of inland port, Canadian Press, 10 September 2008, 9:19pm; Bruce Owen, Work on Bombers new digs may start next year, Winnipeg Free Press, 26 December 2008, B3.)  The area was given the name CentrePort Canada, and its first directors were chosen in December 2008.(Manitobas inland port announces its first board of directors, eSource Canada Business News Network, 29 December 2008; See also Harper pledges cash for Manitoba inland port, CanWest News Service, 14 April 2009.)Doer announced in February 2009 that his government would spend $1 million on special training for northern Manitoba workers, following a global economic downtown that adversely affected the provinces forestry and mining sectors.(Bruce Owen, 1-M fund to help North through slump, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 February 2009, A4.)  Two months later, he joined with the federal government to announce a $40 million investment in a cold weather aerospace engine testing and research facility in Thompson.(Martin Cash, Test centre for Thompson, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 April 2009, B5; Martin Cash, Engine test site crucial: experts - Thompson is perfect due to its cold weather, Winnipeg Free Press, 17 April 2009, B8.)  In early May 2009, the federal and provincial governments announced $116 million for infrastructure renewal in rural and northern communities.(Larry Kusch, Rural Manitoba gets $116M to build with, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 May 2009, A4.);Crocus Investment FundIn early 2005, the labour-managed Investment Fund stopped trading and entered into financial protection.  The Doer government was subsequently accused of having ignored signs of trouble at the fund, and of failing to protect the interests of investors.(Paul Egan, Auditor to slam Crocus, Winnipeg Free Press, 28 May 2005, A1.)  The opposition Progressive Conservatives argued that the government had neglected warnings of financial impropriety, in part because of ideological links between the New Democratic Party and the labour movement.  Doer rejected this charge, observing that the fund had been established by the Filmon government in conjunction with labour leaders.(Mia Rabson, Tories, NDP trade barbs over being cosy with Crocus, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 June 2005, A11.  Both parties were affected by the controversy in 2005.  See Doer trips, Murray falls editorial, Winnipeg Free Press, 28 June 2005, A12.)  He also rejected calls from the opposition for a formal inquiry,(Paul Egan, Crocus investors sue for $200M, Winnipeg Free Press, 13 July 2005, A1; Martin Cash, PCs announce Crocus team, remove legislative logjam, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 May 2006, A3.) and insisted that the province did nothing wrong in the matter.(Martin Cash, No Crocus error, premier maintains, Winnipeg Free Press, 10 May 2006, A10.);Federal-provincial relationsDoer supported the Chrtien governments Act legislation, which required that any future negotiations on provincial secession be preceded by a referendum with a clearly defined question.  The act was opposed by Quebec nationalists, who regarded it as an infringement on their national sovereignty.  In 2004, Doer criticized new Prime Minister Martin for seeming to undermine the principles of the bill.(Joan Bryden, PMs failure to defend Dion, Clarity from attacks imperil Western gains: Doer, Canadian Press, 15 February 2004, 15:40; Martin too wishy-washy on Quebec, says Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 February 2004, B1.)  He also criticized Martins promise to remove the Clause from the of Canada in the 2006 federal election.(Kevin Rollason, Doer wont support scrapping clause, Winnipeg Free Press, 12 January 2006, A12.)  Doer later criticized Martins successor, Harper, for recognizing the Qubcois as a nation within Canada in late 2006.  He was quoted as saying, to me, Canada is one nation, one country. I understand Quebec is unique in terms of language, culture and law, but Canada is one country.(Paul Samyn, Nation talk irks Manitobans, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 November 2006, A4.)Notwithstanding this and other criticisms, a May 2008 article in the and Mail newspaper described Doer as one of the few premiers to have a good working relationship with Conservative Prime Minister Harper.(Steven Chase, PMs sunny relationship with Premier signals change in political landscape, Globe and Mail, 2 May 2008, S3.)  Manitoba signed on to the federal governments Building Canada Fund in late 2008, receiving about $500 million in new infrastructure monies.(Mia Rabson, Ottawa funnels $500 M to Manitoba, Winnipeg Free Press, 5 September 2008, A4.)  Following a global economic downturn in late 2008, Doer called on the federal government to invest in job creation and infrastructure funding.(Erin Anderssen, Manitoba Premier urges Ottawa to confront recession with job creation, Globe and Mail, 20 October 2008, A4.)  Prime Minister Harper later said that his government would spend more on roads, bridges and other public works.(Brian Laghi, Steven Chase & Rheal Seguin, PM, provinces agree to spend to stimulate ailing economy, Globe and Mail, 11 November 2008, A1.)According to journalist Hbert, Doer played a vital role in convincing other provincial leaders to accept Quebec Premier Charests plan to create the of the Federation in 2003.(Chantal Hbert, Charests coup at Charlottetown, Toronto Star, 14 July 2003, A17.)  In 2008-09, Charest and Doer helped broker an agreement among the premiers to provide for greater labour mobility within Canada.(Andy Blatchford, Canadian premiers reach agreement to ease labour mobility across provinces, Canadian Press, 17 July 2008, 4:49pm; Steven Chase, Labour-mobility deal fails to quell skeptics, Globe and Mail, 16 January 2009 (breaking news).)  In early 2007, Doer said that Manitoba would not enter a free trade deal signed between Alberta and Columbia. He instead called for a national trade accord.(Mia Rabson, Doer favours national trade accord, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 February 2007, B2.)  Doer met with other western Canadian premiers in June 2009 to introduce a plan for the collective purchase of prescription drugs.  The premiers indicated that the plan could save taxpayers millions of dollars.(Jonathan Fowlie, Joint drug-buying pact considered, Vancouver Sun, 19 June 2009, A8.)In late 2008, the federal Liberal and New Democratic parties announced plans to defeat the Conservatives on a of confidence and create a government.  The plan was ultimately unsuccessful, and the Conservatives remained in power.  Doer did not take a position on the coalition, and instead called for all parties in the House of Commons to work in a cooperative manner.(Jennifer Graham, Premiers urge federal politicians to work together in best interest of Canada, Canadian Press, 1 December 2008, 7:34pm; Mary Agnes Welch, Taking a position pointless, says Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 December 2008, A5.);International relationsSince his first election in 1999, Doer has been a leading opponent of a water diversion in Devils Lake, Dakota that many regard as posing a serious environmental threat to Manitoba.(Paul Samyn, Doer taking diversion fight to Washington, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 October 1999, A8; Doer, Lathlin to lead delegation opposing Devils Lake drainage outlet press release, M2 Presswire, 22 October 1999; Diversion struggle is uphill, Doer says, Winnipeg Free Press, 27 October 1999, A3; Paul Samyn, Lobby effort scuttles N.D. diversion, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 November 1999, A3; Doer rallies troops to fight Devils Lake diversion plans, Winnipeg Free Press, 25 November 1999, A3; James Brooke, Manitoba, Awash in Its Own Water, Shuns North Dakotas, New York Times, 6 December 1999, p. 8; Douglas Nairne, Province enlists lawyer to battle N.D., Winnipeg Free Press, 12 January 2000, A4; Douglas Nairne, In this corner, Doer and Ventura, Winnipeg Free Press, 14 January 2000, A3; Ruth Walker, A rising Devils Lake is causing a flood of concerns, Christian Science Monitor, 6 March 2000, p. 7; Aldo Santin, Politics stalling Devils Lake diversion funds, Winnipeg Free Press, 13 March 2000, A2; David Roberts, Doer, governor weigh impact of diversion on Lake Winnipeg, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 April 2000, A7; Doer travelling again to fight diversion plan, Winnipeg Free Press, 12 May 2000, A4; David Kuxhaus, Devils Lake project still a threat: Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 September 2000, A8; David Kuxhaus, Would make it easier to build Devils Lake drainage outlet, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 January 2001, A7; Paul Samyn, Aggressive fight needed to protect water: Doer to PM, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 March 2001, A3; Doer aims to fight water diversion, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 August 2001, A4; Manitoba leaders team up to fight N.D. water plans, Winnipeg Free Press, 12 October 2001, B3; Premier, Tory chief fight N.D. diversions in D.C., Winnipeg Free Press, 19 July 2002, A15; Powell rams through N.D. pipeline, Winnipeg Free Press, 6 April 2002, A15; Devils Lake report delay thrills Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 15 August 2002, A11; Daniel Lett, NDP takes diversion fight to U.S. court, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 October 2002, A3; Scott Edmonds, Manitoba views new U.S. plan for flooded Devils Lake as mixed blessing, Canadian Press, 26 February 2003, 16:56; Mia Rabson, Dike fight tactics denounced by Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 13 March 2004, A3; Paul Egan, Minnesota jumps into water fight Joins Manitoba in dispute with N.D. over diversion plan for Devils Lake, Winnipeg Free Press, 30 April 2004, A5; Paul Samyn, Doer targets Devils Lake, Winnipeg Free Press, 29 November 2004, A1; Helen Fallding, Devils Lake outlet nearly finished, Winnipeg Free Press, 15 January 2005, A1; Paul Samyn, Doer to lead Capitol Hill blitz, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 April 2005, A8; Paul Samyn, Devils Lake outlet unstoppable, officials fear, Winnipeg Free Press, 6 April 2005, A3; Paul Samyn, Tough talk on Devils Lake Doer threatens U.S. with lawsuit, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 April 2005, A1; Chris Wattie, U.S. senators reject Devils compromise, National Post, 28 April 2005, A11; Doer recruiting Great Lakes governors for Devils Lake fight, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 May 2005, A5; Mike DeSouza, Great Lakes mayors unite against water diversion, National Post, 27 May 2005, A4; Paul Samyn, Devils Lake attention promised; Bush tells PM hes aware of diversion, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 June 2005, A12; Paul Samyn, Doer gets ear of ambassador, Winnipeg Free Press, 8 July 2005, A7; Mia Rabson, Doer set to retaliate over Devils Lake outlet, Winnipeg Free Press, 13 June 2007, A1.  Doer himself wrote an editorial piece against the project in 2005.  See Gary Doer, The Devil to pay, National Post, 17 May 2005, A22.  He had previously traveled to D.C. in a bid to put the project on hold.  See Doer heads to Washington to press beef farmers case, Globe and Mail, 7 April 2004, A7.)  In 2005, the Canadian and American governments reached a non-binding compromise deal on the project that committed both sides to design an advanced filter to prevent environmental disruption.(Paul Samyn, Devils Lake deal is done, Winnipeg Free Press, 6 August 2005, A1; Alan Freeman, Devils Lake agreement non-binding, McKenna says, Globe and Mail, 9 August 2005, A4.)  Doer initially described this agreement as a significant improvement over prior arrangements,(Michelle MacAfee, Devils Lake deal `not 100 per cent perfect, but Manitoba, Ottawa relieved, Canadian Press, 6 August 2005, 17:16.) but later criticized the North Dakota government for starting the water diversion before the deal was finalized.(Mia Rabson, Doer rages as water flows, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 August 2005, A1; Mia Rabson, Doer to lobby Washington for better Devils Lake filter, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 January 2006, A5; Leah Janzen, Improved Devils Lake filter to be operating this summer, Winnipeg Free Press, 19 January 2006, A7; Mia Rabson, Doer to discuss water wars with PM, Winnipeg Free Press, 21 March 2006, A6; Mia Rabson, Villain, says Doer as U.S. opens tap, Winnipeg Free Press, 15 April 2006, A3; Paul Samyn, Devils Lake outlet agreement soon?, Winnipeg Free Press, 25 April 2006, A5; N. Dakota unwilling to wait for lake filter, Winnipeg Free Press, 28 April 2006, A5; Steve Lambert, N. Dakota wants more access to tap outlet at Devils Lake, Winnipeg Free Press, 25 May 2006, A7.)  In May 2009, Doer said that Manitoba would invest more than $10 million in drainage improvements if North Dakota would agree to construct a permanent filter on its Devils Lake output.(Manitoba premier offers deal in cross-border water dispute, Canadian Press, 7 May 2009, 3:30pm; Steve Lambert, Manitoba premier offers deal in cross-border water dispute, Canadian Press, 7 May 2009, 04:53pm.)  Dakota Governor Hoeven rejected the deal in the same month, arguing that the issues were separate.(State turns down Manitoba offer in water disputes, Globe and Mail, 9 May 2009, A5.)Doer has led several international trade delegations from Manitoba, including visits to Russia, Germany, Israel, India, China and The Philippines.(Mia Rabson, Forget trade talks; figure skating is the buzz in Russia, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 February 2002, A10; Robert Fife, Provinces resolve to work together: To get the job done, National Post, 22 February 2002, A6; Doer going on trade mission to Israel, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 October 2002, A5.  In 2007, the province reported that a delegation to India the previous year resulted in over a dozen contracts.  See Minister, business India-bound, Winnipeg Free Press, 6 December 2007, B7; Mia Rabson, Philippines trip to focus on immigration, Winnipeg Free Press, 5 February 2008, A7; Premiers meet with senior Chinese leaders in Beijing and announce key projects during first-ever Council of the Federation Mission to China, Canada NewsWire, 3 November 2008, 10:00am.)  He also made an historic visit to Iceland in August 2001; Manitoba has a large Icelandic population, and Doer was the first Manitoba Premier to make an official visit to the country.(Paul Samyn, Doer leading trade mission to Iceland this month, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 August 2001, A5; Tourism minister visiting England, Scotland, Iceland, Winnipeg Free Press, 20 August 2001, A7; Larry Kusch, Doers passage to India, Winnipeg Free Press, 20 January 2006, B3; Manitoba gateway to North America: Doer, The Press Trust of India Limited, 13 February 2006; Paul Samyn, Doer tries to lure Bollywood to Manitoba, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 February 2006, A6.)  Asgrimsson, the Minister of Iceland, made a follow-up visit to Manitoba in July 2005.(Paul Samyn, Iceland leader coming to city, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 July 2005, A10. Haarde, Asgrimssons successor, visited Manitoba in 2007.  Nisha Tuli, Icelandic PMs visit to stress business, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 August 2007, B2.)  In May 2008, Ukrainian President Yushchenko made an official visit to Manitoba and addressed the provincial legislature.(Steve Lambert, Warm welcome for Ukrainian president at Manitoba legislature, Canadian Press, 27 May 2008, 4:43pm.)Doer signed an agreement with the American state of Georgia in 2004, for increased co-operation between the Centers for Disease Control in Atlanta and the National Virology Lab in Winnipeg.(Mia Rabson, Doer signs deal to boost citys bid for super lab, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 February 2004, A5.)  In the same year, he signed a memorandum of understanding with Minnesota Governor Pawlenty to create a biomedical corridor for the promotion of research, capital investment and technology development.(Martin Cash, Biomedical alliance with Minnesota mapped out, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 June 2004, C8.)  In early 2005, Doer and New Brunswick Premier Lord traveled on a trade mission to Texas in what was described as an effort to improve relations between Canada and the United States.(Paul Samyn, Doer, Lord are a rootin tootin tag team in Texas, Winnipeg Free Press, 26 January 2005, A1; Paul Samyn, Texas science labs spark Doers hopes for trade, Winnipeg Free Press, 29 January 2005, A6.)  Later in the year, Doer and Charest traveled on a trade mission to Mexico.(Doer, Charest return from trade mission, Montreal Gazette, 14 May 2005, A19.)  In 2006, he appeared at a prominent climate change event with California Governor Schwarzenegger.(Paul Samyn, Doer, not PM basks in California sun, Winnipeg Free Press, 22 October 2006, A4.)  In June 2009, Doer took part in discussions to create a Western Energy Corridor to allow an easier flow of both renewable energy and fossil fuels among western American states and Canadian provinces.(Jason Fekete, Canada-U.S. energy corridor idea promoted, Victoria Times Colonist, 15 June 2009, A8.)Doer has supported Canadas military mission in Afghanistan, despite skepticism about the purpose of the mission from the federal NDP.(Mia Rabson, Manitoba backs Canadas military, Winnipeg Free Press, 8 October 2001, 13; NDP group withdraws provocative preamble, Winnnipeg Free Press, 7 September 2006, A9; Manitobas army editorial, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 February 2008, A10.)  He called for Canada to ban donations to Hezbollahs charity wing in 2002,(Daniel Lett, Stop militants from fund-raising: Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 November 2002, A20.) and endorsed Jean Chrtien governments decision to remain out of the U.S.-led invasion of Iraq in 2003.(Judy Monchuk, Klein sends kudos, thanks to ambassador for U.S. war on Iraq, Canadian Press, 21 March 2003, 19:24.)  In 2005, Doer spoke against the American governments plans to require passports at Canadian border crossings.  He argued that the new expense of travel would create a financial Wall for some families, and instead proposed a security protocol centred around drivers licenses.(Mia Rabson, Passport law will create a Berlin Wall, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 February 2007, A5.)  In 2007, Dakota Governor Hoeven announced that he was working with Doer to find an alternative approach.(Hoeven says hes working with Manitoba on visa alternative, Associated Press Newswires, 13 September 2007, 11:03 report.)  In 2008, Doer argued that Canada should aggressively defend the American Free Trade Agreement against criticism from American Democratic Party presidential candidates.(Mia Rabson, Democrats NAFTA slap unwise: Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 April 2008, A8.)  He later spoke against the States Congresss planned Buy American legislation during a business trip to Illinois and Texas.(Mary Agnes Welch, Doer to target protectionism on U.S. trip, Winnipeg Free Press, 31 January 2009, A3; Trade, Investment Focus of Western Premiers Mission to U.S., PR Newswire (US), 2 February 2009, 04:24 pm; Campbell Clark, Obama moves to water down Buy American provisions, Globe and Mail, 4 February 2009, A1.)Doer signed an agreement in Manila in February 2008, to permit an easier flow of immigration from The Philippines to Manitoba.(Mia Rabson, Philippine pact keeps immigration door open, Winnipeg Free Press, 9 February 2008, A5; William B. Depasupil, RP, Canada sign 3rd labor export agreement: At least 10,000 job opportunities await OFWs in Manitoba this year, Manila Times, 9 February 2008.  See also Mia Rabson, $10,000 gift thrills Manila students, Winnipeg Free Press, 12 February 2008, A4; Martin Cash, Delegation from Philippines promotes products, manpower, Winnipeg Free Press, 27 September 2008, B12.);Legislative reformDoers government changed the rules of the legislature in 1999, to allow the Speaker of the Assembly to be elected by a secret ballot vote of all members. Speakers had previously been appointed by the premier.(Scott Edmonds, Inuit MLA first elected Speaker in Manitoba, Globe and Mail, 19 November 1999, A27.)The Doer government announced election spending reforms in June 2000, which were highlighted by a ban on political donations by private corporations and organized labour.(David Roberts, Manitoba to restrict donations, Globe and Mail, 21 June 2000, A5; Graham Fraser, Restrictions on donations can see politics transformed, Toronto Star, 25 June 2000, p. 1.)  This measure was opposed by the opposition Progressive Conservatives, and by the right-wing Taxpayers Federation.(David Kuxhaus, NDPs planned election-ad limit violates charter: taxpayers group, Winnipeg Free Press, 23 July 2000, A3.)  The reforms came into effect in 2001,(David Kuxhaus, Parties get set to rebuild war chests, Winnipeg Free Press, 4 June 2001, A11; Jeffrey Simpson, Why Manitoba should be an inspiration to us all, Globe and Mail, 31 May 2002, A21.) and were extended to party leadership contests in June 2002.(Mia Rabson, NDP to slap donation limits on leadership campaigns, Winnipeg Free Press, 28 June 2002, A10.)  Further restrictions were added in 2006.(Mia Rabson, Law will squeeze party fundraising, Winnipeg Free Press, 10 April 2006, A5.)  In June 2009, Winnipeg Mayor Katz spoke against Doers plan to ban union and corporate donations from municipal elections.(Bartley Kives and Bruce Owen, Slap in the face to city council Katz slams NDPs proposed donations ban, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 June 2009, B1.)The Doer government introduced legislation in April 2006 to prevent MLAs from the floor from one party to another.  Under the terms of this legislation, MLAs who choose to leave their political party are required to sit as independents until the next election, or to resign and seek re-election for another party.(Mia Rabson, Doer wants to end MLAs crossing floor, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 April 2006, A1.)Doer announced plans in early 2008 to create a lobbyist registry for Manitoba,(Bruce Owen and Mary Agnes Welch, Manitoba government announces it will introduce a lobbyist registry, Canadian Press, 28 April 2008, 10:17pm.) as well as introducing fixed election dates, partial public campaign financing, and restrictions on partisan direct mail flyers sent out by MLAs at public expense.(Manitoba proposes fixed election dates, partial public campaign financing, Canadian Press, 30 April 2008, 4:41pm; Mary Agnes Welch, Tories assail new election laws, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 May 2008, A9.)  The plan for public campaign financing was later abandoned after public opposition.(Mary Agnes Welch, NDP, Tories wont take public subsidy - Election finance amendments planned, Winnipeg Free Press, 8 April 2009, A7.)In 2009, opposition politicians and some journalists pressured Doer to call a public inquiry into a controversy involving expense claims from the 1999 provincial election.  Manitoba had determined that some reimbursement claims filed by the Manitoba NDP were unwarranted; in late 2003, the party agreed to repay $76,000 in an out-of-court settlement.  Critics have charged a lack of transparency in the process, and have questioned why Elections Manitoba did not lay charges.  At least one Winnipeg journalist has compared the matter with an expenses scandal faced by the Party of Canada following the 2006 federal election.  Doer has argued that the matter is settled, and that there is no need for an inquiry.(Dan Lett, Elections watchdog should cough up truth, Winnipeg Free Press, 30 June 2009, A5.);PopularityDoers government enjoyed an extended honeymoon with voters after the 1999 election.  The NDP consistently led all other parties in public opinion polls from 1999 until 2005, often by wide margins.(Davis Kuxhaus, Voters seem satisfied with Doer government, Winnipeg Free Press, 2 October 2000, A4; Helen Fallding, Grit support up as NDP, PCs struggle, Winnipeg Free Press, 29 December 2000, A3l; NDP riding high, Winnipeg Free Press, 26 March 2001, A1; Aldo Santin, Growing Liberal support hits 24%: NDP drops 5 per cent, but party still leads Tories, Winnipeg Free Press, 17 July 2001, A4; Helen Fallding, Tories gaining, NDP slipping, survey shows, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 December 2001, A11 (the NDP still led this poll, 39% to 32%); Helen Fallding, Doer? I dont even know her!, Winnipeg Free Press, 14 March 2002, A1 actual article title; Mia Rabson, NDP, Tories believe poll favours their fortunes, Winnipeg Free Press, 29 October 2002, A3; Daniel Lett, NDP soars, Tories sink in poll, Winnipeg Free Press, 26 December 2002, A1 47-30%; Mia Rabson, Election fever Raging at Legislature, Winnipeg Free Press, 26 March 2003, A9; Daniel Lett, NDP still enjoying strong support, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 October 2003, A1 51-28%; Nearly half of electorate backs Doer government, Winnipeg Free Press, 30 December 2003, A7 49-26%; Daniel Lett, NDP support strong as Tories fall behind, Winnipeg Free Press, 26 March 2004, A5 47-29%; Daniel Lett, Tories close in on NDP, Winnipeg Free Press, 10 October 2004, A1; Mia Rabson, Young voters back PCs, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 January 2005, A1; Mia Rabson, Tories hot on heels of the NDP, Winnipeg Free Press, 27 March 2005, A1.)  The partys popularity dipped in late 2005, damaged somewhat by questions resulting from the failure of the Crocus Investment Fund.  Polls taken in December 2005 and March 2006 showed the NDP and Progressive Conservatives tied for support.(Mia Rabson, Tories strong again: poll Same support level as governing NDP, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 March 2006, A5.)  In July 2006, the PCs pulled ahead of the NDP for the first time in seven years.(Daniel Lett, Support for Tories surging, Winnipeg Free Press, 6 July 2006, A1.)  The NDP nevertheless recovered to win a convincing majority in the 2007 election, and in July 2008 held a ten-point lead over the Progressive Conservatives in popular support.(Mary Agnes Welch, Political landscape as flat as the prairie, Winnipeg Free Press, 14 July 2008, A4.)  The PCs posted a surprise lead over the NDP in a December 2008 poll, although some local journalists questioned its accuracy.(Dan Lett, Manitoba Tories stuck in neutral if Doer stays put, Winnipeg Free Press, 15 December 2008, A4; Editorial - An unhealthy split, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 December 2008, A10.)  By April 2009, the NDP once again held a ten-point lead.(Lindsey Wiebe, NDP regains big lead over Tories, Winnipeg Free Press, 5 April 2009, A5.)Doer was rated as Canadas most popular premier in polls taken in 2003, 2004, 2005 and 2006, scoring a 77% rating in March 2006.(Paul Samyn, Doer must be doing it right, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 September 2003, A1; Paul Samyn, But Doer still Canadas most well-liked politician, Winnipeg Free Press, 19 November 2004, A1; Paul Samyn, Doer nations most popular premier: poll, Winnipeg Free Press, 25 April 2005, A1; Paul Samyn, How premiers rate, Winnipeg Free Press, 5 March 2006, A3.)  His approval rating was 81% in March 2008, making him the second most popular Canadian premier after Danny Williams of and Labrador.(Mia Rabson, Canadians confidence in economy tumbling, Winnipeg Free Press, 19 March 2008, A4.);RetirementOn August 27, 2009 Doer announced he would not seek re-election in the 2011 election, and on August 28, 2009 he was nominated by Prime Minister Harper to succeed Michael Wilson as Canadian ambassador to the United States. He was formally sworn into that position on October 19, 2009, and on the same day Selinger was sworn in as his replacement as Premier of Manitoba. Doers former constituency assistant Wiebe subsequently won the by-election to succeed Doer as MLA for Concordia on March 2, 2010.(Wiebe wins Concordia for NDP. cbc.ca, March 2, 2010.)Federal politicsDoer supported a bid to draft former Manitoba Premier Schreyer as a candidate in the federal Democratic Partys 1989 leadership contest.(Geoffrey York, Manitoba MLAS want Schreyer to run for federal NDP leadership, Globe and Mail, 18 May 1989, A18.)  When Schreyer declined to run, Doer tried to convince Lewis and then Rae to enter the contest, without success.(Graham Fraser, Riis promises to support reluctant Lewis, Globe and Mail, 23 June 1989, A5; William Walker, Rae ready to jump into NDP race, Toronto Star, 4 October 1989, A1.)  He eventually supported McLaughlin, who was elected on the fourth ballot of the partys leadership convention.(Most of partys big names supported McLaughlin, Toronto Star, 3 December 1989, A13.)There was speculation that Doer would seek the federal NDP leadership in 1995, after McLaughlin announced her resignation.(NDP leadership, Winnipeg Free Press, 30 May 1995, A3.)  He declined, and instead gave his support to longtime friend McDonough, whom he nominated at the leadership convention.(David Roberts, Nystrom well-placed to be NDP leader, Globe and Mail, 12 October 1995, A1; Dan Lett, Alexa Reaches Out, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 May 1997, B1; Paul Samyn, NDP Leader McDonough stepping down, Winnipeg Free Press, 6 June 2002, A1.) McDonough was chosen as party leader following the first ballot.  Doer opposed the Politics Initiative in 2001.(Paul Samyn, Radicals left on the fringe of NDP, Winnipeg Free Press, 24 November 2001, A4.)  In 2002, he supported the leadership campaign of Blaikie, whose federal WinnipegTranscona riding overlapped with his own provincial division.(Paul Samyn, Blaikie revs up campaign, Winnipeg Free Press, 15 June 2002, A8; David Kuxhaus, Power matters, says Blaikie, Winnipeg Free Press, 18 June 2002, A5; Mia Rabson, Blaikie strongly backed by Doer, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 January 2003, A5.)  Blaikie finished second against Layton.Doer has disagreed with the federal NDP on some issues. He defended Globals takeover of a part of Blacks newspaper empire in 2000, even though the arrangement had been criticized by the federal party.(Doer bashes federal NDP for its knock on news deal, Winnipeg Free Press, 11 August 2000, A4.)  He later called for Robinson to be demoted as Foreign Affairs Critic in 2002, after Robinson announced his support for the Palestinians in their conflict with Israel (official NDP policy was that both sides should seek a peace agreement).  Doer was quoted as saying, Either he represents the party as a foreign affairs critic or hes removed as foreign affairs critic. And I believe he should be removed.(Michael Friscolanti, Demote Robinson, NDPers demand, National Post, 18 April 2002, A1; Bruce Cheadle, Robinson continues to speak out after NDP removes him as critic on Mideast, Canadian Press, 18 April 2002, 13:00.)  He later expressed disappointment that Robinson was allowed to keep his critics role, albeit with a ban against speaking on Middle East issues.(Jane Taber and Michael Friscolanti, Robinson censure called half measure: Not to speak on Mideast, National Post, 19 April 2002, A13.)Doer published a ten-point proposal for the future of the federal NDP in June 2002, calling for a focus on health and education as well as fiscal balance, community safety and election finance reform.(Gary Doer, What NDP should stand for, Globe and Mail, 18 June 2002, A15.)IdeologyDoer is on the centrist wing of the Democratic Party.(Frances Russell, Doers abundance of caution, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 November 2001, A12; Allen Mills, President Doer getting free ride as provincial politics whither away, Winnipeg Free Press, 3 November 2005, A14.)  He once described his political ideology as follows::I dont believe in nationalizing everything in our society, as in socialist theory. Anybody who calls himself a socialist has to believe in nationalizing almost everything. I see myself as a democrat - mixed economy, strong role of the public sector.(Doer endorsed Blairs approach to leading the British Labour Party in 1997,(Dan Lett, Doer closes in on the do-it stage, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 November 1997, A4.) and his own 1999 election platform was frequently compared with Blairs Third Way of social democracy.(NDP redraws image for voters, Winnipeg Free Press, 16 December 1998, A11.)  Doer has also been compared with former of Saskatchewan Romanow, who also governed from the centrist wing of the party.  Former NDP MLA Gonick wrote a critical essay about Doer in 2007, describing him as a small-l liberal without a socialist bone in his body.(Cy Gonick, Gary Doers Manitoba, Canadian Dimension, July/August 2007, accessed 1 September 2007.)Electoral recordAll electoral information is taken from Manitoba.  Expenditures refer to candidate election expenses.FootnotesExternal links*Canadainternational.gc.ca, Ambassadors Biography* http://www.lg.gov.mb.ca/awards/order/ordermb10.htmlDoerDoer
273436
Exmoor
Exmoor is an area of hilly open moorland in west Somerset and north Devon in West England, named after the main river that flows out of the district, the Exe.  The moor has given its name to a National Park, which includes the Hills, the Lyn Valley, the Vale of Porlock and  of the Channel coast. The total area of the park is , of which 71% is in Somerset and 29% in Devon.()  The National Park is primarily an upland area with a dispersed population living mainly in small villages and hamlets. The largest settlements are Porlock, Dulverton, Lynton, and Lynmouth, which together contain almost 40% of the parks population. Lynton and Lynmouth are combined into one parish and are connected by the and Lynmouth Cliff Railway.Exmoor was once a Forest and hunting ground, which was sold off in 1818. Exmoor was designated a National Park in 1954, under the 1949 Parks and Access to the Countryside Act.(  Several areas of the moor have been declared of Special Scientific Interest due to the flora and fauna. This title earns the site some legal protection from development, damage and neglect. In 1993 Exmoor was also designated an Sensitive Area.GeologyExmoor is an upland of sedimentary rocks classified as gritstones, sandstones, slate, shale and limestone, siltstones, and mudstones depending on the particle size. They are largely from the Devonian and early Carboniferous periods (the name Devonian comes from Devon, as rocks of that age were first studied and described here). As this area of Britain was not subject to glaciation, the plateau remains as a remarkably old landform.()() Quartz and iron mineralisation can be detected in outcrops and subsoil.() The Glenthorne area demonstrates the Trentishoe Formation of the Hangman Sandstone Group. The Hangman Sandstone represents the Devonian sequence of North Devon and Somerset.() These unusual freshwater deposits in the Hangman Grits, were mainly formed in desert conditions.() The underlying rocks are covered by moors and supported by wet, acid soil.() The highest point on Exmoor is Beacon; at  it is also the highest point in Somerset.(CoastlineImage:Exmoorcliffs.jpg|thumb|altRicky peaks and cliffs topped by greenery, with a small section of blue see visible to the left.|left|The Exmoor coastline near the of the RocksExmoor has  of coastline, including the highest sea cliffs in England, which reach a height of  at Culbone Hill. However, the crest of this coastal ridge of hills is more than  from the sea. If a cliff is defined as having a slope greater than 60 degrees, the highest sea cliff on mainland Britain is Great Hangman near Martin at  high, with a cliff face of .() Its sister cliff is the  Little Hangman, which marks the edge of Exmoor.Exmoors woodlands sometimes reach the shoreline,( especially between Porlock and The Foreland, where they form the single longest stretch of coastal woodland in and Wales.() The Coastal Heaths have been recognised as a of Special Scientific Interest due to the diversity of plant species present.()The scenery of rocky headlands, ravines, waterfalls and towering cliffs gained the Exmoor coast recognition as a Coast in 1991.() With its huge waterfalls and caves, this dramatic coastline has become an adventure playground for both climbers and explorers. The cliffs provide one of the longest and most isolated seacliff traverses in the UK.() The West Coast Path, at  the longest Trail in England and Wales, starts at Minehead and runs along all of Exmoors coast.()() There are small harbours at Lynmouth, Weir and Martin. Once crucial to coastal trade, the harbours are now primarily used for pleasure; individually owned sail boats and non-commercial fishing boats are often found in the harbours.() The of the Rocks beyond Lynton is a deep dry valley that runs parallel to the nearby sea and is capped on the seaward side by large rocks.RiversImage:LowerEastLynRiver.jpg|thumb|alta white stream flowing between rock banks through woodland|The Lyn RiverThe high ground forms the catchment area for numerous rivers and streams. There are about  of named rivers on Exmoor.() The Exe, for which Exmoor is named,()() rises at Exe Head near the village of Simonsbath, close to the Channel coast, but flows more or less directly due south, so that most of its length lies in Devon. It reaches the sea at a substantial ria (estuary) on the south (Channel) coast of Devon. Historically, its lowest bridging point was at Exeter, though there is now a viaduct for the motorway about  south of the city centre. It has several tributaries which arise on Exmoor. The Barle runs from northern Exmoor to join the River Exe at Exebridge, Devon. The river and the Valley are both designated as biological sites of Special Scientific Interest. Another tributary, the Haddeo, flows from the Lake.Most other rivers arising on Exmoor flow north to the Channel. These include the Heddon which runs along the western edges of Exmoor, reaching the North Devon coast at Mouth,() and the East and West Lyn which meet at Lynmouth. Oak Water is a moorland tributary of the East Lyn River the confluence being at Watersmeet.() The Horner, which is also known as Horner Water, rises near Luccombe and flows into Bay near Point. The main exception to northward-draining rivers is the River Mole which arises on the south-western flanks of Exmoor. It is the major tributary of the Taw which itself flows northward from Dartmoor.Water is one of the small rivers running north to the coast, and is associated with the Doone legends.Climatethumb|altA thin covering of white snow with rocks poking through it, covering sloping hillsides.|Horner Woods, Exmoor, in winterAlong with the rest of West England, Exmoor has a temperate climate which is generally wetter and milder than the rest of England. The mean annual temperature at Simonsbath is  with a seasonal and diurnal variation, but due to the modifying effect of the sea the range is less than in most other parts of the UK. January is the coldest month, with mean minimum temperatures between . July and August are the warmest months in the region, with mean daily maxima around . In general, December is the month with the least sunshine and June the month with the most sun. The south west of England has a favoured location with regard to the Azores high pressure when it extends its influence north-eastwards towards the UK, particularly in summer.(Cloud often forms inland, especially near hills, and reduce the amount of sunshine that reaches the park. The average annual sunshine is about 1,600 hours. Rainfall tends to be associated with Atlantic depressions or with convection. In summer, convection, caused by the sun heating the land surface more than the sea, sometimes forms rain clouds and at that time of year a large proportion of the rainfall comes from showers and thunderstorms. Annual precipitation varies from  in the east of the park to over  at The Chains.() However in the 24-hours of 16 August 1952, more than  of rain fell at The Chains. This rainfall, which followed an exceptionally wet summer led to disastrous flooding in Lynmouth with 34 dead and extensive damage to the small town.(()Snowfall is very variable from year to year and ranges from 23 days on the high moors to about 6 on coastal areas.() November to March have the highest mean wind speeds, with June to August having the lightest winds. The wind comes mostly from the south west.()Historythumb|left|Tarr steps clapper bridgeThere is evidence of occupation of the area by people from Mesolithic times onward. In the Neolithic period, people started to manage animals and grow crops on farms cleared from the woodland, rather than act purely as hunters and as gatherers.() It is also likely that extraction and smelting of mineral ores to make metal tools, weapons, containers and ornaments started in the late Neolithic, and continued into the bronze and Ages.( An earthen ring at Parracombe is believed to be a Neolithic henge dating from 50004000 BC, and Cow Castle, which is where White Water meets the River Barle, is an Iron Age fort at the top of a conical hill.() Steps are a prehistoric (circa 1000 BC) bridge across the Barle, about  south east of Withypool and  north west of Dulverton. The stone slabs weigh up to 5 tonnes apiece and the bridge has been designated by Heritage as a grade I building,() to recognise its special architectural, historical or cultural significance. There is little evidence of Roman occupation apart from two fortlets on the coast.()Holwell Castle, at Parracombe, was a Norman and bailey castle built to guard the junction of the eastwest and northsouth trade routes, enabling movement of people and goods and the growth of the population.( Alternative explanations for its construction suggest it may have been constructed to obtain taxes at the Heddon bridging place, or to protect and supervise silver mining in the area around Martin.() It was  in diameter and  high above the bottom of a rock cut ditch which is  deep.() It was built, in the late 11th or early 12th century of earth with timber palisades for defence and a one or two storey wooden dwelling. It was probably built by either Martin de Tours, the first lord of Parracombe, William de Falaise (who married Martins widow) or FitzMartin, although there are no written records to validate this. The earthworks of the castle are still clearly visible from a nearby footpath, but there is no public access to them. According to the late 13th-century Rolls, King II of England (d. 1189) gave of Wrotham the office of steward of Exmoor.(Golding Wrotham, William of (d. 1217/18) Oxford Dictionary of National Biography)altStreet scene with houses and shops on the left and an octagonal structure has a central stone pier which supports a heavy timber framework which carries a slate roof with central wooden lantern surmounted by a weather vane. In the distance is a castle.|thumb|altA small single story building with a pyramid shaped roof, to the side of a road lined with buildings. Some private small cars visible. Trees in the distance with the skyline of Dunster Castle.|right|Dunster Yarn Market (a covered market for the sale of local cloth, built in 1609) and Dunster Castle, ExmoorDuring the Ages, sheep farming for the wool trade came to dominate the economy. The wool was spun into thread on isolated farms and collected by merchants to be woven, fulled, dyed and finished in thriving towns such as Dunster. The land started to be enclosed and from the 17th century onwards larger estates developed, leading to establishment of areas of large regular shaped fields. During the 16th and 17th centuries the commons were overstocked with agisted livestock, from farmers outside the immediate area who were charged for the privilege. This led to disputes about the number of animals allowed and the enclosure of land.() During this period a forest and hunting ground was established, administered by a warden,( so that king Charles I could benefit from the fines and rents.(In the mid-17th century John Boevey was the warden. The house that he built at Simonsbath was the only one in the forest for 150 years.() When the royal forest was sold off in 1818, John Knight bought the Simonsbath House and the accompanying farm for 50,000. He set about converting the royal forest into agricultural land.( He and his family also built most of the large farms in the central section of the moor as well as  of metalled access roads to Simonsbath and a  wall around his estate, much of which still survives.()In the mid-19th century a mine was developed alongside the River Barle. The mine was originally called Wheal Maria, then changed to Wheal Eliza. It was a copper mine from 184554 and then an iron mine until 1857, although the first mining activity on the site may be from 1552.() At Simonsbath, a restored Victorian water-powered sawmill, which was damaged in the floods of 1992, has now been purchased by the National Park and returned to working order; it is now used to make the footpath signs, gates, stiles and bridges for various sites in the park.()EcologyIn addition to the Coastal Heaths Site of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI), two other areas are specifically designated. Exmoor covers () and includes the Beacon and the Holnicote and Horner Water Conservation Review sites, and the Chains Conservation Review site. The Chains site is nationally important for its south-western lowland heath communities and for transitions from semi-natural woodland through upland heath to blanket mire.( The site is also of importance for its breeding bird communities, its large population of the nationally rare Fritillary butterfly (Mellicta athalia),( an exceptional woodland lichen flora and its palynological interest of deep peat on the Chains.()The Exmoor SSSI is smaller, covering () and including the Barle and its tributaries with submerged plants such as Alternate Water-milfoil (Myriophyllum alterniflorum). There are small areas of semi-natural woodland within the site, including some which are ancient. The most abundant tree species is Oak (Quercus petraea), the shrub layer is very sparse and the ground flora includes Bracken, Bilberry and a variety of mosses. The heaths have strong breeding populations of birds, including Whinchat (Saxicola rubetra) and Stonechat (Saxicola torquata). Wheatear (Oenanthe oenanthe) are common near stone boundary walls and other stony places. Warbler (Locustella naevia) breed in scrub and tall heath. Trees on the moorland edges provide nesting sites for Redpoll (Acanthis flammea), Buzzard (Buteo buteo) and Raven (Corvus corax).()Florathumb|altGround cover purple coloured plants, with hills in the background.|Dunkery Beacon, with heather in bloomUncultivated heath and moorland cover about a quarter of Exmoor landscape.( Some moors are covered by a variety of grasses and sedges, while others are dominated by heather. There are also cultivated areas including the Hills, which lie in the east of the National Park. There are also  of woodland,(http://www.exmoor-nationalpark.gov.uk/sotp_report_chapter04_woodland.doc |accessdate2009-07-11) comprising a mixture of broad-leaved (oak, ash and hazel) and conifer trees. Horner Woodlands and Steps woodlands are prime examples. The countrys highest beech tree,  above sea level, is at Birch Cleave at Simonsbath but beech in hedgebanks grow up to .( At least two species of whitebeam tree: subcuneata and Sorbus Taxon D are unique to Exmoor.( These woodlands are home to lichens, mosses and ferns. Exmoor is the only national location for the lichens Biatoridium delitescens, Rinodina fimbriata and Rinodina flavosoralifera, the latter having been found only on one individual tree.(Faunathumb|altFour small gray ponies in a grassy field.|A herd of Exmoor pony foalsSheep have grazed on the moors for more than 3,000 years, shaping much of the Exmoor landscape by feeding on moorland grasses and heather. Traditional breeds include Horn, Cheviot and Dartmoor and Dartmoor sheep. ruby red cattle are also farmed in the area. Exmoor ponies can be seen roaming freely on the moors. They are a landrace rather than a breed of pony, and may be the closest breed to ferus remaining in Europe. The ponies are rounded up once a year to be marked and checked over. In 1818 Sir Acland, the last warden of Exmoor, took thirty ponies and established the Acland Herd, now known as the Anchor Herd, whose direct descendants still roam the moor.() In the World War the moor became a training ground, and the breed was nearly killed off, with only 50 ponies surviving the war.() The ponies are classified as endangered by the Breeds Survival Trust, with only 390 breeding females left in the UK. In 2006 a Rural Enterprise Grant, administered locally by the South West Rural Development Service, was obtained to create a new Exmoor Pony Centre at Ashwick, at a disused farm with  of land with a further  of moorland.()()deer have a stronghold on the moor and can be seen on quiet hillsides in remote areas, particularly in the early morning. The of Exmoor, a red stag (Cervus elaphus), was Britains largest known wild land animal, until it was killed in October 2010.(Exmoor, Emperor Stag, shot dead. Guardian, 25 October 2010.)(Fury over Britains largest wild animal shot dead. Daily Express, 25 October 2010.)(U.K. furious over killing of majestic stag. Toronto Star (Canada), 25 October 2010.)(Exmoor Emperor, Britains Largest Animal, Gunned Down In Trophy Hunt. Huffington Post (U.S.), 25 October 2010.) The moorland habitat is also home to hundreds of species of birds and insects. Birds seen on the moor include Merlin, Falcon, Curlew, Stonechat, Dipper, Warbler and Ouzel. Grouse and Grouse are now extinct on Exmoor,() probably as a result of a reduction in habitat management, and for the former species, an increase in visitor pressure.(Ballance, David K. and Gibbs, Brian D. (2003) The birds of Exmoor and the Quantocks)Beast of ExmoorThe of Exmoor is a cryptozoological cat (see cat) that is reported to roam Exmoor. There have been numerous reports of eyewitness sightings, however the official Exmoor National Park website lists the beast under Traditions, Folklore and Legends,() and the BBC calls it the famous-yet-elusive beast of Exmoor. Allegedly.() Sightings were first reported in the 1970s, although it became notorious in 1983, when a Molton farmer claimed to have lost over 100 sheep in the space of three months, all of them apparently killed by violent throat injuries. Descriptions of its colouration range from black to tan or dark grey. It is possibly a cougar or black leopard which was released after a law was passed in 1976 making it illegal for them to be kept in captivity outside zoos. In 2006, the British Big Cats Society reported that a skull found by a Devon farmer was that of a Puma, however, the for Environment, Food and Rural Affairs (Defra) states, Based on the evidence, Defra does not believe that there are big cats living in the wild in England.()Government and politicsThe National Park, 71% of which is in Somerset and 29% in Devon,() has a resident population of 10,600.( It was designated a National Park in 1954, under the 1949 Parks and Access to the Countryside Act.() About three quarters of the park is privately owned, made up of numerous private estates. The largest landowners are the National Trust, which owns over 10% of the land, and the National Park Authority, which owns about 7%. Other areas are owned by the Commission, Estate and Water Companies. The largest private landowner is the Badgworthy Land Company, which represents hunting interests.()From 1954 on, local government was the responsibility of the district and county councils, which remain responsible for the social and economic well-being of the local community. Since 1997 the Exmoor National Park Authority, which is known as a single purpose authority, has taken over some functions to meet its aims to conserve and enhance the natural beauty, wildlife and cultural heritage of the National Parks and promote opportunities for the understanding and enjoyment of the special qualities of the parks by the public,( including responsibility for the conservation of the historic environment.()The Park Authority receives 80% of its funding as a direct grant from the government. The Park Authority Committee consists of members from parish and county councils, and six appointed by the Secretary of State. The work is carried out by rangers, volunteers and a team of 13 estate workers who carry out a wide range of tasks including maintaining the many miles of rights of way, laying, fencing, swaling, walling, invasive weed control and habitat management on National Park Authority land.() There are ongoing debates between the authority and farmers over the biological monitoring of SSSIs, showing the need for a controlled regime of grazing and burning; farmers claim that these regimes are not practical or effective in the long term.()Sport and recreationAlthough the hunting of animals, particularly deer, with dogs was abolished by the Act 2004, the Exmoor hunts still meet in full regalia and there is a campaign to resurrect this rural sport.() During the Spring, amateur steeplechase meetings (Point to Points) are run by hunts at temporary courses such as Bratton Down and Holnicote. These, along with thoroughbred racing and racing, are an opportunity for farmers, huntstaff and the public to witness a day of traditional country entertainment.()For others walking, climbing and the scenery are the attractions. The Way is a  footpath() which follows the walks taken by poet Taylor Coleridge to Porlock, starting from Cottage at Stowey, where he once lived. It starts in the Quantocks before moving onto the Hills and crosses the fringes of Exmoor National Park at Beacon before finishing in Porlock. The Moors Way runs from Ivybridge in Devon to Lynmouth on the coast of North Devon, crossing parts of both Dartmoor and Exmoor.() Both of these walks intersect with the West Coast Path, Britains longest National Trail, which starts at Minehead and follows the Exmoor coast before continuing to Poole.Places of interestWhite signpost on a path on the left. To the right are rolling green fields on the hillsides.|thumb|Exmoor landscapeThe attractions of Exmoor include 208 scheduled ancient monuments, 16 conservation areas, and other open access land as designated by the and Rights of Way Act 2000. Exmoor receives approximately 1.4 million visitor days per year.() Many come to walk on the moors or along waymarked paths such as the Coleridge Way. Attractions on the coast include the and Lynmouth Cliff Railway, which connects Lynton to neighbouring Lynmouth, where the East and Lyn River meet. Bay, a few miles west of Lynton, is home to the Lynton & Barnstaple Railway, a gauge railway which connected the twin towns of Lynton and Lynmouth to Barnstaple, about 31 km (just over 19 miles) away.(The Lynton & Barnstaple Railway Magazine published by The L&BR Trust. Various editions) Further along the coast, Porlock is a quiet coastal town with an adjacent marsh nature reserve and a harbour at nearby Weir. Watchet is a historic harbour town with a marina and is home to a carnival, which is held annually in July.()()Inland, many of the attractions are centred around small towns and villages or linked to the river valleys, such as the ancient clapper bridge at Steps and the Snowdrop Valley near Cross, which is carpeted in snowdrops in February() and, later, displays bluebells. Withypool is also in the Barle Valley. The Moors Way passes through the village.() As well as Castle,() Dunsters other attractions include a priory,() dovecote, yarn market,() inn,() bridge, mill and a stop on the Somerset Railway. Exford, lies on the River Exe.Exmoor has been the setting for several novels including the 19th century Lorna Doone: A Romance of Exmoor by Doddridge Blackmore, and Margaret Drabbles 1998 novel The Witch of Exmoor. The park was featured on the television programme Natural Wonders twice, as one of the wonders of the Country.See also*Estate*Moor*BridgeReferencesFurther reading**************External links*Exmoor National Park Authority*cs:Exmoorcy:Exmoorda:Exmoorde:Exmoor-Nationalparket:ExmoorNacional de Exmoornational dExmoorhr:Exmooris:ExmoorNational Parkpark Exmoorno:Exmoornn:Exmoorpnb:Narodowy Exmoorru:simple:Exmoorfi:Exmoorsv:Exmoor
274343
Friedrich_August_von_Alberti
thumb|200px|Friedrich von AlbertiDr. Friedrich August von Alberti (September 4, 1795  September 12, 1878) was a German geologist whose ground-breaking 1834 publication(Monographie des Bunten Sandsteins, Muschelkalks und Keupers, und die Verbindung dieser Gebilde zu einer Formation (Stuttgart-Tbingen: Cotta), 1834) recognized the unity of the three characteristic strata that compose the sedimentary deposits of the Triassic period in Northern Europe. From the fossils contained in the three distinct layers&mdash; of bed sandstones, capped by chalk (Muschelkalk), followed by black shales&mdash; that are found throughout Germany and Northwest Europe, and are called the Trias (Latin trias meaning triad), Alberti detected that they formed a single stratigraphic formation; today it would be termed a system.  He identified the Triassic as bearing a unique fossil fauna, bounded by the Permian extinction below and by another extinction above. Alberti grew up in Stuttgart and Rottweil where he was educated at the Gymnasium and went to the military school in Stuttgart. Afterwards he went back to Rottweil, a town  south of Stuttgart. He learned the salt processing system and became a Salinentechniker (salt technician). He was quickly promoted to Salineninspektor (salt supervisor). In 1823, based on his perception of the areas geology, he had an idea to drill for salt in Rottenmunster. Eight months later the team had success and found salt, in a location where no one would have considered the possibility of finding salt.He also made excavations in the Roman ruins of Rottweil, the ancient Arae Flaviae; he published his findings from 1833 to 1837.Alberti bought a house and lived in Rottenmunster from 1829 to 1853. While there he worked as manager for two salt companies. After he retired he moved to Heilbronn. He took a position as advisor, salt technician, and geologist. He had excellent skills in understanding sandstone and limestone. He discovered that if you find combinations of these two kinds of stone together, you will always find salt. He wrote books on his experiences of looking and drilling for salt.(F.A. von Alberti, Halurgische geologie, 1852 ) He invented the method of mining salt by pumping water into the mine; when the brine rose to the surface, he would allow the water to evaporate and then he would collect the salt. The Eberhard Karls University of Tbingen gave Friedrich August von Alberti an honorary doctorate for his achievements in the salt-mining industry. The city honored him with a street in his name. Von Alberti was very well thought of and popular. People liked him for his personality, his happiness, and the fact that he was very open and honest to everyone. After he died his family stayed in Rottweil, where also a street bears his name. Today many of his descendants still live in the town.In Friedrichshall, also a former salt town, a school is named after him, the Friedrich-von-Alberti-Gymnasium.Notes(Further reading * August von Albertivon AlbertiAugust von Albertivon AlbertiAugust von Alberti  August von Alberti
276984
Livin
Livin is a commune in the Pas-de-Calais department in northern France.OverviewThe city of Livin is an old mining city of Pas-de-Calais. Near Lens, this modest-sized city nevertheless has several nursery schools, schools, colleges, a university, a swimming pool, a city library, a cultural and social center (CCS), a hospital, a covered stadium, several gardens and parks, two movie theaters, two cemeteries, a Catholic church, a shopping center, a National Police station, a fire station, a complete intercommunity transportation system (Tadao http://tadao.fr), regional newspapers, the main ones being LAvenir de lArtois Future of Artois,Voix du Nord (Voice of the North) and clair (Northern Flash), etc. The city has also recently acquired ADSL connectivity.AdministrationLivin is the seat of two cantons. It belongs to the intercommunality of Lens-Livin (Communaupole) which consists of 36 communes, with a total population of 250,000 inhabitants.HistoryPrehistoryThe history of Livin begins very early.  The foothill of Riaumont (highest point in Livin) is a rich archaeological site.  Traces of Neolithic and Gallo-Roman periods have been found there, and 752 tombs attest that Livin was once a Merovingian burial ground.Agriculture and mining beginIn 1414, there were barely 150 inhabitants in Livin.  At that point it was a village mainly concerned with agriculture.  Up until War I, the population steadily grew:* 600 inhabitants in 1759* 900 inhabitants in 1789* 1223 inhabitants in 1820Coal was discovered in the vicinity of Livin in 1857.  This precipitated an explosion of productivity, prosperity, and population.  The population of Livin was 25,698 in 1914.Livin during the World WarsThe First World War brutally ended Livins expansion.  The city was ruined, the churches and castles destroyed.  Human losses were 400 civilian and 600 military.  The city of Livin was awarded the de Guerre in 1920.After the war, it was necessary to rebuild everything.  After a few years, Livin was again an active city, and mining recommenced.The Second World War again stopped the progress of the city.  In 1940, Livin was evacuated, and the city was settled by Germans.  Resistance was organized, in particular with the help of the Voix du Nord newspaper.  In this war, there were 220 civilian and 225 military casualties.  Livin was liberated on 2 September 1944 by the British Eighth Army.After the war, mining recommenced in force; coal mining was vital to the reconstruction of the French economy.  Silicosis, which would kill many miners, made its appearance.File:Lievin France pano2005-08.jpg|thumb|600px|center|View of Livin (left) taken in 2005 from the site cople 11/19 in Loos-en-Gohelle (right). End of coal miningIn addition to silicosis, miners were in daily peril of being lost in mining catastrophes. There were five major mining catastrophes during the coal mining period:* 28 November 1861, pit 1, 2 dead* 13 August 1882, pit 3, 8 dead* 14 January 1885, pit 1, 28 dead* 16 March 1957, pit 3, 10 dead* 27 December 1974, Saint-Am pit, 42 deadAdditionally, a recession in the mining industry began and with it a recession in Livin.  From 1960 to 1970, 60 of the 67 pits closed,  Following the tragedy in Saint-Am, the last pit closed in 1974.  Livin no longer produces coal, and has moved on to a new chapter.Livin without coalLivin suffered a great deal from the abandonment of coal; the whole city depended on the mines.  Fortunately, the city reconverted and, although it may not have the same economic dynamism of that epoch, the commercial and industrial areas are a source of employment for many, and the city remains relatively prosperous with 33,430 inhabitants (see above).Mayors of Livin since the French Revolution* 17901810, Procope-Alexandre-Joseph de Ligne* 18101819, Pierre Caron* 18201822, Jacques Delaby* 18221825, Pierre Caron* 18251856, Henri-Antoine de Ligne* 18561871, Nicolas Antoine Delaby* 18711878, Alexandre-Procope Comte Jonglez de Ligne* 18791892, Louis Schmidt* 1892, Flix Pamart* 18931905, Edouard Defernez* 19051912, Arthur Lamendin* 19121913, Pierre Leroy* 1914, Franois Pouvier* 19141919 : (evacuation)* 19191925, Lon Degreaux* 19251929, Jules Bdart* 19301935, Silas Goulet* 19361939, Henri-Joseph Thibaut* 19391944, Louis Thobois* 19441945, Henri Bertin* 19451947, Florimond Lemaire* 19471952, Eugne Gossart* 19521981, Henri Darras* 1981present, Jean-Pierre KucheidaNotable peopleFamous people from Livin include:* Carpentier (boxer)* Enrico (director)* Muchembled (historian)Twin townsLivin is twinned with:{| classwikitable|- valigntop|*  Hohenlimburg, near Hagen in Germany (since 1962)*  Pasvalys in Lithuania (since 1999)*  an der Mur in Austria (since 1999)||||*  Valette-du-Var in France (since 2000)*  Rybnik in Poland (since 04.12.2000) (accessdate2008-11-01)|}See also* Riaumont*of the Pas-de-Calais departmentReferences* INSEE commune file;NotesExternal links* Town council website (in French)br:Livinca:Livinceb:Livinde:Livines:Livineu:Livinfa:fr:Livinit:Livinsw:Livinmg:Livinnl:Livinja:no:Livinoc:Livinpcd:Lvinpl:Livinpt:Livinro:Livinsimple:Livinsl:Livinsv:Livinuk:vi:Livinvo:Livinwar:Livin
277921
Bailey
People*(surname)*(given name)Fictional Characters* Bailey, a comic strip created by Mort Walker* Pickett, a character on The Suite Life on Deck* Bailey, a character Greys Anatomy* Bailey, in the television series 2525, a type of large and heavily armed floating bio-mechanical robot whose sole purpose is to collect and/or destroy any human it encountersOther* bridge, a portable pre-fabricated truss bridge* (car), a former USA automobile manufacturer using engines in its cars* (fortification), an enclosed courtyard adjacent to a motte in a castle.* New Hampshire, a fictional town depicted in the comic book Miracle* Irish Cream, a type of alcoholic liqueur*  JUSTIN BAILEY, a famous password from the NES video-game Metroid* Bailey, The Central Criminal Court in London, England.* Bailey, a South Wales mining valleys term to describe the area immediate to the kitchen and between the neighbours kitchen wall, usually floored in flagstones, and typically housing the washing utensils including (machine) See also * (disambiguation)* BAILIIde:Baileyfr:Baileyio:Baileyit:Baileynl:Baileyja:pl:Baileypt:Baileyru:fi:Baileyvo:Bailey
283772
Tourism_in_India
File:Taj Mahal, Agra, India edit2.jpg|200px|thumb|Every year, more than 3 million tourists visit the Mahal in Agra, Pradesh.File:Indischer Maler des 6. Jahrhunderts 001.jpg|thumb|The sixth century Paintings at the Caves in MaharashtraTourism in India is the largest service industry, with a contribution of 6.23% to the national GDP and 8.78% of the total employment in India. India witnesses more than 17.9 million annual foreign tourist arrivals and 740 million domestic tourism visits. The tourism industry in India generated about 100 US$ billion in 2008 and that is expected to increase to US$275.5 billion by 2018 at a 9.4% annual growth rate.() In the year 2010, 17.9 million foreign tourists visited India. Majority of foreign tourists come from USA and UK. Maharashtra, Nadu, Delhi, Pradesh and Rajasthan  are the top 5 states to receive inbound tourists.() Domestic tourism in the same year was massive at 740 million. Pradesh, Pradesh, Tamil Nadu and Maharashtra received the big share of these visitors.(Tourism Statistics at a Glance, 2010. Ministry of Tourism Government of India)()  Ministry of Tourism is the nodal agency to formulate national policies and programmes for the development and promotion of tourism. In the process, the Ministry consults and collaborates with other stakeholders in the sector including various Central Ministries/agencies, the State Governments/  union Territories and the representatives of the private sector. Concerted efforts are being made to promote new forms of tourism such as rural, cruise, medical and eco-tourism.(Annual Report 2009-2010, Ministry of Tourism, Government of India)The Ministry of Tourism is the nodal agency for the development and promotion of tourism in India and maintains the India campaign.According to Travel and Tourism Council, India will be a tourism hotspot from 20092018,() having the highest 10-year growth potential.(Hospitality Begins at Home in the Family Palace) The Travel & Tourism Competitiveness Report 2007 ranked tourism in India 6th in terms of price competitiveness and 39th in terms of safety and security.() Despite short- and medium-term setbacks, such as shortage of hotel rooms,() tourism revenues are expected to surge by 42% from 2007 to 2017.() Indias 5,000 years of history, its length, breadth and the variety of geographic features make its tourism basket large and varied. It presents heritage and cultural tourism along with medical, business and sports tourism. India has a growing medical tourism sector. The Commonwealth Games in Delhi were expected to significantly boost tourism in India.Tourism by stateAndhra PradeshFile:Hyderabad india .jpg|thumb|right|Charminar in HyderabadThe state of Andhra Pradesh comprises like scenic hills, forests, beaches and temples. Also known as The City of Nizams and The City of Pearls, Hyderabad is today one of the most developed cities in the country and a modern hub of information technology, ITES, and biotechnology. Hyderabad is known for its rich history, culture and architecture representing its unique character as a meeting point for North and South India, and also its multilingual culture, Andhra Pradesh is the home of many religious pilgrim centres:*Tirupati, the abode of Lord Venkateswara, is the richest and most visited religious center (of any faith) in the world. Srisailam, the abode of Sri Mallikarjuna, is one of twelve Jyothirlingalu in India. Amaravathis Siva temple is one of the Pancharamams, Vemulavada temple, one of the old abodes of  Lord Shiva,  reputed as Dakshina Kashi - Benaras of South India. Vemulavada temple is built by Chalukya Kings between AD 750 and 975. Yadagirigutta, the abode of an avatara of Vishnu, Sri Lakshmi Narasimha.*The Temple and Pillar Temple in Warangal are famous tourist spots and depict the finest taste of Kakatiya dynasty for arts & culture and temple carvings. Warangal is also home to Medaram - the Asias largest tribal fair/festival called Saralamma Jatara.*Saraswati Temple, Basar is one of the only two Saraswati Temples in India.The state has numerous Buddhist centres at Amaravathi, Nagarjuna Konda, Bhattiprolu, Mangalagiri, Ghantasala, Nelakondapalli, Dhulikatta, Bavikonda, Thotlakonda, Shalihundam, Pavuralakonda, Sankaram, Phanigiri and Kolanpaka.The golden beaches at Visakhapatnam, the one-million-year old limestone caves at Borra, picturesque Araku Valley, hill resorts of Horsley Hills, river Godavari racing through a narrow gorge at Papi Kondalu, waterfalls at Ettipotala, Kuntala and rich bio-diversity at Talakona, are some of the natural attractions of the state. Visakhapatnam is home to many tourist attractions such as the INS Karasura Submarine museum, Yarada Beach, Araku Valley, VUDA Park, Indira Gandhi Zoological Gardens. The weather in Andhra Pradesh is mostly tropical and the best time to visit  is in November through to January. The monsoon season commences in June and ends in September, so travel would not be advisable during this period.Golkonda (Telugu: , Urdu: ), a ruined city of south-central India and capital of ancient Kingdom of Golkonda (c. 13641512), is situated 11 km west of Hyderabad.The most important builder of Golkonda was a Kakatiya King. Ibrahim was following in the spirit of his ancestors, the Qutub Shahi kings, a great family of builders who had ruled the kingdom of Golkonda from 1512. Their first capital, the fortress citadel of Golkonda, was rebuilt for defense from invading Mughals from the north. They laid out Golkondas splendid monuments, now in ruins, and designed a perfect acoustical system by which a hand clap sounded at the forts main gates, the grand portico, was heard at the top of the citadel, situated on a 300-foot (91 m)-high granite hill. This is one of the fascinating features of the fort.Assam Assam is the  central state in the North-East Region of India and serves as the gateway to the rest of the Sister States. Assam boasts of famous wildlife preserves  the National Park, which is home to the Great Indian One-Horned Rhinoceros and the National Park and Wildlife Sanctuary (These first two parks are World Heritage Site), the largest river island Majuli, historic Sivasagar, famous for the ancient monuments of Kingdom, the city of eternal romance, Tezpur and tea-estates dating back to time of Raj. The weather is mostly sub-tropical. Assam experiences the Indian monsoon and has one of the highest forest densities in India. The winter months (October end half to first half of April) are the best time to visit.Assam has a rich cultural heritage going back to the Ahom Kingdom, which governed the region for many centuries before the British occupation. Other notable features include the River, the mystery of the bird suicides in Jatinga, numerous temples including Kamakhya of Tantric sect. Gurdwara Sri Guru Tegh Bahadur also known as Damdama Sahib at Dhubri - This famous Gurudwara is situated in the heart of the Dhubri Town on the bank of the mighty Brahmaputra river in far north-east India. Guru Teg Bahadur the holy Sikh Guru visited this place in 1505 and met Srimanta Sankardeva (the founder of the Mahapuruxiya Dharma) as the Guru traveled from Dhaka to Assam, ruins of palaces, etc. Guwahati, the capital city of Assam, boasts many bazaars, temples, and wildlife sanctuaries.BiharImage:Mahabodhitemple.jpg|right|thumb|Temple is a UNESCO World Heritage SiteBihar is one of the oldest continuously inhabited places in the world with history of 3000 years. The rich culture and heritage of Bihar is evident from the innumerable ancient monuments that are dotted all over this state in eastern India. This is the place of Aryabhata, Great Ashoka, Chanakya and many other great historical figures.Attractions:*Patna - The capital of Bihar, famous for its rich history and royal architecture.*Gaya - Known for Gaya the place at which Buddha attained enlightenment.*Muzaffarpur - Famous for its education.*Kesariya - Location of the worlds largest Buddhist Stupa.*Nalanda - Location of one of the worlds oldest university.*Sasaram - Tomb of Sher Shah Suri, the great Emperor of India.*Sonpur - The Sonepur cattle fair or Sonepur Mela, it is the biggest cattle fair of Asia and stretches on from fifteen days to one month.*Sri Patna Sahib - One of the famous Sikh pilgrimage known for the birth place of Sikhs Tenth Guru Sri Guru Gobind Singh Sahib.*Darbhanga - It is among the oldest cities of Bihar. Famous for the Maharaja forts and Kali Mandir.*Munger - Home to the only Yoga University in the world, School of Yoga. Religious places such as Peethas.Bihar is one of the most sacred places of various religions such as Hinduism, Buddhism, Jainism, Sikhism & Islam. Famous Attraction includes Temple, a Buddhist shrine and World Heritage Site is also situated in Bihar, Caves the oldest rockcut caves in India, Bakhsh Oriental Library the oldest library of India.ChhattisgarhChhattisgarh is a new state but with an ancient civilization, which can be felt by visiting the historical remains in the state. The state is blessed by nature with magnificent water falls, mountains, forests and wildlife. The Green State of Chhattisgarh has 41.33% of its area under forests and is one of the richest bio-diversity areas in the country. There are many tourist attractions worth seeing. Main attractions of Chhattisgarh are Chitrakot Waterfalls, Kutumsar Caves, Ramgarh and Sita Bengra, temple, Sirpur, Rajim, Ratanpur and Malhar.DelhiFile:Image-New Delhi Lotus.jpg|thumb|left|TempleDelhi is the capital city of India. A fine blend of old and new, ancient and modern, Delhi is a melting pot of cultures and  religions. Delhi has been the capital of numerous empires that ruled India, making it rich in history. The rulers left behind their trademark architectural styles.  Delhi currently has many renowned historic monuments and landmarks such as the Tughlaqabad fort, Minar, Quila, Gardens, Jama Masjid, tomb, Fort, and Tomb. Modern monuments include Jantar Mantar, Gate, Bhavan, Temple, temple and Akshardham Temple.Delhi is famous for its British colonial architecture, wide roads, and tree-lined boulevards. Delhi is home to numerous political landmarks, national museums, Islamic shrines, Hindu temples, green parks, and trendy malls.GoaFile:India Landscape.jpg|thumb|Goa is noted for its resorts and beaches.Goa is one of the most famous destinations in India. A former colony of Portugal, Goa is famous for its excellent beaches, Portuguese churches, Hindu temples, and wildlife sanctuaries. The of Bom Jesus, Temple, Falls, and Shantadurga are famous attractions in Goa. Recently a Wax Museum (Wax World) has also opened in Old Goa housing a number of wax personalities of Indian history, culture and heritage.The Goa Carnival is a world famous event, with colorful masks and floats, drums and reverberating music, and dance performances.Himachal PradeshSnow Tourism .jpg|thumb|left|The Himalayan landscape of Himachal Pradesh is ideal for out-door activities such as skiingPradesh is famous for its Himalayan landscapes and popular hill-stations.  Many outdoor activities such as climbing, biking, paragliding, ice-skating, and heli-skiing are popular tourist attractions in Himachal Pradesh.()Shimla, the state capital, is very popular among tourists. The Railway is a Mountain railway which is a World Heritage Site. Shimla is also a famous skiing attraction in India. Other popular hill stations include Manali and Kasauli.Dharamshala, home of the Lama, is known for its Tibetan monasteries and Buddhist temples. Many trekking expeditions also begin here.Jammu and KashmirFile:India north.jpg|right|thumb|& Kashmir is known for its scenic landscapeand Kashmir is the northernmost state of India. Jammu is noted for its scenic landscape, ancient temples and mosques, Hindu and Muslim shrines, castles, gardens and forts. The Hindu holy shrines of Amarnath in Valley attracts about .4 million Hindu  devotees every year. Devi also attract thousands of Hindu devotees every year. Jammus historic monuments feature a unique blend of Islamic and Hindu architecture styles.Tourism forms an integral part of the Kashmiri economy. Often dubbed Paradise on Earth, Kashmirs mountainous landscape has attracted tourists for centuries. Notable places are Lake, Srinagar Phalagam, Gulmarg, Yeusmarg and Mughal Gardens etc. Kashmirs landscape has made it one of the popular destinations for adventure tourism in South Asia. In recent years, Ladakh has emerged as a major hub for adventure tourism. This part of Greater Himalaya called moon on earth consists of naked peaks and deep gorges. Leh, the capital, is also a growing tourist spot.KarnatakaImage:Mysore Palace .jpg|thumb|Palace, illuminated for the Dasara festival. This receives 2.7 million tourists, second highest in IndiaKarnataka has been ranked as fifth most popular destination for tourism among states of India.( It has the second highest number of protected monuments in India, at 507. Kannada dynasties like Kadambas, Gangas, Chalukyas, Rashtrakutas, Hoysalas, Vijayanagaras anf the of Mysore ruled from what is today Karnataka.()() They built great monuments to Buddhism, Jainism, Shaivism. These monuments are preserbed at Badami, Aihole, Pattadakal, Mahakuta, Hampi, Lakshmeshwar, Sudi, Hooli, Temple (Itagi), Dambal, Lakkundi, Gadag, Hangal, Halasi, Galaganatha, Chaudayyadanapura, Banavasi, Belur, Halebidu, Sringeri, Shravanabelagola, Sannati, Nanjangud, Mysore, Hills, Kolar, Mudabidri, Gokarna, Bagali, Kuruvatti and many more. Notable Islamic monuments are present at Bijapur, Bidar, Gulbarga, Raichur and other part of the state. Gumbaz at Bijapur, has the second largest pre-modern dome in the world after the Byzantine Sophia. Karnataka has two heritage sites, at Hampi and Pattadakal.Karnataka is famous for its waterfalls. falls of Shimoga District is one of the highest waterfalls in Asia. This state has 21 wildlife sanctuaries and five National parks and is home to more than 500 species of birds. Karnataka has many beaches at Karwar, Gokarna, Murdeshwara, Surathkal. Karnataka is a rock climbers paradise. Yana in Uttara Kannada, Fort in Chitradurga, Ramnagara near Bangalore district, Shivagange in Tumkur district and tekal in Kolar district are a rock climbers heaven.()KeralaFile:Kerala houseboat.jpg|thumb|left|Kerala, nicknamed as Gods own country, is famous for its houseboats.Kerala is a state on the tropical Coast of southwestern India. Nicknamed as one of the 10 paradises of the world by Geographic, Kerala is famous especially for its eco-tourism initiatives. Its unique culture and traditions, coupled with its varied demography, has made it one of the most popular tourist destinations in India. Growing at a rate of 13.31%, the tourism industry significantly contributes to the states economy. Kerala is known for its tropical backwaters and pristine beaches such as Kovalam.Popular attractions in the state include the beaches at Kovalam, Cherai and Varkala; the hill stations of Munnar, Nelliampathi, Ponmudi and Wayanad; and national parks and wildlife sanctuaries at Periyar and Eravikulam National Park. The backwaters regionan extensive network of interlocking rivers, lakes, and canals that centre on Alleppey, Kumarakom, and Punnamadaalso see heavy tourist traffic. Heritage sites, such as the Padmanabhapuram Palace, Hill Palace, Mattancherry Palace are also visited. Cities such as Kochi and Thiruvananthapuram(Trivandrum) are popular centres for shopping and traditional theatrical performances.The states tourism agenda promotes ecologically sustained tourism, which focuses on the local culture, wilderness adventures, volunteering and personal growth of the local population. Efforts are taken to minimise the adverse effects of traditional tourism on the natural environment, and enhance the cultural integrity of local people.Madhya PradeshFile:Khajuraho-Lakshmana Temple erotic detal1.JPG|thumb|right|The temples of Khajuraho are famous for their sculptures. The Khajuraho group of monuments are a World Heritage Site.Pradesh is called the Heart of India because of its location in the centre of the country. It has been home to the cultural heritage of Hinduism, Islam, Buddhism, Sikhism and Jainism. Innumerable monuments, exquisitely carved temples, stupas, forts and palaces are dotted all over the state. The temples of Khajuraho are world-famous for their erotic sculptures, and are a World Heritage Site.  Gwalior is famous for its fort, Jai Vilas Palace, the Tomb of Rani Lakshmibai, Md. Ghaus & Tansen.Madhya Pradesh is also known as Tiger State because of the tiger population. Famous national parks like Kanha, Bandhavgadh, Shivpuri, Sanjay, Pench are located in Madhya Pradesh. Spectacular mountain ranges, meandering rivers and miles and miles of dense forests offering a unique and exciting panorama of wildlife in sylvan surroundings.MaharashtraFile:Mumbai Skyline at Night.jpg|thumb|left|Mumbai is the most popular cosmopolitan city in India, famous for its architecture, shopping, gastronomy, and Bollywood. Maharashtra accounts for largest foreign tourists arrivals in India.( Maharashtra is the most visited state in India by foreign tourists,( with more than 5.1 million foreign tourists arrivals annually. Maharashtra boasts of a large number of popular and revered religious venues that are heavily frequented by locals as well as out-of-state visitors. Caves, Caves and Shivaji Terminus are the three UNESCO Heritage sites in Maharashtra and are highly responsible for the development of Tourism in the state.Mumbai is the most popular cosmopolitan city in India, and a great place to experience modern India. Mumbai famous for Bollywood, the worlds largest film industry. In addition, Mumbai is famous for its clubs, shopping, and upscale gastronomy. The city is known for its architecture, from the ancient Caves, to the Islamic Ali Mosque, to the colonial architecture of High Court and Shivaji Terminus. Maharashtra also has numerous adventure tourism destinations, including paragliding, climbing, canoeing, kayaking, snorkeling, and diving. Maharashtra also has several pristine national parks and reserves, some of the best ones are Tadoba with excellent accommodation and safari experiences besides little known by amazing wildlife destinations like Koyna, Nagzira (very small with incredible sightings), Melghat (disturbed with massive mining truck movement), Dajipur, Radhanagari and of course the only national park within metropolis city limits in the world - Sanjay Gandhi National Park. The Ka Maqbara at Aurangabad the Mahalakshmi temple at Kolhapur, the cities of Nashik, Trimbak famous for religious importance and the city of Pune the seat of the Empire and the fantastic Chaturthi celebrations together contribute for the Tourism sector of Mahrashtra.ManipurManipur as the name suggest is a land of jewels. Its rich culture excels in every aspects as in martial arts, dance, theater and sculpture. The charm of the place is the greenery with the moderate climate making it a tourists heaven. The beautiful and seasonal Shirui Lily at Ukhrul (district), Sangai (brow antlered deer) and the floating islands at Lake are few of the rare things found in Manipur. Polo, which can be called a royal game, also originated from Manipur. Some of the main tourist attractions are:*Imphal (Capital)*Churachandpur*Lamjao National Park*War cemeteries*Lake*MorehMeghalayaImage:Nohkalikai fall.JPG|thumb|FallsMeghalaya has some of the thickest surviving forests in the country. Therefore constitutes one of the most important ecotourism circuits in the country today. The Meghalayan subtropical forests support a vast variety of flora and fauna. Meghalaya has 2 national parks and 3 wildlife sanctuaries.Meghalaya, also offers many adventure tourism opportunities in the form of mountaineering, rock climbing, trekking and hiking, water sports etc. The state offers several trekking routes some of which also afford and opportunity to encounter some rare animals such as the slow loris, assorted deer and bear. The Lake has a water sports complex with facilities such as rowboats, paddleboats, sailing boats, cruise-boats, water-scooters and speedboats.Cherrapunjee is one of the most popular tourist spots in North East of India. It lies to the south of the capital Shillong. The town is very well known and needs little publicity. A rather scenic, 50 kilometer long road, connects Cherrapunjee with Shillong.The popular waterfalls in the state are the Elephant Falls, Shadthum Falls, Weinia falls, Bishop Falls, Nohkalikai Falls, Falls and Sweet Falls. The hot springs at Jakrem near Mawsynram are believed to have curative and medicinal properties.OrissaFile:Konark Sub Temple Front view.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Sun Temple built by the Ganga dynasty is a World Heritage Site.File:Chilka Sea Side.png|thumb|right|200px|LakeOrissa has been a preferred destination from ancient days for people who have an interest in spirituality, religion, culture, art and natural beauty. Ancient and medieval architecture, pristine sea beaches, the classical and ethnic dance forms and a variety of festivals. Orissa has kept the religion of Buddhism alive. Rock-edicts that have challenged time stand huge and over-powering by the banks of the river Daya. The torch of Buddhism is still ablaze in the sublime triangle at and Khandagiri Caves, Lalitagiri as well as Ratnagiri, on the banks of river Birupa. Precious fragments of a glorious past come alive in the shape of stupas, rock-cut caves, rock-edicts, excavated monasteries, viharas, chaityas and sacred relics in caskets and the Rock-edicts of Ashoka. Orissa is also famous for its well-preserved Hindu Temples, especially the Temple at Puri, Sun Temple and Leaning Temple of Huma.()Orissa is the home for various tribal communities who have contributed uniquely to the multicultural and multilingual character of the state. Their handicrafts, different dance forms, jungle products and their unique life style blended with their healing practices have got world wide attention. The Carnival is a must see for everyone who wants to see a glimpse of the art and culture of Orissa at one place.Puducherrythumb|The Matrimandir, a golden metallic sphere in auroville, PuducherryThe Territory of Puducherry comprises four coastal regions viz- Puducherry, Karaikal, Mahe and Yanam. Puducherry is the Capital of this Union Territory and one of the most popular tourist destinations in India. Puducherry has been described by Geographic as a glowing highlight of subcontinental sojourn. The city has many beautiful colonial buildings, churches, temples, and statues, which, combined with the systematic town planning and the well planned French style avenues, still preserve much of the colonial ambience.PunjabFile:Golden Temple India.jpg|thumb|left|x216px| text|Sahib or The Golden TempleThe state of Punjab is renowned for its cuisine, culture and history. Punjab has a vast public transportation and communication network. Some of the main cities in Punjab are Patiala, Amritsar, Chandigarh, and Ludhiana. Punjab also has a rich religious history incorporating Sikhism and Hinduism. Tourism in Punjab is principally suited for the tourists interested in culture, ancient civilization, spirituality and epic history. Some of the villages in Punjab are also a must see for the person who wants to see the true Punjab, with their beautiful traditional Indian homes, farms and temples, this is a must see for any visitor that goes to Punjab. India-Pakistan border at Wagah is also a popular tourist attraction. Patiala is famous for loads of heritage such as Patiala Peg, Salwar and Jutti.RajasthanFile:UmaidBhawan Exterior 1.jpg|thumb|Bhawan Palace Rajasthan, literally meaning Land of the Kings, is one of the most attractive tourist destinations in India. The vast sand dunes of the Desert attract millions of tourists from around the globe every year.Attractions:*Jaipur - The capital of Rajasthan, famous for its rich history and royal architecture.*Jodhpur -  Fortress-city at the edge of the Desert, famous for its blue homes and architecture.*Udaipur - Known as the Venice of India.*Jaisalmer - Famous for its golden fortress.*Barmer - Barmer and surrounding areas offer perfect picture of typical Rajasthani villages.*Bikaner - Famous for its medieval history as a trade route outpost.*Abu - Is the highest peak in the Range of Rajasthan.*Pushkar - It has the first and one of the very Brahma temples in the world.*National Park - A World Heritage Site*Nathdwara - This town near Udaipur hosts the famous temple of Shrinathji.*Ranthambore - Has one of the largest national parks in India.SikkimFile:Kangchenjunga.JPG|thumb|right|Kangchenjunga is the third highest mountain in the world.Originally known as Suk-Heem, which in the local language means peaceful home. Sikkim was an independent kingdom till the year 1974, when it became a part of the Republic of India. The capital of Sikkim is Gangtok, located approximately 105 kilometers from Jalpaiguri, the nearest railway station to Sikkim. Although, an airport is under construction at Dekiling in East Sikkim, the nearest airport to Sikkim would be Bagdogra.the important places to visit are:1.Baba Mandir2.Nathula Pass3.Rumtek Monastery4.Handicraft Shops5.Tsangpo LakeSikkim is considered as the land of orchids, mystic cultures and colorful traditions. Sikkim is well known among trekkers and adventure lovers. Places near Sikkim include Darjeeling also known as the Queen of Hills and Kalimpong. Darjeeling, other than its world famous Darjeeling tea is also famous for its refined Prep schools founded during the Raj. Kalimpong is also famous for its flora cultivation and is home to many internationally known Nurseries.Tamil NaduFile:Nilgiri Mountain Train.jpg|right|thumb|The Mountain Railway, a World Heritage Site provides a scenic view of hills throughout its 41 km journey between Mettupalayam and Ooty (7500 FT above ground level).Tamil Nadu is the top state in attracting the maximum number of foreign tourists in India.() Archaeological sites with civilization dating back to 3800 years() are found in Tamil Nadu. The state also holds the credit of having maximum number of World Heritage Sites (5) in India which includes Living Chola Temples and Mahabalipuram. With more than 34000 temples,( Tamil Nadu has some great temples like Meenakshi Amman Temple, Temple, Ranganathaswamy Temple.() This state is also known for Medical tourism and houses some of Asias largest hospital.()()Kanyakumari is the southernmost tip of India provides scenic view of sunset and sunshine over the Indian ocean. Hill stations like Yercaud, Kodaikanal, Ooty, Valparai, Yelagiri are widely visited. Water Falls and Wildlife sanctuaries are located across the state. Pichavaram the worlds second largest forest are located in the state.()UttarakhandFile:Valley of flowers uttaranchal full view.JPG|thumb|left|The of Flowers and Devi Parks are World Heritage Sites.Uttarakhand, the 27th state of the Republic of India, is called the abode of the Gods. It contains glaciers, snow-clad mountains, valley of flowers, skiing slopes and dense forests, and many shrines and places of pilgrimage. Char-dhams, the four most sacred and revered Hindu temples: Badrinath, Kedarnath, Gangotri and Yamunotri are nestled in the Himalayas. Haridwar which means Gateway to God is the only place on the plains.It holds the watershed for Gangetic River System spanning 300 km from Satluj in the west to Kali river in the east. Devi (25640 Ft) is the second highest peak in India after Kanchenjunga (28160 Ft). Dunagiri, Neelkanth, Chaukhamba, Panchachuli, Trisul are other peaks above 23000 Ft. It is considered the abode of Devtas, Yakashyas, Kinners, Fairies and Sages.() It boasts of some old hill-stations developed during British era like Mussoorie, Almora and Nainital.Uttar Pradeshthumb|center|700px|A panoramic view of the Fatehpur Sikri Palace, Uttar PradeshSituated in the northern part of India,border with the capital of India Delhi.Pradesh is the most popular tourist  destination in India. Uttar Pradesh is important with its wealth of historical monuments and religious fervour. Geographically, Uttar Pradesh is very diverse, with Himalayan foothills in the extreme north and the Plain in the centre. It is also home of Indias most visited site, the Mahal, and Hinduisms holiest city, Varanasi. The most populous state of the Indian Union also has a rich cultural heritage. Kathak one of the eight forms of classical dances, originated from Uttar Pradesh. Uttar Pradesh is at the heart of India,so popular with another name The Heartland of India.  of Uttar Pradesh like  cuisine, cuisine, cuisine are very famous in entire India and abroad.Uttar Pradesh has much to offer.Places of interest in include:* Varanasi-The origin of Hinduism and worlds one of the oldest city,City of temples,Most popular holy place of lord Shiva devotees,One of the finest Textiles Industry in the world.* Agra - Mahal and several others historical monuments and gardens.* Allahabad or Prayag -Mela-The place where Indian national river Ganges and Yamuna and Saraswati rivers meet.A mass Hindu pilgrimage in which Hindus gather at the Ganges river.Akbar forts,One of the most popular religious center of ancient and modern India for Hinduism.Pradeshs administrative and education capital.* Kanpur - Pradeshs commercial and Industrial hub,several historical places from Mughal, British era.* Lucknow-The capital of Pradesh,Several historical places Mughal, British and ancient India.Image:Adnanwiki.badaimambada1.JPG|thumb|right|Gateway to Imambara, Lucknow* Mathura-The birth place of Lord Krishna of Hinduism and Neminath of Jainism.File:Kusuma Sarovar Ghat.jpg|right|thumb|260px|Kusuma Sarovar bathing ghat, in the Goverdhan area, Vrindavan* Ayodhya-The birth place of Lord Rama of Hinduism .* Jhansi-Historical place,Rani Lakshmibais battlefield against British* Sarnath-Gautama Buddha first taught the Dharma, the Buddha as one of the four places of pilgrimage which his devout followers should visit.The birth place of Shreyansanath, the eleventh Jain Tirthankar of the Jainism.* Kushinagar- It is an important Buddhist pilgrimage site, where Buddha is believed to have attained Parinirvana after his death.* Sikri-Historical place for Mughal Empires  palaces and forts.* Meerut-The historical place of the Mutiny of 1857 or the War of Indian Independence.Indian Historical place from Mahabharata period of ancient India to Modern Indias one of the fastest growing city of Pradesh.* Division-The hub of worlds finest carpet Industries,and very popular tourist destination for its natural beauties and one of the fastest growing region of Pradesh.* Ghaziabad: Historical places from ancient India to modern India and Indias fastest growing Industrial city .* NOIDA and Noida:IT, Electronics and education hub of India.Indias biggest city with planned and highteck residential area.* Gorakhpur:  The city was home to Buddhist, Hindu, Muslim, Jain and Sikh saints.The  birthplace of Yogananda,great Hindu emperor Maurya.* Jaunpur:Historical city was founded by the of Delhi Shah Tughlaq and named in memory of his father, bin Tughluq as Sultanate.Mughals, Lodis and Islamic rulers Forts and ancient  history of India.* National Park -Dudhwa Tiger Reserve,Birds Sanctuary, the unique Frog Temple at Oyal ,Surat Bhawan Palace,Elephant Rides.* Rehar:Several major tourist attractions can be mentioned in the towns surroundings, like Corbett National Park about 24 km, Nainital about 69 kmPradesh is the historical heart land of India.Where each part of the state is attached with ancient history,civilization,religions and culture.West BengalFile:Victoria Memorial Kolkata panorama.jpg|thumb|Memorial in KolkataKolkata, one of the many cities in the state of Bengal has been nicknamed the City of Palaces. This comes from the numerous palatial mansions built all over the city. Unlike many north Indian cities, whose construction stresses minimalism, the layout of much of the architectural variety in Kolkata owes its origins to European styles and tastes imported by the British and, to a much lesser extent, the Portuguese and French. The buildings were designed and inspired by the tastes of the English gentleman around and the aspiring Bengali Babu (literally, a nouveau riche Bengali who aspired to cultivation of English etiquette, manners and custom, as such practices were favourable to monetary gains from the British). Today, many of these structures are in various stages of decay. Some of the major buildings of this period are well maintained and several buildings have been declared as heritage structures.From historical point of view, the story of West Bengal begins from Gour and Pandua situated close to the present district town of Malda. The twin medieval cities had been sacked at least once by changing powers in the 15th century. However, ruins from the period still remain, and several architectural specimens still retain the glory and shin of those times. The Hindu architecture of Bishnupur in terracotta and laterite sandstone are renowned world over.  Towards the British colonial period came the architecture of Murshidabad and Coochbehar.Historic monuments*The Mahal is one of Indias best-known sites and one of the best architectural achievements in India,located in Agra, Pradesh . It was built between 1631 and 1653 by Emperor Jahan in honor of his wife, Arjumand Banu, more popularly known as Mahal. The Taj Mahal serves as her tomb.*Sikri It was the first planned city of the Mughals and also the first one designed in Mughal architecture, an amalgamation of Indian architecture, Persian and Islamic architecture and was declared a UNESCO World Heritage Site in 1986.*Varanasi The ghats of one of the oldest city of the world.*The Temple is a 2000 year old temple dedicated to Buddha in Gaya, Bihar. It is a World Heritage Site.*The Nalanda is located in the Indian State of Bihar, was a Buddhist center of learning from 427 C.E to 1197 C.E partly under the Empire.(Altekar, Anant Sadashiv (1965). Education in Ancient India, Sixth, Varanasi: Nand Kishore & Bros.)(Really Old School, Garten, Jeffrey E. New York Times, December 9, 2006.) It has been called one of the first great universities in recorded history.(According to historical studies the University of Nalanda was established 450 C.E under the patronage of the Gupta emperors, notably Kumaragupta.( *The Temple in Thanjavur, Nadu built by the Cholas. The temple is one of Indias most prized architectural sites.*The temple is located in the town of Darasuram, near Kumbakonam, Tamil Nadu.*The Temple, along with the collection of other monuments in Mahabalipuram, Tamil Nadu have been declared as World Heritage Sites.*The Golden Temple is one of the most respected temples in India and the most sacred place for Sikhs. The Golden Temple is located in Amritsar, Punjab, India.*The Bah temple in Delhi, was completed in 1986 and serves as the Mother Temple of the Indian Subcontinent. It has won numerous architectural awards and been featured in hundreds of newspaper and magazine articles. (It is also known as the Temple.)*The Mahal in Jaipur also known as Palace of Winds.*The Taj Mahal Palace is an icon of Mumbai.*The Memorial in Kolkata, built during the British Raj.*The Terminus in Mumbai, built for Queen VictoriaFile:Victoria Terminus, Mumbai.jpg|thumb|center|550px|The Terminus in Mumbai is a train station built in Gothic architecture in honor of Victoria.Nature TourismIndia has geographical diversity, which resulted in varieties of nature tourism.* Water falls in Ghats including falls (highest in India).* Ghats* Stations* reserves* DesertsWildlife in IndiaFile:Panthera tigris tigris.jpg|thumb|right|Royal Bengal Tiger in Sundarbans. The worlds largest forest as well as a World Heritage Site.India is home to several well known large mammals including the Elephant, Tiger, Lion, Leopard and Rhinoceros, often engrained culturally and religiously often being associated with deities. Other well known large Indian mammals include ungulates such as the Asian Water buffalo, Asian Water buffalo, Nilgai, Gaur and several species of deer and antelope. Some members of the dog family such as the Wolf, Fox, Jackal and the Dhole or Wild Dogs are also widely distributed. It is also home to the Hyaena, Macaques, Langurs and Mongoose species.India also has a large variety of protected wildlife. The countrys protected forest consists of 75 parks of India and 421 sanctuaries, of which 19 fall under the purview of Tiger. Its climatic and geographic diversity makes it the home of over 350 mammals and 1200 bird species, many of which are unique to the subcontinent.Some well known national wildlife sanctuaries include Bharatpur, Corbett, Kanha, Kaziranga, Periyar, Ranthambore, Manas and Sariska.The worlds largest mangrove forest Sundarbans is located in southern Bengal. The National Park, National Park, Sundarbans and National Park are UNESCO World Heritage Site.Hill stationsFile:Khajjiar.jpg|thumb|A summer view of Khajjiar, a hill station in Pradesh.File:Ootyviewpanaromaracecourse003pan.jpg|thumb|A panaromic view of Ooty, one of the finest hill-stations in IndiaSeveral hill stations served as summer capitals of Indian provinces, states, or, in the case of Shimla, of India itself. Since Indian Independence, the role of these hill stations as summer capitals has largely ended, but many hill stations remain popular summer resorts. Most famous hill stations are:* Abu, Rajasthan* Range, Pradesh* Pachmarhi, Pradesh - It is also known as The Queen of Satpura.* Gulmarg, Srinagar and Ladakh in and Kashmir* Shillong in Meghalaya* Darjeeling in Bengal* Shimla, Kullu in Pradesh* Nainital in Uttarakhand* Gangtok in Sikkim* Mussoorie in Uttarakhand* Manali in Pradesh* Tawang in Pradesh* Mahabaleshwar in Maharashtra* Haflong in Assam* Araku, Pradesh* Munnar in Kerala* Ooty, Yercaud and Kodaikanal in Tamil NaduIn addition to the bustling hill stations and summer capitals of yore, there are several serene and peaceful nature retreats and places of interest to visit for a nature lover. These range from the stunning moonscapes of Leh and Ladhak, to small, exclusive nature retreats such as Dunagiri, Binsar, Mukteshwar in the Himalayas, to rolling vistas of Western Ghats to numerous private retreats in the rolling hills of Kerala.Beaches File:India Tourism Elephant.jpg|thumb|Elephants and camel rides are common on Indian beaches. Shown here is Island, part of the and Nicobar IslandsIndia offers a wide range of tropical beaches with silver/golden sand to coral beaches of Lakshadweep. States like Kerala and Goa have exploited the potential of beaches to the fullest. However, there are a lot many unexploited beaches in the states of Andhra Pradesh, Gujarat, Maharastra, Nadu and Karnataka. These states have very high potential to be develop them as future destinations for prospective tourists.Some of the famous tourist beaches are:* Beaches of Vizag, Pradesh* Beaches of Puri, Orissa* Beaches of Digha, Bengal* Beaches of Goa* Beach, Kerala* Beach, Chennai* City Beach, Puducherry* Beaches of Mahabalipuram* Beaches in Mumbai* Beaches of Diu* Beaches of Midnapore, West Bengal* Beaches of and Nicobar Islands* Beaches of Lakshadweep IslandsAdventure TourismFile:Manali India.jpg|thumb|Skiing in Manali, Pradesh* River rafting and kayaking in Himalayas* climbing in Himalayas* climbing in Pradesh* Skiing in Gulmarg or Auli* racing in Bhopal* Paragliding in MaharashtraSee also*of UNESCO World Heritage Sites in India*tourism in India*Luxury trains in IndiaReferencesFurther reading*Bradnock, Roma (2004). Footprint India Footprint Travel Guides, Bath, UK. ISBN 1-904777-00-7.*DeBruyn, Pippa; Bain, Keith; Venkatraman, Niloufer (2010). Frommers India.External links* Incredible India- Official Information website of Ministry of Tourism, India* Ministry of Tourism, India ja:
285360
The_Stainless_Steel_Rat
James Bolivar DiGriz, alias Slippery Jim and The Stainless Steel Rat, is the fictional hero of a series of humorous fiction novels written by Harrison.CharactersJames Bolivar diGrizThe Stainless Steel Rat is anti-hero James Bolivar diGriz, who goes by many aliases, including Slippery Jim and The Stainless Steel Rat. He is a futuristic con man, thief and all-round rascal. He is charming and quick-witted, a master of disguise and martial arts, an accomplished bank robber, an expert on breaking and entering, and (perhaps most usefully) a skilled liar. A master of self-rationalization, the Rat frequently justifies his crimes by arguing that he is providing society with entertainment; and besides which, he only steals from institutions which have insurance coverage. He displays a strong morality, albeit in a much more restricted sense than is traditional. (For example, he will happily steal, but deplores killing.)From the original publishers blurb:...We must be as stealthy as rats in the wainscoting of their society. It was easier in the old days, of course, and society had more rats when the rules were looser, just as old wooden buildings have more rats than concrete buildings. But there are rats in the building now as well. Now that society is all ferrocrete and stainless steel there are fewer gaps in the joints. It takes a very smart rat indeed to find these openings. Only a stainless steel rat can be at home in this environment...The character was introduced in Harrisons short story, The Stainless Steel Rat, which was first published in 1957 in Astounding magazine. The story introduces the Rat, who has just carried out a successful larceny operation, and subsequently details a complex bank robbery which the Rat pulls off with ease. However, he is outfoxed by the mysterious Special Corps &mdash; a crime-fighting organisation staffed with former criminals &mdash; and recruited by them in order to fight crime. Harrison used the story, with minor modifications, as the introduction to the series first full-length novel, also called The Stainless Steel Rat. Like other characters created by Harrison, the Rat is a speaker of Esperanto and advocates atheism.Angelina diGrizShe is a criminal mastermind much like the Rat, only less ethical and more willing to kill. As the Rats first case for the Special Corps, he tracks Angelina down and ends up falling in love with her. After her capture, she undergoes psycho surgery (not to be mistaken for surgery) to considerably lessen her homicidal tendencies and joins the Corps; during that time she begins a relationship with the Rat that ends with them marrying in the last trimester of her pregnancy. She later assists on many of the Rats adventures. While she is no longer a heartless killer, her suppressed homicidal tendencies occasionally come out, especially when she sees another woman in close proximity to her husband.James and Bolivar diGrizThey are the twin sons of the Rat and Angelina. The Rat missed the first six years of their life because of his adventures in time, but they share their fathers attitudes and many of his skills. They end up marrying the same woman, who falls in love with both of them and gets herself duplicated into two identical women sharing one mind.Harold Peters InskippHe is the director of the Special Corps and one of the most powerful men in the Galaxy. He recruits the Rat, but is frequently infuriated by his insubordinate attitude and tendency to go rogue and commit independent crimes for sheer enjoyment. Ironically, the Special Corps is composed almost entirely of former criminals&mdash;Inskipp himself was a legendary fugitive known as Inskipp the Uncatchable before becoming the Corps commander.Professor CoypuHe is a Special Corps boffin who had developed a Time Helix device permitting travel as well as a portal to alternate realities. He also has a great deal of general scientific knowledge. He sent a copy of his mind with the Rat on his excursion to the 20th century. Coypu himself is rarely described apart from having prominent buck teeth - a trait he shares with his namesake, the Coypu, or nutria.The BishopThe Bishop was a master criminal on Bit OHeaven, the Stainless Steel Rats home planet. He was a lot less physical in his capers than Jim, he focused a great deal on computer crime, but also undertook robberies, always leaving as his calling card a picture of the bishop chess piece. He retired from crime before Jim was born, and Jim only learnt of his existence from a fellow prisoner while briefly in jail.  Jim then contacted The Bishop by using his calling card in a robbery, however as a result The Bishop was forced out of retirement when he underestimated the Polices computer security systems after running a check on Jim himself. The Bishop eventually became Jims mentor and taught him a great deal about their trade, as well as a code of ethics. Eventually Jim and The Bishop had to leave Bit OHeaven and on their first off-planet adventure The Bishop was killed. As a parting gift he left Jim a note that he signed with his real name, although the name is not revealed to the reader.The KekkonshikiAlso known as The Gray Men, they are a human subculture who prefer domination to coexistence. Their expertise lies in using technology to manipulate sentient minds, and have manipulated both humans and aliens on a grand scale. Jim has experienced one of their techniques (in which a gray man agent seemingly severs his hands with an axe; this was an illusion). Jim has knowingly opposed them on two separate occasions (The Stainless Steel Rats Revenge & The Stainless Steel Rat Wants You) however during conversation it is revealed by Kome that prior to The Stainless Steel Rat Wants You Jim has in fact thwarted their plans twice already, making this their third encounter. The text can also be read to say that the second time he thwarted their plans was with the alien invasion so the third encounter also happened during The Stainless Steel Rat Wants You when Jim invaded their home planet. They live on a harsh, icy world; this existence forced them to eliminate all emotion from their culture. This society is also completely patriarchal, with women being treated as nothing more than property. (Incidentally Kekkonshiki is the romanization of the Japanese word for Marriage Ceremony .)BooksSynopses there have been twelve books in the Stainless Steel Rat series.; The Stainless Steel Rat (1961) : At the beginning of the first novel, the Stainless Steel Rat believes he has pulled off a successful bank job, but is out-conned into working for the government. In the Special Corps, the elite law-enforcement and spy agency led by the former greatest crook in the Galaxy, Harold P. Inskipp (a.k.a. Inskipp the Uncatchable), he joins the ranks of an organization that is composed mostly of ex-criminals like himself. In the novel, he has several adventures during which he believes he has escaped from the Corps, and meets his love interest, Angelina - also a criminal genius, but lacking in Jims relatively high moral codes and strictures against killing. She is attempting to have an illegal space battleship built on an otherwise peaceful planet. It transpires that Angelina was born unattractive and committed crimes to pay for her transformation into a beautiful woman; her psychological traumas are treated when Jim captures her, but she retains her allure and her criminal tendencies and joins in the Special Corps.:*Large sections of the story first appeared in magazine as two novelettes: The Stainless Steel Rat (1957) and The Misplaced Battleship (1960).  These were reworked into the opening chapters of the novel.(http://www.iol.ie/~carrollm/hh/n02-ssrintro.htm):*re-issued in paperback (1986): ISBN 0-441-77924-7; The Stainless Steel Rats Revenge (1970) : The Stainless Steel Rat gets married, but rapidly gets involved in something that so far has proven impossible in the galaxy - the planet Cliaand has successfully been invading other worlds. Jim is sent (in similar manner to the protagonist Mowry in the novel Wasp,) to infiltrate and investigate, and discovers the mysterious gray Men behind Cliaands success, encounters a world of feisty warrior women, and becomes father of twins (James and Bolivar).:*re-issued in paperback (1986): ISBN 0-441-77912-3; The Stainless Steel Rat Saves the World (1972) : A master criminal from the far future, He, is attempting to extinguish the Special Corps from its timeline. The Stainless Steel Rat travels to Earth, 1975, and then to Napoleonic France, to stop He from destroying the timeline - but discovers that his own actions might have brought He into being! Finally He is trapped in a time loop, saving the Corps.:*This story was first serialised in 1971 in If magazine in three parts.  Parts 2 and 3 were titled, respectively, The Cast Iron Rat and The Stainless Steel Rats Return.  (The latter should not be confused with the Return of... board game or ...Rat Returns 2010 novel).:*re-issued in paperback (1989): ISBN 0-441-77913-1: The Adventures of the Stainless Steel Rat (1978) anthologized the first three books:  ISBN 0-425-04378-9: The Stainless Steel Rat Omnibus (2008) anthologized the first three books:  ISBN 978-0-575-08171-0 (Gollancz); The Stainless Steel Rat Wants You (1978) : After freeing his family from various forms of incarceration, the Stainless Steel Rat saves the all-human galaxy from invading aliens. At this point the twins are adults. Additionally, two more Corps are revealed to exist - the Morality Corps whose main concern is that all human actions abide by their code of morality, and the Time Corps, who patrol time itself to prevent any unauthorised tampering with the flow of time.  Both new corps outrank the Special Corps, and Inskipp (and Jim) is forced to work around them, rather than with them.:*re-issued in paperback (1985): ISBN 0-553-27611-5; The Stainless Steel Rat for President (1982) : The Stainless Steel Rat and Angelina enjoy a belated honeymoon on a planet run by a dictator who rigs elections to get into office, so they set the Rat up as a candidate instead. Very much a satire on republic politics and a parody of adventures set in America.:*re-issued in paperback (1987): ISBN 0-553-27612-3; A Stainless Steel Rat Is Born (1985) : A novel chronicling the beginning of the Stainless Steel Rats career. He intentionally gets caught trying to rob a bank so that he will go to jail where he can learn from the masters of crime, only to realize (too late) that the true masters would never get caught.:*paperback (1986): ISBN 0-553-27942-4; The Stainless Steel Rat Gets Drafted (1987) : The Stainless Steel Rat, early in his career, hunts the man who killed his mentor, but in the process must save a pacifist planet from an imminent attack.:*original hardback: ISBN 0-553-05220-9:*re-issued in paperback (1991): ISBN 0-553-27307-8; The Golden Years of the Stainless Steel Rat (1993) :  This is an original short story which finds The Stainless Steel Rat in Terminal Penitentiary, a prison where over-the-hill crooks are sent.  Published in Stainless Steel Visions by Harry Harrison (Tor 0-312-85245-2), a collection of 12 reprinted stories, one original.; The Stainless Steel Rat Sings the Blues (1994) : The Stainless Steel Rat (in the same earlier timeline as Is Born and Gets Drafted) goes to a prison colony planet to retrieve an alien artifact, which he must find in thirty days or the slow-acting poison he was administered will take its effect.:*original hardback: ISBN 0-553-09612-5:*paperback (1995): ISBN 0-553-56939-2; The Stainless Steel Rat Goes to Hell (1996) : In the later timeline (to which the stories have henceforth returned), the Stainless Steel Rat searches for his wife, who is abducted by a con man who preys on religious believers, swindling them out of their money and then enslaving them in his mining operation.:*original hardback: ISBN 0-312-86063-3:*paperback (1998): ISBN 0-8125-5107-9; The Stainless Steel Rat Joins the Circus (1999) : The Stainless Steel Rat is hired by a businessman to investigate thefts; the clues lead the Rat to suspect a roaming circus, which he infiltrates.:*original hardback: ISBN 0-312-86934-7:*paperback (2000): ISBN 0-8125-7535-0; The Stainless Steel Rat Returns (2010) : James Bolivar Slippery Jim DiGriz, Special Corps agent, master con man, interstellar criminal (retired), is living high on the hog on the planet of Moolaplenty when a long-lost cousin and a shipful of swine arrive to drain his bank account and send him and his lovely wife, Angelina, wandering the stars on the wildest journey since Gullivers Travels.:*original hardback: ISBN 0-765-32441-5Chronological orderThe book series is written only in a semichronological order; it breaks the continuity during part of the series to focus on the Rats early career, then returns to modern-day. Here, then, is a list of the books in the order they take place, rather than the order they were written.# A Stainless Steel Rat Is Born# The Stainless Steel Rat Gets Drafted# The Stainless Steel Rat Sings the Blues# The Stainless Steel Rat# The Stainless Steel Rats Revenge# The Stainless Steel Rat Saves the World# The Stainless Steel Rat Wants You# The Stainless Steel Rat for President# The Stainless Steel Rat Goes to Hell# The Stainless Steel Rat Joins the Circus# The Golden Years of the Stainless Steel RatBased on information in The Stainless Steel Rat Saves the World it is possible to work out when the timeline is set:  James is sent 32598 years into the past to 1975, making events happen in and around 34573 - although Professor Coypu also mentions that they are now using a different calendar to the calendar.  Specifics of the new calendar are never mentioned.Spin-offsComicsImage:stainless steel rat prog171 carlos ezquerra.jpg|thumb|250px|The Stainless Steel Rat Saves The World - Cover to 2000 AD Prog #171 - artwork by EzquerraThe Stainless Steel Rat, The Stainless Steel Rat Saves the World and The Stainless Steel Rat for President were adapted into  a comic strip form in early issues of 2000 AD, written by Gosnell and drawn by Ezquerra. Ezquerra drew Jim with an appearance modelled on the actor Coburn. They appeared in the following issues of 2000AD;* The Stainless Steel Rat, 12 episodes, 2000 AD progs 140-151 (Nov. 1979 to Feb. 1980).* The Stainless Steel Rat Saves the World, 12 episodes, 2000 AD progs 166-177 (June to Sep. 1980).* The Stainless Steel Rat for President, 12 episodes, 2000 AD progs 393-404 (Nov. 1984 to Feb. 1985).(2000AD Index)The first appearance of The Stainless Steel Rat in prog 140 was supposed to be preceded with a brief panel of explanation of who Jim was, however an editorial error meant that the panel actually appeared at the end of the first episode, not the beginning.  This prompted a letter to be printed in 2000 AD from Harry Harrison himself pointing out the error.All three stories were collected in a trade paperback in July 2010 (ISBN 1906735514).BooksChoose your own adventureHarrison also produced a parody of the Your Own Adventure books, You Can Be The  Stainless Steel Rat (ISBN 0-441-94978-9):The readers decisions will determine whether he or she can find Prof. Geisteskrank on the planet Skraldespand and bring him back before he activates a lethal new weapon.Despite the above description, the player cannot fail, regardless of his choices (even though it is possible to get caught in an inescapable loop at one point). It should also be noted that the name of Prof. Geisteskrank is German for insane, and name of the planet Skraldespand is Danish for trashcan.CameosIn the tribute anthology Friends, Harrison wrote a story, The Fourth Law of Robotics, which featured the Stainless Steel Rat in the setting of Asimovs Robot books.In Kings novel Dark Tower III: The Waste Lands, which contains a large number of references to other works, Eddie Dean spots a robot that he says looks like a stainless steel rat.In Transformers: Wars, Rat-Trap makes a quip about being a stainless steel rat.In a story published in Marvel UKs Blakes 7 Monthly, Vila attempts to steal a valuable item, only to find that he has been beaten to it by Slippery Jim, who leaves a note of consolation at the scene.Doctor Two-Brains in the PBS Kids series WordGirl, has a mouse brain as well as a human brain, which makes him crave cheese and fear cats. He designed a stainless steel mouse suit that enables him to temporarily become invincible. Temporarily, because he left the owners manual easily accessible to WordGirls sidekick, Captain Huggy Face.Board gameA game inspired by the Stainless Steel Rat series was published by SPI in their magazine Ares in the late 1970s. It involved the Rat infiltrating a station under hostile control.In popular cultureThe class ring, commonly referred to as The Brass Rat, when cast in Celestrium (also known as jewelers steel) is often referred to as The Stainless Steel Rat in reference to The Stainless Steel Rat series.The Chinese activist Di, writing under the screen name Stainless Steel Rat (), became a high-profile symbol for democracy and free speech in China since her detention in November 2002. Her screen name is often translated as Stainless Steel Mouse.ReceptionGalaxy reviewer Floyd C. Gale received the first novel favorably, saying though pure entertainment, it underlines SFs role in providing speculative thought about potential problems.(Galaxys 5 Star Shelf, Science Fiction, June 1962, p.194)ReferencesExternal links*Stainless Steel Rat Series page on Official website**Series listing at SciFanSzczur
286774
Elite_(video_game)
Elite is a seminal space trading game, originally published by Acornsoft in 1984 for the Micro and Electron computers.  The games title derives from one of the players goals of raising their combat rating to the exalted heights of Elite.  It was written and developed by Braben and Ian Bell, who had met while they were both undergraduates at College, Cambridge.  Non-Acorn versions of the game were published by Firebird, Imagineer and Technology.Elite was one of the first computer games to use wire-frame 3D graphics with line removal.  Another novelty was the inclusion of The Dark Wheel, a novella by Holdstock which influenced new players with insight into the moral and legal codes to which they might aspire.Elites open-ended game model, advanced game engine and revolutionary 3D graphics ensured that it was ported to virtually every contemporary computer system, and earned it a place as a classic and a genre maker in gaming history.() Elite was a hugely influential game, serving as a model for more recent games such as Rogue, Online, Freelancer, Jumpgate, The Quest for Earth, Commander: Privateer, the Escape Velocity series and the X series of space trading games. Influences, development and launch According to Braben and Bell, Elite was inspired by a range of sources. Much of the games content is derived from the Traveller RPG, including the default commander name of Jameson.() The developers also cite 2001: A Space Odyssey, Wars, Guide to the Galaxy and the original Battlestar Galactica as influences. Braben also cites the works of Niven, Pournelle, C. Clarke, L. Forward, Asimov and Scott Card as influences.(Rusell DeMaria, Johnny L. Wilson, High Score!: the illustrated history of electronic games, p. 340-341)When the developers met at College, Cambridge, Bell was already working on a game for Acornsoft called Freefall. Braben had started writing a game called Fighter, but had not yet completed it. The two projects were sufficiently similar that Braben and Bell compared notes, and after seeing Raiders on the 800 they decided to collaborate to produce what eventually became Elite. The project was initially offered to EMI, with whom Braben already had a contract, but was rejected. The developers went to Acornsoft instead; although a project such as Elite was very different from the companys usual fare, Acornsofts managing director David Johnson-Davies agreed to publish it.The game took two years to write and was written in code, allowing much tighter control of memory usage than using a compiler, as their computer had only about 14 kilobytes of memory.(UK Channel 5 television program Brits Who Made The Modern World, 7.30-8.00 pm 22 August 2008) Much care was given to maximum compactness of code. The last part added was a 3D radar display fitted into the last few unused bytes in their computer.(Elite received very good reviews on its launch and sales of the Micro version were exceptional, eventually reaching 150,000 sold copies, a respectable number compared to the number of BBC micros that were sold, though far from the same as some sources claim.(() The games popularity became a national phenomenon in the UK, with reports airing on Channel 4 and elsewhere.( The great commercial success of the BBC Micro version prompted a bidding war for the rights to publish Elite in other formats, with Telecoms software arm, Telecomsoft, eventually winning the rights.( It was eventually ported to virtually every contemporary home computer system and even to the NES console. Bell estimates that approximately 600,000 copies were eventually sold for all platforms combined.()In 1999/2000, a dispute occurred between Ian Bell and David Braben regarding the formers decision to make available all versions of the original Elite. The dispute has now ended; the various versions are available on Bells site. The two Frontier games are available for download from Brabens Elite Club website. Gameplay Elite has often been treated as the yardstick by which subsequent space trading games have been measured. However, it was not the first such game; the genre-defining Trader had been written as long ago as 1974. The space trading genre combines space-borne combat with a buy low, sell high freight transport system and the ability to use the profits to purchase ship upgrades.The player, initially controlling the character Commander Jameson, starts at Lave Station with 100 credits and a lightly armed trading ship, a Cobra Mark III. Most of the ships that the player encounters are similarly named after snakes, or other reptiles. Credits can be accumulated through a number of means. These include piracy, trade, military missions, bounty hunting and  mining. The money generated by these enterprises allows players to upgrade their ships with such enhancements as better weapons, shields, increased cargo capacity, an automated docking system, and more.Instead of complex systems, stars have single planets separated by interstellar distances and each planet has one station in its orbit. Travel between planets is constrained to those within range of the ships limited fuel capacity (7 years) and fuel can be replenished after docking with a space station in orbit around a planet which is a challenging task without a docking computer, as it requires matching the ships rotation to that of the station. Players can upgrade their equipment with a fuel scoop, which allows raw fuel to be skimmed from the surface of starsbeing described in the manual as a dangerous and difficult activity, but in reality a simple processand collecting free-floating cargo canisters and escape capsules liberated after the destruction of other ships. While making a hyperspace jump Thargoid (antagonist race) invasion ships may trap the player, forcing his ship into witch-space to do battle.An extremely expensive one-shot galactic hyperspace upgrade permits travel between the eight galaxies of the game universe. There is little practical difference between the different galaxies. However in some versions it is necessary to travel to at least the second galaxy in order to access the missions.The game includes several optional missions for the Galactic Navy. One requires tracking down and destroying a stolen experimental ship; the other involves transporting classified information on the Thargoids home planet, with Thargoid invasion ships doing their best to see that you do not succeed. Technical innovations The Elite universe contains eight galaxies, each galaxy containing 256 planets to explore.  Due to the limited capabilities of 8-bit computers, these worlds are procedurally generated. A single seed number is run through a fixed algorithm the appropriate number of times and creates a sequence of numbers determining each planets complete composition (position in the galaxy, prices of commodities, and even name and local details text strings are chosen numerically from a table and assembled to produce unique descriptions for each planet). This means that no extra memory is needed to store the characteristics of each planet, yet each is unique and has fixed properties. Each galaxy is also procedurally generated from the first.However, the use of procedural generation created a few problems. There are a number of poorly located systems that can be reached only by galactic hyperspace these are more than 7 light years from their nearest neighbour, thus trapping the traveller. Braben and Bell also checked that none of the system names were profane - removing an entire galaxy after finding a planet named Arse.(Gamespot Q&A Interview) Conversions Originally there were 3 versions of Elite released:  Acorn Electron Tape, BBC B Tape and BBC B Disk.  The BBC version used a split screen to show four colours; the upper two thirds of the screen were displayed in Mode 4 while the lower part was in Mode 5. The Electron version ran entirely in Mode 4, and therefore displayed only black and white.  The Electrons limitations meant several game features were cut including Thargoids and suns. Neither the BBC nor the Electron tape versions featured missions. The BBC B Disk version, referred to as Classic Elite, would load a new set of ships after every hyperspace jump or space station launch, meaning a larger number of ships were available. The disc version was enhanced a couple of years after release to take advantage of the BBC Micro Model Bs successors including the BBC Micro Model B+, Master 128 computers or an optional second processor unit or sideways RAM, if they were fitted. In this case, the game used Modes 1 and 2 to make more colours available.Elite was converted to a wide range of home computer platforms, including the Amiga, ST, II, CPC, 64, Spectrum, MSX, Einstein and PC compatible. The only console version was released in 1991 for the Entertainment System. Some of the versions had slightly altered gameplay or other characteristics, such as the number of missions offered to the player.The ZX Spectrum version was voted number 7 in the Sinclair Readers Top 100 Games of All Time.()The CPC conversion (itself a port of the ZX version) has fewer ships than other platforms, lacking the Anaconda and Transport, along with some minor differences in missions and titles.The 64 conversion introduced Trumbles (creatures based on the tribbles in Trek: The Original Series). Also, when the docking computer is activated in the Commodore 64 version and some other versions, a musical rendition of Blue Danube Waltz is played, which is a nod to a space docking sequence in Kubricks 1968 film 2001: A Space Odyssey. This music was arranged by David Dunn.The Archimedes version of Elite (written by Warren Burch & Clive Gringras and regarded by some as the best conversion of the original game) added intelligent opponents who engage in their own private battles and police who take an active interest in protecting the law. As well as such gameplay enhancements, the version also exploited the more modern hardware by using mesh graphics in place of the wire-frames. The game world no longer seems to be centered around the player; freighter fleets with escorts go about their own business, pirate formations patrol lawless systems looking for cargo to loot and mining ships can often be found breaking up asteroids for their mineral content. Unlike the mythical Generation Ships of the original, rare occurrences of other non-pirate entities mentioned in the manual really can be found in the Archimedes version: geometric formations of space beacons; hermits living among the asteroids; abandoned ships towed by police (although Dredgers and Generation Ships are confirmed not to exist in Archimedes Elite).() The Archimedes version of Elite was originally written to be a space trading game called Trojan - however the obvious similarities eventually meant that to avoid a potential lawsuit Trojan had to become an official Elite conversion.(Acorn User, September 1995)Many attempts to develop clones of Elite have been made, but most have been abandoned before completion or have otherwise failed to come to fruition. The source Oolite is a notable exception. Elite: The New Kind, was developed by Christian Pinder by reverse-engineering the original BBC Micro version of Elite, but was withdrawn from the main distribution at David Brabens request.()In 2004, a commercial product called Elite Starfighter was released in Germany. Starfighter is an Elite clone that features modern graphics. Since it duplicates the original gameplay, it has been criticized as being somewhat dull by todays standards, but is recommended to Elite enthusiasts who might consider taking a look.() Packaging and marketing Acornsoft set in motion a large-scale publicity campaign and commissioned a presentational package for the game that was far more elaborate than normal.  Acornsoft packaged Elite in a box larger than their usual releases, complete with a novella by Holdstock called The Dark Wheel, Space Traders Flight Training Manual, function key strip, reference card and a ship identification poster.The Dark Wheel was the first novella to be included for distribution with a computer game.() The story tells of a young pilot, Alex Ryder, whose father Jason is killed when their merchant ship is attacked by pirates. In trying to understand and avenge his fathers death, Alex encounters the basics of the Elite universe - including combat, hyperdrive and hyperspace, the Thargoid - and discovers the truth about his father and his combat rank. He also learns who the Dark Wheel are and what it takes to join their ranks.(Ian Bells Elite site including the full text of The Dark Wheel) The original Acornsoft version promised on its back cover that a sequel to the novella is planned for publication in 1985, but no direct sequel was ever written. A second novella, Imprint by Andy Redman, was included with the PC release of Elite Plus, but despite being set in the same universe it is in no way connected to the original story.Marketing activities included a launch party at the Park theme park (holding such an event for a computer game was almost unheard of at the time) and a competition to be among the first to achieve the status of Elite.() Legacy Elite is credited as being the breakthrough title that defined the modern space flight simulation genre,()()(()( as well as being influential upon gaming as a whole.((()() It was named one of the sixteen most influential games in history at Telespiele, a German technology and games trade show,() and has been credited as being the first truly open-ended game()() and opening the door for future online worlds such as Life, of Warcraft( and Online.() Elite is one of the most popularly requested games to be remade,() with some arguing that it is still the best example of the genre to date, with more recent titlesincluding its sequelnot rising up to the same level.(()()()Elite was named #12 on IGNs 2000 Top 25 PC Games of All Time list,() the #3 most influential video game ever by the Times Online in 2007,() #6 Greatest Game by Stuff magazine in 2008,() #1 Top Retro Game by Gamer in 2004,() and #1 best game of the 1980s by Generation Magazine in 2008.( The game was posthumously awarded 10/10 by the multi-format magazine Edgetogether with only 2 other games and is being exhibited at such places as the Science Museum in the Game On exhibition organized and toured by the Art Gallery.() In 1984 Elite received the Joystick Award for Best Original Game.() In 1985 the game was named Best Game Overall for that year by readers of Crash magazine,() and Game of the Year by Gamer.() Elites sequel, Elite II, was named #77 on Zones 101 Best PC Games Ever list in 2007.() Elite is listed in Game On! From Pong to Oblivion: The 50 Greatest Video games of All Time (ISBN 0755315707) by authors Simon Byron, Ste Curran and David McCarthy.() In his review of the game for Beebug Magazine in 1984, reviewer David Fell called Elite the best game ever for the BBC Micro.()The game was a significant source of inspiration for later games in its genre.()()()() In interviews, the senior producers of Games have cited Elite as one of the inspirations for their acclaimed MMORPG, Online.() Thorolfur Beck in particular has said that Elite was the game that impacted him most on the Commodore 64, and that it was the prime motivator behind Eve Online.() The developers of Evolution, 3000AD, Infinity: The Quest for Earth, Hard Truck: Apocalyptic Wars and Flatspace have likewise all credited Elite as a source of inspiration.(()()()() Similar praise has been bestowed elsewhere in the media over the years.()()()()() Sequels A pseudo-sequel, Elite Plus, was released for DOS in 1991. Whereas the original Elite for the PC used CGA graphics, Elite Plus  was upgraded to take advantage of EGA, VGA and MCGA. It was coded entirely in language by Sawyer, who later wrote Tycoon.( Section 3.18 and 3.19.)  Elite Plus had a ninth galaxy and a new title, Archangel, for the player to earn. Archangel is reached by undertaking a special mission to destroy a space station in a system invaded by the Thargoids. The players reward for completing the mission is to receive the title Archangel and obtain a device that is capable of emulating anti-ECM broadcasts. The ninth galaxy can only be reached by hyperspacing into Witch Space.  Elite Plus was published by Microplay.A variant of the original BBC Micro Elite with many extra features, originally titled Elite III but now known as Elite A to minimize confusion, was created by Angus Duggan in the late 1980s by disassembling and modifying the 6502 code from the commercial release.  It includes many more ship types, more ship types flyable by the player (who begins in the less capable Adder), cargo delivery missions, some extra equipment items and numerous gameplay improvements.  Elite A was released publicly in 1997. Like the original game, it can be downloaded free from Ian Bells web site and played under emulation.Two official true sequels were created: Elite II (1993) and First Encounters (1995), both produced by Brabens company Developments. Bell had limited involvement in the first sequel, and was not involved in the production of the second. Both games were a considerable advance on the original Elite, with filled 3D graphics, missions and a complex economy. This time, the player was not confined to orbit but could land on and explore or mine planets. The number of flyable ships was greatly increased, and a new political backstory was introduced enabling the player to gain ranks in competing interstellar empires. The games appeared on the Amiga, ST and PC.Both games were, however, significantly flawed in a number of respects. Both games had many bugs, First Encounters in particular, due apparently to being published in an incomplete state, and First Encounters had to be extensively patched; this became the subject of a three-year lawsuit between the publisher  GameTek  and Braben.The sequels employed a realistic flight model based on mechanics rather than the original arcade-style engine. While this was more realistic, many players also found it frustratingly difficult, particularly in combat. Most space trading games since Elite have stuck to an arcade-style flight model, in which the ships behave as though they are flying in an atmosphere.A new sequel, 4,() has been in a lengthy development phase since 1998,() and is currently eight years overdue from its original scheduled release date.()  It is not currently scheduled for release, with Braben stating that full production will commence after the release of The Outsider.() See also * of computer and video games* Oolite References  External links * The Elite Home Page by Ian Bell* Frontiers Elite Website* **Gamasutras The History of Elite: Space, The Endless Frontier by Bill Loguidice and Matt Barton*Masters of their universe - an excerpt from Backroom Boys: The Secret Return Of The British Boffin, by Francis Spufford.* GDC presentation Postmortem of Elite by Braben(computerspil)(Computerspiel)(videojuego)(jeu vido)(videogioco)(computerspel)ru:Elitefi:Elite(datorspel)
288141
Superior,_Wisconsin
 250px|right|thumb|The Fairlawn Mansion, a 42 room mansion built in 1890 by Superiors three-time mayor Martin Pattison, is now a museumSuperior is a city in and the seat of Douglas County, Wisconsin, States. The population was 26,960  at the 2010 census. Located at the junction of U.S. Highways 2 and 53, it is north of and adjacent to both the Village of Superior and the Town of Superior.Superior is at the western end of Superior in northwestern Wisconsin.  Bordered by Saint Louis Bay, Superior Bay, and Allouez Bay, it is also framed by two rivers: the Nemadji and the Saint Louis.  Superior, and the neighboring city across the bay, Minnesota, form a single metropolitan area called the Ports and share a harbor that is one of the most important ports on the Lakes. Both cities have ships (SS William A Irvin in Duluth and  in Superior) devoted to the local nautical heritage. Superior was the last port of call for the Fitzgerald before its famous 1975 sinking.HistorySuperior and Douglas Countys early history is a story of the Native American. The first-known inhabitants of what is now Douglas County were Mound Builders. These people appeared on the shores of Superior sometime after the latest glacier receded. They mined copper in the Minong Range and at Manitou Falls on the Black River. They pounded this metal into weapons, implements, and ornaments, which were later found buried in mounds with their dead. Their civilization was eventually overrun by other tribes, mainly of Muskhogean and Iroquois stock, and disappeared as a distinct culture in late prehistoric American times.About the time of the European arrival, the DuluthSuperior region transitioned from being predominately Dakota to being predominately Ojibwa/Chippewa. In the Ojibwa oral history, Spirit Island in the Louis River was their Sixth Stopping Place where the northern and southern divisions of Ojibwa nation came together in their westward migration. The City of Superior in the language is called Gete-oodena, meaning Old Town as the Superior Chippewa population center of the Ojibwa later moved east toward Island, the Seventh Stopping Place, and the Chippewa towards Minnesota (thus calling both Brainerd and Wisconsin as Oshki-oodena (New Town) in the Ojibwe language).The first-known Europeans to visit the area were the French. In 1618, Brl, a voyager for Champlain, coasted along the south shore of Superior where he met the Ojibwa.  Upon returning to Quebec, he carried back some copper specimens and a glowing account of the region.  In 1632, Champlains map appeared showing Lac Superior de Tracy as Superior and the lower end shore as Fond du Lac. Soon after, fur trading companies established settlements, while missionaries came bringing with them the first touches of European civilization.For more than a century, the Bay Company, followed by the Northwestern Fur Company in 1787 and later, the Jacob Astor Fur Company, maintained trading posts with the Native Americans. With the coming of settlement, however, the voyager and fur trader faded into the misty twilight of a romantic and historic past. Douglas County lies on one of the major water highways used by early travelers and voyagers of inland America. This water trail, the Bois BruleSt. Croix River Portage Trail, was the most convenient connecting link between Superior and the River. The Bois Brule and St. Croix River systems were only separated by a short portage over the Divide near Solon Springs, Wisconsin. The northward traveler used this water trail to take him to Lake Superior, while the downstream traveler could use it to go southwest to the of Mexico, unhindered by portages, by using the St. Croix and Mississippi Rivers. This waterway was also an important route in the Wisconsin fur trade, particularly when the French War with the Fox Indians closed the more southern routes. Spurred by the prospect of lucrative shipping and iron ore industry, businessmen from Chicago and St. Paul laid claim to the site which became the city of Superior, and plans began for the plotting of a great city The first log cabin in Superior was erected in September 1853 on the banks of the Nemadji River, paralleling the breaking of ground for the locks and ship canal at Sault Ste. Marie, Michigan. This brought the dawning of a new age for the infant community, which was incorporated as a city on September 6, 1854.(Superior, WI  Official Website  History of Superior) Immediately there was eagerness for a railroad from Superior to the Pacific Coast. This was later realized with construction of the Northern Pacific, and the dream of a rail and water highway from coast to coast was born. In 1889, the booming settlement at the Head of the Lakes would soon be named the county seat for Wisconsins 4th largest county. Between 1890 and 1920, the city was heavily settled by migrants from the eastern United States as well as immigrants from over 15 countries, including England, Scotland, Ireland, Norway, Sweden, Finland, Belgium, Germany, Austria, Hungary, and Croatia. Named for Senator A. Douglas of Illinois, famed rival of Lincoln, Douglas County became the site where its largest city and county seat, Superior, would be located, and money was pumped into the citys shipping and railway industries.(Superior-Douglas County Chamber of Commerce)GeographyAccording to the States Census Bureau, the city has a total area of 55.4 square miles (143.6 km), of which, 36.9 square miles (95.7 km) is land and 18.5 square miles (47.9 km) (33.36%) is water.(wikimapia link))  Most of Superior is level with a gradual slope toward Lake Superior.There are several parks in the city, including the second largest municipal forest in the United States, located in the citys Billings Park neighborhood.  State Park is a short distance south of the city, and contains Manitou Falls, the highest waterfall in the state at .DemographicsAs of the census of 2000, there were 27,368 people, 11,609 households, and 6,698 families residing in the city. The density was 740.9 people per square mile (286.1/km). There were 12,196 housing units at an average density of 330.2 per square mile (127.5/km). The racial makeup of the city was 94.26% White, 0.68% Black or African American, 2.23% Native American, 0.84% Asian, 0.04% Pacific Islander, 0.26% from other races, and 1.69% from two or more races. 0.83% of the population were Hispanic or Latino of any race. 15.8% were of German, 13.6% Norwegian, 10.9% Swedish, 9.3% Irish, 7.2% Polish, 6.9% Finnish and 5.3% American ancestry according to 2000.There were 11,609 households out of which 27.9% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 41.3% were married couples living together, 12.3% had a female householder with no husband present, and 42.3% were non-families. 34.2% of all households were made up of individuals and 13.9% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.26 and the average family size was 2.91.The citys median household income was $31,921, and the median family income was $41,093. Males had a median income of $33,712 versus $22,073 for females. The capita income for the city was $17,253. 13.4% of the population and 9.6% of families were below the line. 16.0% of those under the age of 18 and 7.8% of those 65 and older were living below the poverty line. In the city, the population was spread out with 22.7% under the age of 18, 12.9% from 18 to 24, 27.9% from 25 to 44, 21.6% from 45 to 64, and 15.0% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 36 years. For every 100 females there were 92.4 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 88.8 males.EconomyCounty Courthouse.Superior is the largest municipality in Douglas County, which has a total population of 43,708.( It is situated in a metropolitan area that includes the 86,918 residents of Minnesota, just across Saint Louis Bay.The transportation industry accounts for more than 1,000 jobs. The DuluthSuperior port, the largest in the Lakes, welcomes both domestic and foreign vessels. Bulk solids (such as grain) constitute much of the tonnage handled by the port, and the silos of such port facilities are visible on the Superior waterfront. In 2004, the ports busiest year since 1979, more than 41.4 million metric tons were shipped out of the port. Northern Railroad has an operations hub in Superior.Murphy Oil USA operates an extensive refinery in Superior, providing hundreds of jobs to the community. The refinery is located along an important pipeline connecting Western Canada and the Midwest.Growing area manufacturers include FenTech, Inc., which manufactures vinyl doors and windows; Charter Films, a producer of plastic films; Genesis Attachments, manufacturer of shears and grapples; Amsoil, a producer of synthetic motor oil and lubricants; and Crane Song Ltd., a manufacturer of discrete Class A electronics for recording studios.* Employment by sector (2002), in numbers of employees: ** Construction/mining, 1,130** Manufacturing, 1,190** Transportation/public utilities, 2,750 ** Wholesale trade, 1,210** Retail trade, 4,020** Finance, insurance, real estate, 500** Service, 5,350** Government, 3,440 EducationImage:UW-Superior-005-050507.jpg|250px|thumb|right|Main entrance of the of WisconsinSuperior, with Campus Welcome Center in foreground.File:2009-0617-Superior-CarnegieLibrary1.jpg|thumb|250px|Superior has the first and last library built in Wisconsin.  The first, pictured, was built in 1901 and served as the main library until 1991.Superior is served by the School District, which has one high school, one middle school, and six elementary schools with a total enrollment of over 5,000 students. Superior High School enrolls more than 1,500 students. Its mascot is the Spartan. Over 1,400 students are also enrolled in School Districts schools. Parochial schools include the  Catholic Cathedral School, the Protestant-based Maranatha Academy and Twin Ports Baptist School.(Visitor Information)The of WisconsinSuperior (UWS) is a public liberal arts college. Originally opened as a state Normal School (teachers college), UWS became part of the of Wisconsin System in 1971.(http://www.uwsuper.edu/aboutuwsuperior/history/)Indianhead Technical College (WITC) offers skill development and technical education, with an enrollment of over 2,200.  The Superior Public Library is located in the heart of downtown Superior. It offers users the opportunity to learn more about area history and displays an extensive collection of art.ReligionSuperior is the see of the Catholic Diocese of Superior. The of Christ the King in Superior is the mother church of the diocese. Saint Francis Xavier Catholic Church, located in the East End of Superior, is an architectural jewel. Christ Evangelical Lutheran Church is the only congregation of the Lutheran Church Missouri Synod located in Superior. It recently moved from its original location on Belknap Street to a new campus on North 28th Street. Pilgrim Lutheran Church is located along Belknap Street near the of WisconsinSuperior. Many small congregational churches dot the citys neighborhoods, representing most major denominations.Notable residents* Arnovich, MLB All Star outfielder* Bancroft, MLB player and manager, member of the Baseball Hall of Fame* L. Bazelon, Judge of the U.S. Court of Appeals* Benson, League Baseball player* Bong, of Honor recipient* Bottolfsen, Governor of Idaho* Bubley, photographer* Cashion, MLB player* Clemens, Army general* Ennis, MLB player* R. Fitzpatrick. editorial cartoonist* Grant, head coach of the Vikings from 19671983; 1985* M. Hagen, Wisconsin State Assembly* H. Hammond, diplomat and New Jersey politician* Johnson, artist, co-founder of the Museum of Art* Leemans, NFL player, member of the Football Hall of Fame* L. Lenroot, U.S. Representative, U.S. Senator, and Judge of the U.S. Court of Customs and Patents Appeals* J. MacDonald, Michigan State Senator* Mathison, NFL player* Mungavin, professional football player* Nevers, member of both College and Pro Football Halls of Fame* Nixon, actress* OBrien, special teams coordinator of the England Patriots* Olson, football player* Francis Schinner, Bishop of the Catholic Diocese of Superior and Catholic Diocese of Spokane* B. Schwellenbach, U.S. Secretary of Labor* Doug Sutherland, NFL player* Taylor, NFL player* David Tipton, NFL player* Jeffrey Williams, NASA astronaut* MacQuarrie, Journalist and Outdoors writer.See also* I. Bong Memorial Bridge* U.S. Highway 2* U.S. Highway 53* Interstate Highway 535  John Blatnik Bridge* Wisconsin Highway 35  Tower Avenue* Highway 105* PipelineExternal links* City of Superior, Wisconsin  Official Website* School District of Superior website* SuperiorDouglas County Chamber of Commerce websiteReferences(Wisconsin)(Wisconsin)(Wisconsin)(Wisconsin)(Wisconsin)Wisconsin(Wisconsin)()(Wisconsin)Wisconsin()(Wisconsin)()
289854
List_of_Canadian_poets
__NOTOC__A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y ZThis is a list of Canadian poets. Years link to corresponding year in poetry articles. A *Abley (born 1955), Canadian poet, journalist, editor and non-fiction writer.*Acorn (19231986), poet, writer, and playwright*Adamson, novelist, poet, short-story writer (a woman)*Agnant (born 1953), Haitian native living in Canada since 1970; novelist, poet and writer of childrens books*Akiwenzie-Damm (born 1965), Native American writer and poet, founder (in 1993) of Press, specializing in indigenous writers*Akpata (2003), writer. poet, musician, politician*Alarie (born 1945), writer, poet and teacher*Alford, editor, author and poet who co-founded the magazine Dandelion*Alland (born 1973), Scottish-Canadian writer, multimedia artist, bookseller, small press publisher and activist*Allard, editor and poet*Allen (born 1951), dub poet*Alonzo (19512005), playwright, poet, novelist, critic and publisher, born in Egypt and moved to Canada at the age of 12*Amabile (born 1936)*Andersen (born 1924), German-born, primarily francophone writer, academic and editor*Patrick Anderson (19151979), English-born Canadian poet and academic*Rod Anderson (1935), poet, musician and accountant*Andre (born 1946), poet, critic and editor living in the United States*Armstrong (born 1948), Native American author, educator, artist, and activist*Arnason (born 1940), author and poet*Rod Anderson (born 1935), poet, musician and Chartered Accountant*Arnott (born 1960), Mtis writer*Atwood (born 1939), poet, novelist, literary critic, feminist and activist*Avison (born 19182007) B *B, political word poet who has published chapbooks*Babstock*Bailey (19051997) poet, anthropologist, ethno-historian, and academic administrator*Bailey (17311808), a Church of England clergyman and poet born in the United States (colony of New Hampshire), immigrated to Nova Scotia, Canada in 1779*Banks (born 1970)*Bannerji, native of India*Bannerman*Barwin, author, composer, childrens writer and poet*Barzanji (born 1953), Kurdish poet and writer living in Canada since 1998*Basmajian (19501990), poet and author*Bassol-Oudraogo (born 1967)), Ivoirian born Canadian poet and journalist*Bauer American-born, living in Canada since 1965, husband of Bauer*Bauer(born 1934), American-born, living in Canada since 1965, wife of Bauer*Beardsley (born 1941), poet and academic*Beauchemin (18501931) francophone poet and physician (a man)*Beaulieu (born 1973) poet, publisher and anthologist.*Bdard (18061833), poet, lawyer and politician*Begamudr, Indian-born poet, short-story writer, novelist and academic*Beissel (born 1929), poet, author, writer and editor*Belford (born 1946)*Bemrose, arts journalist, novelist, poet and playwright*Benoit (died 2007), poet and writer*Bharati, India native and Canadian resident who has published books, including books of poetry, in Punjabi and English; publisher of Third Eye Press*Bergeron, francophone writer and poet*Langstroth Betts, author and poet*Bharati, Punjabi-language poet living in Canada*Billings (19491986), poet and editor*Birney (19041995)*bissett (born 1939)*Blagrave (born 1956), writer, short-story writer, playwright, poet and academic*Blaser (born 1925), author and poet (a man)*Block (born 1949), a man*D. Blodgett (born 1935), poet, literary critic, and translator*Boates (born 1954)*Bk, born Christian Book (born 1966), poet and author*Bolster (born 1969), poet and academic*Borson pen name of Ruth Elizabeth Borson (born 1952), American native living in Canada*Bouraoui (born 1932), Tunisian-born Canadian poet, novelist and academic*Bourinot (18931969), poet and lawyer*Bowering(born 1935), novelist, poet, historian, and biographer*Bowering (1949), poet, novelist and playwright*Bowling (born 1964), poet and novelist*Alex Boyd, poet, fiction writer, critic, essayist and editor*Braid, poet and teacher*Ytzhak Braithwaite (19632008), novelist, word artist, poet, essayist, digital drummer and short-story writer*Bramer (born 1973), poet and teacher*Brand (born 1953), poet, novelist, and non-fiction writer born and raised in and Tobago before moving to Canada*Brandt ne Diana Ruth Janzen (born 1952), poet and literary critic*Brault (born 1933), French Canadian poet and translator*Brebner (19562001)*Brett (born 1950), poet and novelist*Brewster (born 1922), poet and academic*Bringhurst (born 1946), poet, typographer and author*Bromige (born 1933), Canadian poet living in the United States since 1962*Brossard (born 1943), francophone poet and novelist*Alexandra Brown (19041998)*R. Brown (born 1946), American native living in Canada for most of her adult life*Budde (born 1966), poet, novelist and academic*Buffam*Bulmer (born 1963)*Burrs*Bushkowsky C *Cain (born 1970), poet and academic*Calder, poet and academic*Callaghan (born 1937), author and poet; son of the author Callaghan*Camlot (born 1966), poet, scholar and songwriter*Cameron (born 1938), novelist, poet, screenwriter and short story writer*Frederick Cameron (24 Sept. 1854  17 Sept. 1885),  poet, lawyer, and journalist*Campbell (18581918), poet and Anglican clergyman*Caple (born 1970), novelist and poet*Cargnello(born 1979), Montreal poet, lyricist*Carman (18611929), poet and critic*Carson (born 1950), poet, essayist, translator, and academic*William Chapman (18501917), poet, journalist and bureaucrat*Charbonneau (18751960), francophone poet who was the primary founder of the Montreal Literary School*Chiasson (born 1946), Acadian poet, playwright, journalist, academic and the of New Brunswick*Choquette (19051991), novelist, poet and, briefly, (19681970) a diplomat*Choyce (born 1951), novelist, writer, childrens book writer, poet, and academic who founded Pottersfield Press and hosts the television program Choyce Words and Off the Page; born in the United States and immigrated to Canada in 1979*Christakos (born 1962), poet and university writing teacher*Christie (born 1979)*Dave Clark, musician who published a book of poetry*Elliott Clarke (born 1960), poet and playwright.*Clifford (born 1944)*Cogswell (19172004)*Cohen (1934), singer-songwriter, musician, published poet and novelist*Matt Cohen, 19421999), writer and poet*Coles (born 1928), poet, author and academic*Robert Colombo (born 1936), poet, anthologist, editor, essayist, and humorist*Compton (born 1947), poet, critic, and anthologist*Compton (born 1972), poet, writer, turntable-based sound poetry performer, academic who co-founded Books, the first black-oriented press in Western Canada*Conn (born 1952), geneticist and poet living in the United States*Connelly (born 1969), writer and poet*Kevin Connolly*Cooley (born 1944), poet and academic*Cooper, Jamaican-born historian and poet*Paulo da Costa Canadian-Portuguese author, editor and translator*Couture (born 1978), poet, essayist, critic and journalist*Cowherd (18171907), tinsmith and poet*Valancy Crawford (18501887), poet, novelist and short-story writer*Crmazie(18271879), francophone poet who has been called the father of French-Canadian poetry for his patriotic verse*Crosbie (born 1963), poet and novelist*Crozier began writing under the name Lorna Uher (born 1948)*Crummey (born 1965), poet and writer.*Crysler, journalist and poet*jwcurry, John Curry (born 1959), poet, publisher and bookseller D *Dabydeen (born 1945), native Guyana poet and writer living in Canada*Dakos (born 1950), childrens poet and teacher*Dalton, poet and academic*A. Dandurand, Native American poet, playwright, and archaeologist*Daurio (born 1953)*Davey (born 1940), poet and academic*Flood Davin (18401901), lawyer, journalist, politician and poet*Davis, spoken word poet and musician*Dawe (born 1940), writer, poet, childrens book author, artist*de Barros (born 1976), Portuguese native who moved to Canada at age 3; illustrator, web designer and poet*Deahl (born 1945), moved to Canada from the United States in 1970 and a citizen of both countries; poet, academic and publisher of Monument Press; founding member of the Poetry Association*Dempsey and Lorri Millan, performance art duo who have collaborated on performances, films, videos, publications and public art projects since 1989*Dempster (born 1952), poet and novelist*Desbarats*Dewdney (born 1951), poet, writer, artist, creative writing teacher and writer in residence at various universities*Diamond (born 1951), an award-winning Montreal poet, novelist and short-story writer*Giorgio Di Cicco (born 1949), Italian-born, Canadian poet and priest*di Michele (born 1949), Italian-born, Canadian poet, author and creative writing teacher*Robert Dickson (19442007), poet, translator and academic.*Dobbs (born 1923), Indian-born teacher, poet, editor, short-story writer and travel writer who moved to Canada in 1950*Dodds*Domanski (born 1950)*Dominic (born 1944), poet and artist*Donaldson, poet and critic*Donnell (born 1939), poet and writer*Dorsey (born 1952), poet and science fiction novelist*Doucet (born 1946), writer poet, and politician*Downie (born 1964), song writer, poet and musician*Lloyd Douglas (born 1976), poet and writer*Henry Drummond (18541907) Irish-born Canadian poet*Dudek (19182001) poet, literary critic and publisher*Dumont (born 1955) E *Eaton (19021983), novelist, short-story writer, poet and academic*Elias (19482006), American-born, living in Canada from 1979, poet and academic*Eller*David Elliott (19231999), poet and academic*Elson (19601999), Canadian-American astronomer, academic writer and poet*Epp (born 1920) teacher, school administrator, writer and poet in Plautdietsch (Mennonite Low German) F *Faiers (born 1948), librarian, poet and publisher of Monument Press, which he founded in 1978*Fairley (18851968), English-born Canadian writer, educator and political activist*Fawcett (born 1944), poet, novelist, nonfiction author and writer*Fenerty (c.18211982), Canadian poet, journalist, and inventor. Published two poems in book format in 1855 and 1866, and wrote over 32 poems (mostly published in local newspapers).*Ferron, born Debby Foisy (1952), folk singer, songwriter and poet*Fetherling, wrote as Doug Feathering or Douglas Fetherling until 1999 when he began using his middle name (born 1949), American-born poet, novelist, journalist and essayist who moved to Canada at age 18 and became a Canadian citizen*Robert Finch (19001995), poet and academic whose area of expertise was poetry*Finnigan (19252007), writer, poet, teacher and newspaper reporter*Paul Fiorentino, poet, novelist, short-story writer, academic and editor of Matrix magazine*Fitzgerald (born 1952), poet and journalist*Robert Ford (19151998), poet, translator and diplomat*Fraser (born 1941), novelist, poet, biographer, essayist and editor*Frchette (18391908), French Canadian poet, politician, playwright and short-story writer*Friesen (born 1946), poet and university-level creative writing teacher*Frutkin (born 1948), American-born novelist and poet who moved to Canada in 1970 as a Vietnam War draft resister G *Gaji (born 1953), native Yugoslavian Serb living in Canada since 1985*Garebian (born 1943), critic, editor, biographer, and poet*Garneau (18091866), French Canadian notary, poet, civil servant and historian*de Saint-Denys Garneau (19121943), first modernist French Canadian poet*Gaston (born 1953), novelist, playwright, short-story writer and poet*Grin-Lajoie (18241882), French Canadian poet and novelist*Gervais (born 1946), poet, photographer, professor, journalist, and publisher of Moss Press*Morrison Gidney (18031882), educator, poet and journalist*Ignace Adlard Gill (18711918), painter and poet*Glassco (19091981), poet, memoirist and novelist*Godbout (born 1933), novelist, essayist, childrens writer, journalist, filmmaker and poet*Godin (19381994), French Canadian poet and politician*Oliver Goldsmith (1794-1861)*Gom (born 1946), novelist and poet*L. Gordon*Gotlieb (born 1926), science fiction novelist and poet*Goyette (born 1964), poet and novelist*Graham (born 1958), poet and academic*Grandbois (19001975), French Canadian poet*Richard Greene*Greentree, poet, short-story writer and freelance writer*Gripp (born 1964)*Gustafson (19091995), poet and academic*Gunn (born 1949), novelist, poet, and translator*Wm. Gunn*Gunnars, Icelandic-Canadian poet and novelist H *Paul Haines (19332003), poet and jazz lyricist, born in the United States and later a Canadian resident*Phil Hall (born 1953), poet, academic and publisher of broadsides and chapboooks under the Flat Singles Press imprint since 1976*Eaton Hamilton (born 1954), short-story writer, poet and photographer*Harris (born 1937)*Michael Harris*Sharon Harris (born 1972), writer, poet, artist and photographer*Richard Harrison*Hartal (born 1936), painter and poet, born Hungary*Hartman (born 1974 in poetry), poet and editor*Harvor (ne Deichman) (born 1936), novelist and poet*Hayman (15751629), poet, colonist and Proprietary Governor of Bristols Hope colony in Newfoundland*Heavysege (18161876)*Hbert (19162000), French-Canadian novelist and poet*Hedge Coke 1958), poet, writer, artist, activist and academic*Heighington (18971945), soldier, writer, poet lawyer and politician*Heighton (born 1961), novelist and poet*Helwig (born 1938), poet, novelist and essayist; father of Helwig*Helwig (born 1961), poet, novelist, peace and human rights activist; daughter of Helwig*Brian Henderson (born 1948), poet, academic and editor*Hilles (born 1951), poet and novelist*Holden*Holton*Hoogland (born 1952), poet and academic*Horlor (born 1981) poet, former speechwriter, freelance writing consultant*Howith (born 1934)*Hsu, poet and academic*Humphreys (born 1961), poet and novelist*Hunter poet, author, tribal leader, activist*Hunter (born 1969), poet and author*Bruce Hunter (born 1952), teacher, poet and fiction writer*Hunter (born in 1957), poet, novelist, editor, academic and critic*Chris Hutchinson (born 1972)*Smith Huyghue (18161891), Canadian and Australian poet, fiction writer, essayist, and artist I *Ioannou (born 1944)*Itani (born 1942), novelist, short-story writer, poet and essayist J *Jacob (born 1943), novelist, poet, playwright, singer-songwriter, and critic*Jemeni*Jiles (born 1943), American-born poet and novelist who moved to Canada in 1969*Joe (19322007), Mikmaq-Canadian poet and songwriter, called the poet laureate of the Mikmaq people*Johanson (born 1968), composition and literature instructor, poet and essayist*Pauline Johnson, also known as Tekahionwake (18611913)*G. Jones (born 1929), poet, translator and educator*Joseph (born 1953), poet and author K *Kalsey, poet, dramatist, short story writer and translator who writes in both Punjabi and English*Kamboureli, poet and academic*Kearns (born 1937), poet and teacher*T. Kelly (born 1946), novelist, poet and playwright.*Kemp, novelist, playwright, poet and poet*Kennedy (1907-2000), modernist poet, published in 1930s.*Kirkland Kernighan (18541926), poet, journalist and farmer*Kiyooka (19261994), photographer, poet and artist*Peter Klassen (18681947), Russian Mennonite poet and writer who immigrated to Canada in 1923 and wrote primarily in German*Klassen (born 1932), poet and fiction writer*M. Klein (19091972), poet, journalist, novelist, and short story writer*Knister (18991932), novelist, short story writer, poet, critic and journalist*Kogawa (born 1935), poet and novelist*Kotto (born 1961), Cameroon-born francophone Canadian, provincial level politician, former Canadian House of Commons member who published a book of poetry in 2002*Koyczan (born 1976), word poet*Kroetsch (born 1927)), novelist, poet, non-fiction writer and academic*Kulyk Keefer (born 1952), novelist, poet and academic L *LAbb, poet and critic*Labrie (born 1972), French Canadian poet*Laferrire (born 1953), Haitian-born francophone novelist, journalist and poet who moved to Canada in 1976*Lampman (18611899)*Lander (born 1938)*Lane (born 1939)*Travis Lane (born 1934), American-born Canadian poet who moved to Canada in 1960*Lane*Lasnier (19151997), French Canaadian poet and playwright*Lau (born 1971), poet and novelist*Morahan de Lauzon*Layton (19122006)*Leblanc(19472005), French Canadian poet, playwright, novelist, essayist and writer*Leclerc (19141988), songwriter, musician, poet, novelist, actor, radio announcer, radio scriptwriter and writer*Dennis Lee (born 1939), poet, writer and childrens fiction author*B. Lee (born 1951), author, poet and academic*Legris (born 1960)*Lent (19482006), poet and novelist*LePan (19141998), diplomat, poet, novelist and academic*Lilburn (born 1950), poet and essayist*Lillard (born 19441997), poet and historian*Livesay (19091996)*Livingston (born 1965), novelist and poet*Lochhead (born 1922), poet and (now retired) academic*Lowther (19351975) M *Maart (born 1962), poet, short-story writer, novelist, playwright, academic and psychotherapist; South African living in Canada*Mac Cormack (born 1956), experimental poet born in Zambia, who holds dual British/Canadian citizenship, she has moved from Toront to Buffalo, New York, with her husband, poet McCaffery*MacDonald (born 1948)*Hugh MacDonald (born 1945), poet, childrens writer and editor*MacDonald (18801967)*MacEwen (19411987), novelist and poet*Scott MacFarlane (18961979), poet and soldier*MacInnes (18671951), poet and writer*MacKenzie (born 1947), poet, performer (spoken word with music), arts reviewer and commentator, also published as R. D. MacKenzie*MacPherson, poet and novelist*Macpherson (born 13 June 1931), poet and academic (a woman)**Martin (born 1956), American-born poet, translator, academic and collage artist living in Toronto since 2005*Maillard(born 28 February 1942), author and poet*Mair (1838 or 18401927), poet and political activist*Majzels (born 1950), novelist, poet, playwright and translator*Major, contemporary poet*Maltman (born 1951), poet and physicist (a man)*Mandel (19221992), poet, essayist and academic*Zhina Mandiela (born 1953 Jamaican-born poet, theatre producer, and artistic director; Jamaican native living in Canada(ahdri zhina mandiela Answers.com)*Manicom (born 1960), diplomat, poet and novelist*Maracle(born 1950), Native American poet and author*Markotic, poet and novelist*Marlatt, ne Buckle (born 1942)*Tom Marshall (19381993), Canadian poet and novelist*Martin (born 1956), poet and collage artist*Mathews (born 1931), Canadian poet and professor, known for his political activism against United States foreign policy*Mayne (born 1944), poet and literary translator*Mayor (born in 1973), poet and novelist*Robert McBride (1811 or 18121895), Irish-born Canadian poet*McCabe, contemporary artist and poet*McCaffery (born 1947), poet and academic born in England and moved to Toronto in 1968; husband of poet MacCormack*McCrae (18721918), poet, physician, author, artist and soldier during World War I, and a surgeon during the battle of Ypres; best known for writing the famous war memorial poem Flanders Fields.*Roy McDonald (born 1937), is a poet and busker (street performer)*McFadden (born 11 October 1940), poet, fiction writer, and travel writer*McGrath, poet and novelist*McGimpsey, poet, humorist and academic*McInnis (born 1956), poet, short-story writer and essayist*James McIntyre (18281906), called The Cheese Poet*McKay (born 1942), poet, editor, and educator*McKinnon (born 1944)*McLeod (born 1979), poet, novelist, member of The Fugitives.*McMaster (born 1950), poet, literary editor, and word performer*McOrmond (born 1957), poet and academic*Melfi (born 1951), Italian-born poet, novelist and playwright who immigrated to Canada as a young child*Meyer (born 1957), poet and academic*Michel novelist, poet, playwright, songwriter and screenwriter*Michaels (born 1958), poet and novelist*Miki (born 1942), poet and academic*G. Mills (19232004)*Miron (19281996), French Canadian poet, writer, and editor*Maud Montgomery (18741942), Primarily an author, but also a poet from PEI.*E. Moodie (18671958), nurse, botanist and poet*Moodie (18031885), British-born Canadian author and poet*McArthur Mooney (born 1983)*Mordecai (born 1942), Jamaican writer, teacher, scholar and poet living in Canada since 1994*Morency (born 1942), French Canadian writer, poet and playwright*Morgan word artist, motivational speaker, event organizer and poet*Morrissey (born 1955), poet and playwright*Morton (born 1948)*F. Moritz (born 1947), poet and academic*David Moses (born 1952), Native American Canadian poet and playwright*Mour (born 1955)*William Murdoch (18231887), Scottish-Canadian poet, writer and gasworks manager who immigrated to Canada in 1854*George Murray, poet and an associate editor at Maisonneuve Magazine, contributing editor at several literary magazines*Musgrave (born 1951), poet and childrens writer* Musoke-Nteyafas (born c. 1976), poet, writer, visual artist, columnist and playwright N *Naraghi*Nash (born 1942), English-born philosopher, poet and academic*Neff (born 1969), poet, journalist, essayist and literary critic*Neilsen Glenn, poet, ethnographer, essayist and academic*mile Nelligan (18791941), francophone poet from Quebec*Nelson, writer, poet, activist, journalist, leader of the Green Party of Manitoba (20052006)*Nepveu (born 1946), French Canadian poet, novelist and essayist*H. New (born 1938), poet, editor and literary critic*bpNichol Barrie Phillip Nichol, who often went by his lower-case initials and last name, with no spaces (19441988), poet and writer*Newlove (19382003)*Neilsen Glenn, poet, ethnographer and essayist*Nowlan (19331983), poet, novelist, playwright and journalist O *Patrick OConnell (19442005)*Olson, novelist, poet and journalist*Ondaatje (born 1943), Sri Lankan novelist and poet with Canadian citizenship*ONeill, novelist, poet, short story writer, screenwriter and journalist*Ouellette-Michalska (born 1930), French-Canadian writer, novelist, essayist and poet*Outram (19302005), poet and writer; co-founder, with his wife, Barbara Howard, of The Gauntlet Press P *K. Page (born 1916)*Paina (born 1954), Italian poet living in Canada since 1987, editorial director of the quarterly magazine ItalyCanada Trade*Pass (born 1947), English-born Canadian poet and academic who has lived in Canada since 1953; married to poet and novelist Kishkan*Peart (born 1952), musician, songwriter, producer, author, drummer of the Canadian Rock band Rush*Persaud Guyana-born, Canadian essayist, novelist, short story writer, and poet*T. Pfefferle, poet, writer and academic*NourbeSe Philip (born 1947), poet, novelist, playwright, essayist and short story writer*Phillips (born 1947), poet, teacher and publisher*Pick, poet and novelist*Lakshmi Piepzna-Samarasinha (born 1975), American-born poet, spoken-word poet, writer, educator and social activist living in Canada*Pilon (born 1930), French Canadian poet*Pirie (1799);1870), newspaper publisher and poet*Pittman (19402001), poet and playwright*Plantos (19432001), poet, writer, editor*Pohl-Weary, novelist, poet and magazine editor*Pool*W. Powe (born 1955), author, poet and academic*Pratt (19211995), artist, poet and editor; daughter of writer and editor Whitney and J. Pratt, a poet and academic*J. Pratt (18821964), poet and academic*Prewett (18931962), poet and broadcaster, who spent most of his life in the United Kingdom; a poet of World War I*Priest (born 1951), poet and childrens author*Psenak (born 1969), French Canadian poet, playwright and novelist*Purdy (19182000), writer, editor and poet Q *Quan (born 1969), author who moved to Australia* Quesnel (17461809), French Canadian composer, poet, and playwright* Queyras, poet and academic R *Rampuri poet of Punjabi descent who writes in the Punjabi language*Harding Rand (18351900), educator and poet*Iqbal Rashid (born 1971), Canadian/British Muslim poet, screenwriter and filmmaker of Indian descent; has lived primarily in London*Rawlings (a.k.a. a.rawlings)*Ray, co-founder of the Poetry Association, publisher in Ontario*Reaney (19262008), poet, playwright, and literary critic*Redhill (born 1966), American-born Canadian poet, playwright and novelist*C. Reid (born 1952), poet, novelist and short story writer*Jamie Reid (born 1941)*Repchuk (born 1965), writer, poet and editor; president and founder of the Canadian Federation of Poets; editor of Canada magazine*Rhodes*G.D. Roberts (18601943), poet and prose writer; called the Father of Canadian Poetry for his influence on other poets*Lisa Robertson (born 1961), poet, essayist and writer*Rode, poet, playwright and writer in Punjabi and English*Rodgers (born 1952), poet, novelist and clinical psychologist*Rodrguez (born 1948), Chilean-Canadian author, poet, educator, political social activist, co-founder of Aquelarre Magazine; exiled from Chile after the 1973 coup; writes in both Spanish and English and translates her own work* Rogers (born 1944), poet and childrens writer* Rosenblatt (born 1933), Governor Generals Award-winning experimentalist.* Rosnau (born 1972), novelist and poet* Ross, poet, author, academic and past president of the Society of America* Ross (born 1959), writer, poet, editor, and creative-writing instructor* Ross (born 1894), imagist poet of 1920s and 1930s, has been called Canadas first modern poet.* Stephen Rowe (born 1980) S *Sagaris (born 1956), journalist, poet and translator living in Chile*Salah, academic, writer and poet whose first volume of poetry appeared in 2002*Sanger (born 1943), poet and prose writer, critic, editor and academic born in England, immigrated to Canada in 1953*Sangster (18221893)*Savard (18961982), priest, academic, poet, novelist and folklorist*Scheier, poet whose first collection of verses won the 2008 Governor Generals Award for English poetry; editor; son of Scheier; lives in New York City*Scheier (19462000), United States-born poet and short story writer who moved to Canada in 1975; mother of Scheier*Schreuder (born 1971), writer and poet living in Australia*Schroeder (born 1946), German-born poet, novelist, and nonfiction writer*Scobie (born 1943), poet, critic, and academic*Campbell Scott (18621947), poet and writer*Scott, see Campbell Scott*R. Scott, also known as Frank Scott (18991985), poet, intellectual and constitutional expert*Dale Scott (born 1929), poet and academic*Senior (born 1941), Jamaican poet and short story writer living in Canada*W. Service (18741958), poet and writer*Severin, author of seven chapbooks, and three greeting cards*Shaidle (born 1964), author, columnist and poet*Francis Sherman (1871-1926)*Sherman (19452006), poet and visual arts editor*Shields (19352003), American-born Canadian novelist, short-story writer, poet, playwright and writer*Shields, poet and novelist*Shreve, poet, newspaper reporter and office worker*Goran Simic (born 1952), Bosnian-born poet, playwright and short-story writer living in Canada since 1995*Siebert*Simpson (born 1956), poet and novelist*Sinclair*Skarstedt (born 1960), poet, short-story writer, playwright, painter and illustrator who founded and edited the now-defunct literary magazine Zymergy (19871991), and founded Empyreal Press in 1990*Skelton, sometimes wrote under the pseudonym Georges Zuk, a purported French surrealist (born 19251997), British-born Canadian academic, writer, poet, translator and anthologist who immigrated to Canada in 1963; a founder and editor of The Mahalat Review*Sloate (19312009), translator, poet, playwright and academic*Smart (born 1952), English-born poet, author and academic*Elizabeth Smart (19131986), poet and novelist whose book, Grand Central Station I Sat Down and Wept, detailed her romance with English poet George Barker*J. M. Smith (19021980), poet and academic*Burnet Smith (born 1949)*John Smith (born 1927), poet and academic*V. Smith novelist, poet and filmmaker*Ron Smith (born 1943), poet, author, editor, playwright, and former academic; founder and co-publisher of Oolichan Books in 1984; influential in the founding of Theytus Books in 1971*Solie (born 1966)*John Solomon, writer of erotic poetry books*Solway (born 1941), poet, educational theorist, travel writer and literary critic*Sonik (born 1960), novelist, short-story writer, childrens-book author, editor and poet*Marie Souaid (born 1959), poet and editor, living in Montreal, co-founder of Poetry Quebec magazine*Souster(born 1921), poet and (now retired) bank executive*Spalding (born 1966), American-born Canadian author, screenwriter and poet*Spears (born 1934), poet, novelist, and artist living in Denmark since 1962*Sproxton (19432007), poet and novelist*Standish (19191972), poet and novelist*George Stanley, American-born poet and academic associated with the Francisco Renaissance in his early years, moved to Canada in the 1970s; associated with New Star Books and the Capilano Review*Starnino, essayist, educator, and editor*Steffler (born 1947), poet and novelist*Ian Stephens (died 1996), journalist, musician and poet associated with the word movement*Sternberg (born 1948), poet born in Brazil, educated in the United States*Stevenson*Shannon Stewart*Gregory Stewart (born 1950), poet, science fiction author, short-story writer who works at a public utility and lives in Los Angeles, California*Stiles, poet living in London, United Kingdom*Stone, poet, writer and artist*Struthers (born 1951), poet and novelist*Sullivan (18681947), poet, short-story writer, railroad surveyor and mining engineer*Sullivan (born 1947), poet, biographer, academic and anthologist*John Sutherland (19191956), poet, literary critic, and magazine editor who founded and edited Statement in 1942 and its successor publication, Review in 1945*Robert Swanson*Sward (born 1933), American and Canadian poet and novelist*Swede (born 1940), Latvian-born Canadian childrens writer and poet who writes  in English*Ernest Sweet (born 1979), poet, writer and founder of a non-profit educational organization*Swift (born 1966), poet, editor and academic living in the United Kingdom*Szumigalski (19221999) T *Bruce Taylor (born 1960)*Taylor (born 1977), poet, playwright and teacher living in England since 2002*Ruth Taylor (19612006), poet, editor and academic*Terpstra, poet and carpenter*Thesen (born 1946), poet and academic*Edward William Thomson (born 18491924), journalist, writer and poet*John Thompson (19381976)*Tierney (born 1970)*Tlatelpas (born 1953), Mexican native and Canadian resident; Native cultures poet, publisher, and political activist*Siad Togane (born 1943), Somali native and Canadian resident; poet, academic, and political activist*Lemire Tostevin (born 1937), poet, novelist and writer*Tregebov (born 1953), poet and childrens writer*D. Tremblay, poet, writer, social services agency official*Michel Tremblay (born 1972), French-Canadian author, poet, scriptwriter, development producer and science-fiction consultant who moved to London, England in 1995*Tremblay (born 1968), French-Canadian poet, writer, word artist, journalist and radio personality*Trower (born 1930), poet and novelist*Truscott(born 1970), born in the United States*Turcotte (born 26 June 1957), French-Canadian writer and poet*John Tyndall*Scott Tysdal (born 1978) U * Uguay (19551981), French- Canadian poet* Uppal (born 1974), poet and novelist* UU (David W. Harris) (19481994), visual poet V * M. Vaughan, poet, novelist and playwright* Vermeersch (born 1973)* Vigneault (born 1928), Qubc poet, publisher and singer-songwriter; Quebec nationalist and sovereigntist* Sarah Vining (18261897)* Von Buchholz (also G.A. Buchholz) (born 1968) British Columbia poet, dark fiction author, playwright, journalist and arts critic W *Waddington ne Dworkin 19172004), poet, short story writer and translator* Wah (born 1939), poet, novelist, and scholar* Wallace (19451989), poet and short story writer* Walmsley (born 1948), playwright, novelist, poet and screenwriter* Walsh (born 1950), actor, poet, playwright and storyteller* Waltner-Toews (born 1948), epidemiologist, essayist, poet, fiction writer, veterinarian, and a specialist in the epidemiology of food and waterborne diseases, zoonoses and ecosystem health* Watada author, writer, and poet* Alison Watt (born 1957), writer, poet and painter* Wayman (born 1945), poet and academic* Webb (born 1927), poet and radio broadcaster* Weier (born 1949)* Stanley Weir (18561926), judge and poet most famous for writing the English lyrics to Canada, the national anthem of Canada* Wells (born 1976), poet, critic, essayist and editor* Wershler-Henry (born 1966), experimental poet, non-fiction writer and cultural critic* Wevill (born 1935)* Wharnsby (born 1972), singer-songwriter, poet, performer, educator and television personality* Whelan (born 18581937) teacher, bookkeeper and poet* Whittall (born 1976), poet and novelist* Anne Wilkinson (19101961) Canadian poet, writer and essayist* Wilson, poet and playwright* Winger, poet and academic* Wolfwood, political activist and poet* Woodcock (19121995), poet, essayist, critic, biographer and historiian; the founder (in 1959) of the journal Canadian Literature* Woolaver (born 1948) is a Canadian author, poet, playwright and director Y * Michael Yates (born 1938), poet and dramatist* Yoon (born 1962), actor, poet and playwright* Young born in Jamaica, moved to Canada in 1993; poet, actor and playwright Z *Zieroth*Zonailo (born 1947), poet and publisher*Zwicky (born 1955), philosopher, poet, essayist, and violinist* Zolf, poet and editor See also *of Canadian writers*of poets*of poetry awards*of years in poetry*of years in literature References Further reading * * * * * de poetas do Canadkanadskih pesnikov
291743
Whitehaven
Whitehaven is a small town and port on the coast of Cumbria, England, which lies equidistant between the countys two largest settlements, Carlisle and Barrow-in-Furness, and is served by the Coast Line and the A595 road. It is the administrative centre of the Borough of Copeland, and an area.Located on the west coast of the county, outside the District National Park, Whitehaven includes a number of former villages, estates and suburbs, such as Woodhouse, Kells, Mirehouse and Hensingham. The major industry is the nearby Sellafield nuclear complex, with which a large proportion of the population has links.HistoryAlthough there was a Roman fort at Parton, around  to the north, there is no evidence of a Roman settlement on the site of the present town of Whitehaven. The area was settled by Irish-Norse Vikings in the tenth century.(Wainwright, F. T. Scandinavian England: Collected Papers, Chichester: Phillimore (1975)) The area name of Copeland, which includes Whitehaven, indicates that the land was purchased from the of Strathclyde, possibly with loot from Ireland.(Winchester, Angus J. L. The Multiple Estate: A Framework for the Evolution of Settlement in Anglo-Saxon and Scandinavian Cumbria in Baldwin, John R. and Whyte, Ian D. (eds), The Scandinavians in Cumbria, Edinburgh: The Scottish Society for Northern Studies (1985) pp. 89-101)The Priory of St Bees owned the village of Whitehaven until Henry VIII dissolved the monasteries in 1539. Before 1715 the parish of St. Bees included Whitehaven. The town was largely the creation of the Lowther family in the 17th century. In 1630 Sir Christopher Lowther purchased the estate and used Whitehaven as a port for exporting coal from the Coalfield, particularly to Ireland. In 1634 he built a stone pier where ships could load and unload cargoes. Whitehaven grew into a major coal mining town during the 18th and 19th centuries and also became a substantial commercial port on the back of this trade. Daniel Defoe visited Whitehaven in the 1720s and wrote::... grown up from a small place to be very considerable by the coal trade, that it is now the most eminent port in England for shipping off of coals, except Newcastle and Sunderland and even beyond the last.  They have of late fallen into some merchandising also, occasioned by the strange great number of their shipping, and there are now some considerable merchants; but the town is yet but young in trade.(Letter 10: Lancashire, Westmorland and Cumberland, from  tour thro the Whole Island of Great Britain, divided into circuits or  by Defoe, from A Vision of Britain Through Time (a of Portsmouth website))Paul Jones led a naval raid upon the town in 1778 during the War of Independence; it was the last invasion of England by some definitions.The town has links to many notable people: Swift, who claimed that an over-fond nurse kidnapped him and brought him to Whitehaven for three years in his infancy; Gale, grandmother of Washington; and Wordsworth, who often came into town to visit his family.Whitehaven is the most complete example of planned architecture in Europe and recently has been pursuing growth through tourism. Due to Whitehavens planned layout with streets in a right-angled grid, many historians believe that Whitehaven was the blueprint for the York City street grid system.  James Robinson is officially credited as the original architect but some (most notably Alex James) contest the claim. Whitehaven Castle was built in 1769, replacing an earlier building destroyed by fire. In 1924, the Earl of Lonsdale sold Whitehaven Castle to Mr H. Walker, who then donated the building to the people of Cumbria, along with monies to convert it into a hospital to replace the Victorian Whitehaven Hospital.  With the opening of the new Cumberland Hospital in 1964, the Castle became a geriatric unit until forced to close in 1986, owing to fire regulations. It has now been converted to private housing.Harbourright|thumb|Whitehaven HarbourThe towns fortunes as a port waned rapidly when ports with much larger shipping capacity, such as Bristol and Liverpool, began to take over its main trade.  Its peak of prosperity was in the 19th century when West Cumberland experienced a brief boom because haematite found locally was one of the few iron ores that could be used to produce steel by the original process.  Improvements to the Bessemer process and the development of the open hearth process removed this advantage.  As with most mining communities the inter-war depression was severe; this was exacerbated for West Cumbria by Irish independence which suddenly placed tariff barriers on the principal export market.The Harbour lost its last commercial cargo handling operation in 1992 when Marchon ceased their phosphate rock import operations. A new masterplan for the harbour was prepared by Jonas and marine consulting engineers Beckett Rankine with the objective of refocussing the town on a renovated harbour. The key to the masterplan was the impounding of the inner basins to create a large leisure and fishing harbour.The harbour has seen much other renovation due to millennium developments; a picture of the harbour was used on the front page of the Tate Moderns promotional material for an exhibition of Millennium Projects in 2003.(http://www.whitehaven-harbour.co.uk/news.htm whitehaven.co.uk)The Harbour rejuvenation has cost an estimated 11.3 million(http://www.mywhitehaven.net/index.php?optioncom_content&viewarticle&catid45:history-articles&id60:whitehaven-harbour&Itemid73 mywhitehaven.net) and has enabled 100 more moorings within the marina. Further investment of an additional 5.5 million has seen the development of a 40m high crows nest and a wave light feature that changes colour dependant upon the tide, together with the Story on Lowther Street, voted Cumbria Tourisms small visitor attraction of the year 2007.(http://www.rumstory.co.uk/)In June 2008, the Queen visited Whitehaven as part of the 300th Anniversary Celebrations.(http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/shared/spl/hi/pop_ups/08/uk_enl_1212672516/html/1.stm news.bbc.co.uk) The Queen and Prince Philip then officially opened the refurbished Beacon, a museum set on the harbour. 10,000 people attended the event.RailwaysWhitehaven has a rich railway history. It used to be a terminus of the Railway, and still has two railway stations, Whitehaven (Bransty) and Corkickle, both on the Coast Line, which runs from Carlisle to Barrow-in-Furness. The harbour was once riddled with railway lines, when steam engines would shunt trucks full of coal, iron, gypsum and many other cargoes onto the quays for ships to take elsewhere in the world.The railway reached Whitehaven in 1847  - steam powered engines finally reached the town following an agreement between the of Lonsdale and Stephenson. Stephenson was the engineer placed in charge of the construction of the new railway line. The railway became known as the Whitehaven Junction Railway. Even before this line was built, the nearby Lowca engineering works began to produce locomotives. Over the life of the works, some 260 were produced - mainly for industrial lines. Mines and pits right|thumb|Saltom pit The earliest reference to coal mining in the Whitehaven area is in the time of Prior Langton (125682) of St Bees Priory, concerning the coal mines at Arrowthwaite. St Bees Priory was dissolved in 1539, and the lands and mineral rights passed to secular owners. In 1560 Sir Thomas Chaloner granted bases of land for digging coal, and in 1586 he granted St Bees School liberty to take 40 loads of coal at his coal pits in the parish of St Bees for the use of the School.() In 1670, the manor of Bees was bought by Sir John Lowther - he then began to develop the coal trade due to the ever increasing demand from Ireland. Lowther invested in the best available technology to help monopolise the coal trade. By the 1730s Whitehaven had the deepest mines due to the necessity to drive ever deeper shafts to reach new seams of coal.An example of the Lowthers interest in technology could be seen at Stone Pitt when one of the worlds earliest engines, Engine No. 5 built by Newcomen and John Calley in 1715 was installed, to help in drainage and haulage. Brownrigg, Whitehavens most eminent scientist, was the first to investigate the explosive mine gas damp.()The Lowthers technological advances continued when their chief steward, Carlisle Spedding sunk Saltom Pit in 1729. Saltom Pit was the first pit to be sunk beneath the sea. At Saltom pit, Carlisle Spedding pioneered the use of explosives in sinking shafts. He also invented the first form of Safety Lamp, it was called the Spedding Wheel or Steel Mill. On occasions the Spedding Wheel caused explosions or fires but it was a major improvement over the naked flame.Saltom Pit was constructed around 6m above sea level, on land below the cliffs near to Haig Colliery. The pit workings went down to a depth of 456 ft (138m). Saltom Pit ceased working coal in 1848, but today it is a Scheduled Ancient Monument (SM 27801)() and is the best known surviving example of an eighteenth century colliery layout. Evidence of the shaft, horse gin, stable, engine house, boiler house and chimney, cottages, cartroads and retaining walls, all survives in situ.Coal excavated from Saltom Pit was raised by horse gin to surface, then transported by tram through a tunnel to Ravenhill pit for lifting to the cliff top. Saltom Pit was used as a central pumping station, draining many of the other local mines via a drift driven in the 1790s, and continued in use long after it had ceased to work coal.right|thumb|Repaired Saltom Pit During 2007, Copeland Council declared that it could no longer afford to maintain the remaining Saltom Pit buildings, and decided to allow the pit to fall to the mercy of the Sea. Following an online campaign by myWhitehaven.net,(myWhitehaven.net) Copeland Council had a change of heart and decided to reverse this decision. They teamed up with the National Trust in an endeavour to save Saltom Pit, and obtained the necessary funding from various sources, including a 50% grant from the Union. On Monday 8 December 2007, Saltom Pit was reopened as an historic monument. The pit buildings have been repaired and are now part of the Whitehaven Coast project - a scheme to regenerate the coastal area of Whitehaven.In three hundred years over seventy pits were sunk in the Whitehaven and district area. During this period some five hundred or more people were killed in pit disasters and accidents. The largest local disaster was in 1910 at Wellington pit where 136 miners lost their lives. In 1947 at William pit there was another disaster of similar proportions when 104 men were killed. Four separate explosions over the period 1922&ndash;1931 at Haig Pit together killed 83.() Haig was to become the last pit to operate in Whitehaven.In 1983, a major fault was encountered at Haig - with this, the future of the pit was in doubt. This, combined with the political situation, and the miners strike in 19841985, contributed to problems at the colliery. The workforce attempted to open a new face, but a decision had been taken to close, and after two years of recovery work, Haig finally ceased mining on 31 March 1986. Today there is no mining carried out in Whitehaven.MarchonIn 1941, Fred Marzillier and Frank Schon moved their Chemical Company to Whitehaven to avoid German bombing. Marchon started producing some of the first detergents in the world. The new detergents were a big success as soap was in short supply due to the war. The company continued producing their own detergents as well as bulk detergent ingredients for other companies after the war. It was taken over by and Wilson, often referred to as all bright and shiny, in 1955. The Marchon works became the towns largest employer when the mines closed down. However, it too was closed in 2005.SportWhitehaven is a league stronghold, its team RLFC play in National League one. Their mascot is a lion called Pride. There are also several Whitehaven-based teams playing in the amateur League. Whitehavens female amateur R.L.F.C is named the Wildcats.West Brom and England goalkeeper Carson was also born in Whitehaven. He played for Moor Celtic.Aston Villa and England footballer Sewell was born in Kells, Whitehaven on 24 January 1927.Maritime festivalright|thumb|Whitehaven Maritime Festival 2005Whitehaven has also played host to a Maritime Festival, which started in 1999 and was held every two years; the last, in 2007, attracting an estimated 350,000 people to the small town.(Whitehaven International Festival Company) Attractions included tall ships, air displays which include the Arrows and various modern and old planes, street entertainment, and firework displays. At the 2003, 2005 and 2007 Festivals the local Sea Cadets were very much in evidence, conducting the traditional Evening Colours ceremony each evening aboard one of the visiting tall ships, and also taking part in the Festivals official closing ceremony during the late Sunday afternoon each year.The 2005 festival also marked the 60th Anniversary of the end of the Second World War in which Whitehaven had been designated Cumbrias Official commemoration celebration. Up to 1,000 veterans and ex-service personnel took part in the parade from the towns Castle Park to the harbour side, led by members of three military bands. Services were held on the harbour side and aircraft from the Royal Airforce provided a tribute display above the harbour.The Maritime Festivals were organised by the Whitehaven Festival Company, made up a of board of volunteers, who have since launched new events in the town. They organised the Queens visit to Whitehaven in June 2008, followed by the Status Quo gig in August of that year. The company staged two events in August 2009. The first was the redesigned Festival (known for this year as the Whitehaven Food Festival, although it did still feature tall ships) which offered the usual wide variety of attractions, both around the southern half of the harbour and at St. Nicholas Church, on 89 August. The second event, the following week, was the Here and Now Gig (a music concert with 80s pop icons). For the June 2010 festival, which was similar in format to 2009, the music performances (Status Quo, N-Dubz and Jenkins) were moved to the harbour area.The 2011 Festival (featuring Razorlight plus several 1980s acts including Madness) continued the successful culinary theme, with the return of Novelli and other favourites.June 2010 shootingsOn 2 June 2010, Whitehaven became a focus for the international media in relation to gun law in the United Kingdom, following the killings of people in the west of the county.Taxi driver Derrick Bird travelled from his home in Rowrah, killing and maiming people on his journey to Whitehaven. Once in Whitehaven, Bird continued his attacks by shooting fellow taxi drivers, along with other members of the public. From there, Bird used his knowledge of county roads to continue his attacks. In total, there were 30 crime scenes investigated as a result of the shootings by Bird. 12 people were killed and 11 people were injured during his three hours of terror, before he finally turned one of his two guns onto himself in the village of Boot, thus ending one of the worst mass killings in British history.A list of locations where shots were fired and where people were believed to have been killed:*Duke Street, Whitehaven - shots fired and a man killed*Orgill, Haggard End, Egremont - shots fired and one person killed;*Town End Farm, Wilton - a man and a woman were killed after shots fired;*Woodbank, Egremont - shots discharged;*Bridge End, Egremont - shots fired and one person killed;*Coach Road, Whitehaven - shots fired;*Scotch Street, Whitehaven - shots fired;*Red Admiral, Gosforth - shots fired and one man killed;*Seascale railway station - shots fired;*Yeat House Road, Frizington - shots fired and one person killed;*Shaw Road, Drigg - shots fired;*Between Haile and Egremont near Carleton Wood - shots fired and one man killed;*Drigg Road, Seascale - shots fired and one man and one woman killed;*Gosforth Road, Seascale - shots fired and one man killed;*Unident, Seascale - shots fired;*High Trees, Lamplugh - shots fired and one man killed;*Eskdale Green - shots fired;*Outside Hollins Cottage campsite - shots fired;*Wooded area in Boot - Bird found dead.Digital switchover trialOn 20 July 2006, Broadcasting Minister Woodward and Industry Minister Hodge announced that Whitehaven would be the pilot site for the switchover to terrestrial television in the United Kingdom.(Whitehaven Chosen For National Switchover Flagship Project, a 2006 release from the website of the for Culture, Media and Sport)  The selection of a pilot site followed on from trial switchovers held in Ferryside and Bolton.(The switchover began when Two was switched off at 0200 on 17 October 2007. This was followed by the remaining analogue channels at 0200, on 14 November 2007. As a result of the switchover, all televisions in the Whitehaven area must have a terrestrial receiver (Freeview) or digital satellite alternative (Freesat, Sky Digital, etc.)(In other areas, additional alternatives to Freeview are available, such as the cable-based Media.) The switchover in the Whitehaven area was not entirely successful: in nearby Eskdale, poor signal quality left viewers with blank television screens and the digital switchover was supposed to give over 40 channels but certain areas received less than 20.(North-West Evening Mail article on Eskdale reception problems, 14 November 2007)WoodhouseWoodhouse is a housing estate in the suburbs of Whitehaven, between Kells and Greenbank. Police, the local council, and people living in the Woodhouse community have worked very hard to improve the condition of public areas, the reputation, and the crime levels on the estate. Woodhouse was created as a council estate, but some tenants later bought their homes. The estate has a fish and chip shop, general store and pub. There are also two taxi firms and regular buses running to and from the town centre. The estate has three surrounding schools which cater for infants and juniors, St. Marys, Kells county infants school, and Monkwray Junior school. The estate has local centres and public parks for children of all ages to use. Every summer there is a play-scheme, two days a week, which caters for over one hundred children during the school holiday, featuring trips to farm parks and theme parks. Regular meetings upon the estate are held by the council which allows the members of the public within the community to voice their opinions and concerns.Neighbouring townsThe main towns neighbouring Whitehaven are Workington to the north, Moor to the East and Egremont to the south. Villages close by which are not suburbs include Bees and Beckermet to the south and Distington to the north.Notable people*Benson (clockmaker)*Sewell - England footballer*Carson*Conroy, Australian politician and government minister(Australian Senate Environment, Communications and the Arts Committee, Proof Estimates Hansard, 20 October 2008, p. 69.)*Higgins (producer)*Kavanagh*Summerfield Professional Ice Hockey Player for Phoenix*Paul Jones American Naval Hero, started career in Whitehaven(http://www.whitehavenandwesternlakeland.co.uk/people/default.htm)*Washington first President of the States, grandmother lived and buried in Whitehaven(Further reading* Whitehaven an illustrated history, by Daniel Hay. Published by Michael Moon, 1979. ISBN 0-904131-21-1ReferencesExternal links*bg:de:Whitehavenfr:Whitehavengv:Whitehavenit:Whitehavennl:Whitehavennn:Whitehavenpl:Whitehavenro:Whitehavensimple:Whitehavensk:Whitehaven
292602
Middle_Kingdom_of_Egypt
The Middle Kingdom of Egypt is the period in the history of Egypt stretching from the establishment of the Eleventh Dynasty to the end of the Fourteenth Dynasty, between BC and BC, although some writers include the Thirteenth and Fourteenth dynasties in the Intermediate Period. During this period, the cult of Osiris rose to dominate Egyptian popular religion. The period comprises two phases, the 11th Dynasty, which ruled from Thebes and the 12th Dynasty onwards which was centered around el-Lisht. These two dynasties were originally considered to be the full extent of this unified kingdom, but historians now consider the 13th Dynasty to at least partially belong to the Middle Kingdom.Political HistoryReunification under the Eleventh DynastySeated edit.jpg|thumb|150px|An Osiride statue of the first pharaoh of the Middle Kingdom, Mentuhotep IIAfter the collapse of the Kingdom, Egypt entered a period of weak Pharaonic power and decentralization called the Intermediate Period.(Grimal. (1988) p. 156) Towards the end of this period, two rival dynasties, known to the ancient Egyptians as the Tenth and Eleventh, fought for power over the entire country. The Theban 11th Dynasty only ruled southern Egypt from the first cataract to the Tenth Nome of Upper Egypt.(Grimal. (1988) p. 155) To the north, Lower Egypt was ruled by the rival 10th Dynasty from Herakleopolis.( The struggle was to be concluded by II, who ascended the Theban throne in 2055 B.C.(Shaw. (2000) p. 149) During Mentuhotep IIs fourteenth regnal year, he took advantage of a revolt in the Thinite Nome to launch an attack on Herakleopolis, which met little resistance.( After toppling the last rulers of the 10th Dynasty, Mentuhotep began consolidating his power over all Egypt, a process which he finished by his 39th regnal year.( For this reason, Mentuhotep II is regarded as the founder of the Middle Kingdom.(Habachi. (1963) pp. 16-52)Mentuhotep II commanded military campaigns south as far as the Second Cataract in Nubia, which had gained its independence during the Intermediate Period. He also restored Egyptian hegemony over the Sinai region, which had been lost to Egypt since the end of the Old Kingdom.(Grimal. (1988) p. 157) To consolidate his authority, he restored the cult of the ruler, depicting himself as a god in his own lifetime, wearing the headdresses of Amun and Min(Shaw. (2000) p. 151) He died after a reign of 51 years, and passed the throne to his son, III.(Mentuhotep III reigned for only twelve years, during which he continued consolidating Theban rule over the whole of Egypt, building a series of forts in the eastern Delta region to secure Egypt against threats from Asia.( He also sent the first expedition to Punt during the Middle Kingdom, by means of ships constructed at the end of Wadi Hammamat, on the Red Sea.(Shaw. (2000) p. 156) Mentuhotep III was succeeded by IV, whose name significantly is omitted from all ancient Egyptian king lists.(Redford. (1992) p. 71.) The Papyrus claims that after Mentuhotep III come seven kingless years.(Gardiner. (1964) p. 124.) Despite this absence, his reign is attested from a few inscriptions in Hammamat that record expeditions to the Sea coast and to quarry stone for the royal monuments.( The leader of this expedition was his vizier Amenemhat, who is widely assumed to be the future pharaoh I, the first king of the 12th Dynasty.(Redford. (1992) p. 72.)(Gardiner. (1964) p. 125.)Mentuhotep IVs absence from the king lists has prompted the theory that Amenemhet I usurped his throne.( While there are no contemporary accounts of this struggle, certain circumstantial evidence may point to the existence of a civil war at the end of the 11th dynasty.( Inscriptions left by one Nehry, the Haty-a of Hermopolis, suggest that he was attacked at a place called Shedyet-sha by the forces of the reigning king, but his forces prevailed. Khnumhotep, an official under Amenemhet I, claims to have participated in a flotilla of 20 ships to pacify Upper Egypt. Redford has suggested these events should be interpreted as evidence of open war between two dynastic claimants.(Redford. (1992) p.74) What is certain is that, however he came to power, Amenemhet I was not of royal birth.(Early Twelfth DynastyEarly in his reign, Amenemhet I was compelled to campaign in the Delta region, which had not received as much attention as upper Egypt during the 11th Dynasty.(Arnold. (1991) p. 20.) In addition, he strengthened defenses between Egypt and Asia, building the Walls of the Ruler in the East Delta region.(Shaw. (2000) p. 158) Perhaps in response to this perpetual unrest, Amenemhat I built a new capital for Egypt in the north, known as Amenemhet Itj Tawy, or Amenemhet, Seizer of the Two Lands.(Arnold. (1991) p. 14.) The location of this capital is unknown, but is presumably near the citys necropolis, the present-day el-Lisht.( Like Montuhotep II, Amenemhet bolstered his claim to authority with propaganda.(Grimal. (1988) p. 159) In particular, the of Neferty dates to about this time, which purports to be an oracle of an Old Kingdom priest, who predicts a king, Amenemhet I, arising from the far south of Egypt to restore the kingdom after centuries of chaos.(Propaganda notwithstanding, Amenemhet never held the absolute power commanded in theory by the Old Kingdom pharaohs. During the First Intermediate Period, the governors of the nomes of Egypt, nomarchs, gained considerable power.(Gardiner. (1964) p. 128.) Their posts had become hereditary, and some nomarchs entered into marriage alliances with the nomarchs of neighboring nomes.( To strengthen his position, Amenemhet required registration of land, modified nome borders, and appointed nomarchs directly when offices became vacant, but acquiesced to the nomarch system, probably in order to placate the nomarchs who supported his rule.(Grimal. (1988) p. 160) This gave the Middle Kingdom a more feudal organization than Egypt had before or would have afterward.(Gardiner. (1964) p. 129.)In his 20th regnal year, Amenemhat established his son I as his coregent,( establishing a practice which would be used repeatedly throughout the rest of the Middle Kingdom and again during the New. In Amenemhets 30th regnal year, he was presumably murdered in a palace conspiracy. Senuseret, campaigning against Libyan invaders, rushed home to Itjtawy to prevent a takeover of the government.(Shaw. (2000) p. 160) During his reign he continued the practice of directly appointing nomarchs,(Shaw. (2000) p. 175) and undercut the autonomy of local priesthoods by building at cult centers throughout Egypt.(Shaw. (2000) p. 162) Under his rule, Egyptian armies pushed south into Nubia as far as the second cataract, building a border fort at Buhen and incorporating all of lower Nubia as an Egyptian colony.(Shaw. (2000) p. 161) To the west, he consolidated his power over the Oases, and extended commercial contacts into Syrio-Palestine as far as Ugarit.(Grimal. (1988) p. 165) In his 43rd regnal year, Senusret appointed II as junior coregent, and died in his 46th.(Murnane. (1977) p. 5.)The reign of II has been often characterized as largely peaceful,( but record of his genut, or daybooks, have cast doubt on that assessment.(Shaw. (2000) p. 163) Among these records, preserved on temple walls at Tod and Memphis, are descriptions of peace treaties with certain Syrio-Palestinian cities, and military conflict with others.( To the south, Amenemhet sent a campaign through lower Nubia to inspect Wawat.( It does not appear that Amenemhet continued his predecessors policy of appointing Nomarchs, but let it become hereditary again.( Another expedition to Punt dates to his reign.( In his 33rd regnal year, he appointed his son II coregent.(Murnane. (1977) p. 7.)Evidence for military activity of any kind during the reign of Senusret II is non-existent.(Shaw. (2000) p. 164) Senusret instead appears to have focused on domestic issues, particularly the irrigation of the Faiyum. This multi-generational project aimed to convert the Faiyum oasis into a productive swath of farmland.( Senusret eventually placed his pyramid at the site of el-Lahun, near the junction of the Nile and the Fayuums major irrigation canal, the Yussef.(Gardiner. (1964) p. 138.) He reigned only fifteen years,(Grimal. (1988) p. 166) which is evidenced by the incomplete nature of many of his constructions.( His son III succeeded him.Height of the Middle KingdomIII was a warrior-king, often taking to the field himself. In his sixth year, he re-dredged an Old Kingdom canal around the first cataract to facilitate travel to upper Nubia.(Shaw. (2000) p. 166) He used this to launch a series of brutal campaigns in Nubia in his sixth, eighth, tenth, and sixteenth years.( After his victories, Senusret built a series of massive forts throughout the country to establish the formal boundary between Egyptian conquests and unconquered Nubia at Semna.( The personnel of these forts were charged to send frequent reports to the capital on the movements and activities of the local Medjay natives, some of which survive, revealing how tightly the Egyptians intended to control the southern border.(Gardiner. (1964) p. 136.) Medjay were not allowed north of the border by ship, nor could they enter by land with their flocks, but they were permitted to travel to local forts in order to trade.(Gardiner. (1964) p. 135.) After this, Senusret sent one more campaign in his 19th year, but turned back due to abnormally low Nile levels, which endangered his ships.( One of Senusrets soldiers also records a campaign against skmm, perhaps Shechem, the only reference to a campaign against a location in Syrio-Palestine from the entirety of Middle Kingdom literature.(Redford. (1992) p. 76)Domestically, Senusret has been given credit for an administrative reform which put more power in the hands of appointees of the central government, instead of regional authorities.( Egypt was divided into three waret, or administrative divisions: North, South, and Head of the South (perhaps Egypt, most of Egypt, and the nomes of the original Theban kingdom during the war with Herakleopolis, respectively).(Hayes. (1953) p. 32) Each region was administrated by a Reporter, Second Reporter, some kind of council (the Djadjat), and a staff of minor officials and scribes.( The power of the Nomarchs seems to drop off permanently during his reign, which has been taken to indicate that the central government had finally suppressed them, though there is no record that Senusret ever took direct action against them.(Senusret III had a lasting legacy as a warrior Pharaoh. His name was Hellenized by later Greek historians as Sesostris, a name which was then given to a conflation of Senusret and several New Kingdom warrior pharaohs.(Shaw and Nicholson. (1995) p. 260) In Nubia, Senusret was worshiped as a patron God by Egyptian settlers.(Aldred. (1987) p.129) The duration of his reign remains something of an open question. His son III began reigning after Senusrets 19th regnal year, which has been widely considered Senusrets highest attested date.(Wegner. (1996) p. 250) However, a reference to a year 39 on a fragment found in the construction debris of Senusrets mortuary temple has suggested the possibility of a long coregency with his son.(Wegner. (1996) p. 260)The reign of III was the height of Middle Kingdom economic prosperity. His reign is remarkable for the degree to which Egypt exploited its resources. Mining camps in the Sinai, which had previously been used only by intermittent expeditions, were operated on a semi-permanent basis, as evidenced by the construction of houses, walls, and even local cemeteries.(Grimal. (1988) p. 170) There are 25 separate references to mining expeditions in the Sinai, and four to expeditions in wadi Hammamat, one of which had over 2000 workers.(Grajetzki. (2006) p. 60) Amenemhet reinforced his fathers defenses in Nubia(Shaw. (2000) p. 168) and continued the Faiyum land reclamation system.(Shaw. (2000) p. 169)  Amenemhet invited Asiatic settlers to Egypt to labor on Egypts monuments.( It is possible that this influx marked the beginning of the influx of Asiatics which would ultimately lead to the Hyksos takeover of Lower Egypt.( After a reign of 45 years, Amenemhet III was succeeded by IV,( whose nine year reign is poorly attested.(Shaw. (2000) p. 170) Clearly by this time, dynastic power began to weaken, for which several explanations have been proposed. Contemporary records of the Nile flood levels indicate that the end of the reign of Amenemhet III was dry, and crop failures may have helped to destabilize the dynasty.( Further, Amenemhet III had an inordinately long reign, which tends to create succession problems.(Grimal. (1988) p. 171) The latter argument perhaps explains why Amenemhet IV was succeeded by Sobekneferu, the first historically attested female king of Egypt.( Sobekneferu ruled no more than four years,(Shaw. (2000) p. 171) and as she apparently had no heirs, when she died the Twelfth Dynasty came to a sudden end as did the Golden Age of the Middle Kingdom.Decline into the Second Intermediate PeriodAfter the death of Sobeknefru, the throne may have passed to Wegaf, who had previously been the Great Overseer of Troops,(Grajetzki. (2006) p. 66) though others have suggested Khutawy was next to reign.(Grimal. (1988) p. 183) Beginning with this reign, Egypt was ruled by a series of ephemeral kings for about ten to fifteen years.(Grajetzki. (2006) p. 64) Ancient Egyptian sources regard these as the first kings of the Thirteenth Dynasty, though the term dynasty is misleading, as most kings of the thirteenth dynasty were not related.(Grajetzki. (2006) p. 65) The names of these short-lived kings are attested on a few monuments and Graffiti, and their succession order is only known from the Canon, although even this is not fully trusted.( After the initial dynastic chaos, a series of longer reigning, better attested kings ruled for about fifty to eighty years.( The strongest king of this period, I, ruled for eleven years and maintained effective control of Upper Egypt, Nubia, and the Delta,(Grajetzki. (2006) p. 71) with the possible exceptions of Xois and Avaris.(Shaw. (2000) p. 172) Neferhotep I was even recognized as the suzerain of the ruler of Byblos, indicating that the Thirteenth Dynasty was able to retain much of the power of the Twelfth Dynasty, at least up to his reign.( At some point during the 13th dynasty, Xois and Avaris began governing themselves,( the rulers of Xois being the Fourteenth Dynasty, and the Asiatic rulers of Avaris being the Hyksos of the Fifteenth Dynasty. According to Manetho, this latter revolt occurred during the reign of Neferhoteps successor, IV, though there is no archaeological proof.(Grajetzki. (2006) p. 72) Sobekhotep IV was succeeded by the short reign of V, who was followed by Ibiau, then Ai. Wahibre Ibiau ruled ten years, and Merneferre Ai ruled for twenty three years, the longest of any Thirteenth Dynasty king, but neither of these two kings left as many attestations as either Neferhotep or Sobekhotep IV.(Grajetzki. (2006) p. 74) Despite this, they both seem to have held at least parts of lower Egypt. After Merneferre Ai, however, no king left his name on any object found outside the south.( This begins the final portion of the thirteenth dynasty, when southern kings continue to reign over Upper Egypt, but when the unity of Egypt has fully disintegrated, and the Middle Kingdom gave way to the Intermediate Period.(Grajetzki. (2006) p. 75)AdministrationWhen the Eleventh Dynasty reunified Egypt, it had to create a centralized administration such as had not existed in Egypt since the downfall of the Old Kingdom government. To do this, it appointed people to positions which had fallen out of use in the decentralized First Intermediate Period. Highest among these was the Vizier.(Shaw. (2000) p. 174) The vizier was the chief minister for the king, handling all the day to day business of government in the kings place.( This was a monumental task, therefore it would often be split into two positions, a vizier of the north, and a vizier of the south. It is uncertain how often this occurred during the Middle Kingdom, but Senusret I clearly had two simultaneously functioning viziers.( Other positions were inherited from the provincial form of government at Thebes used by the Eleventh Dynasty before the reunification of Egypt.(Grajetzki. (2006) p. 21) The Overseer of Sealed Goods became the countrys treasurer, and the Overseer of the Estate became the Kings chief steward.( These three positions and the Scribe of the Royal Document, probably the kings personal scribe, appear to be the most important posts of the central government, judging by the monument count of those in these positions.(Beside this, many Old Kingdom posts which had lost their original meaning and become mere honorifics were brought back into the central government.( Only high ranking officials could claim the title Member of the Elite, which had been applied liberally during the First Intermediate Period.(This basic form of administration continued throughout the Middle Kingdom, though there is some evidence for a major reform of the central government under Senusret III. Records from his reign indicate that Upper and Lower Egypt were divided into separate waret and governed by separate administrators.( Administrative documents and private stele indicate a proliferation of new bureaucratic titles around this time, which have been taken as evidence of a larger central government.(Richards. (2005) p. 7) Governance of the royal residence was moved into a separate division of government.( The military was placed under the control of a chief general.( However, it is possible that these titles and positions were much older, and simply were not recorded on funerary stele due to religious conventions.(Provincial GovernmentDecentralization during the First Intermediate Period left the individual Egyptian provinces, or Nomes, under the control of powerful families who held the hereditary title of Great Chief of the Nome, or Nomarch.(Trigger, Kemp, OConnor, and Lloyd. (1983) p. 108) This position developed during the Fifth and Sixth Dynasties, when the various powers of Old Kingdom provincial officials began to be exercised by a single individual.( At roughly this time, the provincial aristocracy began building elaborate tombs for themselves, which have been taken as evidence of the wealth and power which these rulers had acquired as Nomarchs.( By the end of the First Intermediate Period, some nomarchs ruled their nomes as minor potentates, such as the nomarch Nehry of Hermopolis, who dated inscriptions by his own regnal year.(When the Eleventh Dynasty came to power, it was necessary to subdue the power of the Nomarchs if Egypt was to be reunified under a central government. The first major steps towards that end took place under Amenemhet I. Amenemhet made the city, not the nome, the center of administration, and only the haty-a, or mayor, of the larger cities would be permitted to carry the title of Nomarch.( The title of Nomarch continued to be used until the reign of Senusret III,( as did the elaborate tombs indicative of their power, after which they suddenly disappear.(Trigger, Kemp, OConnor, and Lloyd. (1983) p. 112) This has been interpreted several ways. Traditionally, it has been believed that Senusret III took some action to suppress the nomarch families during his reign.(Grimal. (1988) p. 167) Recently, other interpretations have been proposed. Detlef Franke has argued that Senusret II adopted a policy of educating the sons of nomarchs in the capital and appointing them to government posts. In this way, many provincial families may have been bled dry of scions.( Also, while the title of Great Overlord of the Nome disappeared, other distinctive titles of the nomarchs remained. During the First Intermediate Period, individuals holding the title of Great Overlord also often held the title of Overseer of Priests.(Trigger, Kemp, OConnor, and Lloyd. (1983) p. 109) In the late Middle Kingdom, there exist families holding the titles of mayor and overseer of priests as hereditary possessions.( Therefore, it has been argued that the great nomarch families were never subdued, but were simply absorbed into the Pharaonic administration of the country.( While it is true that the large tombs indicative of nomarchs disappear at the end of the twelfth dynasty, grand royal tombs also disappear soon thereafter due to general instability surrounding the decline of the Middle Kingdom.(Agriculture and climateThroughout the history of ancient Egypt, the annual flooding of the River to inundate the fields on its banks was relied upon to feed the population. There is evidence that the collapse of the previous Kingdom may have been due in part to low flood levels, resulting in famine.(Bell. (1975) p. 227) This trend appears to have been reversed during the early years of the Middle Kingdom, with relatively high water levels recorded for much of this era, with an average inundation of 19 meters above its non-flood levels.(Bell. (1975) p. 230) The years of repeated high inundation levels correspond to the most prosperous period of the Middle Kingdom, which occurred during the reign of Amenemhat III.(Bell. (1975) p. 263) This seems to be confirmed in some of the literature of the period, such as in the of Amenemhat, where the king tells his son how agriculture prospered under his reign.(ArtOne of the innovations in sculpture that occurred during the Middle Kingdom was the block statue, which would continue to be popular through to the Ptolemaic age almost 2,000 years later.(Teeter. (1994) p. 27) Block statues consist of a man squatting with his knees drawn up to his chest and his arms folded on top his knees. Often, these men are wearing a wide cloak that reduces the body of the figure to a simple block-like shape.(Bothmer, 94.) Most of the detail is reserved for the head of the individual being depicted. In some instances the modeling of the limbs has been retained by the sculptor.(Shaw, Block Statue.) There are two basic types of block statues: ones with the feet completely covered by the cloak and ones with the feet uncovered.(Late Period, 4-5.)LiteratureB. Parkinson and D. Morenz write that ancient Egyptian literaturenarrowly defined as belles-lettres (beautiful writing)were not recorded in written form until the early Twelfth dynasty of the Middle Kingdom.(; ; see also  and .) Old Kingdom texts served mainly to maintain the divine cults, preserve souls in the afterlife, and document accounts for practical uses in daily life. It was not until the Middle Kingdom that texts were written for the purpose of entertainment and intellectual curiosity.( Parkinson and Morenz also speculate that written works of the Middle Kingdom were transcriptions of the literature of the Old Kingdom.(; .) It is known that some oral poetry was preserved in later writing; for example, litter-bearers songs were preserved as written verses in tomb inscriptions of the Old Kingdom.(.)It is also thought that the growth of the middle class and a growth in the number of scribes needed for the expanded bureaucracy under Senusret II helped spur the development of Middle Kingdom literature,.( Later ancient Egyptians considered the literature from this time as classic.( Stories such as the of the shipwrecked sailor and the of Sinuhe were composed during this period, and were popular enough to be widely copied afterwards.( Many philosophical works were also created at this time, including the between a man and his Ba where an unhappy man converses with his soul, the Satire of the Trades in which the role of the scribe is praised above all other jobs, and the magic tales supposedly told to the Old Kingdom pharaoh Khufu in the Papyrus.( Pharaohs of the Twelfth through Eighteenth Dynasty are credited with preserving for us some of the most fabulous of Egyptian papyri:* 1950 BC &ndash; Wooden Tablet* 1950 BC &ndash; papyri* 1800 BC &ndash; papyrus* 1800 BC &ndash; Moscow Mathematical Papyrus* 1650 BC &ndash; Mathematical Papyrus* 1600 BC &ndash; Smith papyrus* 1550 BC &ndash; papyrusReferences Bibliography * * * * * ** * * * * * * * * * * * Reich (gypten)padahlq (Misir)- Srednja dravaMitj dEgipteeReichriikMedio de EgiptoImperio de EgiptioEmpire gyptienegipatsko kraljevstvoPertengahan Mesiris:MirkiRegnohu:Kzpbirodalom(Egypte)ja:i EgyptMejan egipcianMdioMijlociu Egiptean ( )Kingdom of Egyptrakraljevstvofi:Keskivaltakuntariket ( )zh:
293089
Chester-le-Street
Chester-le-Street ( )() is a town in Durham, England. It has a history going back to Roman times when it was called Concangis. The town is located  south of upon Tyne and  west of Sunderland on the Wear. The Parish Church of St Mary and St Cuthbert is where the body of St Cuthbert was laid to rest for some 112 years before being transferred to Cathedral, and is the site of the first translation of the Gospels into English, Aldred writing the Old English gloss between the lines of the Gospels there.(Selkirk (2000) pp. 339340)It is a town;() markets are held on Tuesdays, Fridays and Saturdays. Until 2009 the town had its own local government district. This was formed by the amalgamation in 1974 of the former Chester-le-Street Urban and Rural Districts. It was abolished in 2009 when Durham became a unitary authority as part of the structural changes to local government in England,()() a move that was controversial at the time.()()HistoryThere is evidence of Age use of the Wear near the town,(Purdon (1992) p. 6) but the history of Chester-le-Steet starts with the Roman fort of Concangis. This was built alongside the Roman road Road (now Front Street) and close to the River Wear, around 100 A.D., and was occupied till the Romans left Britain in 410 A.D. At the time the Wear was navigable to at least Concangis, and may also have provided food for the garrisons stationed there.(Selkirk (2000) pp. 4592)After the Romans left there is no record of who lived there, until 883 when a group of monks, driven out of Lindisfarne seven years earlier, stopped there to build a wooden shrine and church to St Cuthbert, whose body they had borne with them. While they were there the town was the centre of Christianity for much of the northeast, because it was the seat of the of Lindisfarne, making the church a cathedral. There the monks translated into English the Lindisfarne Gospels, which they had brought with them. They stayed for 112 years, leaving in 995 for the safer and more permanent home at Durham.(Selkirk (2000) pp. 337340)The church was rebuilt in stone in 1054, and despite the loss of its bishopric seems to have retained a degree of wealth and influence. In 1080 most of the huts in the town were burned and many people killed in retaliation for the death of Walcher, the first Prince-Bishop, at the hands of an English mob. After this devastation wrought by the Normans the region was left out of the Book; there was little left to record, and the region was by then being run from Durham by the Prince-Bishops so held little interest for London.(Selkirk (2000) p. 354)Cades Road did not fall out of use but was hidden beneath later roads which became the Great North Road, the main route from London and the south to Newcastle and Edinburgh. The towns location on the road played a significant role in its development, as well as its name, as inns sprung up to cater for the travelling trade: both riders and horses needed to rest on journeys usually taking days to complete. This trade reached a peak in the early 19th century as more and more people and new mail services travelled by stagecoach, before falling off with the coming of the railways. The town was bypassed when the A167 was routed around the town, and this was later supplanted by the faster A1(M).(Purdon (1992) p.16)The coal industry also left its mark on the town. From the late 17th century onwards coal was dug in increasing quantities in the region. Mining was centred around the rivers, for transportation by sea to other parts of the country, and Chester-le-Street was at the centre of the coal being dug and shipped away down the Wear, so a centre of coal related communication and commerce. At the same time the growth of the mines and the influx of miners supported local businesses, not just the many inns but new shops and services, themselves bringing in more people to work in them. These people would later work in new industries established in the town to take advantage of its good communications and access to raw materials.(Selkirk (2001) pp. 391427)One of the most tragic episodes in the towns history and that of the coal industry in NE England occurred during a miners strike during the winter of 1811/12.(William Page, The Victoria History of the County of Durham 3 vols (London, 1907), II.153) Collieries owned by the Dean and Chapter of Durham Cathedral were brought to a standstill by the strike, causing much hardship amongst the people of the town. The strike was broken on New Years Day, January 1812, when the Bishop of Durham, Barrington, sent a detachment of troops from Durham Castle to force a return to work. It is thought that this uncharacteristic act by Barrington was due to pressure from the national government in Westminster who were concerned that the strike was affecting industrial output of essential armaments for the Wars.The Jarrow MarchOn the evening of 5 October 1936 the Jarrow marchers stopped at the town centre after their first days walk. The church hall was used to house them before they continued onward the following day.()EtymologyThe Romans called their fort Concangis or Concagium, a Latinisation of the Celtic name for the area, Place of the horse people, which also gave name to the waterway through the town, Burn. The precise name is uncertain as it does not appear in Roman records, but Concangis is the name most used today.(Selkirk (2001) p. 45)(Purdon (1992) p. 8)In Anglo-Saxon times the settlement was called Cuneceastra(Purdon (1992) p. 10) or Conceastre,(Selkirk (2000) p. 337) the name of the burn combined with the English word for a Roman fort. This shortened over time to Chester, the name used locally for the town, or Cestria in Latin.(For example the old bell in St Mary and St Cuthbert is inscribed in Latin Master Robert Ashburn, Dean of Chester, made me. This bell given is thus named Cuthbert) But Chester is a common name for towns in England, and in the Middle Ages Street, for the Roman road, was added. The Universal etymological English dictionary of 1749 gives the town as Chester upon Street (and describes it as a Village in the Bishoprick of Durham).() At some point this was shortened to the modern form.ClimateThe town has a mild climate and gets well below average rainfall relative to the UK. It does though experience occasional floods. To the east of the town the Riverside cricket ground and Riverside park were built on the flood plains of the River Wear, and are often flooded when the river bursts its banks.The town centre is subject to occasional flooding, usually after very heavy rain over the town and surrounding areas, if the rain falls too quickly for it to be drained away by Cong Burn. The flooding occurs at the bottom of Front Street where the Cong Burn passes under the street, after it was enclosed in concrete in 1932.()()LandmarksJohn Leland described Chester-le-Street in the 1530s as: Chiefly one main street of very mean building in height.Defoe echoed the sentiment.St Mary and St Cuthbert churchSt Mary and St Cuthbert church possesses a rare surviving anchorage, one of the best-preserved in the country. It was built for an anchorite, an extreme form of hermit. His or her walled-up cell had only a slit to observe the altar and an opening for food, while outside was an open grave for when the occupant died. It was occupied by six anchorites from 1383 to c. 1538, and is now a museum known as the Ankers House.The north aisle is occupied by a line of Lumley family effigies, only five genuine, assembled c. 1590. Some have been chopped-off to fit and resemble a casualty station at Agincourt, according to Simon Jenkins in his Englands Thousand Best Churches. It is Chester-le-Streets only Grade I building.()Chester Burn viaductThe viaduct to the northwest of the town centre was completed in 1868 for the North Eastern Railway, to enable trains to travel at high speed on a more direct route between Newcastle and Durham. It is over 230m long with 11 arches, now spanning a road and supermarket car-park, and is a Grade II listed building.()Bethel United Reform churchThe small Reform on Low Chare, just off the main Front Street, was built in 1814 as the Bethel Congregational Chapel and remodelled in 1860. It is still in use and is a Grade II listed building.()The Queens Head HotelThe Queens Head Hotel, in a central location on Front Street, was built over 250 years ago when this road was the main route from Edinburgh and Newcastle to the south and London. It is set back from the street and is still one of the largest buildings in the street and so the town centre, and is a Grade II listed building.()SportCricketThe Ground at Chester-le-Street is home to County Cricket Club which became a first class county in 1992.The town also has its own cricket club, Chester-le-Street Cricket Club based at the Lane ground. They are the current Champions of the North East Premier League, won the national ECB 45 over tournament in 2009 and reached the quarter final of the national 20/20 club championship in 2009.()()Rowingthumb|right|180px||Blade colours of Chester-le-Street rowing clubChester-le-Street rowing club is based on the River Wear near the Riverside Cricket ground.Early footballfootball was once played in the town. The game was played annually on Tuesday between the Upstreeters and Downstreeters. Play started at 1pm and finished at 6pm. To start the game, the ball was thrown from a window in the centre of the town and in one game more than 400 players took part. The centre of the street was the dividing line and the winner was the side where the ball was (Up or Down) at 6pm. It was played from the Middle Ages until 1932, when it was outlawed by the police and people trying to carry on the tradition were arrested.(Purdon (1992) pp. 2122)() Football support today is largely divided between Sunderland and United.TransportRoadAt the time of the football matches Front Street was actually the A1 road from London to Edinburgh. A bypass was built in the 1950s, which still exists today as the A167. The bypass road itself was partly bypassed by, and partly incorporated in, the A1(M) motorway in the 1970s.The northern end of Front Street used to be the start of the A6127, which is the road that would continue through Birtley, Gateshead, and eventually over the Bridge and become the A6127(M) central motorway in upon Tyne. However, when the Gateshead-Newcastle Western Bypass of the A1(M) was opened, many roads in this area were renumbered, following the convention that roads originating between single digit A roads take their first digit from the single digit A road in an anticlockwise direction from their point of origin, and Newcastle Road, which was formerly designated A1, is now unclassified. The A6127 was renamed the A167.Car traffic is now banned from the northern part of Front Street and it is restricted to buses only.Railthumb|left|Chester-le-Street Railway Stationrailway station, on the Coast Main Line of the Rail network, between Newcastle and Durham, opened in 1868.()  It offers local connections and cross-country train services.  , train operators serving the station are CrossCountry,  TransPennine Express and Rail.  A local independent company,  Chester-le-Track, has operated the station since 1999, as an agent for Spirit, Trains Northern and Northern Rail.(()( )BusThe town is the original home of The Northern General Bus Company, nowadays North East, and the company still operates from the Picktree Lane Depot. It also pioneered the use of Minilink bus services in the North East in 1985EducationPrimary schools* Lane Primary School* Primary School* CE (Controlled) Junior School* Primary School* Rose Primary School* Pelaw Infant School* Cuthberts RCVA Primary SchoolSecondary schools* Hermitage School* View Community School()Notable people* Former England football captain Robson and his footballing brothers Justin (United and Gateshead) and Gary (West Bromwich).* Football manager and former England international player Todd.* Citys Danny Graham.* Citys Howard.* Sunderlands Leadbitter.* Chelseas Magnay.* Hartlepools Barron.* Hartlepools Mackay.* County F.C. and F.C. footballer Peter Ward.* Purdon, the folk singer and poet, lived here for most of his life although born in Scotland.* Welch of pop group Shadows was brought up here.* Gavin Sutherland, the conductor and pianist, was born and brought up here.* Chambers childrens author, Carnegie Medal and Hans Christian Andersen Award winner, was born in here.* Collingwood, England cricketer and former one-day international captain plays for CCC and lives here.* Clark, Big Brother 9 contestant.* Pearson, UFC fighter, winner of The Ultimate Fighter 9 competition in 2009.* Kevin Geordie Walker, guitarist of post-punk group Joke*KIRSTY LAING Twin Town It is twinned with:* Kamp-Lintfort in Germany. Notes ( References (Bibliography* * External links*Chester-le-Live community website*Cestria Primary School*Chester-le-Street CE(Controlled) Junior*Chester-le-Street Heritage Group local history society*Chester-le-Street Railway Station*Chester-le-Street Scout District*Chester-le-Street shops*Chester-le-Street Town Football Club*Concangis Roman fort or castra*Durham County Cricket Club*The Hermitage School*Newker Primary*Parish Church of St Mary and St Cuthbert*Parkview Community School*Red Rose Primary School*St Cuthberts RC Primaryit:Chester-le-Streetno:Chester-le-Streetnn:Chester-le-Streetpl:Chester-le-Streetro:Chester-le-Streetvo:Chester-le-Street
294429
First_Balkan_War
 campaignbox  The First Balkan War, which lasted from October 1912 to May 1913, pitted the League (Serbia, Greece, Montenegro and Bulgaria) against the Empire. The combined armies of the Balkan states overcame the numerically inferior and strategically disadvantaged Ottoman armies and achieved rapid success. As a result of the war, almost all remaining European territories of the Ottoman Empire were captured and partitioned among the allies. Ensuing events also led to the creation of an independent Albanian state. Despite its success, Bulgaria was dissatisfied over the division of the spoils in Macedonia, which provoked the start of the Balkan War. Background Tensions among the Balkan states over their rival aspirations to the provinces of  Ottoman-controlled Rumelia, namely Rumelia, Thrace and Macedonia, subsided somewhat following intervention by the Powers in the mid-19th century, aimed at securing both more complete protection for the provinces Christian majority and protection of the quo. By 1867, Serbia and Montenegro had both secured their independence, which was confirmed by the Treaty of Berlin a decade later. But the question of the viability of Ottoman rule was revived after the Turk Revolution of July 1908, which compelled the Sultan to restore the suspended Ottoman constitution, and the significant developments in the years 190911.Serbias aspirations towards and Herzegovina were thwarted by the Austrian annexation of the province in October 1908, whereupon the Serbs focused their expansionist attentions to the south. Following the annexation, the Turks tried to induce the Muslim population of Bosnia to emigrate to the Ottoman Empire. Those who took up the offer were settled by the Ottoman authorities in those districts of northern Macedonia where the Muslim population was weak. The experiment proved to be a catastrophe for the Empire since the immigrants readily united with the existing population of Albanian Muslims in the series of Albanian uprisings before and during the spring of 1912. Some government troops who were ethnic Albanians switched sides, joining with the revolutionaries. In May 1912, after driving the Ottomans out of Skopje, the Albanian revolutionaries pressed south towards Manastir (present day Bitola), forcing the Ottomans to cede large regions in June 1912. For Serbia this posed a struggle against time to avoid the creation of the Albanian state.On 18 October 1912, I of Serbia issued a declaration To the Serbian People:The timetable of the creation of the Balkan League indicates that the increasing prewar understanding between Serbia and Bulgaria persisted parallel to the success of the Albanian Uprising, making the uprising the triggering issue behind the Serbo-Bulgarian agreement and therefore the Balkan Wars. On the other hand, Bulgaria used the favorable timing in forcing Serbia to come to painful compromises regarding its aspirations toward Macedonia, since the party under time pressure was Serbia.(The war correspondence of Leon Trotsky: The Balkan Wars 1912-13, 1980, p.221) The agreement provided that, in the event of a victorious war against the Ottomans, Bulgaria would receive all of Macedonia south of the Palanka-Ohrid line. Serbias expansion was to be to the north of this line, including Kosovo, and out to the coast of the Adriatic Sea to the west. This included the northern half of modern Albania, giving Serbia access to the sea. If Serbia intended to honour the treaty, then it had sold Macedonia to buy Albania.After the successful dtat for unification with Rumelia,(Bismarcks Diplomacy at Its Zenith,Joseph Vincent Fulle, 2005 p.22) Bulgaria had orchestrated a methodical scenario of indirect expansion through the creation, in the multiethnic Ottoman-held Macedonia, of a revolutionary organization, the IMRO, allegedly without national colour. IMROs rhetoric claimed to be speaking generally for liberation on behalf of the Macedonian People, declaring its anti-chauvinism. In fact, it was a Bulgarian backed organization created with a secret agenda to facilitate the incorporation of Thrace (Eastern and Western) and Macedonia (Aegean and Vardar) into a new autonomous state, as an intermediate step before the unification with Bulgaria could take place in the same way as had taken place with Eastern Rumelia. After an initial success, Serbia and especially Greece realized the true purpose of IMRO and consequently a vicious guerilla war (see Struggle) broke out between Bulgarian- and Greek-backed groups within Macedonia, ending when the Young Turks movement, with its initially democratic and modernization agenda, came into power in the Ottoman Empire. Bulgaria then turned to the more orthodox method of expansion through winning a war, built a large army for that purpose, and started to see itself as the Prussia of the Balkans.(Emile Joseph Dillon, The Inside Story of the Peace Conference, Ch. XV) But even so, it was clear that Bulgaria could not win a war against the Ottomans alone.In Greece, Army officers had revolted in August 1909 and secured the appointment of a progressive government under Venizelos, which they hoped would resolve the Cretan issue in Greeces favour and reverse their defeat of 1897 at the hands of the Ottomans. An emergency military reorganization led by a French military mission had been started for that purpose, but its work was interrupted by the outbreak of war. In the discussions that led Greece to join the League, Bulgaria refused to commit to any agreement on the distribution of territorial gains, unlike the deal with Serbia over Macedonia. Bulgarias diplomatic policy was to push Serbia into an agreement limiting its access to Macedonia,(The making of a new Europe, 1981, Hugh Seton-Watson & Christopher Seton-Watson p.116) while at the same time refusing any such agreement with Greece, believing that its army would be able to occupy the larger part of Aegean Macedonia and the important port city of Salonica (Thessaloniki) before the Greeks.In 1911, Italy had launched an invasion of Tripolitania, which was quickly followed by the occupation of the Dodecanese Islands. The Italians decisive military victories over the Ottoman Empire greatly influenced the Balkan states towards the possibility of winning a war against the Ottomans. Thus in the spring and summer of 1912 these consultations between the various Christian Balkan nations had resulted in a network of military alliances which became known as the League.The Great Powers, most notably France and Austria-Hungary, reacted to this diplomatic grouping by trying to dissuade the League from going to war, but failed. In late September, both the League and the Ottoman Empire mobilized their armies. Montenegro was the first to declare war, on September 25 (O.S.)/October 8. The other three states, after issuing an impossible ultimatum to the Porte on October 13, declared war on the Empire on October 17. Order of battle and plans The Ottoman of battle when the war broke out constituted from a total of 12,024 officers 324,718 men, 47,960 animals, 2,318 artillery pieces and 388 machine guns. From these a total 920 officers and 42,607 men had been assigned in non-divisional units and services, the remained 293,206 officers and men being assigned into four Armies.() Opposing them and in continuation of their secret prewar settlements of expansion between them, the three Slavic allies (Bulgarian, Serbs and Montenegrins) had led out extensive plans to coordinate their war efforts: the Serbs and  Montenegrins in the theater of Sandak, the Bulgarians and Serbs in the Macedonian and Thracian theaters. The bulk of the Bulgarian forces (346,182 men) was targeting Thrace, pitted against the Thracian Ottoman Army of 96,273 men and about 26,000 garrison troops(The war between Bulgaria and Turkey 1912-1913, Volume II, Ministry of War 1928, pp. 659-663) or about 115,000 in total, according to both Halls, Ericksons and the Turkish Gen. Staffs study of 1993, books. The remaining Ottoman army of about 200,000(Erickson (2003), p. 170) was located in Macedonia, pitted against the Serbian (234,000 Serbs and 48,000 Bulgarians under the Serbians orders) and Greek (115,000 men) armies, and divided into the Vardar and Macedonian Ottoman armies with independent static guards around the fortress cities of Yanina (against the Greeks in Epirus) and Scutari (against the Montenegrins in north Albania). Bulgaria Bulgaria was militarily the most powerful of the four states, with a large, well-trained and well-equipped army.(Hall (2000), p. 16) Bulgaria mobilized a total of 599,878 men out of a population of 4.3 million.(Hall (2000), p. 18) The Bulgarian field army counted for nine infantry divisions, one cavalry division and 1,116 artillery units.(Hall (2000), p. 16) Commander in Chief was Tsar Ferdinand, while the actual command was in the hands of his deputy, General Michail Savov. The Bulgarians also possessed a small navy of six torpedo boats, which were restricted to operations along the countrys Sea coast.(Hall (2000), p. 17)Bulgarias war aims were focused on Thrace and Macedonia. It deployed its main force in Thrace, forming three armies. The First Army (79,370 men), under general Kutinchev with three infantry divisions, was deployed to the south of Yambol, with direction of operations along the Tundzha river. The Second Army (122,748 men), under general Ivanov, with two infantry divisions and one infantry brigade, was deployed west of the First and was assigned to capture the strong fortress of Adrianople (Edirne). According to the plans, the Third Army (94,884 men), under general Dimitriev, was deployed east of and behind the First, and was covered by the cavalry division hiding it from the Turkish view. The Third Army had three infantry divisions and was assigned to cross the Stranja mountain and to take the fortress of Kilisse. The 2nd (49,180) and 7th (48,523 men) divisions were assigned independent roles, operating in Thrace and eastern Macedonia respectively. Serbia Serbia called upon about 255,000 men (out of a population of 2,912,000 people) with about 228 guns, grouped in 10 infantry divisions, two independent brigades and a cavalry division, under the effective command of former War Minister Putnik.(Hall (2000), p. 18) The Serbian High Command, in its pre-war wargames, had concluded that the likeliest site of the decisive battle against the Ottoman Army would be on the Pole plateau, before Skopje. Hence, the main forces were formed in three armies for the advance towards Skopje, while a division and an independent brigade were to cooperate with the Montenegrins in the of Novi Pazar.The First Army (132,000 men) was commanded by General Bojovi, and was the strongest in number and force, forming the center of the drive towards Skopje. The Second Army (74,000 men) was commanded by General Stepanovi, and consisted of one Serbian and one Bulgarian (7th Rila) division. It formed the left wing of the Army and advanced towards Stracin. The inclusion of a Bulgarian division was according to a pre-war arrangement between Serbian and Bulgarian armies, but that division ceased to obey orders of Gen. Stepanovi as soon as the war began, followed only the orders of the Bulgarian High Command. The Third Army (76,000 men) was commanded by General Jankovi and, being the right-wing army, had the task to liberate Kosovo and then join the other armies in the expected battle at the Ove Polje. There were also two other concentrations in northwestern Serbia across the Serbo-Austrohungarian borders, the Ibar Army (25,000 men) under General Mihail Zhivkovich and the Javor brigade (12,000 men) under Lt Colonel Milovoje Anelkovi. Greece Greece, a state of 2,666,000 people,(Erickson (2003), p. 70) was considered the weakest of the three main allies, since it fielded the smallest army and had suffered an easy defeat against the Ottomans 16 years before in the War of 1897. A British consular dispatch from 1910 illustrates the common perception of the Greek Armys capabilities at the time: if there is war we shall probably see that the only thing Greek officers can do besides talking is to run away.(Fotakis (2005), p. 42) However Greece was the only Balkan country to possess a substantial navy. This was vital to the League, as it could prevent Ottoman reinforcements from being rapidly transferred by ship from Asia to Europe. This fact was readily appreciated by the Serbs and Bulgarians, and was the chief factor in initiating the process of Greeces inclusion in their alliance.(Fotakis (2005), p. 44) As the Greek ambassador to Sofia put it during the subsequent negotiations that led to Greeces entry in the League: Greece can provide 600,000 men for the war effort. 200,000 men in the field, and the fleet will be able to stop 400,000 men being landed by Turkey between Salonica and Gallipoli.(Hall (2000), p. 17) The Greek Army was still undergoing reorganization by a French military mission, called in 1911, when the war began. Under its supervision, the Greeks had adopted the triangular infantry division as their main formation, but more importantly, the overhaul of the mobilization system allowed the country to field and equip a far greater number of troops than it had in 1897: while foreign observers estimated a mobilized force of approximately 50,000 men, the Greek Army fielded 125,000, with another 140,000 in the National Guard and reserves.(( Upon mobilization, as in 1897, this force was grouped in two field armies, reflecting the geographic division between the two operational theaters open to the Greeks: Thessaly and Epirus. The Army of Thessaly ( ) was placed under Crown Prince Constantine, with Lt Gen Danglis as his chief of staff. It fielded the bulk of the Greek forces, seven infantry divisions, a cavalry regiment and four independent Evzones battalions, roughly 100,000 men. It was expected to overcome the fortified Ottoman border positions and advance towards south and central Macedonia, aiming to take Thessaloniki and Bitola. Further 10,000 to 13,000 men in eight battalions were assigned to the Army of Epirus ( ) under Lt Gen Sapountzakis. As it had no hope of capturing the heavily fortified capital of Epirus, Ioannina, its initial mission was simply to pin down the Ottoman forces there until sufficient reinforcements could be sent from the Army of Thessaly after its successful conclusion of operations.armored cruiser Averof, flagship of the Greek fleet. At the time, she was the most modern warship of all combatant navies, and played a crucial role in the operations in the Aegean Sea.The Greek Navy was relatively modern, strengthened by the recent purchase of numerous new units and undergoing reforms under the supervision of a British mission. Invited by Prime Minister Venizelos in 1910, the mission began its work upon its arrival in May 1911. Granted extraordinary powers and under the energetic leadership of Vice Admiral Grand Tufnell, it thoroughly reorganized the Navy Ministry and dramatically improved the number and quality of exercises in gunnery and fleet maneuvers.(Fotakis (2005), pp. 2535) In 1912, the core unit of the fleet was the fast cruiser Averof, completed in 1910 and at that time the fastest and most modern ship of the line in the combatant navies.(Fotakis (2005), p. 45) It was complemented by three rather antiquated battleships of the Hydra class. There were also eight destroyers built in 19061907, and six new destroyers that were hastily bought in summer 1912 as the imminence of war became apparent.(However, at the outbreak of the war, the Greek fleet was still far from ready.  The Ottoman battlefleet retained a clear advantage in number of ships, speed of the main surface units and, more importantly, in the number and caliber of the ships guns.(Fotakis (2005), pp. 4546) In addition, as the war caught the fleet in the middle of its expansion and reorganization, fully a third of the fleet (the six new destroyers and the submarine Delfin) only reached Greece after hostilities had started, necessitating a reshuffling of crews and leading to a lack of necessary familiarization and training time. Coal stockpiles and other war stores were in short supply, while the Averof herself had arrived with barely any ammunition, and would remain so until late November.(Fotakis (2005), p. 46) Ottoman Empire In 1912, the Ottomans found themselves in a difficult position. They had a large population, 26 million, but only just over 6.1 million of them lived in the European part of the Empire, and of these only 2.3 million were Muslims, the rest being Christians, considered unfit for conscription. The very poor transport network, especially in the Asian part, dictated that the only reliable way for a mass transfer of troops to the European theater was by sea, but that was under question due to the presence of the Greek fleet in the Aegean Sea. They were also still engaging in a protracted war with the Italians in Libya (and by now in the Dodecanese islands of the Aegean), which had dominated the Ottoman military effort for over a year and would last until 15 October, a few days after the outbreak of hostilities in the Balkans. They were therefore unable to significantly reinforce their positions in the Balkans as the relations with the Balkan states deteriorated over the course of the year.(Hall (2000), p. 19) Ottoman forces in the Balkans The Ottomans military capabilities were hampered by a number of factors, beginning with domestic strife, caused by the Turk Revolution and the counter-revolutionary coup several months later (see (1909) and March Incident). This resulted in different groups competing for influence within the military. An effort had been made to reorganize the army by a German mission, but its effects had not taken hold, and the Ottoman army was caught in the midst of reform and reorganization. In addition, several of the armys best battalions had been transferred to Yemen to face the ongoing rebellion there, and in the summer of 1912, the Ottoman High Command took the disastrous decision to dismiss some 70,000 mobilized troops.(Hall (2000), p. 18)(Uyar & Erickson (2009), pp. 225226) The regular army (Nizam) was composed of well-equipped and trained active divisions, but the reserve units (Redif) that reinforced it were ill-equipped, especially in artillery, and badly trained.The Ottomans strategic situation was difficult, as their borders were almost impossible to defend against a co-ordinated attack by the Balkan states. Nevertheless, the Ottoman leadership decided to defend the entirety of their territory. As  a result, the available forceswhich could not be easily reinforced from Asia due to Greek control of the sea and the inadequacy of the Ottoman railway systemwere dispersed too thinly across the region and failed to stand up to the rapidly mobilized Balkan armies.(Uyar & Erickson (2009), pp. 226227) The Ottomans had three armies in Europe (the Macedonian, Vardar and Thracian Armies) with 1,203 pieces of mobile and 1,115 fixed artillery on fortified areas. The Ottoman High Command repeated the error of previous wars in neglecting the established command structure and creating new superior commands, the Eastern Army and Western Army, reflecting the division of the operational theater between the Thracian (against the Bulgarians) and Macedonian (against Greeks, Serbs and Montenegrins) fronts.(Uyar & Erickson (2009), pp. 227228)Western Army fielded at least 200,000 men(Erickson (2003), p. 170) while the Eastern Army fielded 115,000 men against the Bulgarian Army.(Hall (2000), p. 22) The Eastern Army was deployed against the Bulgarians. It was commanded by Nazim Pasa and numbered seven corps of 11 Regular Infantry, 13 Redif and 1+ Cavalry divisions:* I Corps with three divisions (2nd Infantry (minus regiment), 3rd Infantry and 1st Provisional divisions).* II Corps with three divisions (4th (minus regiment) and 5th Infantry and Uak Redif divisions).* III Corps with four divisions (7th, 8th and 9th Infantry Divisions, all minus a regiment, and the Afyonkarahisar Redif Division).* IV Corps with three divisions (12th Infantry Division (minus regiment), zmit and Bursa Redif divisions).* XVII Corps with three divisions (Samsun, Ereli and zmir Redif divisions).* Edirne Fortified Area with six-plus divisions (10th and 11th Infantry, Edirne, Babaeski and Gmlcine Redif and the Fortress division, 4th Rifle and 12th Cavalry regiments).* Detachment with two-plus divisions (Krcaali Redif, Krcaali Mustahfz division and 36th Infantry Regiment).* An independent cavalry division and the 5th Light Cavalry BrigadeThe Western Army (Macedonian and Army) was composed of ten corps with 32 infantry and two cavalry divisions.Against the Serbs the Ottomans deployed the Army (HQ in Skopje under Halepli Zeki Pasha) with five Corps of 18 Infantry divisions, one cavalry division and two independent cavalry brigades under the:* V Corps with four divisions  (13th, 15th, 16th Infantry and the tip Redif divisions)* VI Corps with four divisions (17th, 18th Infantry and the Manastr and Drama Redif divisions)* VII Corps with three division (19th Infantry and skp and Pritine Redif divisions)* II Corps with three divisions (Uak, Denizli and zmir Redif divisions)* Sandak Corps with four divisions (20th Infantry (minus regiment), 60th Infantry, Metrovia Redif Division, Talca Redif Regiment, Firzovik and Taslica detachments)* An independent Cavalry Division and the 7th and 8th Cavalry Brigades.The Macedonian Army (HQ in Thessaloniki under Rizah Pasha) was composed of 14 divisions in five corps detailed against Greece, Bulgaria and Montenegro.Against Greece, seven-plus divisions were deployed:* VIII Provisional Corps with three divisions (22nd Infantry and Nasli and Aydn Redif divisions).* Corps with three divisions (23rd Infantry, Yanya Redif and Bizani Fortress divisions).* Selanik Redif division and Detachment as independent units.Against Bulgaria in south-eastern Macedonia, two divisions forming the Corps (14th Infantry and Serez Redif divisions, plus the Detachment) were deployed.Against Montenegro, four-plus divisions were deployed:* Corps with two-plus divisions (24th Infantry, Elbasan Redif, kodra Fortified Area)* Detachment with two divisions (21st Infantry and Prizren Redif divisions)According to the organizational plan the men of the Western Group had to number 598,000. But slow mobilization procedures and the poor railroad efficiency reduced drastically the available men, so that when war began, according to the Western Army Staff there were only 200,000 men available.( Although during the next period more men reached the units, due to the war casualties, the Western Group never came near its nominal strength. In time of war the Ottomans planned to bring more troops in from Syria, both Nizamiye and Redif.( Greek naval supremacy however prevented those reinforcements from arriving. Instead those soldiers had to deploy via the land route, and most never made it to the Balkans.(Uyar & Erickson (2009), p. 227)The Ottoman General Staff, assisted by the German Military Mission, developed 12 war plans, designed to counter various combinations of opponents. Work on plan No. 5, which was against a combination of Bulgaria, Greece, Serbia and Montenegro, was very advanced, and had been sent to the Army staffs for them to develop local plans.(Erickson (2003), p. 62) State of the Ottoman Navy Hayreddin, the Ottoman flagship (pictured here) and her sister Turgut Reis were more heavily protected and had more and heavier primary armament than Averof, but were five knots slower.The Ottoman fleet had performed abysmally in the War of 1897, forcing the Ottoman government to begin a drastic overhaul. Older ships were retired and newer ones acquired, chiefly from France and Germany. In addition, in 1907 the Ottomans called in a British naval mission to update their training and doctrine.(Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), pp. 914) The mission, headed by Admiral Sir Gamble, would find its task almost impossible however. To a large extent this was due to the political upheaval in the aftermath of the Turk Revolution; it is indicative that between 1908 and 1911, the office of Navy Minister changed hands nine times. Inter-departmental infighting and the entrenched interests of the bloated and over-aged officer corps, many of whom occupied their positions as a quasi-sinecure, further obstructed drastic reform. In addition, British attempts to control the Navys construction programme were met with suspicion by the Ottoman ministers, and funds for Gambles ambitious plans for new ships were not available.(Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), pp. 1415)To counter the Greek acquisition of the Averof, the Ottomans tried to buy the new German armoured cruiser  or even the battlecruiser . When these moves failed due to the ships exorbitant costs, the Ottomans acquired two old Brandenburg-class battleships, which became Barbaros Hayreddin and Turgut Reis.(Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), pp. 1617) Along with the cruisers Hamidiye and Mecidye, these two ships formed the core of the Ottoman fleet.(Erickson (2003), p. 131) By the summer of 1912 however, they were already in a poor state due to chronic neglect: the rangefinders and ammunition hoists had been removed, the telephones were not working, the pumps were corroded, and most of the watertight doors could no longer be closed.(Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), p. 20) Operations Montenegro started the First Balkan War by declaring war against the Ottomans on . Bulgarian theater of operations File:Yaroslav Veshin - Na nozh.jpg|200px|thumb|Bulgarians overrun the Ottoman positions en bayonette, by the Czech painter  Vn.The western region of the Balkans, including Albania, Kosovo, and Macedonia was less important to the resolution of the war and the survival of the Ottoman Empire than the Thracian theater, where the Bulgarians fought major battles against the Ottoman forces. But although the geography dictated that Thrace would be the major battlefield in a war with the Ottoman Empire,(Hall (2000),p. 22) the position of the Ottoman Army there was jeopardized by erroneous intelligence estimates of their opponents order of battle. Unaware of the secret prewar political and military settlement over Macedonia between Bulgaria and Serbia, the Ottoman leadership assigned the bulk of their forces there. The German ambassador Hans Baron von Wangenheim, one of the most influential people in the Ottoman capital, had reported to Berlin on October 21 that the Ottoman forces believed that the bulk of the Bulgarian army would be deployed in Macedonia with the Serbs. Subsequently the Ottoman HQ under Abdullah Pasha expected to meet only three Bulgarian infantry divisions, accompanied by cavalry, east of Adrianople.(Erickson (2003), p. 85) According to E. J. Erickson this assumption possibly resulted from their analysis of the objectives of the Balkan Pact - but it had deadly consequences for the Ottoman Army in Thrace, which would have to defend the area against the bulk of the Bulgarian army against impossible odds.(Erickson (2003), p. 86) This misappraisal was also the reason of the catastrophic aggressive Ottoman strategy at the start of the campaign in Thrace.Bulgarian offensive and advance to atalcaIn the Thracian front the Bulgarian army  had placed 346,182 men against the Ottoman 1st Army with 105,000 men in eastern Thrace and the Kircaali detachment of 24,000 men in western Thrace. The Bulgarian forces were divided into the 1st (Lt. Gen. Kutinchev), 2nd (Lt. Gen. Ivanov) and 3rd (Lt. Gen. Dimitriev) Bulgarian Armies of 297,002 men in the eastern part and 49,180 (33,180 regulars and 16,000 irregulars) under the 2nd Bulgarian Division (Gen. Stilian Kovachev) in the western part.(Hall (2000), pp. 22-24) The first large-scale battle occurred against the Adrianople-Kilisse defensive line, where the Bulgarian 1st and 3rd Armies (together 174,254 men) defeated the Ottoman East Army (of 96,273 combatants),(Hall (2000), p. 22-24)(The war between Bulgaria and Turkey 1912-1913, Volume II Ministry of War 1928, p.660) near Gechkenli, Seliolu and Petra. The Ottoman XV Corps urgently left the area to defend the peninsula against an expected Greek amphibious assault, which in the event never materialized.(Erickson (2003), p. 82) The absence of this Corps created an immediate vacuum between Adrianople and Demotika, and the 11th Infantry Division from the Eastern Armys IV Corps was moved there to replace it. Thus one complete army corps was removed from the Eastern Armys order of battle.(Erickson (2003), p. 82) As a consequence of the insufficient intelligence on the invading forces, the Ottoman offensive plan failed completely in the face of Bulgarian superiority forcing Pasha to abandon Kirk Kilisse, which was taken without resistance by the Bulgarian Third Army.( The fortress of Adrianople, with some 61,250 men, was isolated and besieged by the Bulgarian Second Army, although for the time being no assault was possible due to the lack of siege equipment in the Bulgarian inventory.(Seton-Watson (1917), p. 238) Another consequence of the Greek naval supremacy in Aegean was that the Ottoman forces did not receive the reinforcements projected in the war plans, consisting of a further corps to be transferred by sea from Syria and Palestine.(Erickson (2003), p. 333) Thus the Greek Navy played a crucial albeit indirect role in the Thracian campaign, by neutralizing three corps, a significant portion of the Ottoman Army, in the all-important opening round of the war.( Another, more direct role, was the emergency transportation of the Bulgarian 7th Rila Division from the Macedonian to the Thracian front after the termination of the operations there.(Seton-Watson (1917), p. 202)File:Chataldzha attack.jpg|250px|right|thumb|The Bulgarian attack at atalca.After the battle of Kirk Kilisse the Bulgarian high command decided to wait a few days, a decision which allowed the Ottoman forces to occupy a new defensive position on the Luleburgaz-Karaagach-Bunarhisar line. Despite this, the Bulgarian attack by First and Third Army which together accounted for 107,386 rifleman, 3,115 cavalry, 116 machine guns and 360 artillery pieces defeated the reinforced Ottoman Army consisting of 126,000 riflemen, 3,500 cavalry, 96 machine guns and 342 artillery pieces(Erickson (2003), p.102) and reached the of Marmara. In terms of forces engaged it was the largest battle fought in Europe between the end of the War and the beginning of the World War.(Erickson (2003), p.102) As a result of it the Ottoman forces were pushed to their final defensive position across the atalca Line protecting the peninsula on which Constantinople is located. There they succeeded in stabilizing the front with the help of fresh reinforcements from the Asian provinces. The line had been constructed during the War of 1877-8 under the directions of a German engineer in Ottoman service, von Bluhm Pasha, but was considered obsolete by 1912.(Hall (2000), p. 32)Meanwhile the forces of the Bulgarian 2nd Thracian division, 49,180 men divided into the Haskovo and Rhodope detachments, advanced toward the Aegean Sea. The Ottoman Kircaali detachment (Kircaali Redif and Kircaali Mustahfiz Divisions and 36th Regiment with 24,000 men), tasked with defending a 400 km front across the Thessaloniki-Dedeagach railroad, failed to offer serious resistance and on 26 November their commander Yaver Pasha was captured together with 10,131 officers and men by Volunteer Corps. After the occupation of Thessaloniki by the Greek army, his surrender completed the isolation of the Ottoman forces in Macedonia from those in Thrace.File:Chataldja armistice.jpg|250px|right|thumb|The delegates at the atalca amistice, General Fichev, Pasha and General Savov are seen in the first row.On , the offensive against the atalca Line began, despite clear warnings from Russia that if the Bulgarians occupied Constantinople it would attack them. The Bulgarians launched their attack along the defensive line with 176,351 men and 462 artillery pieces against the Ottomans 140,571 men and 316 artillery pieces,( but despite Bulgarian superiority, the Ottomans succeeded to repulse them. An armistice was consequently agreed on  between the Ottomans and Bulgaria, the latter also representing Serbia and Montenegro, and peace negotiations began in London. Greece also participated in the conference, but refused to agree to a truce, continuing its operations in the Epirus sector. The negotiations were interrupted on , when a Young Turk coup dtat in Constantinople under Pasha overthrew the government of Pasha. Upon expiration of the armistice, on , hostilities recommenced. Ottoman counteroffensive On 20 February Ottoman forces began their attack, both in atalca and south, at Gallipoli. There the Ottoman X Corps, with 19,858 men and 48 guns, landed at arky, at the same time as an attack of around 15,000 men supported by 36 guns (part of the 30,000-strong Ottoman army isolated in the Gallipoli peninsula) at Bulair further south. Both attacks were supported by fire from Ottoman warships, and were intended in the long term to relieve pressure on Adrianople. Confronting them were about 10,000 men with 78 guns.(Erickson (2003), p. 262) The Ottomans were probably unaware of the presence in the area of the newly-formed 4th Bulgarian Army of 92,289 men under General Kovachev. The Ottoman attack in the thin isthmus, with a front of just 1,800m, was hampered by thick fog and strong Bulgarian artillery and machine gunfire. As a result the attack stalled, and was repulsed by a Bulgarian counterattack. By the end of the day both armies had returned to their original positions. Meanwhile the Ottoman X Corps, which had landed at arky, advanced until by  the reinforcements sent by General Kovachev succeeded in halting them. Casualties on both sides were light. After the failure of the frontal attack in Bulair, the Ottoman forces at arky re-embarked into their ships on 11 February and were transported to Gallipoli.The Ottoman attack at atalca, directed against the powerful Bulgarian First and Third Armies, was initially launched only as a diversion from the Gallipoli-arky operation, pinning down the Bulgarian forces situ. Nevertheless, it resulted in unexpected success. In the north the Bulgarians were forced to withdraw about 15 km and to the south over 20 km to their secondary defensive positions. With the end of the attack in Gallipoli the Ottomans cancelled the operation, reluctant to leave the atalca Line, but several days passed before the Bulgarians realized that the offensive was over. By February 15 the front had again stabilized but the fighting along the static lines continued until the armistice. The battle, which resulted in heavy Bulgarian casualties, could be characterized as an Ottoman victory at the tactical level, but strategically it was a failure, since it did nothing to prevent the failure of the Gallipoli-arky operation or relieve the pressure on Adrianople. Fall of Adrianople and Serbo-Bulgarian friction The failure of the arky-Bulair operation and the deployment of the 2nd Serbian Army together with its much needed heavy siege artillery sealed Adrianoples fate. On 11 March after a two weeks bombardment that destroyed much of the fortified structures around the city, the final assault started with Allied forces enjoying a crushing superiority over the Ottoman garrison. Under the command of General Ivanov, the Bulgarian 2nd Army with 106,425 men and two Serb divisions with 47,275 men eventually conquered the city, but at a high price: the Bulgarians suffering 8,093 and the Serbs 1,462 casualties.(The war between Bulgaria and Turkey 1912-1913, Volume V, Ministry of War 1930, p.1057) The Ottoman casualties for the entire Adrianople campaign reached 13,000 killed. The number of prisoners is less clear. The Ottoman Enpire began the war with 61,250 men in the Adrianople fortress.(Erickson (2003), p. 281) Richard Hall notes that 60,000 men were captured. Adding to the 13,000 killed, the modern Turkish General Staff History notes that 28,500 man survived captivity(Turkish General Staff, Edirne Kalesi Etrafindaki Muharebeler, p286) leaving only 20,000 men unaccounted( as possibly captured (including the unspecified number of wounded). Bulgarian losses for the entire Adrianople campaign amounted to 18,282. According to both R.C. Hall and E.J. Erickson, the assault was an unnecessary bloodshed, it was more of a political decision and took place only to inflate the national pride of Tsar Ferdinand and some Bulgarian politicians, since the fortress would have to surrender anyhow by the end of the month due to starvation. The most important result however was that now the Ottoman command lost all hopes of regaining the initiative, which made any further fighting pointless.(The war between Bulgaria and Turkey 1912-1913, Volume V, Ministry of War 1930, p. 1053)The battle had major and key results in the Serbo-Bulgarian relations putting the seeds of the countries confrontation some months later. The Bulgarian censor rigorously cut any references about the Serbian participation in the operation in the telegrams of the foreign correspondents. The public opinion in Sofia thus failed to realise the crucial services Serbia rendered in the battle. Accordingly the Serbs claimed that their troops of the 20th Regiment were those who captured the Ottoman commander of the city, and that Colonel Gavrilovi was the allied officer who accepted Shukris official surrender of the garrison, a statement that Bulgarians disputed. Subsequently the Serbs officially protested, pointing out that although they had sent their troops to Adrianople to win for Bulgaria territory the acquisition of which had never been foreseen by their mutual treaty,(Seton-Watson, pp. 210238) the Bulgarians had never fulfilled the clause of the treaty requiring Bulgaria to send 100,000 men to help the Serbians in their Vardar front. The Bulgarians answered that their staff had informed the Serbs about that on 23 August. The friction escalated some weeks later when the Bulgarian delegates in London bluntly warned the Serbs that they must not expect Bulgarian support on their Adriatic claims. The Serbs angrily replied that that was a clear withdrawal from the prewar agreement of mutual understanding according to the Kriva Palanka-Adriatic line of expansion, but the Bulgarians insisted that in their view, the Vardar Macedonian part of the agreement remained active and that the Serbs were still obliged to surrender the area as agreed.( The Serbs answered by accusing the Bulgarians of maximalism, pointing out that if they lost both northern Albania and Vardar Macedonia, their participation in the common war would had been virtually for nothing. The tension soon was expressed in a series of hostile incidents between the two armies along their common line of occupation across the Vardar valley. The developments essentially ended the Serbo-Bulgarian alliance and made a future war between the two countries inevitable. Greek theater of operations Macedonian frontOttoman intelligence had also disastrously misread Greek military intentions. In retrospect, it would appear that the Ottoman staffs believed that the Greek attack would be shared equally between the two major avenues of approach, Macedonia and Epirus. The 2nd Army staff had therefore evenly balanced the combat strength of the seven Ottoman divisions between the Yanya Corps and VIII Corps, in Epirus and southern Macedonia respectively. The Greek Army also fielded seven divisions, but, having the initiative, concentrated all seven against VIII Corps, leaving only a number of independent battalions of scarcely divisional strength in the Epirus front. This had fatal consequences for the Western Group of Armies, since it led to the early loss of the strategic center of all three Macedonian fronts, the city of Thessaloniki, a fact that sealed their fate.(Erickson (2003), p. 215) In an unexpectedly brilliant and rapid campaign, the Army of Thessaly seized the city. In the absence of secure sea lines of communications, the retention of the Thessaloniki-Constantinople corridor was essential to the overall strategic posture of the Ottoman Empire in the Balkans. Once this was gone, the defeat of the Ottoman Army became inevitable. To be sure, the Bulgarians and the Serbs played an important role in the defeat of the main Ottoman armies. Their great victories at Kirkkilise, Luleburgaz, Kumanovo, and Monastir shattered the Eastern and Vardar Armies. However, these victories were not decisive in the sense that they ended the war. The Ottoman field armies survived, and in Thrace, they actually grew stronger day by day. In the strategic point of view these victories were enabled partially by the weakened condition of the Ottoman armies brought about by the active presence of the Greek army and fleet.(Erickson (2003), p. 334)File:Greek infantry 1912.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Greek infantrymen in the of Sarantaporos.With the declaration of war, the Greek Army of Thessaly under Crown Prince Constantine advanced to the north, successfully overcoming Ottoman opposition in the fortified Straits of Sarantaporo. After another victory at Yenidje/Giannitsa on , the Ottoman commander Tahsin Pasha surrendered Thessaloniki and its garrison of 26,000 men to the Greeks on . Two Corps HQs (Ustruma and VIII), two Nizamiye divisions (14th and 22nd) and four Redif divisions (Salonika, Drama, Naslic and Serez) were thus lost to the Ottoman order of battle. Additionally, the Ottoman forces lost 70 artillery pieces, 30 machine guns and 70,000 rifles (Thessaloniki was the central arms depot for the Western Armies). The Ottoman forces estimated that 15,000 officers and men had been killed during the campaign in south Macedonia, bringing total losses up to 41,000 soldiers.( Another direct consequence was that the destruction of the Macedonian Army sealed the fate of the Ottoman Vardar Army, which was fighting the Serbs to the north. The fall of Thessaloniki left it strategically isolated, without logistical supply and depth to maneuver, ensuring its destruction.File:Turks prisoners.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Ottoman of war in Greek hands. After the of Giannitsa, the Greek Army took 26,000 Ottoman POWs.Upon learning of the outcome of the battle of Yenidje, the Bulgarian high command urgently dispatched their 7th Rila Division from the north in the direction of the city. The division arrived there a week later, the day after its surrender to the Greeks. Until November 10, the Greek-occupied zone had been expanded to the line from Dojran to the hills west to Kavalla. In western Macedonia however, the lack of coordination between the Greek and Serbian HQs cost the Greeks a setback in the Battle of Vevi on , when the Greek 5th Infantry Division crossed its way with the VI Ottoman Corps (a part of the Vardar Army consisting of the 16th, 17th and 18th Nizamiye divisions), retreating to Albania following the battle of Prilep against the Serbs. The Greek division, surprised by the presence of the Ottoman Corps, isolated from the rest of Greek army and outnumbered by the now counterattacking Ottomans centered on Bitola, was forced to retreat. As a result, the Serbs beat the Greeks to Bitola.Epirus frontIn the Epirus front the Greek army was initially heavily outnumbered, but due to the passive attitude of the Ottomans succeeded in conquering Preveza (21 October 1912) and pushing north to the direction of Ioannina. On November 5, Major Spyromilios led a revolt in the coastal area of Himar and expelled the Ottoman garisson without facing significant resistance,()(Epirus, 4000 years of Greek history and civilization. M. V. Sakellariou. Ekdotike Athenon, 1997. ISBN 9789602133712, p. 367.) while on November 20 Greek troops from western Macedonia entered Korce. However, Greek forces in the Epirote front had not the numbers to initiate an offensive against the German-designed defensive positions of Bizani that protected the city of Ioannina, and therefore had to wait for reinforcements from the Macedonian front.(Albanias captives. Pyrros Ruches, Argonaut 1965, p. 65.)After the campaign in Macedonia was over, a large part of the Army was redeployed to Epirus, where Crown Prince Constantine himself assumed command. In the of Bizani the Ottoman positions were breached and Ioannina taken on . During the siege, on 8 February 1913, the Russian pilot N. de Sackoff, flying for the Greeks, became the first pilot ever shot down in combat, when his biplane was hit by ground fire following a bomb run on the walls of Fort Bizani. He came down near small town of Preveza, on the coast north of the Ionian island of Lefkas, secured local Greek assistance, repaired his plane and resumed flight back to base.(Baker, David, Flight and Flying: A Chronology, Facts On File, Inc., New York, New York, 1994, Library of Congress card number 92-31491, ISBN 0-8160-1854-5, page 61.) The fall of Ioannina allowed the Greek army to continue its advance into Epirus, the southern part of modern Albania, which it occupied. There its advance stopped, although the Serbian line of control was very close to the north.Naval operations in the Aegean and Ionian seasFile:Greek warships 1912-10-05.jpg|thumb|right|250px|The Greek fleet assembled at Bay on 5/18 October 1912, before sailing for Lemnos On the outbreak of hostilities on 18 October, the Greek fleet, placed under the newly-promoted Rear Admiral Kountouriotis, sailed for the island of Lemnos, occupying it three days later (although fighting continued on the island until 27 October) and establishing an anchorage at Bay. This move was of major strategic importance, as it provided the Greeks with a forward base in close distance to the Dardanelles, the Ottoman fleets main anchorage and refuge.(Fotakis (2005), pp. 4748)(Hall (2000), p. 64) In view of the Ottoman fleets superiority in speed and broadside weight, the Greek planners expected it to sortie from the straits early in the war. Given the Greek fleets unpreparedness resulting from the premature outbreak of the war, such an early Ottoman attack might well have been able to achieve a crucial victory. Instead, the Ottoman Navy spent the first two months of the war in operations against the Bulgarians in the Black Sea, giving the Greeks valuable time to complete their preparations and allowing them to consolidate their control of the Aegean.(Fotakis (2005), pp. 4648)By mid-November Greek naval detachments had seized the islands of Imbros, Thasos, Efstratios, Samothrace, Psara and Ikaria, while landings were undertaken on the larger islands of Lesbos and Chios only on 21 and 27 November respectively. Substantial Ottoman garrisons were present on the latter, and their resistance was fierce. They withdrew into the mountainous interior and were not subdued until 22 December and 3 January respectively.((Erickson (2003), pp. 157158) Samos, officially an autonomous principality, was not attacked until 13 March 1913, out of a desire not to upset the Italians in the nearby Dodecanese. The clashes there were short-lived as the Ottoman forces withdrew to the Anatolian mainland, so that the island was securely in Greek hands by March 16.((Erickson (2003), pp. 158159)At the same time, with the aid of numerous merchant ships converted to cruisers, a loose naval blockade on the Ottoman coasts from the Dardanelles to Suez was instituted, which disrupted the Ottomans flow of supplies (only the Black Sea routes to Romania remained open) and left some 250,000 Ottoman troops immobilized in Asia.(Fotakis (2005), pp. 4849)(Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), p. 19) In the Sea, the Greek fleet operated without opposition, ferrying supplies for the army units in the Epirus front. Furthermore, the Greeks bombarded and then blockaded the port of Vlor in Albania on 3 December, and Durrs on 27 February. A naval blockade extending from the pre-war Greek border to Vlor was also instituted on 3 December, isolating the newly-established Government of Albania there from any outside support.(Hall (2000), pp. 65, 74)Lieutenant Votsis scored a major success for Greek morale on 31 October: he sailed his boat No. 11, under the cover of night, into the harbor of Thessaloniki, sank the old Ottoman ironclad battleship Feth-i Blend and escaped unharmed. On the same day, Greek troops of the Epirus Army seized the Ottoman naval base of Preveza. The Ottomans scuttled the four ships present there, but the Greeks were able to salvage the Italian-built torpedo-boats Antalya and Tokat, which were commissioned into the Greek Navy as Nikopolis and Tatoi respectively.(Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), pp. 1920, 156) On 9 November, the wooden Ottoman armed steamer Trabzon was intercepted and sunk by the Greek torpedo boat No. 14 under Lt. Periklis Argyropoulos off Ayvalk.( Confrontations off the Dardanelles The main Ottoman fleet remained inside the Dardanelles for the early part of the war, while the Greek destroyers continuously patrolled the straits exit to report on a possible sortie. Kountouriotis suggested mining the straits, but was not taken up for fear of international reactions.(Fotakis (2005), p. 50) On 7 December, the head of the Ottoman fleet Tahir Bey was replaced by Ramiz Naman Bey, the leader of the hawkish faction among the officer corps. A new strategy was agreed, whereby the Ottomans were to to take advantage of any absence of Averof to attack the other Greek ships. The Ottoman staff formulated a plan to lure a number of the Greek destroyers on patrol into a trap. A first such effort on 12 December failed due to boiler trouble, but the second try two days later resulted in an indecisive engagement between the Greek destroyers and the cruiser Mecidiye.(Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), pp. 2122)The wars first major fleet action, the Battle of Elli, was fought two days later, on . The Ottoman fleet, with four battleships, nine destroyers and six torpedo boats, sailed to the entrance of the straits. The lighter Ottoman vessels remained behind, but the battleship squadron moved on north under cover of the forts at Kumkale and engaged the Greek fleet, coming from Imbros, at 9:40. Leaving the older battleships behind, Kountouriotis led the Averof into independent action: utilizing its superior speed, it cut across the Ottoman fleets bow. Under fire from two sides, the Ottomans were quickly forced to withdraw to the Dardanelles.((Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), p. 22) The whole engagement lasted less than an hour, in which the Ottoman suffered heavy damage to the Barbaros Hayreddin and 18 dead and 41 wounded (most during their disorderly retreat) and the Greeks one dead and seven wounded.((Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), pp. 22, 196)In the aftermath of Elli, on 20 December the energetic Lt. Commander Bey was placed in effective command of the Ottoman fleet. Two days later he led his forces out, hoping again to trap the patrolling Greek destroyers between two divisions of the Ottoman fleet, one heading for Imbros and the other waiting at the entrance of the straits. The plan failed as the Greek ships quickly broke contact, while at the same time the Mecidiye came under attack by the Greek submarine Delfin, which launched an torpedo against it but missed; the first such attack in history.( During this time, the Ottoman Army continued to press upon a reluctant Navy a plan for the re-occupation of Tenedos, which the Greek destroyers used as a base, by an amphibious operation. The operation was scheduled for 4 January. On that day, weather conditions were ideal and the fleet was ready, but the Yenihan regiment earmarked for the operation failed to arrive on time. The naval staff nevertheless ordered the fleet to sortie, and an engagement developed with the Greek fleet, without any significant results on either side.(Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), pp. 2223) Similar sorties followed on 10 and 11 January, but the results of these cat and mouse operations were always the same: the Greek destroyers always managed to remain outside the Ottoman warships range, and each time the cruisers fired a few rounds before breaking off the chase.(Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), p. 23)hamidiye.jpg|thumb|left|250px|The Ottoman cruiser Hamidiye. Its exploits during its eight-month cruise through the Mediterranean were a major morale booster for the Ottomans.In preparation for the next attempt to break the Greek blockade, the Ottoman Admiralty decided to create a diversion by sending the light cruiser Hamidiye, captained by Rauf Bey, to raid Greek merchant shipping in the Aegean. It was hoped that the Averof, the only major Greek unit fast enough to catch the Hamidiye, would be drawn in pursuit and leave the remainder of the Greek fleet weakened.((Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), p. 26) In the event, Hamidiye slipped through the Greek patrols on the night of 1415 January and bombarded the harbor of the Greek island of Syros, sinking the Greek cruiser Makedonia which lay in anchor there (it was later raised and repaired). The Hamidiye then left the Aegean for the Eastern Mediterranean, making stops at Beirut and Said before entering the Sea. Although providing a major morale boost for the Ottomans, the operation failed to achieve its primary objective, as Kountouriotis refused to leave his post and pursue the Hamidiye.(((Hall (2000), p. 65)Four days later, on , when the Ottoman fleet again sallied from the straits towards Lemnos, it was defeated for a second time in the Battle of Lemnos. This time, the Ottoman warships concentrated their fire on the Averof, which again made use of its superior speed and tried to the T of the Ottoman fleet. Barbaros Hayreddin was again heavily damaged, and the Ottoman fleet was forced to return to the shelter of the Dardanelles and their forts. The Ottomans suffered 41 killed and 101 wounded.((Langensiepen & Gleryz (1995), pp. 2324, 196) It was the last attempt of the Ottoman Navy to leave the Dardanelles, thereby leaving the Greeks dominant in the Aegean. On , a Greek MF.7, piloted by Lt. Moutousis and with Ensign Moraitinis as an observer, carried out an aerial reconnaissance of the Ottoman fleet in its anchorage at Nagara, and launched four bombs on the anchored ships. Although it scored no hits, this operation is regarded as the first naval-air operation in military history.()()General Ivanov, commander of the 2nd Bulgarian Army, acknowledged the role of the Greek fleet in the overall Balkan League victory by stating that the activity of the entire Greek fleet and above all the Averof was the chief factor in the general success of the allies.( Serb-Montenegrin theater of operations and Turkish Forces with Montenegrin flag (Siege of Shkodr).jpg|thumb|300px|right|Albanian and Turkish soldiers with Montenegrin flag during the Siege of ScutariThe Serbian forces operated against major part of Ottoman Western army which were located in the areas of Novi Pazar, Kosovo and northern and eastern Macedonia. Strategically the Serbian forces were divided into four independent armies and groups: Javor brigade and Ibar Army against Ottoman forces in the area of Novi Pazar, Third Army against Ottoman forces in the areas of Kosovo and Metohija, First Army against Ottoman forces in the area of northern Macedonia and Second Army (operating from the Bulgarian territory) against Ottoman forces in the area of eastern Macedonia. The decisive battle was expected to be fought in the area of northern Macedonia, more specifically in the plains of Pole, where the main forces of Ottoman Vardar Army were expected to concentrate. According to the plan of the Serbian Supreme Command, three Serbian armies (First, Second and Third) were supposed to encircle and destroy the Vardar Army in that area, with First Army advancing from the north (direction Vranje-Kumanovo-Ove Pole ), Second Army advancing from the east (direction Kriva Palanka-Kratovo-Ove Pole) and Third Army advancing from the north-west (direction Pritina-Skopje-Ove Pole). In the execution of this plan the main role was given to the First Army while Second Army was expected to cut of the Vardar Armys retreat route, and if necessary attack its rear and right flank. The main goal of Third Army was to liberate Kosovo and Metohija and if necessary give assistance to the First Army by attacking the Vardar Armys left flank and rear. Ibar Army and the Javor brigade had a minor role in the Serbian plan, they were expected to conquer and secure areas of the Sandjak of Novi Pazar and replace Third Army in Kosovo after it advanced further south.The Serbian Army under General (later Marshal) Putnik dealt three decisive victories in Macedonia, its primary objective in the war, effectively destroying the Ottoman forces in the region and conquering north Macedonia. They also helped the Montenegrins to take the Sandak and sent two divisions to help the Bulgarians at the siege of Adrianople.The last battle for Macedonia was the battle of Monastir, in which the remains of the Ottoman Vardar Army were forced to retreat to central Albania. After the battle, Prime Minister Pasic asked Gen. Putnik to take part in the race for Thessaloniki. Putnik declined and instead turned his army to the west, towards Albania, foreseeing that a future confrontation between the Greeks and Bulgarians over Thessaloniki could greatly help Serbias own plans over Vardar Macedonia.After the Great Powers applied pressure on them, the Serbs started to withdraw from northern Albania and the Sandak, although they left behind their heavy artillery park to help the Montenegrins in the continuing siege of Scutari. On 23 April 1913 Scutaris garrison was forced to surrender due to starvation. Conclusion of the war and aftermath The Treaty of London ended the First Balkan War on 30 May 1913. All Ottoman territory west of the Enez-Kyky line was ceded to the Balkan League, according to the quo at the time of the armistice. The treaty also declared Albania to be an independent state. Almost all of the territory that was designated to form the new Albanian state was currently occupied by either Greece or Serbia, which only reluctantly withdrew their troops. Having unresolved disputes with Serbia over the division of northern Macedonia and with Greece over southern Macedonia, Bulgaria was prepared, if the need arose, to solve the problems by force, and began transferring its forces from Thrace to the disputed regions. Unwilling to yield to any pressure Greece and Serbia settled their mutual differences and signed a military alliance directed against Bulgaria on May 1, 1913, even before the Treaty of London had been concluded. This was soon followed by a treaty of mutual friendship and protection on May 19/June 1, 1913. Thus the scene for the Balkan War was set.Reactions among the Great PowersThe developments that led to the war did not go unnoticed by the Great Powers, but although there was an official consensus between the European Powers over the territorial integrity of the Ottoman Empire, which led to a stern warning to the Balkan states, unofficially each of them took a different diplomatic approach due to their conflicting interests in the area. As a result, any possible preventative effect of the common official warning was cancelled by the mixed unofficial signals, and failed to prevent or to stop the war:*Russia was a prime mover in the establishment of the Balkan League and saw it as an essential tool in case of a future war against her rival, the Austro-Hungarian Empire.() But she was unaware of the Bulgarian plans for Thrace and Constantinople, territories on which Russia herself had long-held ambitions.*France, not feeling ready for a war against Germany in 1912, took a totally negative position against the war, firmly informing her ally Russia that she would not take part in a potential conflict between Russia and Austro-Hungary if it resulted from the actions of the Balkan League. The French however failed to achieve British participation in a common intervention to stop the Balkan conflict.*The Empire, although officially a staunch supporter of the Ottoman Empires integrity, took secret diplomatic steps encouraging the Greek entry into the League in order to counteract Russian influence. At the same time she encouraged the Bulgarian aspirations over Thrace, preferring a Bulgarian Thrace to a Russian one, despite the assurances she had given to the Russians in regard of their expansion there.*Austria-Hungary, struggling for an exit from the Adriatic and seeking ways for expansion in the south at the expense of the Ottoman Empire, was totally opposed to any other nations expansion in the area. At the same time, the Habsburg empire had its own internal problems with the significant Slav populations that campaigned against the German-Hungarian control of the multinational state. Serbia, whose aspirations in the direction of the Austrian-held Bosnia were no secret, was considered an enemy and the main tool of Russian machinations that were behind the agitation of Austrias Slav subjects. But failed to achieve German backup for firm reaction. Initially, Emperor II told the Archduke Franz Ferdinand that Germany was ready to support Austria in all circumstances - even at the risk of a world war, but Austro-Hungarians hesitated. Finally, in the Imperial War Council of 8 December 1912 the consensus was that Germany would not be ready for war until at least mid-1914 and notes about that passed to the Habsburgs. Consequently no actions could be taken when the Serbs acceded to the Austria ultimatum of October 18 and withdrew from Albania.*Germany, already heavily involved in the internal Ottoman politics, officially opposed a war against the Empire. But in her effort to win Bulgaria for the Powers, and seeing the inevitability of Ottoman disintegration, was playing with the idea to replace the Balkan positions of the Ottomans with a friendly Greater Bulgaria in her San Stefano borders. An idea that was based on the German origin of the Bulgarian King and his anti-Russian sentiments.Finally, when Serb-Austrian tensions again grew hot in July 1914 when a Serbian backed organization assassinated the heir of the Austro-Hungarian throne, no one had strong reservations about the possible conflict and the World War broke out. See also * wars* Balkan War* of the Serbian-Turkish warsReferencesSources* * * * * * *  Guerra Balcanica  balkanski ratGuerra BalcnicaBalkankrig Guerra de los BalcanesBalkana milito Guerre balkaniqueGuerra Balcnica balkanski ratBalkan I guerra balcanica  Balcanicum PrimumBalknu karBalkan karasBalkn-hbor Balkan IEerste Balkanoorlogja:frste balkankrigenfrste balkankrigenwojna bakaskaGuerra BalcnicaRzboi Balcanic e Par Ballkanikebalknska vojnabalkanska vojna balkanski ratBalkanin sotaBalkankrigetBalkan Sava zh:
296380
Yate
Yate is a town in Gloucestershire, England. It is situated at the southwest extremity of the Cotswold Hills, 12 miles (19 km) northeast of the city of Bristol. At the 2001 census its population was 21,789. The town of Sodbury (population 5,066) is contiguous with Yate to the east. Yate developed from a village into a town in the 1960s, partly as an overspill or commuter town for the city of Bristol.LocationThe town is surrounded by countryside and within reach of the city of Bristol by bicycle, car, bus or train.Administration National Yate is represented in the UK Parliament by the constituency of Thornbury and Yate.CountyYate was in Gloucestershire until 1974 when it became part of the newly-formed of Avon. In 1996, Avon was abolished, and the area became part of the unitary authority of Gloucestershire. Yate remains part of Gloucestershire only for traditional purposes.LocalYate Town Council provides local services.(Yate Town Council official website)Historyleft|thumb|The coat of arms of YateThe first mention of Yate concerns the existence of a religious house about AD 770; Yate is also mentioned in the Book of 1086. The name is derived from the Old English word giete or gete, meaning a gateway into a forest area.During the Anglo-Saxon period and well into medieval times, most of this part of south Gloucestershire was covered with forest. Through the centuries the land was cleared for farming.The towns parish church, St Marys,(St Mary, Yate Diocese of Bristol)dates from Norman times. It was altered during the fifteenth century and was extensively restored in 1970. St Marys Primary School,(St.Marys School, Yate official website) situated outside the churchyard walls, was built on the site of a former poor house.It was the opening of the railway station in 1844, as part of and Gloucester Railway, that established Yate, with Station Road becoming the central thoroughfare. The cattle and produce markets were held around this road, and businesses were established there. railway station was closed by the Axe in January 1965, but was reopened in May 1989; the Brunel-built engine shed is preserved nearby.In the 1960s Yate was designated as a development area and the building boom began. The creation of a new town included a large retail shopping area, sports and leisure development together with public buildings.When a secondary school was built in the late 1970s, it was supposed to be called Brinsham Green School, after Brinsham Lane at nearby Yate Rocks. Owing to a spelling error, however, it was in fact called Green School.The town further expanded in the 1990s and 2000s with the construction of housing at North Yate. This housing estate continued to use the corrupted name of Brimsham. To locals the area is known as Brimsham Park.Yate rail yardDuring World War II, a rail transfer yard was constructed for the States Army, probably as part of Bolero to assist the build up of troops and stores before D-Day. Two large storage sheds survived on the site until 2008. At the end of World War II, the site was taken over by the Navy and became known as the Sea Transport Stores Depot. It was occupied by the Agency until the sheds were demolished for development.  Archaeology(Oxford Archaeology Official Website) has been commissioned to undertake an investigation as to the military significance of this site. The opinion of Bristol Industrial Archaeological Society has also been sought.(Bristol Industrial Archaeological Society (BIAS) official website)TransportRailwayYate railway station serves the town. The station is located on the main Bristol to Birmingham line between Parkway and Cam and Dursley, and is operated by Great Western.BusesBus services within the Yate area are mainly provided by First Group and Wessex Connect. Other operators who provide bus services to/from Yate include Andybus, Severnside Transport and South Gloucestershire Bus and Coach Company.  Regular bus services link Yate with Bristol City Centre. There are also buses from Yate running to Bath,Cribbs Causeway, Malmesbury, Tetbury and Westonbirt Arboretum.  Additionally, buses link Yate to a number of other towns/villages within South Gloucestershire including Badminton, Charfield Chipping Sodbury, Downend, Emersons Green, Filton,Fishponds, Frenchay, Hanham, Kingswood, Pucklechurch, Mangotsfield, Old Sodbury, Staple Hill,Thornbury,Tormarton, Westerleigh, Wick, Winterbourne and Wotton Under Edge. It should be noted that the majority of bus routes in the area operate Monday to Saturday only. On sundays and bank holidays, the only bus routes serving Yate are the services to Bristol and Cribbs Causeway which operate to a reduced frequency with the first journeys being later and the final journeys being earlier than the rest of the week.Buses in Yate pick up and set down at Yate Bus Station which is in easy reach of Yate Shopping Centre.  A number of bus services also pass Yate Railway Station.DesignMajor growth in Yate started in the early 1920s with the construction of the Moorlands Road estates behind Station Road, close to the Parnall aeroplane factory. In the 1950s the development of the Ridge housing estate took place to the east. The area between these estates was still being mined for celestine and therefore could not be built on until the mineral had been extracted.In the 1960s the area around Stanshawes was exhausted of celestine and the housing boom started with the major construction taking place in the south. Much of this development was planned using the Radburn model, a design that created a vehicle-free environment by the use of green spaces and linking paths at the front of the houses. This model was used until the late 1980s and early 1990s, when the planners reverted back to traditional street design methods for the development of the remainder of North Yate, Brimsham Park and the Newmans factory site.Twin town* Salzdetfurth, GermanyLinked with Genieri, GambiaIndustryBefore World War II, Yate had an aircraft manufacturing industry (Parnall).(History of Parnall Aircraft.) During World War II, Parnall specialized in making turrets. A number of people were killed in raids by the Luftwaffe on the factory in February and March 1941.(The Bombing of Parnalls Aircraft Factory of Yate BBC WW2 Peoples War)Yate has three natural products associated with it: limestone to the east, celestine or spar near the centre of the town, and coal to the west.The need for limestone increased with the growth of roads, while the demand for coal grew with the diminishing supply of timber. Celestine, the major strontium mineral, was first dug in the late 1880s and was initially used for the refining of beet. At one time Yates celestine accounted for over 70 per cent of the worlds production. It colours flames red, and so was important for pyrotechnics such as fireworks, military and signal flares, and tracer bullets. The last commercial excavation of celestine from the Yate area was during the Vietnam War. The mining company, Bristol Mineral and Land Co, closed in 1994.Shoppingthumb||Yate shopping centre has over 100 shopsConstruction of a pedestrianised shopping centre of around a hundred shops began in the early-to-mid-1960s.(Yate Shopping centre) The shopping centre was opened by Phoenix, who played Tanner in ITVs Street. As with the most British New Towns, modern art was included in the design: in the case of Yate, this was in the form of the Four Seasons sculpture, and a graceful and dramatic spire-shaped sculpture, which could be seen for miles, mounted high above the centre on the roof of one of the shops. This sculpture existed until the early 1990s when it was removed during the revamping of the centre, which included the erection of glass roofs over the walkways. An extension to East Walk was constructed at the start of the 1980s, and this included the construction of a new Tesco store, with the old store in South Walk turned into a Tesco Home and Wear store. An extension to West Walk was constructed in the early 1990s.In the past Yate shopping centre also housed a single screen cinema until the early 1980s, it was closed and replaced with a nightclub named Spirals.  The nightclub remained in situ before being closed in the 2000s and was replaced with a pool hall.  Many local people have campaigned to have a cinema return to the area and now with the construction of a new youth caf it looks as though this may happen.Shops in the centre include Burtons (clothes retailer), Tesco, Boots (chemist), Halfords Metro, (supermarket), Argos, Superdrug and The Entertainer. Eating places in the Centre include McDonalds and Boswells.During the 1980s and into the mid 1990s, the shopping centre hosted Yates annual festival. On opening day a celebrity launched the festival by releasing balloons and stayed to sign autographs. Celebrities have included Carole Lee Scott, in character as Grotbags (from Hull and Emus enemy), Mallett, Chegwin, Kemp (EastEnders Grant Mitchell), Ken Morley (Streets Reg Holdsworth), Neilson (Coronation Streets Cropper), Callard (Coronation Streets McDonald), Carolgees and Spit the Dog, and the Bar Kid. The festival also brought along a number of news presenters from West including Bruce Hockin, Richard Wyatt and Peter Rowell.On 19 November 2009, a large crowd packed into the shopping centre to see Andre switch on the towns Christmas lights and sing his single Unconditional.In December 2006, the owners of the shopping centre (Dominion Corporate Trustees) announced plans to enlarge and modernise it. In Phase 1 the main change will be an enlargement of the existing Tesco supermarket, using part of the centres car park. To compensate for the loss, the store will be on stilts, with parking beneath.Located near the shopping centre are Lidl, Morrisons and B&Q. There are two Express stores in Yate: one on Station Road and one in Brimsham Park. The B&Q was built in the mid-to-late 1980s, along with two small housing estates, on the site of the Newmans electric motor factory which had been demolished in the mid-1980s.The shopping centre also has a Plus, Advice Bureau, library, leisure centre, over-50s caf, and health centre.In 2008, construction of a new health centre began on the site of the old one, costing around 12 million. The new West Gate Health Centre (formerly the West Walk Health Centre) was officially opened on 8 March 2010.In August 2009, plans were agreed for Tesco to pull down their store and replace it with a more modern store three times the size, known as a Extra. The plans also include four more shop units, relocation of the bus station, and a revamped entrance to East Walk. The major revamp of the towns bus station was completed and officially opened in January 2010. A large temporary Tesco store was delivered on 20 lorries, in early February (2011), to be in place and erected for opening on Monday 28 February 2011. The old Tesco closed its doors for the final time on Sunday 27th February 2011. Demolition is now complete and the new steel frame is currently being erected. The new Extra store will open on Monday 24th October at 8am, with the current temporary store closing a week earlier. It was also revealed on 19th September 2011 that Marks and Spencer have submitted planning permission for a new store in two of the new four untits that will be built at the end of East walk opposite the new Tesco Extra. JD Wetherspoons have also got the go ahead to open up on Yate shopping centre.Amenitiesthumb|Kingsgate ParkThe town has a skatepark at Peghill. Yate Common on Westerleigh Road, also known the German Fields, is used for dog walking, nature watching, kite flying, circuses and fairs.The common has a stretch of unused carriageway (), known as the road to nowhere, which has been used for filming in TV programmes such as Casualty.(South Gloucestershire council hires out many venues for filming / training purposes) This was part a scheme to create a bypass from Rodford Way in South Yate to Nibley. The scheme was only partially completed in 1974, the year when Yate became a part of Avon. Completion of the road would have entailed building a bridge over the railway, but finance for this was never made available.The town has several parks and areas of open space. The largest of these is Kingsgate Park, which has an adventure playground for children.The town is served by a community radio station, FM which broadcasts 365 days a year on its webcasts and twice a year on 87.7 MHz FM.Future plansYate and Chipping Sodbury have been earmarked for 5000 new homes to be built by 2026. While the location of the housing has yet to be decided, the expected areas are to the north of Yate, and towards Chipping Sodbury.Local sportAthleticsYate and District Athletic Club(Yate and District Athletic Club official website) is a track-and-field club based at Yate Outdoor Sports Centre.CricketChipping Sodbury Cricket Club(Chipping Sodbury Cricket Club official website) is Yates nearest cricket club, providing cricket for men, women, boys and girls. They play their home matches on their two grounds at The Ridings playing fields in Chipping Sodbury.FootballTown F.C.(Yate Town F.C official website of Yate F.C.) plays in the Southern League South and West Division. There is also a ladies football team, Yate Town Girls/Ladies FC,(Yate Town Girls/Ladies FC) that plays in local leagues. A junior team, Yate United F.C.,(Official website of Yate United F.C.,) provides competitive youth football.The largest youth club in Yate is St Nicholas Youth Football Club. They play their home matches at The Ridings playing fields in Chipping Sodbury.http://www.stnicksfc.co.uk/There is another local team called Brimsham AthleticHockeyYate Hockey Club runs teams from adult to junior.(Yate Hockey Club official website)Notable people* Gibson, winner of Brother UK* Hussey, musician best known as the lead-singer of The Mission* K. Rowling, author of the Potter series of books, was born in nearby Chipping Sodbury later at the village of Winterbourne* Skuse, footballer, City F.C., grew up and resides in Yate, and attended Abbottswood School and King Edmund Community School* Twentyman, Jr., sports editor of Radio Bristol, former footballer and honorary president of Brimsham Green Football Club()Estates in YateAbbotswoodAbbotswood has a small shopping centre and privately owned blocks of flats, a youth club and church.North YateConstruction began in the late 1970s and early 1980s.Brimsham ParkConstruction began in the early 1990s.The RidgeThis is a large housing estate with two local schools, Broadway Infants School and The Ridge Junior School. There are shops in the centre of the estate including a convenience store and dentists.Literary references to YateYate was awarded the tongue-in-cheek honour of being the 45th worst place to live in the UK, according to the Idler book of Towns,(Idler book of Towns, eds Sam Jordison and Dan Kieran (Box Tree 2003)) while Man Half Biscuits song The Referees Alphabet on their Laird Social Club album informs the listener that Y is for Yate, the kind of town that referees come from.Location gridReferencesExternal links*de:Yatefr:Yateit:Yatela:Yatenl:Yatenn:Yatepl:Yatept:Yatero:Yatefi:Yatevo:Yate
297388
Sarangani
 footnotes                Sarangani is a province of the Philippines located in the SOCCSKSARGEN region in Mindanao. Its capital is Alabel and borders Cotabato to the north and del Sur to the east. Sarangani is part of the South Cotabato-Sultan Kudarat-Sarangani-Gen. Santos City (Soccsksargen) development cluster, and is linked by paved roads to the international airport and world-class fish port of Gen. Santos City. Good roads and regular flights through Gen. Santos City allow the province easy access to Manila, Cebu, Davao City, as well as the rest of the Soccsksargen areas. Gen. Santos Citys airport has one of the countrys longest runways.The province is situated as the countrys major gateway to the Brunei-Indonesia-Malaysia-the Philippines - East Asean Growth Area. With its proximity to its regional counterparts, Sarangani is in a unique position to marshal its resources, entice tourists and investors, and compete in an international market under a borderless trade regime.Strategically located at the southernmost tip of Mindanao, the province is protected by the resource-rich Sarangani Bay. Beyond this is the Celebes Sea, which is the provinces access to the rest of the world.Bordered by over 230 kms. of unspoiled coastline, Sarangani offers more than 4,400 sq. kms. of typhoon-free land and marine resources, largely untapped tourism potentials, and vast investment possibilities.The province is divided into two parts, separated by the Bay and Santos City, and it used to be part of South Cotabato until it was made an independent province in 1992.(gmanews.tv, Born to be Wild: Sarangani, 06/12/2008.) HistoryThe early inhabitants who first inhabited Sarangani were the indigenous natives, called MunaTo, a native term for first people.( balita.ph/2008, Man-made island resort now a Sarangani landmark)In 1942, the Japanese troops occupied Southern Cotabato (now. Sarangani). notes        In 1945, Filipino troops of the 6th, 10th, 101st and 102nd Infantry Division of the Philippine Commonwealth Army and 10th Infantry Regiment of the Philippine Constabulary entered and liberated in Southern Cotabato (now. Sarangani) and fought against the Japanese Imperial Army forces during the Battle of Cotabato at the end of World War II under the Japanese Occupation.Before its inception in 1992, Sarangani was part of Cotabato and held its title as the  Third District of South Cotabato. The province was created by Republic Act No. 7228 on March 16, 1992, penned by the late Congressman, James L. Chiongbian. His wife, Priscilla L. Chiongbian is the first Governor of Sarangani. They are known as the Father and Mother of Sarangani Province.Sarangani celebrates its foundation anniversary every month of November, named as MunaTo Festival.The famous Maitum white water tubing is also located in Sarangani, 1.6 km. of wild water tube ride in Pangi River at barangay New La Union, Maitum Sarangani Province. Pangi River ws 2nd Runner Up in 2003s national search for the cleanest river in the Philippines. Here you can also enjoy day-trekking or horseback riding and commune with nature along the way.Its landmark Isla Parilla resort is now an AA world-class resort, built within a man-made island.(pia.gov.ph, Island resort now Sarangani landmark)(  balita.ph/2008/11, Sarangani gears for foundation anniversary festival)Sarangani also has, as treasure, its ancient burial jars, discovered  by archaeologists from the Museum in Ayub Cave, Maitum, in 1991 and in 2008, at Sagel Cave, Maitum (now declared by Historical Institute as a national historical sites). Amid Mindanaos armed conflicts, artifacts found thereat prove settlements of pre-historic civilization in Maitum.((AdministrationSarangani is subdivided into 7 municipalities grouped into two parts, separated by the Bay. The western part consists of Kiamba, Maasim, and Maitum, while the eastern part is composed of Alabel, Glan, Malapatan, and Malungon.MunicipalitiesGovernmentElected Officials 2010-2013*Rep. Emmanuel Manny Pacquiao*Gov. Miguel Rene A. Dominguez*Vice Gov. Steve C. SolonElected Officials from 2007-2010:*Rep. Erwin Chiongbian*Gov. Miguel Dominguez*Vice Gov. Steve SolonElected Officials 2004-2007*Rep. Erwin Chiongbian*Gov. Miguel Dominguez*Vice Gov. Bridget Chiongbian-HuangEconomyCoconut, corn, rice, banana, mango, durian, rubber, and sugarcane are just some of the major crops now being planted by the Sarangans. Other possibilities lie in a wide range of commercial choices: industrial plantations (mango, abaca, coffee, rubber, and rattan), agro-forestry (high-value crops), light manufacturing and processing facilities, real estate and housing, tourism, beach resorts, hotels and restaurants, recreational facilities, port zone development, milling plants, fruit production, processing of canned fruits and vegetables, production of ornamental plants, furniture, trading, telecommunications, mining, and aquaculture.Saranganis favorable investment climate is manifested by the large plantations (mango, banana, pineapple, asparagus), cattle ranches, and commercial fishponds that have been operating in the area, some of which having existed as far back as 40 years.Businesses locating in the province are assured of stable power and water supply. Electricity comes from the National Power Corporation, and augmented by a 50 mw power plant in Alabel, the provinces capital. Water is provided for by sustainable spring development projects. External links * Official Website of the Provincial Government of Sarangani* Sarangani Province Photo News* gmanews.tv, Born to be Wild: Sarangani, 06/12/2008 References Maitum Information OfficeSaranganizh-min-nan:Saranganibcl:Saranganiceb:Saranganide:Saranganide Saranganifa:fr:Saranganiilo:Saranganiid:Saranganidi Saranganipam:Saranganimk:(provincie)ja:no:Saranganipl:Saranganiru:(provins)tl:Saranganitr:Saranganivi:Saranganiwar:Sarangani
298705
Batman_(TV_series)
prod_website        Batman is an American television series, based on the DC book character of the same name. It stars West as Batman and Ward as Robin  two crime-fighting heroes who defend City.()() It aired on the Broadcasting Company (ABC) network for two and a half seasons from January 12, 1966 to March 14, 1968. The show was aired twice weekly for its first two seasons, resulting in the production of a total of 120 episodes. It currently shows reruns on the Hub.Genesis of the seriesIn the early 1960s, Ed Graham Productions optioned the television rights to the strip Batman and planned a straightforward juvenile adventure show, much like Adventures of Superman and Lone Ranger, to air on CBS on Saturday mornings. Former American football linebacker and actor Mike Henry was set to star as Batman.Reportedly, DC Comics commissioned publicity photos of Henry in a Batman costume. Around this same time, the Club in Chicago was screening the Batman serials (1943s Batman and 1949s Batman and Robin) on Saturday nights. It became very popular. East coast ABC executive Yale Udoff, a Batman fan in his childhood, attended one of these parties at the Playboy Club and was impressed with the reaction the serials were eliciting. He contacted ABC executives Bennett and J. Scherick, who were already considering developing a television series based on a comic strip action hero, to suggest a time Batman series in the hip and fun style of Man from U.N.C.L.E. When negotiations between CBS and Graham stalled, DC Comics quickly reobtained rights and made the deal with ABC, who farmed the rights out to Century Fox to produce the series.In turn, 20th Century Fox handed the project to Dozier and his Greenway Productions. ABC and Fox were expecting a hip and funyet still seriousadventure show. However, Dozier, who loathed comic books, concluded the only way to make the show work was to do it as a art camp comedy. Ironically, the Batman comic books had recently experienced a change in editorship which marked a return to serious detective stories after decades of tales with aliens, dimensional travel, magical imps and talking animals.() Originally, espionage novelist Ambler was to write a TV-movie that would launch the television series, but he dropped out after learning of Doziers camp comedy approach. Eventually, two sets of screen tests were filmed, one with West and Ward and the other with Waggoner and Deyell, with West and Ward winning the roles.By that time, ABC had pushed up the debut date to January 1966, thus forgoing the movie until the summer hiatus. The film would be produced quickly to get into theatres prior to the start of Season Two of the television series. Semple, Jr. had signed on as head script writer. He wrote the pilot script, and generally wrote in a pop art adventure style. Ralph Ross, Stanford Sherman, and Charles Hoffman were script writers who generally leaned more toward camp comedy, and in Rosss case, sometimes outright slapstick and satire. Originally intended as a one-hour show, ABC only had two early-evening time slots available, so the show was split into two parts, to air twice a week in half-hour installments with a cliffhanger, originally to last only through a station break, connecting the two episodes, echoing the old movie serials.The Joker, the Penguin, the Riddler, the Catwoman, Freeze, and David Wayne as the Mad Hatter, all of whom are regular Bat-Villains, appear in the series, which was deliberately villain-driven as well as action-comedy-heavy. There had been plans for Two-Face to appear, depicted as a news anchor who was disfigured when a camera blew up in his face. Though Eastwood was discussed for the role of Two-Face, the show was cancelled before any appearance by this character was made.Plot summaryThe teasersThe typical story began with a villain (often one of a short list of recurring villains) committing a crime, such as stealing a fabulous gem or taking over City. This was followed by a scene inside Gordons office, where he and Chief OHara would deduce which villain was responsible. Commissioner Gordon would press a button on the Batphone, a bright red telephone located on a pedestal in his office. The scene would then cut to stately Manor where Alfred (the butler) would answer the Batphone, which sat like a normal everyday telephone on the desk in Waynes study. Frequently, Wayne and his ward, Grayson, would be found talking with Dicks aunt, Cooper, who was unaware of Bruces and Dicks secret identities. Alfred would discreetly interrupt so they could excuse themselves to go to the Batphone. Upon learning which criminal he would face, Wayne would turn a switch concealed within a bust of Shakespeare that stood on his desk. This would cause a bookcase to slide back and reveal two poles. To the Batpoles! Wayne would exclaim, and he and Grayson would slide down to the Batcave, activating an unseen mechanism on the way that dressed them as their alter egos. The sequence often began at this point.The episodes properSimilar in style and content to the 1940s serials, Batman and Robin would arrive in the Batcave in full costume and jump into the Batmobile, with Batman in the drivers seat. Robin would say, Atomic batteries to power...turbines to speed. Batman would respond, Roger, ready to move out and, after fastening their seatbelts, the two would drive out of the cave at high speed. As the Batmobile approached the mouth of the cave (actually a tunnel entrance in Los Angeless Canyon) a camouflaged door would swing open and a hinged barrier outside the Batcave would drop down to allow the car to exit onto the road. Scenes of Batman and Robin sliding down the Batpoles and getting into the Batmobile, the Batmobile exiting the Batcave, and the arrival at Commissioner Gordons building (while the episode credits are shown), are reused footage utilized in nearly all episodes.After being summoned to Commissioner Gordons office via the Batphone, the initial discussion of the crime usually led to Batman and Robin conducting their investigation alone. This investigation usually resulted in a meeting with the villain, with the heroes engaging in a fistfight with the villains henchmen, and the villain getting away, leaving a series of unlikely clues for the two to investigate. Later, they would face the villains henchmen again, and he or she would capture one or both of the heroes and place them in a deathtrap leading to a cliffhanger ending, which was usually resolved in the first few minutes of the next episode.After the cliffhangersThe second part of the episode (until late in Season Two) would begin with a brief recap of part one. After the opening credits and the theme music, the cliffhanger was resolved.The same pattern of plot was repeated in the following episode until the villain was defeated in a major brawl where the action was punctuated by superimposed onomatopoeic words, as in comic book fight scenes (POW!, BAM!, ZONK!, etc.). Not counting five of the Penguins henchmen who disintegrate or get blown up in the associated Batman theatrical movie, only three criminal characters die during the series: the Riddlers moll Molly (played by St. John in Episode 2) who accidentally falls into the Batcaves atomic reactor, and two out-of-town gunmen who shoot at Batman and Robin toward the end of the Zelda The Great/A Death Worse Than Fate episode, but end up killing each other instead. Twice, Catwoman (Newmar) appears to fall to her death (into a bottomless pit and from a high building into a river), but since she returned in later episodes, it is presumed that as a cat, she has nine lives and thus has several more left to go.  In Instant Freeze, Mr. Freeze freezes a butler solid and knocks him over, causing him to smash to pieces, although this is implied rather than seen. There is a later reference suggesting the butler survived. In Green Ice, Mr. Freeze freezes a policeman solid; it is left unclear whether he survived. In The Penguins Nest, a policeman suffers an electric shock at the hands of the Penguins accomplices, but he is presumed to survive, as he appears in some later episodes. In The Bookworm Turns, Commissioner Gordon appears to be shot and falls off a bridge to his death, but Batman deduces that this was actually an expert high diver in disguise, employed by The Bookworm as a ruse (implying that the diver survived the fall).Robin, in particular, was especially well known for saying Holy (insert), Batman! whenever he encountered something startling.The series utilized a narrator (producer Dozier, uncredited) who parodied both the breathless narration style of the 1940s serials and Winchells narration of The Untouchables. He would end many of the cliffhanger episodes by intoning, Tune in tomorrow  same Bat-time, same Bat-channel!Only two of the series guest villains ever discovered Batmans true identity: Egghead by deductive reasoning, and King Tut on two occasions (once with a bug on the Batmobile and once by accidentally mining into the Batcave). Egghead was tricked into disbelieving his discovery, as was Tut in the episode when he bugged the Batmobile. In the episode when Tut tunnelled into the Batcave, he was hit on the head by a rock which made him forget his discovery and jarred him back into his identity as a mild-mannered Professor of Egyptology at University. While under the spell of the Siren (Collins), Commissioner Gordon found the Batcave beneath Wayne Manor and deduced Batmans true identity, but Alfred gassed him to prevent his informing her, the memory of the discovery gone after leaving the Sirens spell.Season 1In Season 1, Batman and Robin are super crime-fighting heroes, contending with the villains of Gotham City. It begins with the two-parter, Hi Diddle Riddle and Smack in the Middle, featuring Frank Gorshin as The Riddler.Season 2In Season 2, the show suffered from repetition of its characters and formula. In addition, critics noted that the series delicate balance of drama and humor that the first season maintained was lost as the stories became increasingly farcical. This, combined with Lorenzo Semple Jr. contributing fewer scripts and having less of an influence on the series, caused viewers to tire of the show and for critics to complain, If youve seen one episode of Batman, youve seen them all.Season 3By Season 3, ratings were falling and the future of the series seemed uncertain. A promotional short featuring Craig as Batgirl and Tim Herbert as Moth was produced, since the Batgirl character had made her major debut in a 1966 issue of Detective Comics and the producers, to keep up with the comic book, wanted to add her to the TV series. The short was convincing enough for ABC to pick up Batman for another season, and for Dozier to introduce Batgirl as a regular on the show in an attempt to attract more female viewers. Batgirls alter ego was Gordon, Commissioner Gordons daughtera mild-mannered librarian at the Gotham Library.(Television Obscurities. Batgirl Promotional Short, June 11, 2003. Retrieved 2007-03-24.) The show was reduced to once a week, with mostly self-contained episodes, although the following weeks villain would be in a tag at the end of the episode, similar to a opera. Accordingly, the narrators cliffhanger phrases were eliminated, but most episodes would end with him saying something to encourage viewers to watch the next episode.Aunt Harriet was reduced to just two cameo appearances during the third season because of Blakes poor health (Aunt Harriet was also mentioned in another episode, but was not seen; her absence was explained by her being in shock upstairs). The nature of the scripts and acting started to enter into the realm of surrealism. For example, the sets backgrounds became mere two-dimensional cut-outs against a stark black stage. In addition, the third season was much more topical, with references to hippies, mods, and distinctive 1960s slang, which the previous seasons avoided.CancellationNear the end of the third season, ABC planned to cut the budget even further by eliminating Robin and Chief OHara, and making Batgirl Batmans full-time partner. Both Dozier and West were against this idea, and ABC cancelled the show. Weeks later, NBC offered to pick the show up for a fourth season and even restore it to its original twice-a-week format, if the sets were still available for use. However, Fox had already demolished the sets a week before. NBC had no interest in paying the $800,000 for the rebuild, so the offer was withdrawn.CastRegular cast* West as Batman/Bruce Wayne, a caped crusader whose parents were murdered when he was a child and has devoted his life to fighting crime.* Ward as Robin/Grayson, Batmans faithful partner and boy wonder, who would often say things beginning with Holy and ending with Batman, such as Holy Masquerade, Batman!* Napier as Alfred, Batmans loyal butler.* Neil Hamilton as James Worthington Gordon, Gotham Citys Commissioner of Police.* Repp as Chief OHara, Gotham Citys Chief of Police.* Blake as Aunt Harriet Cooper, Dick Graysons maternal aunt.* Craig as Batgirl/Gordon, Commissioner Gordons daughter and Batmans partner (Season 3).* David Lewis as Warden Crichton of Gotham State Penitentiary (recurring).* Byron Keith as Mayor Linseed of Gotham City (recurring).* Dozier as Desmond Doomsday, the Narrator.(Desmond Doomsday was listed as the narrator on the Batman Exclusive Original Television Soundtrack Album, 20th Century-Fox Records, 1966)Recurring villains* Astin as Riddler (season 2)* Baxter as Olga, Queen of the Cossacks (season 3)* Berle as Louie the Lilac* Buono as King Tut* Gorshin as Riddler (season 1 and 3)* Jones as Queen of Diamonds (season 2)* Kitt as Catwoman (season 3)* Meredith as Penguin* Meriwether as Catwoman (film)* Newmar as Catwoman (season 1 and 2)* Preminger as Freeze (2nd appearance)* Price as Egghead* Robertson as Shame* Romero as Joker* Sanders as Freeze (1st appearance)* Wallach as Freeze (final appearance)* Wayne as Mad HatterBatclimb CameosAside from the super-criminals, another coveted spot was the Batclimb Cameo. Often, as the Dynamic Duo scaled the outside of a building using Batarangs and Bat-ropes (filmed on a horizontal surface with the camera rotated 90 degrees, and their capes held up by off-camera strings), a window would swing open, a celebrity would pop his or her head out, and a short conversation would ensue. Batclimb cameo scenes were discontinued for the third season. The personages that did these scenes were:* Cassidy as Lurch from The Addams Family* Dick Clark* Bill Dana as Jos Jimnez from Bill Dana Show* Davis, Jr.* Devine as Claus* Duff as Sam Stone from Squad (Duff later appeared as guest villain Cabala.)* Ho* Klemperer as Colonel Klink from Heroes* Suzie Knickerbocker (pen name of Mehle)* Lewis* Lord the Carpet King* Linkletter* G. Robinson* Williams and Lee as Green Hornet and Kato (both of whom later appeared in two crossover episodes as visiting heroes).Theme musicPopularityMany sports, music, and media personalities, and a number of Hollywood actors, looked forward to and enjoyed their appearances as villains on the Batman show. They were generally allowed to overact and enjoy themselves on a high-rated television series, guaranteeing them considerable exposure (and thus boosting their careers). The most popular villains on the show included Romero as Joker, Meredith as Penguin, Gorshin as Riddler, and Newmar as Catwoman. Other famous names from the rogues gallery in the comic book series made appearances on the show (notably Mad Hatter), and some were taken from other superhero comics, such as Puzzler and Archer (Superman villains) and The King (a Arrow villain, who was again portrayed as a Batman villain in the 1990s animated series). Many other villains were created especially for the television show, and never appeared in the comic books (e.g., Shame, Lorelei The Siren Circe, Chandell/Fingers, the Bookworm, Lord Marmaduke Ffogg, Dr. Cassandra Spellcraft, and Louie the Lilac), while some were hybrids. The comics Mr. Zero was renamed Freeze, a name change that was copied in the comics with lasting effect, and the comics Brainy Barrows was reworked as Egghead. The comics featured Eivol Ekdol and his partner in crime the Great Carnado. The television show used Ekdol, but replaced Carnado with Zelda the Great. A 2009 comic book featured the first appearance of a version of King Tut.(Batman Confidential #26, April 2009, Comics.)A celebrity making a prominent appearance in another role was Gore playing Pussycat, an apprentice of Catwoman. On the January 19, 1967 episode, she sang her top 20 hit California Nights. Gore was also the niece of Howie Horwitz, one of the shows producers.A film based on the television show, Batman, was released in 1966. While it did not initially perform well at the cinema, its continued re-release at theaters and showings on television and video have proven profitable for decades. Originally, the movie had been conceived to help sell the television series abroad, but the success of the series in America was sufficient publicity. The film was shot after season one was filmed. The movies budget allowed for producers to build the Batboat and Batcopter, which were used in the second and third seasons of the television show.The action television show was extraordinarily popular, called the biggest TV phenomenon of the mid-1960s.(Science Fiction. Pioneers of Television, 18 January 2011.) At the height of its popularity, it was the only prime-time television show other than Peyton Place to be broadcast twice in one week as part of its regular schedule, airing at 7:30 p.m. Wednesdays and Thursdays. Episodes of the show were filmed as two-part cliffhangers, with each storyline beginning on Wednesday and ending on the Thursday night episode (in the second season, a pair of three-parters were also seen). At the very end of the Thursday night segment, a little tag featuring the next weeks villain would be shown, such as, Next week: Batman jousts with The Joker again! This started on the third week of the series run and continued until the end of season two. The first episode of a storyline would typically end with Batman and Robin being trapped in a deathtrap, while the narrator (Dozier) would tell viewers to watch the next night with the repeated phrase: Tune in tomorrow  same Bat-time, same Bat-channel! Even many years after the show ceased production, this catch-phrase still remained a long-running punchline in popular culture.On March 16, 1966, the East Coast broadcast of The Purr-Fect Crime was interrupted, then cut-off, by news bulletins and special coverage of the 8 space mission, which had run into trouble and had to be brought back to Earth later that evening. On the West Coast, the live coverage of the emergency splashdown pre-empted the show entirely. Part two of this episode, Better Luck Next Time, aired as scheduled the following night (March 17). These were the first two episodes to be repeated later that spring, since when originally aired on March 16, East Coast viewers had seen only bits and pieces of Part 1 while West Coast viewers did not see Part 1 at all.Several cast members recorded music tied in to the series. Adam West released a single titled Miranda, a country-tinged pop song that he actually performed in costume during live appearances in the 1960s. Frank Gorshin released a song titled The Riddler, which was composed and arranged by Torm. Burgess Meredith recorded a spoken word single called The Escape backed with The Capture, which consisted of The Penguin narrating his recent crime spree to a jazz beat. Burt Ward recorded a song called Boy Wonder, I Love You, written and arranged by Zappa.Parodies in the series* The television show was famous for parodying names of many famous celebrities of the day. Among the most notable were newscasters Cronkite, who was parodied as Walter Klondike, and Huntley, who was known as Chet Chumley on the show. Steve Allen played a character named Allen Stevens. J. Pauline Spaghetti, a woman who is almost tricked into giving up her fortune to the notorious European criminal Sandman, played by Rennie, is a parody on Paul Getty.* Meriwether, the Catwoman of the Batman movie, plays Lisa Carson, a wealthy Gotham City socialite who is kidnapped by King Tut. Lisas father is John E. Carson  a parody on the legendary host of Tonight Show, Carson.* Although never seen in the series, there were references to a Governor Stonefellow, including occasional phone calls from Commissioner Gordon to Stonefellow. The name was a parody on Rockefeller, who served as governor of New York from 1959 to 1973.* Gotham Citys Mayor Linseed is a parody on Lindsay, who served as Mayor of New York City from January 1, 1966 to December 31, 1973. Deputy Mayor Zorty appeared in one episode; he was a parody on Yorty, who was then Mayor of Angeles.* Early in the shows second season, Batman is pitted against Ma Parker, played by Winters. Parkers name is a parody of Barker, who was part of a crime wave during the 1930s.* In The Penguins Last Jest on December 8, 1966, Penguin and his crew are on trial for a host of felony crimes. Batman is asked by Gotham Citys district attorney Jefferson Hamfurter to prosecute the case. Hamfurters name is a parody of the district attorney on Mason, Burger.* Pentagon becomes The Hexagon in the Batman series.* The Catwoman is known to have an additional hideout, Cat-Lair West, across the river from Gotham City in New Guernsey, a parody on Jersey. Guernsey and Jersey are both islands in the English Channel and both breeds of cattle.* New Guernsey is connected to Gotham by the Abraham Lincoln Bridge. In reality, the Washington Bridge and the Tunnel connect New York City with New Jersey.* Gothams Short Island was a parody of New Yorks Island.  It is separated from Gotham by the West River. Long Island is actually separated from the rest of New York City by the River.* Gothams Phony Island was a parody of New Yorks Island.* A notable location in Gotham is Chimes Square, a parody of Square.* An episode involves some action in suburban Northchester. The suburban county north of New York City is Westchester.* In the episode The Entrancing Dr. Cassandra, in which Lupino appeared as the episodes title villain, Dr. Cassandra Spellcraft, the evil alchemist steals the Mope Diamond, a parody on the famous Diamond, from Spiffanys Jewellers. Spiffanys is a parody on & Co.* One of Woodrow Roosevelt High Schools basketball rivals is Disko Tech, a homophone of discotheque.* The three-part Londinium story arc during final season (The Londinium Larcenies, The Foggiest Notion, and The Bloody Tower) was the series tribute to the London period of the 1960s. At the time of the show, British pop culture was popular in North America. Many aspects of the British capital were parodied during the three episodes. The citys name is changed to Londinium, which was Londons name during Roman times. Yard becomes Ireland Yard in the series. Street becomes Barnaby Street. Street, the citys press district, is changed to Bleat Street.* Hale Jr., who became best known in America for portraying Skipper of the S. S. Minnow on Island, appeared as Gilligan, the owner/cook of a diner, in The Ogg And I. (The title itself is a parody of The Egg And I, the film comedy that introduced the characters of and Pa Kettle, who maintained a chicken-and-egg farm.)* The episode The Bats Kow Tow features a hair stylist named Mr. Oceanbring, a play on, and played by Sebring, a Hollywood hair stylist who is most remembered for being one of the victims (along with actress Tate) of Mansons gang on August 9, 1969.* The 1964 opening of the Bridge is fictionalized in The Bookworm Turns as the opening of Gotham Narrows Bridge, using news footage of the real event.* Footage from the New York Worlds Fair is used for establishing shots in the premire episode, Diddle Riddle, which opens with a the Riddlers jewel heist at the Gotham City Worlds Fair.* In the Minerva, Mayhem and Millionaires, the series final episode which featured Zsa Gabor as the villan Minerva, executive producer Dozier and producer Howie Horwitz have uncredited bit parts parodying themselves as they are patrons of Minervas Spa and her truth machine mines their brains for information as to where they keep their money.  Dozier portrays himself as a millionaire, with his name mentioned only once, by Minerva, as Mr. Dozier. Howoritz is asked by Minerva how he became a famous director and responded he never uses method actors and never listen to network executives.* Several political figures of the day were parodied during Hizzoner the Penguin aired on November 2, 1966, which included sharp barbs aimed at candidates relying on political pollsters and a hapless candidate clearly modeled on Barry Goldwater. In the last scene of the subsequent episode, Dizzoner the Penguin, Batman is first offered the Republican nomination for President in 1968. After he politely turns that down, he immediately receives another call in which he is offered the Democratic nomination for President in 1968. Batmans stunned response is, But I thought you already had a candidate for 1968. Democrat Johnson was of the United States at the time the episode was filmed.After the series run1970s reunionsIn 1972, Burt Ward and Yvonne Craig reunited as Robin and Batgirl for an Equal Pay public service announcement. Dick Gautier played Batman because Adam West was, at the time, trying to distance himself from the role. It was narrated by William Dozier. In 1977, Adam West and Burt Ward returned as voice actors for the Filmation-produced animated series, New Adventures of Batman. West would once again reprise his role as Batman in animated form when he succeeded Soule in the final two seasons of Friends. In 1979, West, Ward, and Frank Gorshin reunited on NBC for Hanna-Barberas two of the Superheroes television specials. In the 1980s, West, Meriwether, Ward, Craig, and Price teamed up for a series of celebrity editions of Feud.LegacyThe series stars, West and Ward, were typecast for decades afterwards, with West especially finding himself unable to escape the reputation of a hammy, campy actor. However, years after the series impact faded, an episode of The Animated Series paid tribute to West with an episode titled Beware The Gray Ghost. In this episode, West played the role of an aging star of a superhero television series Bruce Wayne had watched as a child and from which he later found inspiration. This gave West new popularity with the next generation of fans. He also played Gotham Citys Mayor Grange as a somewhat recurring role in The Batman.In 2003, West and Ward reunited for a tongue-in-cheek movie titled to the Batcave: The Misadventures of Adam and Burt which combined dramatized recreations of the filming of the original series (with younger actors standing in for the stars), with modern day footage of West and Ward searching for a stolen Batmobile. The film included cameo appearances by Newmar, Gorshin, and Lee Meriwether, as well as Waggoner, who had been an early candidate for the role of Batman. Craig did not appear in the movie  she reportedly disliked the script. The movie received high ratings and was released on DVD in May 2005.The animated television series The Brave and the Bold is influenced by the 1960s television series. The opening credits feature Batman rope-climbing up a building, something that Adam West and Burt Ward often did in the show.() Several villains from the 1960s show including King Tut, Egghead, Mad Hatter, Archer, Bookworm, False Face, Black Widow, Siren, Marsha Queen of Diamonds, Louie the Lilac, Ma Parker, and Shame make cameo appearances as prisoners at Heights prison in the episode Day of the Dark Knight!. They are all captured by Batman and Arrow during a mass escape attempt. The episode Game Over for Owlman! shows a room in the Batcave containing souvenirs of deathtraps that the Joker employed in the 1960s series, with accompanying flashbacks: the giant key from the Human Key Duplicator from The Impractical Joker, the machine-controlled chair from The Joker Goes to School, and the giant clam from Jokers Hard Times. The episode The Color of Revenge! begins with a flashback to the time of the 1960s television series, using attributes such as the red Batphone, the Shakespeare bust, the sliding bookcase, the Batpoles, Robin in his old television-series costume, and the shot of Batman and Robin fastening their seat belts in the Batmobile. Additionally, the Adam West Batman briefly appears in Night of the Batmen! as part of an army of Batmen gathered across the Multiverse.The Young Justice episode Schooled briefly references the show as well by featuring a Shakespeare bust in Bruces office at the Waynetech building in Metropolis. As a further homage to the series, Bruce is shown accessing an emergency Batsuit hidden in his desk by flipping a switch concealed within the bust.Holy ......, Batman!A line spoken by Robin (ODonnell) in Forever is a homage to the television Robins catch-phrase exclamations that started Holy and sometimes ended Batman!, for instance Holy bargain basements, Batman! (from the television series first season) and Holy flypaper, Batman! (From the television series second season). During the movie, Robin says Holey rusted metal, Batman! after the duo climb onto twisted metal girders beside some water. This catchphrase also appeared for a time in Batman comic books.Nonrelease on home videoDespite considerable interest,(The program is perpetually highly ranked as a Most Requested unreleased show at TVShowsonDVD.com) there is no official home entertainment release of the series.Conflicting reports of the reasons behind the non-release of the series point to a number of different factors, which may or may not indeed play a part. These include:*Disagreement between DC Comics, owners of the Batman character, after DCs sister/parent company Bros. took over DC in 1969. Warner Bros. could also be involved, as well as Century Fox, owners of the program itself.(Fox (who owns the footage) and DC Comics (owner of the characters, and sister company of Warner Bros.) are still deep in the process of sorting out the legalities and licensing situations for this release. There may be other licenses involved as well, such as music and so forth. Batman  1966 Batman Series Still Not Coming To DVD Yet, by David Lambert, December 5, 2005. Retrieved 2008-04-05.)**Commentators have suggested that DC Comics itself is not involved, and that Warner and Fox are reluctant to work with each other. This was denied by a Warner spokesperson in 2005 during their semi-regular Home Theater Forum chat, where it was stated that the issues were between Fox and DC alone, with Warner playing no part in negotiations.(Warner Home Video representatives stated::..we have no rights to 60s BATMAN... The BATMAN TV issue is between DC Comics and Fox. It doesnt involve Warner home video. Chat Transcript: Warner Home Video on HTF, March 29, 2005. Retrieved 2008-04-05.)*Greenway/ABC/Fox rights issues. The Batman series was conceived as an equal partnership between Doziers Greenway Productions and Fox in 1964, before Fox entered into a separate agreement with ABC to produce the series in 1965. With three companies involved almost from the outset, there is some speculation that these rights are tangled even before the DC Comics character ownership rights are to be considered. Moreover:**In 2006, Deborah Dozier Potter, the successor-in-interest to Greenway Productions sued Fox for allegedly withholding monies under the Fox/ABC agreement.(Batman  New Lawsuit  Will We Ever See Batman on DVD? by Gord Lacey, August 19, 2006. Retrieved 2008-04-05.)(Fox Hit With Claim for Net Profits on Batman Series, by Leslie Simmons, August 18, 2006. Retrieved 2008-04-05.) Dozier Potter further claimed that this came to her attention when, in March 2005, she considered releasing the series on DVD, implying that (from her perspective at least) Greenway/Dozier Potter has some say in the matter of potentional DVD release of the series. The case was resolved/dismissed in November 2007. In February 2005, John Stacks had approached Deborah Dozier Potter to market the series on DVD. There were many offers and lots of interest in the release of the series, as can be read in Joel Eisners The Official Batbook Revised Bat Edition 2008.(The relevant passage reads: The lawsuit filed by Debra Dozier Potter was dismissed with prejudice on 11/26/07. Furthermore, a notice of unconditional settlement was filed by the Plaintff on 11/19/07. For those who care to look, the case is DEBORAH DOZIER POTTER VS TWENTIETH CENTURY FOX FILM CORPORATION Case No BC357067. Retrieved 2008-04-05.)*Other complications/rights issues:**Christopher D. Heer, writing at the 1966 Batman Message Board, clarified a quote by moderator Lee Kirkham, noting that there will likely be the need for complicated deals regarding cameos, since ...at least some of the cameos were done as uncredited, unpaid walk-ons  which means that Fox does NOT have home video clearances for them. Either those scenes would have to be cut or an agreement reached with the actors.(Re: Blog talks about Batman DVD ownership woes Reply #42, January 25, 2008. Retrieved 2008-04-05. )**Kirkhams initial quote also noted that, alongside music clearance issues, there could also be problems over some of the costumes, and the original Batmobile:::It may surprise you, but then there are also rights issues concerning the design of the unique Batmobile design used in the show, and possibly a separate issue regarding some of the costumes as well!(A Few Non-Bionic Legal Issues Plaguing TV-DVD, by David Lambert, 2007-10-07.)The series, under the Fox/ABC deal, is however still in syndication, and regularly shown on a number of channels around the world. Thus far, though, only the 1966 feature film is available on DVD for non-broadcast viewing in North America. This affected the 2003 movie reunion to the Batcave: The Misadventures of Adam and Burt, also released to DVD, which was able to make use of footage only from the 1966 movie.The series will return to national network TV for the first time in October 2011 when it begins a run on the nostalgia programming Me-TV network in October 2011.(http://metvnetwork.com/fall.phpMETV network fall announcement)With Batman being unavailable for home-video release, an unusual situation has occurred in which material that would be considered DVD featurettes has been released separately. In 2004, Entertainment released Holy Batmania, a two-DVD set that included documentaries on the making of the series, as well as rare footage such as the original screen tests of the cast and Lyle Waggoner.() In 2008, Adam West released a privately issued DVD with the tongue-in-cheek title Adam West Naked for which he recorded anecdotes regarding all 120 episodes of the series.(Adam West Gets Back in the Batmobile, Los Angeles Times Hero Complex, March 20, 2009, accessed Feb. 22, 2010.)CollectiblesStarting in 1966, an enormous amount of Batman merchandise was manufactured and marketed to cash-in on the TV shows vast popularity. This includes trading cards, scale model kits of the Batmobile, coloring books, and board games. Items from this particular era have gained substantial collector appeal with their remarkable variety, scarcity, and style.One of the most desired collectibles involves the episodes introducing Catwoman (The Purr-fect Crime / Better Luck Next Time), which were the subject of a View-Master reel & booklet set in 1966 (Sawyers Packet # B492). While the series was first-run on ABC, packet cover indicia reflected the Bat Craze cultural phenomenon by referring to the booklet as a Batbooklet, Dynamically illustrated. By the time the television series was cancelled in 1968 and GAF had taken over the View-Master product, Batbooklet was removed in favor of then-standard View-Master packaging for all future releases in the decades to follow, right up the period when the standard packet line was discontinued. The first seasons superimposed fight onomatopoeias were not used for the View-Masters scenes of fights. Instead, black-lined blast balloons (transparent inside), and series-like onomatopoeias were illustrated and superimposed over fight images.The popularity of the TV series has carried several decades after its debut; toy company Mattel has made the 1966 Batmobile in various scales for the Wheels product line.ReferencesExternal links*** Museum of Broadcast Communications*  Mad Magazine parody()(srie de televisi)(Fernsehserie)(serie de televisin)(srie tlvise)(serie televisiva)(televisieserie)ja:#(TV-serie 1966-68)(srie de televiso)()(TV series)(TV serija)(televisiosarja)(TV-serie)
299541
Frederick_Forsyth
 website  http://www.frederickforsyth.co.uk/Frederick Forsyth, CBE (born 25 August 1938) is an English author and occasional political commentator. He is best known for thrillers such as Day of the Jackal, Odessa File, Fourth Protocol, The Dogs of War, Devils Alternative, Fist of God, Icon, The Veteran, Avenger, Afghan and The Cobra. Early life and education The son of a furrier, Forsyth was born in Kent. He was educated at School and later attended the of Granada in Spain.( He became one of the youngest pilots in the Air Force at the age of 19, where he served on Service from 1956 to 1958.  Becoming a journalist, he joined Reuters in 1961 and later the BBC in 1965, where he served as an assistant diplomatic correspondent. From July to September 1967, he served as a correspondent covering the Civil War between the region of Biafra and Nigeria. He left the BBC in 1968 after controversy arose over his alleged bias towards the Biafran cause and accusations that he falsified segments of his reports. Returning to Biafra as a freelance reporter, Forsyth wrote his first book, The Biafra Story in 1969.( Works Forsyth decided to write a novel using similar research techniques to those used in journalism. His first full length novel, Day of the Jackal, was published in 1971 and became an international bestseller and gained its author the Edgar Allan Poe Award for Best Novel. In this book, the Arme Secrte (a real-life terrorist group) hires an assassin to kill then-French President de Gaulle. It was made into a film of the same name.In Forsyths second full-length novel, Odessa File (1972), a reporter attempts to track down a certain ex-Nazi SS officer in modern Germany. The reporter discovers him via the diary of a Jewish Holocaust survivor who committed suicide earlier, but he is being shielded by an organization that protects ex-Nazis, called ODESSA. This book was later made into a movie with the same name, starring Voight, but there were substantial alterations.In The Dogs of War (1974) a British mining executive hires a group of mercenaries to overthrow the government of an African country so that he can install a puppet regime that will allow him cheap access to a colossal platinum-ore reserve. This book was also adapted to film, in 1981, starring Walken and Berenger.Shepherd was an illustrated novella published in 1975. It tells of a nightmare journey by an RAF pilot while flying home for Christmas in the late 1950s. His attempts to find a rational explanation for his eventual rescue prove as troublesome as his experience.Following this came Devils Alternative in 1979, which was set in 1982. In this book, the Union faces a disastrous grain harvest. USA is ready to help for some political and military concessions. A Politburo faction fight ensues. War is proposed as solution. Ukrainian freedom fighters complicate the situation later. In the end, a Swedish oil tanker built in Japan, a Russian airliner hijacked to Berlin and various governments find themselves involved.In 1982, Comebacks, a collection of ten short stories, was published. Some of these stories had been written earlier. Many were set in the of Ireland where Forsyth was living at the time. One of them, Are No Snakes In Ireland, won him a second Edgar Allan Poe Award, this time for best short story.Fourth Protocol was published in 1984 and involves renegade elements within the Union attempting to plant a nuclear bomb near an American airbase in the UK, intending to influence the upcoming elections and lead to the election of an anti-NATO, anti-American, anti-nuclear, pro-soviet Labour government. The Fourth Protocol was later filmed, starring Brosnan and Caine, in 1987. Almost all of the political content was removed from the film.Forsyths tenth book came in 1989 with The Negotiator, in which the American Presidents son is kidnapped and one mans job is to negotiate his release.Two years later, in 1991, The Deceiver was published. It includes four separate short stories reviewing the career of British secret agent Sam McCready. At the start of the novel, the Permanent Under-Secretary of State (PUSS) of the Foreign and Commonwealth Office requires the Chief of the SIS to push Sam into early retirement. The four stories are presented to a grievance committee in an attempt to allow Sam to stay on active duty with the SIS.In 1994, Forsyth published Fist of God, a novel which concerns the first War. Next, in 1996, he published Icon, about the rise of fascists to power in Russia.In 1999, Forsyth published Phantom of Manhattan, a sequel to Phantom of the Opera. It was intended as a departure from his usual genre; Forsyths explanation was that I had done mercenaries, assassins, Nazis, murderers, terrorists, special forces soldiers, fighter pilots, you name it, and I got to think, could I actually write about the human heart?( However, it did not achieve the same success as his other novels, and he subsequently returned to modern-day thrillers.In 2001, The Veteran, another collection of short stories, was published, followed by Avenger, published in September 2003, about a Canadian billionaire who hires a veteran to bring his grandsons killer to the US. Avenger was released as a film starring Sam Elliot and Timothy Hutton.(Afghan, published in August 2006, is an indirect sequel to Fist of God. Set in the very near future, the threat of a catastrophic assault on the West, discovered on a senior al-Qaeda members computer, compels the leaders of the U.S. and the UK to attempt a desperate gambitto substitute a seasoned British operative, retired Col. Mike Martin (of Fist of God), for an Afghan Taliban commander being held prisoner at Guantnamo Bay.Cobra, published in 2010, features some of the characters previously featured in Avenger, and has as its subject an attempt to destroy the world trade in cocaine. Style Forsyth eschews psychological complexity in favour of meticulous plotting, based on detailed factual research. His books are full of information about the technical details of such subjects as money laundering, gun running and identity theft. His novels read like investigative journalism in fictional guise. His moral vision is a harsh one: the world is made up of predators and prey, and only the strong survive.Forsyths novels typically show the ways in which spies, gangsters, assassins, mercenaries, diplomats, business leaders and politicians go about their business behind-the-scenes; the sort of things that the average reader would not suspect while reading a simple headline. The Jackal does not just go out and shoot at Charles de Gaulle: he does meticulous research on the man at the library of the Museum; obtains papers for his false identities; travels around Paris to find a good location for a snipers nest; and buys and tests his weapons.Also a subtle twist at the end of the novel can reveal that a lot more was going on than the reader initially suspected: Cat Shannon, the central figure of The Dogs of War, turns out to have had his own agenda all the time; Adam Munro of The Devils Alternative finds out that he was not a player but a pawn to people in high places; in The Odessa File, the reporters true motivation is revealed at the end, and a number of events in Icon turn out to have been committed by people other than those who the reader had been led to suppose. In Avenger, one of the events that allows the Avenger to escape is unexplained until the last few paragraphs.Forsyths novels also feature famous personalities and political leaders as charactersThe Day of the Jackal features the French president Charles de Gaulle and his interior minister, Frey, who heads the government search for the assassinthe opening chapter is based on an actual attempt by the OAS to kill de Gaulle. The Odessa File features the real-life Nazi murderer Roschmann and the Nazi-hunter Wiesenthal. The Fourth Protocol and Icon involve several chapters indirectly featuring former British prime minister Thatcher and former US president H. W. Bush. Although unnamed or of fictional identity, the leader of the Soviet Union is portrayed as the lead antagonist in several novels. Other real life characters are thinly disguised. For example, real life suspected Russian arms dealer Bout is portrayed as Vladimir Bout in Avenger. Public life Forsyth is a Eurosceptic Conservative. He is Patron of Off Out, an organisation calling for Britains withdrawal from the European Union. In 2003, he was awarded the One of Us Award from the Way Forward group for his services to the Conservative movement in Britain. He is also a patron of the Britons Foundation. In 2005, he came out in opposition to Clarkes candidacy for the leadership of the Conservative Party, calling Clarkes record in government unrivalled; a record of failure which at every level has never been matched. Instead, he endorsed and donated money to David Daviss campaign.He is a strong supporter of the British monarchy. In his book Icon, he recommended a monarchy as a solution to Russias political problems following the collapse of the Soviet Union.He is an occasional radio broadcaster on political issues, and has also written for newspapers throughout his career, including a weekly page in the Express. In 2003, he criticised gay-bashers in the churches in Guardian newspaper.( He has narrated several documentaries, including Jesus Christ Airlines, a history of men in battle and I Have Never Forgotten You: The Life & Legacy of Simon Wiesenthal.In August 2006, Forsyth appeared on the ITV gameshow Who Wants To Be A Millionaire? to raise funds for charity.  On 8 February 2007, Forsyth appeared on BBCs political panel show Question Time. On it, he expressed scepticism on the subject of anthropogenic change. On 26 March 2008, he also appeared on BBCs One Show. On 17 June 2008, Forsyth was interviewed on BBC 5 Live Midday News in relation to the restoration of the Covenant. During the interview he referred to Brown as a numpty.In October 2010, Forsyth was shortlisted for the award of Bigot of the Year in the 2010 Awards.( Bibliography  See also * of bestselling novels in the United States References  refs  ()(Transscript from a Larry King Live Weekend Interview with on CNN)(http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0473445/)()()* Frederick Forsyth. Encyclopdia Britannica. 2009. Encyclopdia Britannica Online. 3 Nov. 2009 EB. External links * * * They Take The Mind, and What Emerges is Just Tapioca Pudding: interview with F. Forsyth.ForsythForsythForsythForsythForsythForsythForsythForsythForsythForsythForsythForsythja:ForsythForsythForsythForsythForsythForsythForsyth
301364
Union_Carbide
Union Carbide Corporation is a wholly owned subsidiary of The Chemical Company. It currently employs more than 2,400 people.(Union Carbide Corporation, About Us. Accessed May 31, 2011.) Union Carbide primarily produces chemicals and polymers that undergo one or more further conversions by customers before reaching consumers. Some are high-volume commodities and others are specialty products meeting the needs of smaller markets. Markets served include paints and coatings, packaging, wire and cable, household products, personal care, pharmaceuticals, automotive, textiles, agriculture, and oil and gas. The company is a former component of the Jones Industrial Average.(History of DJIA, globalfinancialdata.com)Founded in 1917, the companys researchers developed an economical way to make ethylene from gas liquids, such as ethane and propane, giving birth to the modern petrochemical industry. Before divesting them, the chemical giant owned consumer products Eveready and Energizer batteries, Glad bags and wraps, Simoniz car wax, and Prestone antifreeze. The company divested other businesses before being acquired by Dow Chemical on February 6, 2001, including electronic chemicals, polyurethane intermediates, industrial gases and carbon products.(Union Carbide Corporation, History, Accessed July 9, 2008.)HistoryThe Union Carbide and Carbon Corporation was formed in 1917 from the merger of the former Union Carbide founded in 1898 and the National Carbon Company founded in 1886. These companies made carbon rods for lights and electrodes for arc furnaces, and produced aluminum.(Themistocles DSilva, The Black Box of Bhopal: A Closer Look at the Worlds Deadliest Industrial Disaster,Trafford Publishing, 2006 ISBN 1412084121, page 27) Other companies merged included Linde Air Products, maker of liquid oxygen, Prest-O-Lite, manufacturer of calcium carbide, and Electro Metallurgical. In 1920 the company set up a chemicals division which manufactured ethylene glycol for use as automotive antifreeze. The company continued to acquire related chemical producers, for example, the Bakelite Corporation became a division in 1939. The company changed its name to Union Carbide Corporation in 1957.Ucar batteries was Carbides former industrial and consumer zinc chloride battery manufacturing branch. Energizer alkaline batteries were sold off to Purina in 1986, following a hostile takeover attempt.Hawks Nest Tunnel disasterThe Hawks Nest Tunnel disaster took place between 1927 and 1932 in a West Virginia tunnel project led by Union Carbide. During the construction of the tunnel, workers found the mineral silica and were asked to mine it for use in electroprocessing steel. The workers were not given masks or breathing equipment to use while mining. Due to silica dust exposure, many workers developed silicosis, a debilitating lung disease. According to a marker on site, there were 109 admitted deaths. A hearing placed the death toll at 476.Bhopal disasterThe Bhopal disaster was an industrial disaster that took place at a Union Carbide India Limited pesticide plant in the Indian city of Bhopal, Pradesh. Around midnight on 3 December 1984, isocyanate (MIC) gas was accidentally released from the plant, exposing more than 500,000 people to MIC and other chemicals. The government of Madhya Pradesh confirmed a total of 3,787 deaths related to the gas release. The disaster left an estimated 40,000 individuals permanently disabled, maimed, or suffering from serious illness. (Eckerman, Ingrid (2001) Chemical Industry and Public Health  Bhopal as an example. Accessed 8 November 2010) Union Carbide was sued by the of India and agreed to an settlement of US$470 million in 1989.(Bhopal and the BP Oil Spill: A Tale of Two Disasters) Issues yet to be settled include the Bhopal plant site clean up and Indias demand for the extradition of then-Union Carbide CEO Warren Anderson.(See also*Carbide Corporate Center*Carbon CompanyReferencesExternal links* The Bhopal Story - The Complete coverage of 1984 Bhopal Gas Disaster* UnionCarbide.com - Union Carbide Corporation homepage* Bhopal.orgCarbideCarbideCarbideCarbideCarbideCarbideCarbideja:CarbideCarbideCarbidezh:
302655
Pathanamthitta_district
 footnotesPathanamthitta district (Malayalam: ) is the youngest district located in the southern part of the state of Kerala, India. The district headquarters is in Pathanamthitta town. The district is surrounded by Kottayam, Idukki, Alappuzha and Kollam districts. It has a border with the state of Nadu in the east. Pathanamthitta, Tiruvalla, Adoor, Pandalam, Kozhencherry, Ranni, Mallapally, Konni and Kumbanad are the major towns in the district.Pathanamthitta is known as the headquarters of pilgrimage tourism, for the large number of pilgrims it receives. The famous pilgrimage centre of Sabarimala, is situated here. Having three rivers and a forest cover which includes a tiger reserve, the district also attracts many wildlife and nature enthusiasts.The According to the of India 2001 the population was 1,231,577() making it the third least populous district in Kerala (out of 14), after Wayanad and Idukki.( )Pathanamthitta has been declared the first polio-free district in India.() The district is 10.03% urbanised.() Etymology The districts name is a combination of two Malayalam words pathanam and thitta, which together mean array of houses on the river side.() The district capital is located on the banks of the river Achankovil. History It is presumed that the regions that form the district were formerly under the Pandalam reign, which had connections with the Pandya kingdom.() When Pandalam was added to the princely state Travancore in 1820, the region came under Travancore administration.The district was formed on November 1, 1982 in the interest of speeding up development. The formation was done by incorporating various portions of the erstwhile Kollam, Alappuzha and Idukki districts. While the taluks Pathanamthitta, Adoor, Ranni, Konni and Kozhencherry were taken from district, Thiruvalla and Mallappally were taken from district.(GeographyPathanamthitta is a landlocked district, located at , spanning over an area of .( )The district is bordered by the districts Kottayam and Idukki in the north, Alappuzha in the west, Kollam in the south. To the east it has border with the Nadu state.()The district can be divided into three natural geographical regions: the highland, the midland and the lowland. The highland stretches through the Ghats, where the hills are tall and covered with thick forests. Ghats maintains an average altitude of around 800 m. It descends to the smaller hills of midland in the centre and finally to the lowland. The lowland with its abundance of coconut trees, lies along the western borders of district.()ClimatePathanamthitta has a moderate climate, which is more or less the same climatic conditions as prevalent elsewhere in the State. Annual temperature range between 20C (68F) and 39C (102F). The district experiences three distinct weather conditions: Winter, summer and the monsoon. The winter season is experienced from December to February and summer season from March to May. There are two rainy seasons: The South-West monsoon (June to September) and the North-East monsoon (October to November). The South-West monsoon is usually very heavy. About 75 per cent of the annual rain is received during this season. Forest Pathanamthitta district has a reserve forest area of .(  This is approximately 50% of the total district area. The forest area can broadly be classified as evergreen, semi-evergreen and moist deciduous. The forest is the main source of raw materials for wood based industrial units. Timber is the most important produce. Rivers Three important rivers flow through the district. These rivers originate from various mountains of the Ghats mountain range. The Pamba () which is the third longest river in kerala, has its origin in Pulachimala. The Achankovil river () originates from Pasukida Mettu, and Manimala river () originates from the Thattamalai hills. A small portion of Kallada river also falls in the southern border of the district. Pamba and Achankovil rivers together drain more than 70% of the total area of Pathanamthitta.()()One third of the electricity produced in the State comes from this district. The Sabarigiri Hydroelectric project situated at the Pamba basin and the Kakkad Electricity project functions in this district. The abundant water resources are also utilized for irrigation purpose through the Kallada and Pamba irrigation projects.EconomyAgriculturethumb|Pepper - the King of Spices - on a Pepper Vinethumb|Cocoa pods in various stages of ripeningthumb|right|Sugar cane fieldAgriculture is the main occupation of the people. About 75% people are dependent on this sector. Rubber is the most important crop, with its plantations covering over . The hilly terrain coupled with high humidity makes the region suitable for rubber plantations. Paddy is the most important crop cultivated in the wet lands. Tapioca and pulses are the important dry land crops. Other major crops are coconut, banana, pepper and ginger. In certain areas cashew, pineapple, sugarcane, cocoa and other tree spices are cultivated. The land available for cultivation is less since sizeable area of the district is reserve forest.* Source : Statistics for Planning-DES 2006FisheriesPathanamthitta district has a unique position in the inland fisheries map of Kerala state with its freshwater resources like rivers, reservoirs, streams, ponds, quarries and fields. The fisheries activities in this region started with the establishment of a Fresh Water Survey Station. The district has an Ornamental Fish Breeding resource centre and a National Fish Seed Farm. There are 2444( fishermen depending on this sector for their livelihood.Pathanamthitta district has tremendous potential in fish culture sector. For the development of piscine culture activities a Fish Farmers Development Agency(F.F.D.A.) was constituted during the year 1990. The agency provide technical as well as financial assistance to the farmers. The ongoing schemes of F.F.D.A. are assistance to new pond construction, pond reclamation, supply of fish seed, feed, medicine towards input, integrated farming and establishment of mini hatcheries.IndustryPathanamthitta district is considered as industrially backward. As of March 31, 2006, there are 13,898 registered Small Scale Industries (SSI), employing 46,421 people.( There are also 378 workers employed in the handloom sector. There are three Mini Industrial Estates in the district with the State government declaring 8.5 hectares of area as development plot. District Industries Centre distributes the land to needy entrepreneurs on request. 14.48 hectares of land has been transferred to KINFRA and five acres of land has been transferred to SIDCO for industrial parks. Green channel committee has been set up to help entrepreneurs get help in obtaining licenses, clearances, electricity, water connection, without delay. Administration The district headquarters is at Pathanamthitta town. The district administration is headed by the District Collector. He is assisted by five Deputy Collectors holding charges of general matters, revenue recovery, land acquisition, land reforms and election.()Pathanamthitta has two revenue divisions: Thiruvalla and Adoor. The district is divided into five taluks: Ranni, Kozhencherry, Adoor, Thiruvalla and Mallappally. The taluks again are divided into villages. Villages are the lowest level of subdivisions in India. Pathanamthitta has a total of 68 villages.Under the three tier system of panchayat in rural areas, Pathanamthitta has one district panchayat, 9 block panchayat and 53 grama panthayats. The headquarters of the district panchayat is also at Pathanamthitta. Under the single tier system of municipality in urban areas, Adoor, Pathanamthitta and Thiruvalla are the 3 municipalities the district has.As per the Delimitation of Parliamentary and Assembly Constituencies Order, 2008, Pathanamthitta has five Assembly constituencies, down from eight. However, the district was unified into a single Parliamentary constituency, thus contributing a seat to the Sabha. The Pathanamthitta parliamentary constituency is formed by including all the five Assembly constituencies of the district along with two other Assembly constituencies in the neighboring district.()() Congress and the CPM/CPI are the two main political parties. Transport Some portion of National Highway 220 (NH220) passes through Tiruvalla. SH 07 and SH 08 are the two major State highways providing connectivity to other towns and districts. SH 07, also known as K. Road, passes only through Pathanamthitta. SH 08 also known as Eastern Highway, is the second longest state highway of Kerala. It connects the townships of Punalur in Kollam district and Muvattupuzha in Ernakulam district.The Kerala Public Work Department (P.W.D) maintains the all the roads in the district, including the village roads. As of 2005, P.W.D. maintains about  of road in the district.There is a good connectivity of State transport, K.S.R.T.C., on the T.K. Road. However, on other roads and especially towards the eastern side, the State transport service is less frequent. Here, private bus operators facilitate the transportation needs. The K.S.R.T.C. has three major depots in the district. From Pathanamthitta, there are Inter State Services to Coimbatore and Tenkasi. Tiruvalla (TRVL) is the only Railway Station within the district. Express trains to Trivandrum, Cochin, Chennai, Mangalore, Mumbai, Hyderabad, Calcutta, New Delhi, Goa, Baroda, Ahmedabad etc., passes through Tiruvalla station. Computerised Train Reservation Centres are available both at Tiruvalla and Pathanamthitta. International Airport (TRV) at Thiruvananthapuram () is the nearest airport. The National Carrier Air India has a Reservation Office at Thiruvalla.A private airport, which is managed by Aviation Ltd, is under construction at Aranmula, 18 km from Pathanamthitta town. Once completed, the airport will be the first of its kind in Kerala.()() Demographics According to the of India 2001, the district had a population of 1,234,016 with a density of 467 persons per square kilometre.() This is the lowest density in the State after Idukki and Wayanad.() Schedule tribes and castes comprise 13% of the total population. The female to male ratio is 1094:1000, which is the highest among the districts in the State.() Pathanamthittas literacy rate is 95%.Pathanamthittas major religion are Hinduism, Christianity and Islam. Sikhs, Buddhists and Jains have much smaller followings.  the population included 694,560 Hindus, 481,602 Christians and 56,457 Muslims, the lowest following in the State.()Cultureright | thumb | Padyani - At Thazhoor Bhagavathy Temple at Vazhamuttom near PathanamthittaPathanamthitta district is known for its fairs and festivals. The Padayani is one such major folk art. The colourful art, colloquially known as Padeni, is associated with the festivals of certain temples only in Southern Kerala. The art is a combination of music, dance, painting and satire. Sabarimala, Convention, Anandapalli and Kadammanitta are some of the major fairs and festivals.() Traditional Keralite festivals like Onam, Vishu as well as other major Christian and Islam festivals are celebrated with great fervor. The region is known for its cultural heritage and communal harmony. Participation of people from different religions can be seen.The residents of Pathanamthitta partake of Keralite cuisine, which is generally characterised by an abundance of coconut and spices. Other South Indian and cuisines are also popular. The residents of the district generally wear traditional Kerala wear. The younger generation prefers clothing to the traditional wear.The early history of literature and the native tradition of Malayalam poetry has its roots in the district through the contributions of the three poets known as Poets. They lived between AD 1350 and 1450. Their work include the Malayalam translation of Gita, Bharatamala (a condensation of Mahabharatam), Ramayanam, Bhartam, Purana and Mahatmyam. These works are considered to be among the first major work of its kind in Malayalam.Pathanamthitta was home to a number of acclaimed poets like Kerala Varma,S.Padmanabha Panicker, Mathan Tharakan, Gopala Kurup, Ramakrishnan and V. Simon. Renowned writers like Guru Chaitanya Yati, Dr.M. George, K. M. Varghese, Dr.M. Tharakan, Narendranath had their roots here. S. Valiathan, son of Thampuran of Pandalam, is an acclaimed painter of Kerala, who followed the style of Ravi Varma. Valiyathans paintings are exhibited in the art galleries in USA, Germany, Switzerland and other foreign countries. Film personalities like Gopalakrishnan, Ponnamma, Bhavani, Bhasi, Pankajam, Ponnamma, Soman and Mohanlal are the natives of this district. Tourism With a number of fairs and festivals, Pathanamthitta district is known as the headquarters of pilgrimage tourism.() The district receives an estimated 3 to 4 million pilgrims during the festival season of Sabarimala.() Situated here among the Ghats is a temple dedicated to the Hindu deity, Ayyappan. The district is a host to Asias biggest and the worlds second largest Christian convention.()  The eight-day Christian gathering in February is held at Maramon on the sand-bed of River. The Cherukolpuzha Hindu convention, Kadammanitta devi temple, the 10th century Kaviyoor mahadeva temple, Parthasarathi temple at Aranmula and anikkattilammakshethramhttp://www.anikkattilamma.com are some of the Hindu religious places of interest. Some of the Christian places of interest are St. Marys church at Niranam, St. Thomas Ecumenical Church at Nilackal, Dayara and Parumala. The churches at Niranam and Nilackal (Chayal) are believed to be among the seven churches founded by St. Thomas the Apostle.()() The Muslim colourful Chandanakkudam festival of the Jama  Al Mosque at Pathanamthitta town attracts many visitors. Although these places are religious in nature, they attract people from all faiths.File:MaramonConvention 2009.JPG|thumbnail|300px|Convention: Asias biggest Christian gatheringthumbnail|Perunthenaruvi water fallsThe district is known for its reserve forest and wild life. Perunthenaruvi water falls, Kakki reservoir surrounded by forest and wild animals, dam sites at Moozhyar and Maniyar, elephant training centre at Konni, Charalkunnu hill station are ideal locations for nature enthusiasts. Trekking to the Sabari Hills during January to March is also organized by Pathanamthitta District Tourism Promotion Council (DTPC).thumb|left|Muloor SmarakomPathanamthitta district has places known for its historical importance. Among them are, ancient castles at Pandalam, monument of Thampi Dalawa at Mannadi and the Muloor Smarakom (Muloor memorial). Pandalam was the capital of the ancient Travancore kingdom.The district has other tourist attractions. Aranmula is a major attraction for its famous metal mirrors and snake boat race. The school of traditional arts attracts foreign visitors. Founded by French artist Louba Schild, the school teaches kathakali, classical dance, classical music as well as kalarippayattu. The palace at Aranmula kottaram has a history of 200 years.( ) Flora and fauna Image:Bengal Tiger Kerala India.jpg|thumb|The Tiger inhabits Pathanamthittas reserve forestsPathanamthitta has tropical biodiversity with forest, plantations, rivers and fertile land. Fifty percent of the district is covered with forest, providing rich flora and fauna. The district has a variety of plants including medicinal, spices, tuber crops and those yielding fruits and fiber. Aromatic plants and spices such as pepper, ginger, cardamom and turmeric are cultivated on a large scale. Trees such as timber, teak, rosewood, jack tree, manjakadambu, anjili, pala can be found in abundance.The forests of the district have excellent wild life habitats. A variety of animals and birds can be found. Tigers, elephants, gaur, deer, monkeys and other wild animals are found in the forest. squirrel, lion-tailed macaques, deer and bear can also be spotted in the reserve. Grey Hornbill and Indian Hornbill are found. Wide variety of other birds such as sunbirds, woodpeckers and kingfishers can also be seen.The existence of the wild life habitat is under threat from various areas. Pollution from fertilizer and industries and illegal mining are the major threats. Issues connected to Sabarimala pilgrimage such as clearing of forest land and large amount of waste discharged also threatens the habitat.(()EducationPathanamthitta district is divided into two educational districts: Pathanamthitta and Thiruvalla. There are no universities in this district. Most of the colleges are affiliated to the Gandhi University, Kottayam. As of 2006, there are six engineering colleges and nine private aided arts and science colleges.(As in the case with most of the State, the schools and colleges here are run by the government, private trusts, or individuals. Each school is affiliated with either the Certificate of Secondary Education (ICSE), the Board for Secondary Education (CBSE), or the State Education Board. English is the language of instruction in most private schools, while government run schools offer English or Malayalam. After 10 years of secondary schooling, students typically enroll at Higher Secondary School in one of the three streamsArts, Commerce or Science.Sportsthumb|Aranmula Uthrattathi Boat RaceVallam Kali (Boat Race) is part of a festival celebrated during the month of September. Though the snake boat race is also performed at nearby places, the race held at Aranmula is unique because of the boats shape and design. Maramadimatsaram (Ox Race) is another such seasonal sport. This is held as part of the largest annual cattle fair of Travancore region. The race is held in three categories.()While football is the most popular sport, cricket is the most-followed sport as in the rest of the state and India.Notable peopleSee of people from Pathanamthitta DistrictNotes External links *palace* Government of India - Pathanamthitta district portal* Government of Kerala - Pathanamthitta district portalReferences* Pathanamthitta District Handbook(Distrikt)de Pathanamthitta(district)di Pathanamthitta(district)(distrikt)()
304840
San_Joaquin_River
 footnotes The San Joaquin River () is the largest river of Central California in the States. At over  long, the river starts in the high Sierra Nevada, and flows through a rich agricultural region known as the Joaquin Valley before reaching Bay, Francisco Bay, and the Ocean. An important source of irrigation water as well as a wildlife corridor, the San Joaquin is among the most heavily dammed and diverted of Californias rivers.People have inhabited the San Joaquin Valley for more than 8,000 years, and it was long one of the major population centers of pre-Columbian California. Starting in the late 18th century, successive waves of explorers then settlers, mainly Spanish and American, emigrated to the San Joaquin basin, first exploiting then driving out the indigenous tribes. The newcomers quickly appropriated the rich natural and hydrologic resources of the watershed for use in farms and cities, but found themselves plagued by flood and drought. Because of the uniform topography of the San Joaquin Valley, floods once transformed much of the lower river into a huge inland sea.In the 20th century, many levees and dams were built on the San Joaquin and all of its major tributaries. These engineering works changed the fluctuating nature of the river forever, and cut off the Tulare Basin from the rest of the San Joaquin watershed. Once habitat for thousands of spawning salmon and millions of migratory birds, today the river is subject to tremendous water-supply, navigation and regulation works by various federal agencies, which have dramatically reduced the flow of the river since the 20th century.NameMany different names have been given to the San Joaquin over time, and there were even times when different sections of the river were known by different names. The present name of the river dates back to between 1805 and 1808, when Spanish explorer Moraga was surveying east from Mission San Jos in order to find potential mission sites. Moraga happened upon a tributary (it is unknown which one) of the river, and named it for Saint Joachim, husband of Anne and father of the mother of Jesus. That name was later applied to the entirety of the river, and was in common use by 1810.()(Gudde and Bright, p. 337)In 1826, Smith wrote in his journals that an unknown group of Native Americans called the river the Peticutry,(Hoover and Kyle, pp.89-90) a name which is listed as an official variant in the Geological Survey (USGS) Names Information System. Other names include Rio de San Francisco, probably by Father Juan Cresp in 1772, and Rio San Juan Bautista, the origin of which is unknown.(CourseThe river officially starts in the south-central Sierra Nevada at the confluence of two major affluents: the Middle Fork, rising out of Island Lake at almost  above sea level, and the smaller North Fork, beginning at a small unnamed pond just south of Mount Lyell. The Middle Fork is usually considered part of the stem. From the mountainous alpine headwaters, the San Joaquin flows generally south into the foothills of the Sierra, passing through four hydroelectric dams. It eventually emerges from the foothills at what was once the town of Millerton, the location of Dam since 1944, which forms Lake.()Image:SanJoaquinMendotaPool.jpg|thumb|left|The San Joaquin at Pool during the high flows of April 2006Below Friant Dam, the San Joaquin flows west-southwest out into the San Joaquin Valley  the southern part of the Great Central Valley  passing north of Fresno. With most of its water diverted into aqueducts, the river frequently runs dry in the  between here and Mendota,() where it is replenished by the Canal and intermittent flows from Fresno Slough, fed by the Kings River. From Mendota, the San Joaquin swings northwest, passing through many different channels, some natural and some man-made. Northeast of Dos Palos, it is joined by the Fresno and Rivers. Fifty miles (80 km) downstream, the River empties into the San Joaquin.(The majority of the river flows through quiet agricultural bottomlands, and as a result its meandering course manages to avoid most of the urban areas and cities in the San Joaquin Valley. About  west of Modesto, the San Joaquin meets its largest tributary, the Tuolumne. Near Vernalis, it is joined by another major tributary, the River. The river passes between Manteca and Tracy, where a pair of distributaries  the Old River and Middle River  split off from the main stem just above the Joaquin Delta, a huge river delta formed by sediment deposits of the Sacramento and San Joaquin Rivers.(About  from the mouth, the river draws abreast to the western flank of Stockton, one of the basins largest cities. From here to the mouth, the river is dredged as part of a navigation project, the Stockton Deep Water Ship Channel. Past the of tide, amid the many islands of the delta, the San Joaquin is joined by two more tributaries: the River and the larger Mokelumne. The river grows to almost  wide before ending at its confluence with the Sacramento River, in Antioch, forming the head of Bay. The combined waters from the two rivers then flow west through the Strait and Francisco Bay into the Pacific.(DischargeSan Joaquin River monthly discharges at Vernalis()()Colors  id:lightgrey value:gray(0.8)  id:darkgrey  value:gray(0.3)  id:sfondo value:rgb(1,1,1)  id:barra value:rgb(0.6,0.8,0.9)ImageSize   width:800 height:280PlotArea    left:60 bottom:30 top:30 right:60DateFormat  x.yPeriod      from:0 till:10000TimeAxis    orientation:verticalAlignBars   justifyScaleMinor  gridcolor:lightgrey increment:1000 start:0BackgroundColors  canvas:sfondoBarData  bar:Jan text:Jan.  bar:Fv text:Feb.  bar:Mar text:Mar.  bar:Avr text:Apr.  bar:Mai text:May  bar:Jun text:Jun.  bar:Jul text:Jul.  bar:Ao text:Aug.  bar:Sep text:Sep.  bar:Oct text:Oct.  bar:Nov text:Nov.  bar:Dc text:Dec.PlotData  color:barra width:30 align:left  bar:Jan from:0 till: 5010  bar:Fv from:0 till: 6860  bar:Mar from:0 till: 7220  bar:Avr from:0 till: 7100  bar:Mai from:0 till: 7560  bar:Jun from:0 till: 6280  bar:Jul from:0 till: 2570  bar:Ao from:0 till: 1450  bar:Sep from:0 till: 1760  bar:Oct from:0 till: 2280  bar:Nov from:0 till: 2260  bar:Dc from:0 till: 3430PlotData  bar:Jan at: 5010 fontsize:S   bar:Fv at: 6860 fontsize:S  bar:Mar at: 7220 fontsize:S   bar:Avr at: 7100 fontsize:S   bar:Mai at: 7560 fontsize:S   bar:Jun at: 6280 fontsize:S   bar:Jul at: 2570 fontsize:S   bar:Ao at: 1450 fontsize:S   bar:Sep at: 1760 fontsize:S   bar:Oct at: 2280 fontsize:S   bar:Nov at: 2260 fontsize:S   bar:Dc at: 3430 fontsize:S GeologyIn a geologic context, the San Joaquin can be divided into two major segments.() The upper  above Friant Dam in the Sierra is characterized as a steep-gradient, rocky mountain stream. Over millions of years, the upper San Joaquin, as well as the upper reaches of most of its tributaries, have eroded enormous amounts of rock and sediment from the mountains. Most of the Sierras are underlain by granitic igneous and rock dating back to the Mesozoic Era (250-65.5 MYA); in addition many of the San Joaquins tributaries flow across a foothills region of metamorphosed volcanic rock more famously known as the Mother Lode Gold Belt.()The  lower part of the river, in sharp contrast, is a meandering stream flowing over Cenozoic alluvial deposits (65.5 MYA-present), which together comprise the flat floor of the Central Valley.( The tremendous volume of sediments that underlie the lower San Joaquin River ranges from  deep, with distance to bedrock generally increasing in a northerly direction. Prior to the uplift of the Coast Ranges, more than  of sediments were deposited at the foot of the Sierras by tidal activity, and the ancestral San Joaquin and its tributaries flowed west over this alluvial plain to the sea, dumping their own sediments onto the marine deposits.() Compressional forces along the boundary of the North American and Plates between 2-4 MYA resulted in the uplift of the Coast Ranges, creating an enclosed basin today known as the Central Valley and resulted in the San Joaquins present path to the sea.()Because of its highly permeable nature, the San Joaquin Rivers valley is underlain by one of the largest aquifers in the United States. The aquifer underlying the San Joaquin River and Tulare Basin is estimated to hold nearly  of water, of which about half can be pumped economically or is clean enough for human use.()() The aquifer receives in excess of  of inflow per year, mostly from precipitation and irrigation water seepage. Concentration of chloride and other minerals generally increases from east to west across the basin.()HistoryIndigenous peopleArchaeological finds near the southern end of the San Joaquin Valley suggested that man first arrived in the region as early as 12,000 but no later than 8,000 years ago.() The two major ethnic groups were the Miwok people, who inhabited the northern end of the San Joaquin Valley and the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta region, and the Yokut tribes, scattered around the more arid southern portion of the basin. During these pre-European times, the San Joaquin River flowed through rich grasslands and sprawling marshes, flooding every few years and transforming much of the valley into lakes. At the southern end of the valley lay the vast Lake, formerly the largest freshwater lake in the western United States, which connected with the San Joaquin through a series of marshes and sloughs.() The rich vegetation and wildlife surrounding these bodies of water made the San Joaquin Valley a favored home as well as a stopping-off place for other nomadic peoples.(Hittell, pp. 344-346) The native people, mostly hunter-gatherers, lived off this land of abundance; during the 18th century, the population of the San Joaquin Valley was estimated at more than 69,000, representing one of the greatest concentrations of native people anywhere in North America.()Image:Bierstadt Albert Mariposa Indian Encampment Yosemite Valley California.jpg|thumb|left|Mariposa Indian Encampment by Bierstadt, c. 1872The Yokut, who comprised most of the indigenous in the San Joaquin basin, are believed to have lived along streams coming out of the foothills of the Sierra, spanning a region from the River all the way south to the River, including reaches of the upper San Joaquin River. Territories east of the foothills were occupied by the Chumash and Paiute, while the marshlands to the west were inhabited by various nomadic peoples, and probably had fewer permanent residents although it was a favored fishing and hunting spot.(Putnam, Kroeber and Lowie, p. 309) In contrast, the Miwok occupied land deeper within the Sierra Nevada stretching north from the Merced River to the Mokelumne or the American, a tributary of the Sacramento, and west to the Delta region.(Curtis, p. 129) Most of the Miwok people in the watershed were part of the appropriately named Miwok group.(Heizer and Elsasser, p. 15)A majority of the people along the San Joaquin River and its tributaries lived in small bands or tribes, which had no distinguishing names. Villages were small and usually the size of camps, rarely numbering more than a few hundred inhabitants. The Miwok, for example, rarely traveled more than a few miles from their home villages, and as such the inhabitants of one village would not know much of the surrounding country beyond the neighboring villages.(Curtis, p. 130) The staple food for San Joaquin Valley inhabitants was the acorn, which when ground, could be made into various foods such as cakes. Grinding the acorns was a simple process where they crushed the nuts using rocks in natural granite depressions.(Curtis, p. 131) Many of the surviving examples of acorn milling areas can still be found in the foothills, especially around the River area.()Spanish and Mexican influenceThe first recorded non-indigenous person to see the San Joaquin Valley was Don Fages in 1772. This is for certain, but several dramatically different accounts have been given for how and where he arrived. Fages may have started from San Luis Obispo de Tolosa, apparently chasing deserters from the Spanish army, and traveled east then north over the Mountains through Pass, which today carries 5 into the valley. After crossing the mountains, he came upon the shore of Buena Vista Lake at the southern end of the San Joaquin Valley, and gave the name Buena Vista (beautiful view) to the pass and a nearby Native American village. However, Fages did not venture farther north, and thus did not see the San Joaquin River.(Hoover and Kyle, p. 126)() Image:Mount Diablo California from Concord.jpg|thumb|right|Diablo (background), where Juan Cresp first gazed upon the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta in 1772, with Suisun Bay in the foregroundIn contrast, the second story is confusing in its sheer geographic difference from the first, yet in its identical time frame. In this account, Fages, accompanied by Father Juan Cresp, reached Diablo near Suisun Bay on March 30, 1772 and there gazed upon the merging courses of the Sacramento, San Joaquin and Mokelumne Rivers.(Exploring the Great Rivers of North America, p. 126)(Johnson, Haslam and Dawson, p. 28) Another narrative does not mention Fages name, but does say that Cresp was the one who reached Suisun Bay in 1772. During this visit, Cresp called the San Joaquin River El Rio de San Francisco, a name that was not used widely due to the rivers remoteness but persisted until the early 19th century.(Rose, p. 17)The San Joaquin River region remained largely unknown except for the fact of its existence until 1806, when Spanish explorer Gabriel Moraga led the first of several subsequent expeditions into the Central Valley, in order to find potential mission sites.() Moraga started out from San Juan Bautista, in present-day San Benito County, on September 21 of that year and traveled east into the San Joaquin Valley.(Beck and Haase, p. 24) The group skirted the western foothills of the Sierra and christened many placenames that remain in use today. In 1807 and 1808, Moraga set out again to the San Joaquin Valley. It was during one of these expeditions that he gave the river its present name, after St. Joachim. He also gave names to many tributaries of the river, such as the Merced River (El Ro de Nuestra Seora de Merced, River of our Lady of Mercy.(Rose, p. 18)Although relations between the Spanish and the Native Americans in the earlier expeditions to the valley were initially friendly, the indigenous began to grow accustomed to, and thus started taking advantage of, the Spanish that later came to the San Joaquin River region. As early as the 1807 Moraga expedition, it was reported that some natives were hostile and attempting to steal their horses. Indeed, when the natives began to rustle cattle and horses for food, the Spanish retaliated by burning camps and villages, and forcibly taking native children for labor work at the various missions.( Such conflict created enormous cultural loss, and violence continually escalated between the two sides, with no apparent end in sight.(Rose, pp. 18-19)(Pritzker, p. 157)During the early 19th century, the Spanish military frequently raided the San Joaquin Valley, taking hostage hundreds of native Yokuts and Miwoks and forcing them to nearby missions  San Juan Bautista, San Jos, San Francisco de Ass, for example. Military violence and disease caused the extermination of much of the remaining valley population, including those in a series of 24 villages along the lower San Joaquin River described by Moraga. Those natives that lived in the foothills and the higher mountains of the Sierra remained undisturbed for the most part, and fought back against the Spanish while sheltering their valley counterparts.(Pritzker, pp. 157-158)However, the greater military power of the Europeans resulted in the indigenous getting pushed further and further back from their native lands; this did not change when California became part of Mexico in 1821, despite the fact that the new government secularized the Spanish missions and resultantly freed many enslaved indigenous people. During Mexican rule, the mission lands in the San Joaquin Valley were subdivided to wealthy landowners (rancheros) and caused even more conflicts between the Mexicans and the Native Americans.() A famous leader of the natives was the Yokut Estanislao, who led revolts against the Mexicans in the late 1820s until finally defeated in 1829 on the River, which bears his name today.(Waldman, p. 134)()Early American eraThe first American known to see the San Joaquin River was likely Smith, a renowned man, trapper and explorer. In 1826, Smith arrived in San Gabriel Arcngel, California, when the region was under control by the Mexican government. As this was in violation of a law which prevented foreigners from entering California and he could have been arrested for spying,( he traveled north into the San Joaquin Valley, searching for populations of beaver. Smith noted the fertility and natural beauty of the area, and the apparent peace of the Native Americans living in the villages he passed by.(Hicks, pp. 98-102) His expedition then turned east in an attempt to cross the Sierra Nevada. They tried to summit the range by way of both the Kings River and the River (a tributary of the Sacramento), but it was early spring and the snow was too deep. Finally, they crossed the mountains along the River canyon, becoming the first recorded whites to cross the Sierra Nevada on foot.(Farquhar, p. 26) It is still disputed over whether Smiths party discovered gold on the San Joaquin or one of its tributaries. Although some of his men confirmed it, Smith did not make any mention of the precious metal in his journal.(Rose, p. 22)thumb|left|Stockton, on the lower San Joaquin River, circa 1860, with the river to the leftIn the early 1830s, a few fur trappers from the Northwest exploring southwards into the San Joaquin Valley arrived just in time to be greeted with a sight of horror. An epidemic of smallpox and malaria brought unintentionally by the Europeans had swept down the San Joaquin River corridor during the summer of 1833, killing in a single stroke between 50 and 75 percent of the entire native population in the valley.(Heizer and Sturtevant, p. 92)(Exploring the Great Rivers of North America, p. 128) The outbreak did not vanish; it continued for year after year with diminishing acuteness until about 50,000-60,000 indigenous lay dead. Explorer Carson noted in 1839 that cholera or some other fearful scourge broke out among them and raged with such fearful fatality that they were unable either to bury or burn their dead, and the air was filled with the stench of their decaying bodies.(Rose, p. 19)During the time Mexico was in control of California, the San Joaquin River region was only sparsely populated, and used almost exclusively for ranching. However, when California won independence from Mexico in 1846, becoming part of the United States the following month, a flood of American settlers descended upon the valley. Just an year before, Davis Wilson had drove a herd of cattle from his Riverside ranchero through the San Joaquin Valley to Stockton and reported seeing not a single white man. But after the Americans took over, emigrants began trickling in increased numbers, establishing the towns of Kingston City, Millerton, and Fresno City. The newcomers also included a group of Mormons led by Brannan who established a settlement at the confluence of the San Joaquin and the Stanislaus, called New Hope.((Rose, p. 26)The real influx came in 1848, when a gold strike on the American set off the Gold Rush. Within one year, the population of the San Joaquin Valley increased by more than 80,000.( The city of Stockton, on the lower San Joaquin, quickly grew from a sleepy backwater to a thriving trading center, the stopping-off point for miners headed to the gold fields in the foothills of the Sierra. Rough ways such as the Road and Angeles Road(Hoover and Kyle, p. 376) quickly extended the length of the valley, some following old cattle routes and Native American trails, and were served by mule teams and covered wagons.() Riverboat navigation quickly became an important transportation link on the San Joaquin River, and during the June Rise,(Rose, p. 54) as boat operators called the San Joaquins annual high water levels during snowmelt, large craft could make it as far upstream as Fresno. During the peak years of the gold rush, the river in the Stockton area was reportedly crowded with hundreds of abandoned oceangoing craft, whose crew had deserted for the gold fields. The multitude of idle ships was such a blockade that at several occasions they were burned just to clear a way for riverboat traffic.(Rose, p. 27)()Rise of irrigationAlthough the gold rush attracted tens of thousands of newcomers to the San Joaquin River area, deposits of the precious mineral petered out within a few years, especially on the upper reaches of the San Joaquin and its tributaries which were only suitable for mining. Many of these people settled in the San Joaquin Valley, most in the existing towns such as Stockton, Fresno and Bakersfield but some establishing new settlements. These included San Joaquin City, near the confluence of the San Joaquin with the Stanislaus, probably the largest of these post-gold-rush boomtowns. Established in 1851, the town maintained considerable size until 1880, when trade competition from nearby Stockton caused it to diminish.(Hoover and Kyle, p. 378) Another notable but much smaller settlement was Las Juntas, near present-day Mendota. This was a haven for criminals and fugitives, and was frequented by the infamous bandits Murrieta and Vsquez.(Hoover and Kyle, p. 89)It was in the mid-1860s that the San Joaquin River and its surrounds underwent the greatest change they had seen in human history: the introduction of irrigated agriculture. As early as 1863, small irrigation canals were built in the Centerville area, southeast of Fresno, but were destroyed in subsequent floods.() The vulnerability of the small local infrastructure led to the establishment of districts, which were formed to construct and maintain canals in certain areas of the valley. One of the first was the Robla Canal Company in the Merced River area, which went into operation in March 1876, but was soon surpassed by the Farmers Canal Company. The district built a diversion dam on the Merced, sending its water into a pair of canals still in use today.() One of the most powerful early irrigation empires was the Kern County Land and Water Company, established by Ben Ali Haggin, a wealthy land speculator, in 1873, and soon supplying over  through their canal system.(Hundley, p. 92) However, Haggin soon ran into conflicts with other landowners over water rights, as the larger districts, including his, had more financial reserves and engineering expertise, and were the first to build dams and diversions on a large scale. This resulted in the drying out of streams and rivers before they reached downstream users and sparked conflict over how much water could be allotted to whom.(Hundley, pp. 93-94) In Haggins case, his company ran into problems with the & Lux Corporation, run by Henry Miller and Lux, who owned more than  throughout the San Joaquin Valley, Tulare Basin, and other regions of California.(Igler, pp. 103-107) The court battle that resulted would change water laws and rights in the San Joaquin River valley forever, and ended up promoting large-scale agribusiness over small farmers.(Johnson, Haslam and Dawson, p. ?)thumb|left|An example of heavily irrigated farmland in the northern San Joaquin Valley, near Tracy and MantecaMiller and Lux were not any newer to the San Joaquin Valley than had been Haggin, but were the driving influence on valley agribusiness until well into the early 20th century. The corporation had begun acquiring land in the valley in 1858, eventually holding sway over an enormous swath reaching from the Kern River in the south to the Chowchilla River in the north. Much of the land that Miller and Lux acquired was swamp and marsh, which was considered virtually worthless.(Rose, pp. 45-46) However, with their huge capital, they could afford to drain thousands of acres of it, beginning an enormous environmental change that eventually resulted in the loss of over 95 percent of the wetlands adjoining the San Joaquin River and Tulare Basin.(Igler, p. 33) Henry Miller exercised enormous political power in the state, and most San Joaquin Valley inhabitants either were avid supporters of him or despised him. When Miller died in 1916, his company owned  in the San Joaquin Valley alone with hundreds of miles of well-developed, maintained irrigation canals. As said by Tom Mott, the son of Miller and Lux irrigation superintendent, Miller realized you couldnt do anything with the land unless you had the water to go with it. Perhaps more than any other person, Miller had more of a lasting impact on the San Joaquin River than any other individual.(Rose, p. 48)Even as early as the 20th century, so much water was being diverted off the San Joaquin River and its tributaries that the river was no longer suitable for navigational purposes. As a result, commercial navigation began a decline starting in the late 19th century and was completely gone by 1911. With over  under irrigation along the river by 1900(  this figure has only grown hugely since then  the river and its tributaries became much narrower, siltier and shallower, with large consequences for the natural environment, for sustainability of water supplies in its valley, and also huge changes for water politics in the state. The San Joaquin and its tributaries seemed to give rise to just about every single possible argument over water, including such cases as When is a river not a river? referring to the difference between a slough and a marsh.(Merchant, p. 239) It has been said that fights over the river have caused some of the most bitter and longest running lawsuits ever to clog the courts. Arguably, it is the most litigated river in America.(Rose, p. 49)()Dams, diversions and engineeringStockton Ship ChannelOnce, before agricultural development of its valley, the San Joaquin was navigable by steamboats as far upstream as Fresno, but diversions have slowed and shallowed the river. In addition, this has caused the river to drop large amounts of silt that formerly washed out to sea in its bed, further reducing the depth. In the late 19th century, the city of Stockton, once an important seaport for the San Joaquin Valley, found itself increasingly landlocked because the San Joaquin River, its main connection to the sea, was rapidly silting up. The early 20th century saw proposals to maintain a minimum depth in the lower river by dredging, but these were interrupted by the onset of War I. In 1925 the city put forth a $1.3 million bond for dredging the lower San Joaquin from its mouth to the of Stockton  a distance of  by river.((Rose, p. 109)In 1926, Stockton pooled its finances with the federal and state governments for a total of $8.2 million. Construction on the channel, which included widening and deepening the riverbed and cutting off meanders and oxbows, began in earnest in 1928.(Rose, p. 110) These included major cuts at Hog, Venice and Mandeville Islands, plus five more smaller straightening projects. The navigation project shortened the river length by  and deepened it to . Additional deepening work was carried out in 1968 and 1982.(Rose, p. 111) Today, the navigation channel, known as the Deep Water Ship Channel, can handle fully loaded vessels of up to 60,000 tons and up to  in length.() However, the navigation works have unexpectedly led to low dissolved oxygen levels in the lower San Joaquin River, which has hurt fish populations. This is believed to be a result of the combination of the abrupt geometry change from the shallow river upstream of Stockton to the deep water channel, in addition to pollution from the harbor and city and poor tidal mixing.()Big Creek HydroBy the early 20th century, Californian cities as far south as Los Angeles were looking to new sources for electricity because of their rapidly growing populations and industries. Two visionaries, railroad baron Huntington and engineer S. Eastwood established a fledgling power company in 1902 today known as California Edison, and acquired water rights to the upper San Joaquin River from the Miller and Lux Corporation. During that year, Huntington and Eastwood devised plans to utilize the water of the San Joaquin River and some of its headwaters tributaries in what would become one of the most extensive hydroelectric systems in the world, known as the Creek Hydroelectric Project.()Construction of the systems facilities, which included Pool Reservoir and Lake on the San Joaquin and four additional reservoirs on its tributaries with a total storage capacity of , started in 1911.() A total of eight dams and underground tunnels, the longest of which stretches , and nine powerhouses with a total installed capacity of 1,000 MW were built in stages spanning the 20th century, with the last powerhouse coming on line in 1987.( The consistent use and reuse of the waters of the San Joaquin River, its South Fork, and the namesake of the project, Big Creek, over a vertical drop of , have over the years inspired a nickname, The Hardest Working Water in the World.()()Federal and state projectsthumb|left|Federal and state canals in the San Joaquin ValleyAs early as the 1870s, state and federal agencies were already looking at the Central Valley as an area in need of a large water transport project. In 1931 California came up with the Water Plan, which entailed the construction of dams and canals to transport water from the Sacramento River to the rapidly dwindling San Joaquin. The project was still in its planning stages when the Depression hit the United States, and California was unable to raise the funds necessary for building the various facilities.(Hundley, p. 255) Resultantly, the project was transferred to the federal government and switched hands several times between the Army Corps of Engineers (USACE) and Bureau of Reclamation (USBR) before finally being authorized in the and Harbors Act of 1937 as a USBR undertaking and part of the Deal, a series of large-scale reforms and construction projects intended to provide jobs for the millions of unemployed during the Depression.()Construction of Friant Dam, the main dam on the San Joaquin River, began in 1937 and was completed in 1942. The dam serves for irrigation and flood control storage, but its main purpose is to divert water into the Canal, which runs northwest along the San Joaquin Valley to the Chowchilla River, and the Canal, which carries San Joaquin water all the way south into the Tulare Basin, terminating at the River. Both are irrigation and municipal supply canals serving primarily agricultural interests.(Hundley, p. 257)() Water from the Friant Dam supplies almost  of farmland in Fresno, Kern, Madera, and Tulare counties.() Unfortunately, the diversion of water off the San Joaquin at Friant Dam leaves little more than a trickle below the dam in most years, except for releases serving farms in the immediate area downstream of Friant.()()A key point for irrigation water distribution on the San Joaquin, despite its small size, is Mendota Dam. Built in 1871 at the juncture of the San Joaquin River and Fresno Slough,() it initially served to divert water into the Main Canal, an irrigation canal for the riverside bottomlands in the San Joaquin Valley. In 1951, Mendota became the terminus of the Canal, a USBR project which conveys up to  of water for  from the mouth of the Sacramento River to the usually dry San Joaquin at that point.() Water from Mendota is distributed in two directions: released into the San Joaquin for downstream diversions at the Sack Dam, another small diversion dam; and into Fresno Slough during the dry season, when no water is flowing in from the Kings River. The latter sends water into the Tulare Basin through the natural channel of the slough, which in essence conveys water in either direction depending on the time of year  north into the San Joaquin during the rainy season, south into the Tulare during the dry months.()Even with the presence of the Friant and numerous other flood control dams, large floods still caused significant damage along the San Joaquin River all the way through the late 1950s. The passage of the Control Act of 1944 included provisions for the construction of a levee system along part of the San Joaquin River, but valley farmers were not entirely satisfied. After years of lobbying, farmers convinced the state government to authorize a massive flood-control system of diversion channels and levees whose main component is the Bypass, so named because of its location east of and parallel to the San Joaquin. Groundbreaking of the huge project was in 1959 and construction was finished in 1966.(Rose, p. 112) Image:Millerton Lake 1.jpg|thumb|right|Lake, the reservoir of Friant Dam and the largest on the San Joaquin mainstemThe bypass system starts with the Chowchilla Canal Bypass, which can divert up to  off the San Joaquin, a few miles above Mendota. After intercepting the flow of the Fresno River, the system is known as the Eastside Bypass, which runs northwest, crossing numerous tributaries: Berenda and Ash Sloughs, the Chowchilla River, Owens Creek and Bear Creek. Near the terminus, the bypass channel has a capacity of roughly . The Eastside Bypass ends just upstream of the Merced River confluence, where the San Joaquin levee system is better designed. However, the levees on the bypass channel are generally more well-built than those on the San Joaquin mainstem and thus the channel of the San Joaquin runs dry in some places where the entire flow has been diverted to the bypass system.()()Although fairly large with a capacity of ,() Lake, the reservoir of Friant Dam, is small compared to other reservoirs in the San Joaquin basin, such as Don Pedro and Pine Flat. The Bureau of Reclamation in conjunction with the Department of Water Resources has proposed the construction of a new dam on the San Joaquin, Flat Dam, a few miles upstream of Friant. The proposed $1.2-3.5 billion dam would be  high and create a reservoir of , well over twice the capacity of Millerton Lake.()()() Proponents of the project cite numerous benefits: flood control, increased storage, hydroelectric potential, and capacity to provide a greater flow in the downstream river during the dry season. It would also give dam operators the advantage of being able to maintain the river to a lower temperature due to the reservoirs great depth  which would benefit salmon runs. The new reservoir would provide an estimated annual yield of . Under the most extreme plans, construction could begin as early as 2012 and finish by 2017-2019; state bonds have already been put forth for the project.(()However, opponents assert that the upper San Joaquin River, already straitjacketed by dams (Mammoth Pool, No. 6, Redinger, Kerckhoff, Friant, and scores more on tributaries) will not provide sufficient discharge to fill the reservoir except in very wet years.( The new reservoir would destroy  of whitewater runs, fishing spots and historic sites on the San Joaquin River, and inundate two Big Creek Hydro powerhouses, causing a potential net loss of electricity generation.() Temperance Flat would cause significant evaporation and the water required to fill it would only further stress the San Joaquin Rivers already strained water supplies, in addition to draining even more money out of the states floundering budget.()()EcologyImage:San Luis National Wildlife Refuge.JPG|thumb|right|A road in the Luis National Wildlife Refuge, one of the few remaining wetland areas along the San Joaquin RiverHundreds of years ago, the San Joaquin flowed freely through a grass and marsh-dominated region variously known as the California prairie, California annual grassland, or Central Valley grasslands. It is widely believed that the dominant grass species throughout the San Joaquin River valley and Tulare Basin, as well as the Valley, the Sierra foothills and Coast Ranges, was pulchra, a type of bunchgrass more commonly known as purple needlegrass. Today, this vegetation community exists only in isolated pockets because of development of the valley for agriculture, and in much of the remnant open areas where it once thrived, now grows introduced flora such as rye and oat.() The vegetation communities created by the introduced grasses are sometimes referred to as valley grassland, which is highly seasonal but is spread throughout the Central Valley from near Redding to south of Bakersfield. These grasses all thrive in the climate that dominates much of the San Joaquin Valley.()The San Joaquin River and its residual marshes and wetlands provide a critical resting and breeding stop for migratory birds along the Flyway.() Once, the seasonal bird populations in the San Joaquin basin were immense, especially in the now-dry Tulare Lake region: It took something different, though, to capture the sound of the blue sky as it turned dark and deafening from the wings and cries of millions of native and migratory birds  Canadian geese, mallards, swans, pelicans, cranes, teal, and curlews. How to mimic the sudden flight of flocks so immense they extinguished the sun? One of the first white men to camp along the lake could think of only one noise, the roar of a freight train, that compared with the takeoff of the birds.(Arax and Wartzman, p. 49) Historically, the grasslands and the fringes of the great marshes and lakes provided habitat for large grazing animals including antelope, deer and the endemic elk, which in turn had various predators such as the Joaquin Kit Fox; all of these species have seen drastic declines in populations as their native habitat has fallen under the plow.()Ninety-five percent of the historic wetlands have been largely decimated by development, as well as the oak woodland habitat, which originally occurred along stream and river corridors in the foothills, and the tule grass that once thrived in huge stands on the edges of marshes and lakes.( Some of the richest remaining marsh habitats are in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta, which despite significant agricultural and infrastructure development, has retained many of its original swamps and backwaters.() Before the 19th century, the delta was a region of numerous islands of nutrient-rich peat, alluvial deposits, winding channels and waterways. Since then, most of the Delta islands have been cultivated, and consistent use of the land has resulted in subsidence, in some cases up to ; water diversions from the rivers feeding it have caused increased salinity, which has in turn hurt fish species that once thrived in the region.(Merchant, p.  274)()As defined by the Wildlife Fund, the San Joaquin River watershed is part of the Sacramento-San Joaquin freshwater ecoregion, which supports almost 40 species of freshwater fish. These include several types of lampreys, sturgeons, sunfish, perch and various fish species such as salmon and steelhead. Some of these fish are believed to have descended from fishes of the Basin in geologically ancient times, when the upper reaches of the Sacramento River watershed were connected with that of the River.() Up to 75 percent of the historic species were endemic to the Sacramento-San Joaquin basin. Most of the native fish species have suffered because of introduced species and the construction of dams.() In a study from 1993 to 1995, it was found that the main stem of the San Joaquin River was mainly populated by minnow, shiner, shad and silverside, all of which were introduced. Downstream portions of the rivers main tributaries were populated mainly by largemouth and bass, sunfish and white catfish, while native species have only survived relatively well in the upper reaches of the river and its tributaries, which also play host to introduced trout.()PollutionFor its size, the San Joaquin River is one of the most polluted rivers in the United States, especially in its lower course. Years of pesticides and fertilizers being applied to the surrounding lands as well as municipal runoff have led to elevated levels of selenium, fluoride, nitrates and other substances in the river and its tributaries; pesticide pollution is now considered ubiquitous to the San Joaquin River system. The selenium is believed to originate from soils on the west side of the valley and in the Coast Ranges, which are rich with the element. Additionally, the San Joaquin is suffering chronic salinity problems due to high levels of minerals being washed off the land by irrigation practices.() Abandoned mines contribute toxic mine drainage to some tributaries of the river.() One of the worst environmental disasters was at Reservoir, a disposal site for agricultural drain water which doubled as a wildlife refuge.() Initially, animals and plants thrived in the artificial wetlands that were created here, but in 1983, it was found that birds had suffered severe deformities and deaths due to steadily increasing levels of chemicals and toxins. In the next few years, all the fish species died except for the mosquito fish, and blooms proliferated in the foul water.() These have had not only an adverse impact on San Joaquin River ecology, but also cause pollution to the sources of most of the large aqueducts in the state  the California and Delta-Mendota Canals, for example.(SalmonBefore irrigation development, the San Joaquin River and its tributaries supported the southernmost run of salmon in North America including prodigious spring and fall runs of salmon. The Department of Fish and Game estimated in the 1930s that the historic salmon run was likely in the vicinity of 15,000 fish annually, but by the mid-20th century, reduction in river flows led to the run dropping to about 3,000-7,000. Some sources put the historic populations as high as three hundred thousand, but this is highly unlikely because of the limited habitat available in the watershed.()Construction of dams in the San Joaquin watershed has led to most of the good spawning streams, located higher in the mountains near the headwaters of the San Joaquin and its tributaries, being cut off to the salmon. Introduced fish species such as bluegill and various types of bass that prey on salmon smolt are also a major contributor to the decline.() The San Joaquins point of divergence with the distributary Old River has historically created a sort of bottleneck for outmigrating salmon because the Old River in turn branches into many side-channels and sloughs of the delta as well as various canal intakes. Recent years have seen work by the California Department of Water Resources and the California Department of Fish and Game to construct and manage temporary rock barriers at the head of the Old River in order to keep fish in the main channel of the San Joaquin River. In the fall of 2009, just 2,236 salmon returned to the entire river system to spawn; this has led to a misplaced government ban on salmon fishing off the coasts of northern California and Oregon.() Recent years have seen efforts to bring back some of the salmon population to the San Joaquin and some of its tributaries; these include the establishment of fish hatcheries. As of 2011, plans had been finalized for a $14.5 million hatchery near Friant Dam as part of a $20 million federal restoration project for the fish.()Groundwater overdraftBecause of the heavy demand of water for agriculture and the insufficient flow of the San Joaquin River, groundwater in the San Joaquin Valleys rich aquifer has been an important source of irrigation supply since the late 19th century. Historically, surface water was able to provide all the needed supply, but as agricultural lands spread across more and more of the valley, groundwater pumping became increasingly common. Also, with the introduction of better technology that allowed farmers to dig deeper wells and install electrical pumps, groundwater was seen as an often cheaper and easily accessible source compared to the river. Water imported from Northern California through the Central Valley Project managed to stave off increasing rates of withdrawal for several years, until the California drought heavily decreased water supplies from these sources for a while and caused many farmers to return to groundwater pumping.()()thumb|right|Pole marking the location of maximum land subsidence in the San Joaquin Valley  nearly   near MendotaGroundwater withdrawal reached its peak during the 1960s with more than  being drawn from the aquifer each year  over twice the present flow of the San Joaquin River  which accounted for 69.6% of all the groundwater pumped within the Central Valley, and nearly 14 percent of all the groundwater withdrawn in the United States.() In a 1970 study, it was found that more than  of the San Joaquin River valley had been affected by subsidence in excess of . The maximum drop in elevation was near Mendota, the northward bend of the San Joaquin River, at over .() In some areas, the table has declined more than  vertically, forcing farmers to sink their wells as deep as  to hit more abundant pockets of the underground water.()Even after better practices and new sources of water through federal projects, groundwater pumping continues at a tremendous rate. The San Joaquin Valley aquifer lost about  from 1961 to 2003, which despite being a dramatic reduction from the 1960s, still amounts to nearly  per year. The subsidence caused by groundwater withdrawal has threatened infrastructure in the San Joaquin Valley, including the Aqueduct, a Water Project facility that conveys water from the delta region to coastal-central and California. Subsidence has also damaged highways and power lines as well as causing some areas to be more susceptible to flooding.()Restoration effortsIn 2009, the Bureau of Reclamation began to release water from Friant Dam in an effort to restore two once-dry stretches of the San Joaquin of about .() These two reaches are from below the dam to Mendota Pool, and from the Sack Dam, a dam approximately  downstream, to the confluence with the Merced River. The flows were initially  in that year.() The increased flows will not only begin to restore large areas of desccicated riverside habitat below the dam, but will serve the primary purpose of restoring salmon runs in the upper San Joaquin watershed. The restoration flows, however, will cause a 12 to 15 percent reduction of water provided by the Friant Division of the CVP() with complaints from irrigators in the valley as a result. There has also been a lawsuit regarding damage to farmland west of the San Joaquin, near the town of Los Baos, claiming that the flows are seeping through levees that have not seen use in years due to the drying out of the river channel.()In addition to the dry reaches, the higher discharge in the San Joaquin will help restore a total of  of river, figuring in stretches with low or polluted flows. It is also hoped that the water will help dilute contaimiants in the river caused by pesticides and fertilizers that are applied to the surrounding farmland. In turn, the boost in flow could assist restoration efforts and help flush out saline water in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta, where water is pumped into state aqueducts which provide water supplies to two-thirds of Californians.() Salmon will be re-introduced to the river in 2012,() most habitat conservation work on the San Joaquin River will be completed by 2013, and the USBR will begin releasing up to , or full restoration flows, from the Friant Dam in 2014. Additional rehabilitation work is projected to continue until 2016. The total cost of the restoration, one of the largest river recovery efforts in the United States,() could be up to $800 million or even a billion dollars. Approximately $330 million will be paid by Central Valley farmers, and the state and federal governments will provide the remaining funding.()Efforts have been under way to restore wetlands along the San Joaquin River as well as on the historic shores of Tulare Lake. These primarily entail the cleanup of existing wetlands and procuring additional water supplies, rather than converting agricultural land back into the original swamp and marsh. Since wetlands can provide a natural form of flood control  wetlands act like sponges, absorbing flood flows during the rainy season and releasing the accumulated water during the dry season  and also can filter out many forms of toxins, especially from fertilizers, they are important to maintaining good water quality in the San Joaquin River.()() Wetlands preservation group Unlimited was awarded a $1 million grant in 2005 as part of the American Wetlands Conservation Act in order to conduct restoration work on  of swamps and marshes throughout the San Joaquin Valley.()WatershedAt , the San Joaquin watershed drains a fair swath of inland central California, covering an area nearly the expanse of Carolina. This includes the  San Joaquin basin proper, and the  Tulare Basin, each comparable to the size of the Peninsula of Michigan.( This makes it the largest single river basin entirely in the state. The San Joaquin River basin is roughly synonymous with the San Joaquin Valley, and is bounded by the Sierra Nevada to the east, the Coast Ranges on the west, and the Tehachapi Mountains on the south.() The watersheds major southeast-northwest axis runs roughly parallel with the coast of California; it measures  long and  wide, covering all or parts of seventeen California counties (through which the river flows seven() stretching from north of Lodi to well south of Bakersfield.( Most of the elevation change in the San Joaquin occurs within the first  above Friant Dam. Its highest headwaters are at over , but by the time the river reaches the foothills, it is a mere  above sea level.()Historically, the average annual runoff of the San Joaquin was about , equalling a flow of roughly . Some early estimates even range as high as , or more than .(Biennial report of the Department of Engineering of the State of California, pp.37-38) The numerous tributaries of the San Joaquin  the Fresno, Chowchilla, Merced, Tuolumne, Mariposa Creek, Calaveras, Mokelumne, and others()  flowed freely across alluvial flood plains to join the river. All of the major tributaries of the river originate in the Sierra. Most of the streams that start in the Coast Range are intermittent, and even the perennial ones contribute little to the flow of the San Joaquin.(Benke and Cushing, p. 553) During the winter, spring, and early summer, storms and snowmelt swell the river, while in late summer and autumn, there is little water left to replenish it. Historically, groundwater seepage from Tulare Lake maintained a significant base flow in the river during the dry months  some accounts suggest over 50 percent.( The present annual flow of the San Joaquin River is a little over , or only about .(()thumb|left|The lower San Joaquin River, at the head of the distributary Old RiverOn the west and northwest, the San Joaquin watershed borders those of rivers draining into the Pacific, while beyond almost all of the other divides lie basins, mostly of the Basin. To the north, a low series of ridges separates the San Joaquin River basin from that of the Sacramento River. The Coast Ranges bound the watershed on the west and borders on the drainages of the River, Salinas River and the endorheic Plain. On the south, the Tehachapis wall off the San Joaquin Valley from the Desert. To the east, the Sierra Nevada separate the San Joaquin drainage from those of multiple smaller rivers that terminate in various Great Basin lakes. From north to south, these are the Carson, Walker, and Rivers.()()The overwhelming majority of the economic base in the San Joaquin River watershed is provided by agriculture. The valley is widely considered one of the most productive farming regions in the world,() and the top four U.S. counties ranked by agricultural production are all located in the San Joaquin watershed and Tulare Basin.() The crops grown in these four counties alone are valued at over $12.6 billion annually,( while the production of the entire valley is estimated at more than $14.4 billion.( The main crop in the valley by annual sales is cotton, but more than 200 types of produce are grown along the San Joaquin River and in the Tulare Basin, including rice, almonds and lettuce just to name a few. Livestock raising is also a major business in the valley.( This prodigious output has earned the basin many names, including the breadbasket or salad bowl of the United States.()As of 2009, the San Joaquin River watershed had a human population of roughly 4,039,000,() about 1.9 million of whom live within the section of the watershed not including the Tulare Basin.() The largest cities are Bakersfield, near the south end of the valley on the Kern River; Fresno, roughly in the geographic center; Modesto, on the Tuolumne River; and Stockton, on the southeast fringe of the Delta region. Other major cities include Visalia, Tulare, Hanford, Porterville, Madera, Merced, Turlock, Manteca and Lodi. Population growth is among the highest in the state of California and more than twice the U.S. average.() In Madera County, near the geographic middle of the basin, growth was 51.5% between 1990 and 2003, the highest in the San Joaquin basin.( Most of the major cities lie on the State Route 99 corridor, which runs along the entirety of the San Joaquin Valley and forms the primary thoroughfare for the valley. 5 provides the major transportation route for the west side of the valley.()Land cover in the watershed is predominantly agriculture and forest, and large expanses of shrubland and semiarid foothill terrain also occupy portions of the basin in addition to a growing urban percentage. Irrigated land covers 30% of the watershed followed by forested areas in addition to national forest and park land that encompass 26.8% of the total land area. Built-up areas use a much smaller percentage of the watershed, at just 1.9%. In the San Joaquins direct drainage region (not including the Tulare Basin) agricultural cover was 19.2%, forests embraced 28.4%, and urban areas occupied 2.4% as of 1995.( The basins main population centers are in the north and south and population density generally increases from west to east. In fact, despite the relatively small percentage of developed areas, more than 50% of the population lives in the watersheds four largest cities: Fresno, Bakersfield, Stockton and Modesto.(Benke and Cushing, p. 554)TributariesSeven major tributaries flow directly into the San Joaquin River, all of which run from the Sierra Nevada westwards into the main stem. In addition, some of the discharge of the Kings River also enters the San Joaquin directly (but seasonally) through a distributary. Of these, the River is the largest in any respect: longest, greatest drainage basin, and highest discharge. The River is the second largest by length and drainage basin, but the River has a greater flow. Tributaries are listed below proceeding from the mouth upstream, with their respective main-stem length, watershed and discharge noted. Rivers of the Tulare Basin are noted below the San Joaquins direct tributaries with their individual data. Most of the tributaries had much larger flows before irrigation diversions  for example, the Tuolumnes historic discharge was almost 48% higher than it is now.See also*of rivers of California*Joaquin River National Wildlife RefugeNotesReferencesWorks cited******Gudde, Erwin G.; Bright, William (2004). California Place Names: The Origin and Etymology of Current Geographical Names. University of California Press. ISBN 0-52024-217-3.**************External links*California Central Valley Grasslands*Great Flood of 1862*Tulare Lake Restoration - Fiction or Fact?*Using Tulare Lake For Water Storage*California Water Plan Update 2005 San Joaquin Hydrologic Region Chapter published by the Department of Water Resources*Map of San Joaquin Reclamation and Levee Districts*San Joaquin River TMDL Description of DO problems on the San Joaquin River*SanJoaquinBasin.com -  A website devoted to the San Joaquin BasinJoaquin-rivier ()JoaquinJoaquin RiverJoaquini jgiSan Joaqun Joaquin (fleuve)Joaquin (fiume)Choakinas (up)Joaquin (rivier)Joaquin (elv)Joaquin (rzeka)San JoaquinSan Joaquin()Joaquin RiverSan Joaquinzh:
306343
Rayleigh_quotient
In mathematics, for a given complex matrix M and nonzero vector x, the Rayleigh quotient(Also known as the RayleighRitz ratio; named after Ritz and Rayleigh.) R(M, x), is defined as(Horn, R. A. and C. A. Johnson. 1985. Matrix Analysis. Cambridge University Press. pp. 176&ndash;180.)::R(M,x) : {x^{*} M x \over x^{*} x}.For real matrices and vectors, the condition of being Hermitian reduces to that of being symmetric, and the transpose x^{*} to the usual transpose x. Note that R(M, c x)  R(M,x) for any real scalar c \neq 0 . Recall that a Hermitian (or real symmetric) matrix has real eigenvalues. It can be shown that, for a given matrix, the Rayleigh quotient reaches its minimum value \lambda_\min (the smallest eigenvalue of M) when x is v_\min (the corresponding eigenvector). Similarly, R(M, x) \leq \lambda_\max and R(M, v_\max)  \lambda_\max. The Rayleigh quotient is used in theorem to get exact values of all eigenvalues. It is also used in algorithms to obtain an eigenvalue approximation from an eigenvector approximation. Specifically, this is the basis for quotient iteration.The range of the Rayleigh quotient is called a range.Special case of covariance matricesA matrix M can be represented as the product A A. Its eigenvalues are positive::M v_i   A A v_i  \lambda _i v_i:v_i A A v_i  v_i \lambda _i v_i: \left\| A v_i \right\|^2  \lambda _i \left\| v_i \right\|^2: \lambda _i  \frac{\left\| A v_i \right\|^2}{\left\| v_i \right\|^2} \geq 0.The eigenvectors are orthogonal to one another::M v_i  \lambda _i v_i:v _j M v_i  \lambda _i v_j v_i:(M v_j ) v_i  \lambda _i v_j v_i:\lambda _j v_j  v_i  \lambda _i v_j v_i:(\lambda _j - \lambda _i) v_j  v_i  0:v_j  v_i  0 (different eigenvalues, in case of multiplicity, the basis can be orthogonalized).The Rayleigh quotient can be expressed as a function of the eigenvalues by decomposing any vector x on the basis of eigenvectors::x  \sum _{i1} ^n \alpha _i v_i,  where   \alpha_i  \frac{xv_i}{\sqrt{v_iv_i}}  \frac{\langle x,v_i\rangle} is the coordinate of x orthogonally projected onto v_i:R(M,x)  \frac{x A A x}{x x}:R(M,x)  \frac{(\sum _{j1} ^n \alpha _j v_j) A A (\sum _{i1} ^n \alpha _i v_i)}{(\sum _{j1} ^n \alpha _j v_j) (\sum _{i1} ^n \alpha _i v_i)}which, by orthogonality of the eigenvectors, becomes::R(M,x)  \frac{\sum _{i1} ^n \alpha _i ^2 \lambda _i}{\sum _{i1} ^n \alpha _i ^2}  \sum_{i1}^n \lambda_i \frac{(xv_i)^2}{ (xx)( v_i v_i)}In the last representation we can see that the Rayleigh quotient is the sum of the squared cosines of the angles formed by the vector x and each eigenvector v_i, weighted by corresponding eigenvalues.If a vector x maximizes R(M,x), then any vector k . x (for k \ne 0) also maximizes it, one can reduce to the Lagrange problem of maximizing \sum _{i1} ^n \alpha _i ^2 \lambda _i under the constraint that \sum _{i1} ^n \alpha _i ^2  1.Since all the eigenvalues are non-negative, the problem is convex and the maximum occurs on the edges of the domain, namely when \alpha _1  1 and \forall i > 1, \alpha _i  0 (when the eigenvalues are ordered in decreasing magnitude).Alternatively, this result can be arrived at by the method of multipliers. The problem is to find the critical points of the function :R(M,x)  x^T M x , subject to the constraint \|x\|^2  x^Tx  1.I.e. to find the critical points of :\mathcal{L}(x)  x^T M x  -\lambda (x^Tx - 1), where \lambda  is a Lagrange multiplier. The stationary points of \mathcal{L}(x) occur at:\frac{d\mathcal{L}(x)}{dx}  0 :\therefore 2x^T M^T :\therefore M x  \lambda x and  R(M,x)  \frac{x^T M x}{x^T x}  \lambda \frac{x^Tx}{x^T x}  \lambda.Therefore, the eigenvectors x_1 \ldots x_n of M are the critical points of the Raleigh Quotient and their corresponding eigenvalues \lambda_1 \ldots \lambda_n are the stationary values of R.This property is the basis for components analysis and correlation.Use in Sturm&ndash;Liouville theorytheory concerns the action of the operator:L(y)  \frac{1}{w(x)}\left(-\frac{d}{dx}\leftp(x)\frac{dy}{dx}\right + q(x)y\right)on the product space defined by:\langle{y_1,y_2}\rangle  \int_a^b w(x)y_1(x)y_2(x) \, dxof functions satisfying some specified conditions at a and b. In this case the Rayleigh quotient is:\frac{\langle{y,Ly}\rangle}{\langle{y,y}\rangle}  \frac{\int_a^b{y(x)\left(-\frac{d}{dx}\leftp(x)\frac{dy}{dx}\right + q(x)y(x)\right)}dx}{\int_a^b{w(x)y(x)^2}dx}.This is sometimes presented in an equivalent form, obtained by separating the integral in the numerator and using by parts::\frac{\langle{y,Ly}\rangle}{\langle{y,y}\rangle}  \frac{\int_a^b{y(x)\left(-\frac{d}{dx}\leftp(x)y(x)\right\right)}dx + \int_a^b{q(x)y(x)^2} \, dx}{\int_a^b{w(x)y(x)^2} \, dx}: \frac{-y(x)\leftp(x)y(x)\right|_a^b + \int_a^b{y(x)\leftp(x)y(x)\right} \, dx + \int_a^b{q(x)y(x)^2} \, dx}{\int_a^b{w(x)y(x)^2} \, dx}: \frac{-p(x)y(x)y(x)|_a^b + \int_a^b\left+ q(x)y(x)^2\right \, dx}{\int_a^b{w(x)y(x)^2} \, dx}.GeneralizationFor a given pair (A, B) of real symmetric positive-definite matrices, and a given non-zero vector x, the generalized Rayleigh quotient is defined as::R(A,B; x) : \frac{x^T A x}{x^T B x}.The Generalized Rayleigh Quotient can be reduced to the Rayleigh Quotient R(D, Cx) through the transformation D  {C^*}^{-1} A C^{-1} where C is the decomposition of matrix B.See also* of valuesReferences(Further reading* Shi Yu, Lon-Charles Tranchevent, Bart Moor, Yves Moreau, Kernel-based Data Fusion for Machine Learning: Methods and Applications in Bioinformatics and Text Mining, Ch. 2, Springer, 2011.de:Rayleigh-Quotientit:Quoziente_di_Rayleigh de Rayleighde Rayleigh
307385
Greenback_Party
 colors  GreenThe Greenback Party (also known as the Independent Party, the National Party, and the Greenback-Labor Party) (U.S History: http://www.u-s-history.com/pages/h212.html) was an American political party with an anti-monopoly ideology(Hild, Matthew (2007) Greenbackers, Knights of Labor, and Populists; Farmer-Labor Insurgency in the Late-Nineteenth-Century South, The University of Georgia Press. pp 21. {ISBN 0-8203-2897-9}) that was active between 1874 and 1884. Its name referred to  paper money, or greenbacks, that had been issued during the Civil War and afterward. The party opposed the shift from paper money back to a coin-based monetary system because it believed that privately owned banks and corporations would then reacquire the power to define the value of products and labor. It also condemned the use of militias and police against union strikes.(Foner, Eric (2006) Give Me Liberty! An American History Volume 2, W.W. Norton & Company. pp 532. {ISBN 0-393-92784-9}) Conversely, they believed that government control of the monetary system would allow it to keep more currency in circulation, as it had in the war. This would better foster business and assist farmers by raising prices and making debts easier to pay. It was established as a party whose members were primarily farmers financially hurt by the of 1873. History The Greenback Party was founded at a meeting in Indiana, on November 25, 1874. It was originally called the Independent Party or the National Party. In the late 1870s, the party controlled local government in a number of industrial and mining communities and contributed to the election of 21 members in the States Congress independent of the two major parties.(Foner, Eric (2006) Give Me Liberty! An American History Volume 2, W.W. Norton & Company. pp 532. {ISBN 0-393-92784-9})The Age was an era of political ferment and conflict over the proper uses of governmental activity.(boner, Eric (2006) Give Me Liberty! An American History Volume 2, W.W. Norton & Company. pp 532. {ISBN 0-393-92784-9}) The Greenback movement began as a protest against the national system of money and banking that had emerged by the mid-1870s. In particular, Greenbackers condemned the National Banking System, created by the Banking Act of 1863, the harmonization of the silver dollar (Act of 1873 was in fact the Crime of 73 to Greenback), and the Act of 1875, which mandated that the U.S. Treasury issue specie (coinage or hard currency) in exchange for greenback currency upon its presentation for redemption beginning on 1 January 1879, thus returning the nation to the gold standard. Together, these measures created an inflexible currency controlled by banks rather than the federal government. Greenbacks contended that such a system favored creditors and industry to the detriment of farmers and laborers.(Gild, Matthew (2007) Greenbelts, Knights of Labor, and Populists; Farmer-Labor Insurgency in the Late-Nineteenth-Century South, The University of Georgia Press. pp 20-21. {ISBN 0-8203-2897-9})In 1880 the Greenback Party broadened its platform to include support for an tax, an hour day, and allowing women the right to vote. Ideological similarities also existed between the Grange (National Grange of the Order of Patrons of Husbandry) and the Greenback movement. For example, both the Grange and the GAP favored a national graduated income tax and proposed that public lands be given to settlers rather than sold to land speculators.(Gild, Matthew (2007) Greenback, Knights of Labor, and Populists; Farmer-Labor Insurgency in the Late-Nineteenth-Century South, The University of Georgia Press. pp 22. {ISBN 0-8203-2897-9}) The town of Tennessee was named after the Greenback Party about 1882.(Albert, Linda. About Greenback, Maryville-Alcoa Daily Times, 19 February 2000) According to William D. Barns of Virginia University, Virginias Independent Greenback Party attracted reformists in 1878, from both the Democrats and Republicans, dwarfing the latter for a short period.  Many state delegates were elected to the Virginia Legislature, but by 1882, nearly all these had returned to their original parties, or had been voted out by conservative politicians.    Among its national spokesmen, although not the best known, was Ewing, Jr., a noted Free State advocate in Kansas before the civil war, a controversial major general of Union forces during the war, an a Republican turned Democrat after the Grant Administration.  His national debates on Greenback Monetary policy, led the partys growth and influence as spokesmen against the post-war redevelopment of monopolistic gold-based capitalism.  Ewings advice to Andrew Johnson had helped point the Administration towards an anti-gold standard Treasury department.(Smith, Ronald D., (2008) Thomas Ewing Jr., Frontier Lawyer and Civil War General, pp 290.)  Ewing served in Congress from 1877 to 1881 during the Hayes administration as a leading spokesman for those national politicians who wanted the nations money supply used to expand commerce and fund westward expansion of the nation, not repay in gold the interest on civil war bonds Eastern bankers had bought to fund much of the civil war effort but whose antebellum lending practices to the South had helped slavery flourish.(Smith, Thomas Ewing Jr., pp 331-332.)  His 1875 national debates with hard money New York Governor L. Woodford set the stage for a rapid but brief rise in party national influence.(See J. V. Lee, ed., Joint Discussions between Gen. Thomas Ewing, of Ohio, and Gov. Stewart L. Woodford, of New York, on the Finance Question, 100 )  The partys influence declined quickly, and after 1884 it was no longer a force in American politics. Many Greenback activists, including 1880 Presidential nominee B. Weaver, later participated in the Populist Party. By the middle of the 1880s, the Greenback Labor nationally was losing its labor-based support, in part as a result of craft-union voluntarism and in part as a result of Irish defections back to the Democratic Party.(Mink, Gwendolyn (1986) Old Labor and New Immigrants in American Political Development; Union, Party, and State, 1875-1920, Cornell University Press. pp. 87. {ISBN 0-8014-1863-1}) Other Greenback Parties The 1952 campaign of Washington grocer C. Proehl (May 24, 1880-June 1970) and Edward J. Bedell.()The presidential Election Campaign of Hart Slocomb and Kirby Meador in 1960.(Female presidential candidates 1870-1990, Guide To Women Leaders. Retrieved 1/11/08.) Presidential tickets National ConventionsNovember 25, 1874  Organizational Convention in IndianaMay 1618, 1876  Academy of Music, Indianapolis, Indiana. There were 239 delegates present from 17 states. Cooper was nominated for President with 352 votes to 119 for three other contenders. Booth was nominated for Vice President by a vote of 418 to 58 scattering. When Booth declined to run, the national committee substituted Samuel F. Cary.February 1878  The National (Greenback-Labor) Party platform expounded at the partys first convention at Ohio declared that reform of the monetary system was necessary in order to secure to the producers of wealth the results of their labor and skill, and muster out of service the vast army of idlers who, under the existing system, grow rich upon the earnings of others, that every man and woman may, by their own efforts, secure a competence, so that overgrown fortunes and extreme poverty will seldom be found within the limits of our Republic.(Hild, Matthew (2007) Greenbackers, Knights of Labor, and Populists; Farmer-Labor Insurgency in the Late-Nineteenth-Century South, The University of Georgia Press. pp 22. {ISBN 0-8203-2897-9})June 911, 1880  Exposition Hall, Illinois. There were 714 delegates present. B. Weaver was nominated for President with 224.5 votes to B. Wright with 126.5, D. Dillaye with 119, and 246 scattering. (After the roll call, all delegates who had supported other candidates shifted their votes to Weaver: New York Times, June 12, 1880.) J. Chambers was nominated for Vice President with 403 votes to 311 for M. West. May 2829, 1884  Englishs Opera House, Indianapolis, Indiana. All states were represented except Delaware and Mississippi. Benjamin Franklin Butler was nominated for President with 323 votes to 98 for Harper and five scattering. Absolom M. West was unanimously nominated for Vice President. Butler had been nominated for President two weeks earlier by the Anti-Monopoly Partys National Convention.September 12, 1888  Ohio. Only eight delegates attended, and no candidates were nominated.Elected officialsThe following were Greenback members of the House of Representatives:United States Congress, March 4, 1879 - March 3, 1881.* M. Lowe (18421882), 8th congressional district* P. Forsythe (18301906), 15th congressional district* De La Matyr (18251892), National 7th congressional district* B. Weaver (18331912), 6th congressional district* H. Gillette (18401918), 7th congressional district* W. Ladd (18181892), 4th congressional district* H. Murch (18381886), 5th congressional district* Ford (18331897), 9th congressional district* Lindsay Russell (18451908), Carolinas 3rd congressional district* B. Wright, 12th congressional district* H. Yocum (18341895), 20th congressional district* George Washington Jones (18281903), 5th congressional district* Barlow (18141889), 3rd congressional districtUnited States Congress, March 4, 1881 to March 3, 1883.* M. Lowe, Alabamas 8th congressional district.(seated June 3, 1882, subsequently died August 12, 1882. Seat filled by Democrat Wheeler after special election.)* W. Ladd, Maines 4th congressional district* H. Murch, Maines 5th congressional district* S. Hazeltine 6th congressional district* M. Rice 7th congressional district* Ford, Missouris 9th congressional district* H. Burrows 10th congressional district* N. Brumm, 13th congressional district* Mosgrove, 25th congressional district* George Washington Jones, Texas 5th congressional districtUnited States Congress, March 4, 1883 to March 3, 1885.* F. Shively, Anti-Monopolist 13th congressional district* Hamlin Weller, 4th congressional district* N. Brumm, 13th congressional districtUnited States Congress, March 4, 1885 to March 3, 1887.* James Weaver, Iowas 6th congressional districtUnited States Congress, March 4, 1887 to March 3, 1889.* James Weaver, Iowas 6th congressional districtSee also* Party (United States - 19th Century)* Producerism* States Note* of political parties in the United States Notes  References Ohio Elects the President (Mansfield OH: Bookmasters, 2000), pp. 5059.  Smith, Ronald D., Thomas Ewing Jr., Frontier Lawyer and Civil War General. Columbia:University of Missouri Press, 2008, ISBN 978-0-8262-1806-3.States Greenback Party ()sv:Greenbackpartiet
309547
Dakota_Territory
The Territory of Dakota was an incorporated territory of the United States that existed from March 2, 1861, until November 2, 1889, when the final extent of the reduced territory was split and admitted to the Union as the states of North and Dakota.The Dakota Territory consisted of the northernmost part of the land acquired in the Purchase of the United States. The name refers to the Dakota branch of the Sioux tribes which occupied the area at the time.  Most of Dakota Territory was formerly part of the Minnesota and Nebraska territories. When Minnesota became a state in 1858, the leftover area between the River and Minnesotas western boundary fell unorganized. When the Treaty was signed later that year, ceding much of what had been Lakota land to the U.S. Government, early settlers formed an unofficial government and unsuccessfully lobbied for United States territory status. However, it wasnt until three years later when soon-to-be-President Abraham Lincolns cousin-in-law, J.B.S. Todd, personally lobbied for territory status that Washington formally created Dakota Territory.It became an organized territory on March 2, 1861.  Upon creation, Dakota Territory included much of present-day Montana and Wyoming; by 1868, creation of new territories reduced Dakota Territory to the present boundaries of Dakotas. Territorial counties were defined in 1872, including Bottineau County, Cass County and others.thumb|Dakota Territory, circa 1886The territorial capital was Yankton from 1861 until 1883, when it was moved to Bismarck. The Dakota Territory was divided into the states of Dakota and Dakota on November 2, 1889. The admission of two states, as opposed to one, was done for a number of reasons. The two population centers in the territory were in the northeast and southeast corners of the territory, several hundred miles away from each other. On a national level, there was pressure from the Republican Party to admit two states to add to their political power in the Senate.  A century later, with the populations of the two states at low levels, there were discussions of reuniting them as Dakota, but this has never been seriously considered.Life in Dakota TerritoryAfter becoming an organized territory, the population increased very slowly during the early years and then very rapidly with the Dakota Boom from 1870 to 1880.(The New Encyclopedia of the American West.  Ed. Howard R. Lamar.  1998 Yale University Press, New Haven.  pp. 282)   The white population grew slowly for a number of reasons.  Mainly, the Sioux Indians were considered very hostile and a threat to early settlers.  They were gradually defeated and were not as severe a threat.(Encyclopedia of the American West.  Ed. Charles Philips and Alan Axelrod.  1996 Macmillan Reference USA, New York. pp.12001201)  The population increase can largely be attributed to the growth of railroads, specifically the Pacific Railroad.  Settlers that came to the Dakota Territory were from other western territories as well as many from Northern and Western Europe.  These included large numbers of Norwegians, Germans, Swedes, and Canadians.(John H. Hudson, Migration to an American Frontier, Annals of the Association of American Geographers,(June 1976), 243244)  Commerce was organized around agriculture with wheat being the territorys main cash crop. Other economic activities included mining and cattle ranching. Gold was discovered in the Hills and attracted more settlers to the area. The population surge increased the demand for meat spurring expanded cattle ranching on the territorys vast open ranges. Economic hardship hit the territory in the 1880s due to lower wheat prices and a drought.(The New Encyclopedia of the American West, 282)Dakota Territory in popular cultureDakota Territory was the setting for the syndicated western series, Without a Gun, starring Reason as newspaper editor Adam McLean and Mills as Marshal Frank Tillman. The program aired from 19571959.The Disney musical film One and Only, Genuine, Original Family Band takes place in the Dakota Territory during the time of the 1888 Presidential Election.Dakota Territory was the setting for By The Shores Of Silver Lake, The Long Winter, Little Town On The Prairie, These Happy Golden Years and The First Four Years by Laura Ingalls Wilder   Laura Ingalls WilderSee also*of Dakota Territory*HBO fictional series Deadwood set in the Hills in the town of Deadwood in 1876.*regions of the United States*of North Dakota*of South Dakota*of Dakota Territory Civil War units*evolution of the United States**Territory of France that encompassed land that would later become part of the Territory of Dakota:***Louisiane, 16821764 and 1803**Territory of Spain that would later be returned to France:***Luisiana, 17641803**Territory of the United Kingdom that encompassed land that would later become part of the Territory of Dakota:***Land, 16701870**territories that encompassed land that would later become part of the Territory of Dakota:***Purchase, 18031804***of Louisiana, 18041805***of Louisiana, 18051812***of Missouri, 18121821***of Michigan, 18051837***of Wisconsin, 18361848***of Iowa, 18381846***of Minnesota, 18491858***of Nebraska, 18541867***of Idaho, 18631890**territories that encompassed land that was previously part of the Territory of Dakota:***of Idaho, 18631890***of Montana, 18641889***of Wyoming, 18681890**states that encompass land that was once part of the Territory of Dakota:***of Nebraska, 1867 (annexed land 1882)***of North Dakota, 1889***of South Dakota, 1889***of Montana, 1889***of Wyoming, 1890*States Congressional Delegations from Dakota TerritoryNotesExternal links*Collection of Historical Photographs of the Dakota Territoryast:DakotaTerritorietde:Dakota-Territoriumde Dakotadu Dakotadel Dakotaja:no:DakotaDakotyde Dakota(teritoriu SUA)
310917
Starflight
:See travel for travel between the stars.:For other uses of Starflight see (disambiguation)Starflight is a game published by Arts and developed by Binary Systems in 1986. Originally developed for DOS and Tandy, it was later released for the Amiga, ST, Macintosh and 64. A fully revamped version of the game was developed for the Sega Mega Drive/Genesis in 1991.Set in the year 4620, the game puts players in the role of a starship captain sent to explore the galaxy. There is no set path, allowing players to switch freely between mining, ship-to-ship combat, and alien diplomacy.(Ackerman, Kyle (2008-4-10). Starflight: When Emergent Play Was Only a Floppy Away.  Frictionless Insight. Retrieved on 2008-8-09.) The story eventually expands to resemble a opera  la Trek. Self-aware humor also plays a role within Starflight, such as an encounter with the Starship Enterprise, infrequent messages between a disgruntled shark and a smuggler, and a hidden code which reveals the telephone number of the developers home office. In March 1987, Gaming World declared it the best science fiction game available on computer.() Gameplaythumb|256px|left|The players starship just outside of the Arth system.The player begins inside a space station orbiting a planet called Arth. The inhabitants of Arth have recently discovered two things: first, that they were once a colony world of Earth; and second, Endurium, a crystal that fuels interstellar flight. The goals of the game include exploration, collection of lifeforms and minerals, and finding habitable colony worlds.  Eventually, a larger goal of finding out why stars in the region are going nova and stopping the process, if possible, comes to the forefront.The ship is initially equipped only to haul minerals. It can be modified into a warship through the purchase of weapons, armor, and shields. The player hires a crew from five species to man the ships six posts: Navigator, Science Officer, Engineer, Communications Officer, Doctor, and Captain (who has no actual role - the manual states that his abilities boost the crews). A crewmans proficiency is determined by the relevant skill: a good science officer can determine more of a planets properties and detect aliens at range, etc. Skill increases are bought. One crewman can man multiple posts, but different species have different maximum skill levels. More crew will also spread out the damage from spiky space tiger attacks and other hazards.The hub of the game is Starport, headquarters of the Interstel corporation, and a station which orbits the planet Arth.( Here players sell their finds, buy minerals and Endurium, recruit and train crew members, and upgrade parts of the ship. The main source of income is planet exploration: the ship is equipped with a terrain vehicle that the crew can use to look for minerals and life-forms. The most lucrative source is finding planets suitable for human life. If the science officers analysis checks out, the player can flag a planet for colonization, and name it for no gameplay effect whatsoever.Starflight has well over a hundred stars and several hundred planets. All star systems can be entered and all planets landed on, though in some cases this destroys the ship due to high gravity. Space is also crisscrossed with continuum fluxes, coordinate pairs that allow instantaneous travel between them. Travel via fluxes cuts down significantly on fuel costs and travel time, thought it causes all but the most accomplished navigators to lose their bearings. Space is populated with a handful of spacefaring races, androids, probes, strange singing beings called Minstrels, and a number of random encounters, including the Enterprise. Most alien races begin by scanning the ship for potential danger, while others merely start shooting. If the player chooses to arm weapons or raise shields prematurely, the aliens will interpret that action as aggressive and begin firing. Alternatively, the communications officer can hail the aliens and ask questions on set topics. The science officer can also scan alien ships for general data (e.g. 88 times the size of our ship, weapons armed.)Combat is a matter of moving around to dodge enemy fire, mashing the fire button to fire missiles when far away, and mashing the fire button to fire weaker, but inescapable lasers when near. The players ship has ablative armor and regenerative shields. It takes damage to its hull, crew members, and individual components.When a landing is ordered, pixelated map shows the various topography of each planet, as well as a cursor to select a landing point. The Terrain Vehicle can be deployed once the ship is parked on the ground, allowing the crew to drive across the terrain and scan for minerals. As is the case in outer space, a heads-up display monitors the Terrain Vehicles current fuel level, which is replenished by simply re-entering the ship. If the Terrain Vehicle is destroyed or irrevocably lost, a fee is automatically deducted for a replacement.PlotSettingAt the start of the game, a large construct known as the Crystal Planet is slowly moving through the galaxy. The planet causes nearby stars to flare up and destroy all carbon-based life in the system. The player must explore solar systems, gather clues, special artifacts that grant access to the planet, and ultimately find the planet and destroy it before the players home system flares.The galaxy is composed of a number of species which can be encountered in space and five of which can be hired as part of the players crew. (Humans apparently only exist on Arth and are not to be found among the stars other than on Interstel ships.) Other species include the Veloxi, large insects who demand bribes from ships which violate their space; androids, Interstel models which can be part of the crew, and a mechanical race (the Mechans) left over from the days of the Old Empire; the Elowan, a pacifistic race of sentient plants; the Thrynn, reptile creatures who are primarily interested in money; Spemin, gelatinous blobs who are known for their cowardice; the Gazurtoid, octopus-like zealots who regard all air-breathers as infidels; and the Uhlek, a destructive fleet of ships with a hive mind.StoryThe story begins on a planet called Arth, which is a haven for the survivors of the human race (aka the Old Empire). Due to heavy radiation, the inhabitants have been forced to live beneath the planets crust for centuries. In recent times, the radiation has finally dissipated from the surface, allowing the population to unearth long-lost technology belonging to Arths original settlers.  This technology allows for the building of spaceships.   An independent company called Interstel is dispatching ships to mine for resources, particularly endurium, a crystalline mineral which acts as fuel for starships. In addition, Interstel employees are instructed to seek missing information about Arths history, ancient artifacts, and planets with optimum environments for colonization. Early in the game, the crew encounters an Old Empire starship adrift in space; An endlessly repeating distress call has been transmitting from the ship for over a thousand years. Before the fall of the Old Empire, a scientific expedition known as the Noah 9 left Earth in search of Heaven, a paradise world to which humans could immigrate. Ultimately, the expedition never arrived, leaving a fleet of Mechan ships forever waiting for their arrival. Once their coded questions are answered correctly, the Mechans assume that the crew is, in fact, the long-awaited Noah 9. Further investigation leads the crew to Earth, the homeworld of the Old Empire. The planet has been burned to a cinder and is devoid of all life. Additional clues are found in the Four Seedlings, a symmetrical system made up of four suns. Centuries ago, the leaders of the Old Empire realized something was causing hostile aliens to flee from the center of the galaxy. The greatest minds from each of the races gathered at this location, where they discovered that the Crystal Planet was slowly eradicating all life. In a last act, they sent a human named Commander McConnell to end it, but he apparently failed.At the end of the game, the player must obtain certain artifacts in order to penetrate the shielding of the Crystal Planet and destroy it. Commander McConnells last journal entry can be found on the surface; in it, he shares his discovery that endurium is actually a race of living, sentient beings who are being burned up as fuel for travel. These Beings are revealed to be the ancients. Because their metabolism is extremely slow due to their crystalline makeup, they are not even aware of outside life and have come to view other races as a virus. The game ends after the player successfully plants the Black Egg artifact on the planets surface and retreats back into space, causing the Crystal Planet to explode and ending the game, though the game can still be played after the Crystal Planet is destroyed in the Genesis version.Mega Drive/Genesis versionright|thumb|Genesis version of StarflightStarflight was ported and re-released for the Mega Drive/Genesis in 1991. Aside from graphical upgrades, there are very few changes to the overall game. In addition to modifications made to the ship itself, several upgrades can be purchased for the Terrain Vehicle &mdash; renamed TV &mdash; including pontoons and snow treads (for transport over water and snow, respectively). The Shimmering Ball, an artifact which doubled as a device in the original DOS version, has no such ability in the remake but in fact autoscans alien ships when encountered. The option to name newly discovered planets was also removed.LegacyStarflight spawned a sequel, 2: Trade Routes of the Cloud Nebula, and was very much the spiritual predecessor to the more popular, but similarly themed Control 2. An unofficial sequel released without the Starflight name due to the inability of the designers to gain the rights to the title from Arts is the lesser-known Protostar.  It has also been confirmed that Starflight was an inspiration for the Mass Effect series developed by Bioware.()ReceptionGame reviewers Hartley and Pattie Lesser complimented the game in their The Role of Computers column in Dragon #116 (1986), calling it stunning in its presentation and play.()See also* 2* Control 2* Elite (1984)* Seed (1994)ReferencesExternal links** Starflt.com  Resource page and downloads* Starflight - The Lost Colony project* The Starflight III Project* Starflight JDR (in Spanish)* Boldly Going Somewhere Better  Newer Games: Starflight  In-depth review of the Genesis version of Starflightde:Starflightes:Starflightfr:Starflightpt:StarFlight
312527
Parral,_Chihuahua
footnotes               Hidalgo del Parral, is a city and seat of the municipality of Hidalgo del Parral in the state of Chihuahua. It is located in the southern part of the state, 220 km from the state capital, the city of Chihuahua, Chih.The citys population was 101,147 at the 2005 census, and the municipalitys population was 103,519. The municipality includes numerous very small outlying communities in addition to the city. The city was founded as San Jos del Parral. The name was changed after independence from Spain, in honour of Fr Hidalgo, widely considered the Father of the Country.The city is one of the most European-fashioned in all Mexico, because of the historic presence of Spaniards and French.HistoryAccording to legend, Juan Rangel de Biezma came here in 1629, picked up a rock on the Cerro la Prieta (La Prieta Hill), licked it and proclaimed There is a mineral deposit here.  This deposit produced silver for 340 years.()Parral was once a bustling center for silver mining. As early as 1567, the silver mines at Santa Barbara were established in the territory of the Conchos Indians. However, in 1631, a vast new silver strike was made in what is now southern Chihuahua. Later, in 1640, it was declared Capital of the World by monarch, IV of Spain, at the very height of the Empire, that included territories in Asia, Italy, and the Countries .The strike in Parral led to a large influx of Spaniards and Indian laborers into the area of Tarahumara country north of Santa Barbara. However, the steadily increasing need for labor in the Parral mines, according to Professor Spicer, led to the forcible recruitment, or enslavement, of non-Christian Indians...the influx of new people and the resulting development of Spanish society no doubt placed increased pressure upon the native population in the region. The large area of southern Chihuahua inhabited by the Conchos Indians included the highway between the mining districts of Parral, Cusihuiriachic, and Chihuahua.   After the end of the silver mining boom, Parral was almost completely abandoned in the early 1930s (although the surrounding district continues to be mined for silver and base metals.)  It is now a small city mainly dedicated to commerce.Parral is often associated with several historical figures, including revolutionary leader Villa, who was assassinated on July 20, 1923 and  initially buried there, and border ruffian Dirty Rudabaugh, a sometime friend and foe of the Kid.thumb|right|300px|The Palacio Alvarado was once the home of one of the wealthiest mining barons in Parral.Notable sitesEl Palacio de AlvaradoIt belonged to one of the most prominent families in Parral, descendants of Pedro Alvarado owning the silver mine called La Palmilla.  This family was rich enough to offer the President Daz to pay the national external debt. The palace was constructed by Amrigo Rouvier and it is now a museum and cultural center. It has preserved much of the original European-made furniture.  The walls of the patio were painted by Italian painter Decanini between 1946 and 1948. El Hotel HidalgoThis  historical building was a gift from Don Pedro Alvarado to Villa and is located next to the Plaza Guillermo Baca.La Casa de la Familia Griensen (the Griensen Family House)This is where Elisa Griensen was born.  She distinguished herself in Parral history by fighting against a contingent of U.S. soldiers sent to capture Pancho Villa after he crossed the border and attacked Columbus, New Mexico.The Francisco Villa MuseumThis historical building is located on the street near the spot where Villas enemies waited days for him to pass and ultimately assassinated him in 1923.  Every year in July, his death is reenacted here.Casa StallforthThis was a beautiful and luxurious palace (during the era), with a beautiful baroque style; decorated in the facade with many beings from the mythology, that once belonged to the Stallforth family - who along with the Alvarado family, became the towns main benefactors, contributing much to its infrastructure.(Notable eventsThe annual staging of the Murder of Villa, a recreation using props from the era, in the exact place of the historical event.The annual Cabalgata Villista, is a long-distance horse ride with statewide massive participation and a spectacular visual event as thousands of horses enter the city(see Cavalcade).FoodIn addition to its diverse and rich History, Parral is famous for its traditional foods. Parral was recently named as one of the Ten Gastronomic Marvels of Mexico, primarily for its artisan confectioneries dulces de leche.  These include a wide variety of candies and pastries from old recipes based on milk, sugar, and natural fruits.  Some other notable recipes with a touch of Parral are enchiladas, rayadas, barbacoa, steaks and cabrito (goat).Dulces de lecheDulces de leche are cooked-milk confections found nationwide in Mexico; Parral has been historically acclaimed since the 1930s because of the distinctive flavor of its dulces de lechecandys made with nuts like pecans, peanuts, hazelnuts, and fruits such as apricot, pineapple, coconut and others. Parrals candies have been shipped around the world; interesting destinations include Vatican City, Washington DC, and London. These traditional confections arrived in Parral in the early 20th century. The origin of recipes is unknown, although it is believed that they arrived in southern Mexico from Europe during the colonial times.  Then, these recipes were transferred to later generations.One of the most famous confectionery artisans in Parral was Don Pablo Rodriguez, founder of La Gota de Miel.  Don Pablito (as the Parralenses knew him) was born in Teocaltiche, Jalisco in the late 19th century.  He and his wife arrived to Parral in the early 20th century, after working for several years in the State of Coahuila as a baker and a cook in the Hacienda del Rosario (now Parras de la Fuente) for Francisco Madero and Mercedes Gonzlez (parents of President Francisco I. Madero).  It is believed that their recipes might have acquired some influence from professional chefs also working in the hacienda at the time.Several local artisans in Parral had recentlyin the late 1990sattempted to imitate Don Pablitos original recipe.EnchiladasEnchiladas are a specialty Mexican plate also found nationwide, and Parral is traditionally famous for its delicious enchiladas. They are a rolled maize tortilla stuffed with meat and covered with a tomato and chile sauce. Enchiladas can be filled with a variety of ingredients, including meat, cheese, beans, potatoes, vegetables, or seafood.These other tradition in Parral, started in the early 20th century and they gained notoriety in the mid-late 20th century.  Enchiladas originated in Mexico. Anthropological evidence suggests that the indigenous people of the Valley of Mexico traditionally ate corn tortillas folded or rolled around small fish. Writing at the time of the Spanish conquistadors, Bernal Daz del Castillo documented a feast enjoyed by Europeans hosted by Hernn Corts in Coyoacn.  In the 19th century, as Mexican cuisine was being memorialized, enchiladas were mentioned in the first Mexican cookbook, El cocinero mexicano (The Mexican Chef), published in 1831, and in Mariano Galvan Riveras Diccionario de Cocina, published in 1845.48 Probably, as with the dulces de leche, this recipes arrived to Parral from immigrants from the south of Mexico.Among the most famous cookers of enchiladas in Parral was Doa Cuca, near of the historical Calicanto bridge.wheat flour, cinnamon, piloncillo, anise and honey.BarbacoaBarbacoa is meat from cattle or sheep slowly cooked over an open fire or, more traditionally, in a hole dug in the ground covered with maguey leaves; although the interpretation is loose, in the present day it may refers to meat steamed until tender. During colonial and post-colonial times, Parral was famous because of its delectable barbacoa or birria de hoyo. Such barbacoa contained ingredients as laurel (bay leaf), garlic, maguey, onions, and other condiments. It was one of the luscious foods of the executives, foreigners, and miners working in the silver mines at Parral.SportsJudoParral has one of the best clubs of Judo throughout Latin America: Judokan Parral. It is a Judo academy in one of the most isolated places in Mexico,and Gabriel Gonzlez. Among the most recognized alumni of Judokan is Vanessa Zambotti. She is an Olympic judo-fighter with international experience. She started practicing the sport at Judokan Parral (for her complete history see: http://vanessazambotti.com/vz/contenido/5.aspx).(The history of how judo started in Parral is needed here)Judokan is increasingly becoming one of the most important culturks for future generationswho follow the sport closelyin the North of Mexico. Right now, some historians are working on achieving oral testimonies and photographs to sketch part of northern Mexico popular history, and they will include the impact of judo among practitioners (this needs verification and further elaboration).BaseballParral is famous, primarily in the North of Mexico, for its baseball team Los Mineros de Parral(The complete history of baseball in Parral goes here).Notable people from Parral* Gloria and Campobello, ballet dancers and choreographers. Born in Durango, spent their childhood in Parral.* Duval, actress.* Familiar, journalist.* Gmez Morn, politician. Founding member of the National Action Party. Born in Chihuahua, then moved to Parral.* Gmez-Quiones, historian, professor of history, poet, and activist. Co-editor of the de Santa Brbara.* Linda Hel Atta, Slims mother.* Mariles, jumping champion in the Summer Olympics in London, where he won gold medals both in Individual Jumping and in Team Jumping.* Montemayor, novelist, poet, essayist and literary critic.* Ortiz Mena, politician and economist. Director of the Social Security Institute from 1952 to 1958, of Finance and Public Credit from 1958 to 1970, president of the Development Bank from 1971 to 1988.* Fernando Ramrez, historian.* Rangel Sostmann, rector of the Instituto Tecnologico y de Estudios Superiores de Monterrey.* Reyes Flores, painter, first female exponent of Mexican muralism.* Ripstein, film producer.* Gabriel Sandoval Chvez, professional boxer.* Zambotti, judoka. Gold medalist in the Pan American Games, de Janeiro 2007.Sister cities* Fe, New Mexico, USA* KanpurReferences(*Link to tables of population data from Census of 2005 INEGI: Instituto Nacional de Estadstica, Geografa e InformticaExternal links*Municipio de Hidalgo del Parral Official website* Parral Chihuahua*www.PuroChihuahua.com*www.houstonculture.org*www.enparral.com*http://www.flickr.com/groups/la_capital_del_mundo/ Parral images*http://www.rulosite.com()del Parral(Chihuahua)(Chihuahua)(Chihuahua)(Chihuahua)(Chihuahua)del Parraldel Parral()del Parral
313765
Black_sand
File:BlackSandMaui.jpg|thumb|Black sand from a beach in Hawaii.Black sand is sand that is black in color. One type of black sand is a heavy, glossy, partly magnetic mixture of usually fine sands, found as part of a deposit. Another type of black sand, found on beaches near a volcano, consists of tiny fragments of lava.While some beaches are predominantly made of black sand, even other colour beaches (e.g. gold and white) can often have deposits of black sand, particularly after storms. Larger waves can sort out sand grains leaving deposits of heavy minerals visible on the surface of erosion scarps.Placer depositsleft|thumb|Black Sands and Gold in Sluicebox, Blue Ribbon Mine, Alaskathumb|Magnet for separation of black sand by handBlack sands are used by miners and prospectors to indicate the presence of a placer formation.  mining activities produce a concentrate that is composed mostly of black sand.  Black sand concentrates often contain additional valuables, other than precious metals:  earth elements, thorium, titanium, tungsten, zirconium and others are often fractionated during igneous processes into a common mineral-suite that becomes black sands after weathering and erosion.Several gemstones, such as garnet, topaz, ruby, sapphire, and diamond are found in placers and in the course of placer mining, and sands of these gems are found in black sands and concentrates.  Purple or ruby-colored garnet sand often forms a showy surface dressing on ocean beach placers.Lava fragmentsLava, erupting onto a shallow sea floor or flowing into the sea from land, may cool so rapidly that it shatters into sand and rubble. The result is the production of huge amounts of fragmental volcanic debris. The famous black sand beaches of Hawaii, such as Black Sand Beach, were created virtually instantaneously by the violent interaction between hot lava and sea water.(http://vulcan.wr.usgs.gov/Glossary/LavaFlows/description_lava_flows.html USGS Magma, Lava, Lava Flows, etc.)See also* Diamond* Mining* deposit* mineral sands ore deposits* IronsandReferencesja:th:enzh:
315037
Roraima
 footnotes                Roraima (Tupi: Green Plateau, (Regionally pronounced , but most persons of others states pronounce , according the Jornal Vale Paraibano. The Portuguese pronunciation is .)) is the northernmost and least populated state of Brazil, located in the Amazon region. It borders the states of Amazonas and Par, as well as the nations of Venezuela and Guyana. The population is 400,000 (2006) and the capital is Boa Vista. Roraima is the Brazilian state with the fewest municipalities, 15 in total.Geographythumb|left|Tepequm, in Roraima.The climate of Roraima is tropical with an annual mean temperature of 26C (78.8F). The states southern part is located in the rainforest, while the north has open grassland fields, and there is a small strip of savanna to the east. The state is rich in mineral deposits - especially gold, diamonds, cassiterite, bauxite, marble and copper. Many of these deposits are located in indigenous reserves, and illegal mining has resulted in frequent conflicts with the native population, especially the Yanomami and the Macuxi and allied groups. The Roraima National Park is located around one of the highest mountains of both Venezuela (outside of the Andes) and Brazil, and the highest in Guyana, a 2,875 m (9,432 ft) high tepui known as Roraima. Only a small fraction of the mountain is in Brazilian territory, however, and the highest point of the Brazilian part is at 2,734 metres (8,970 ft).()sobre o Rio Branco.JPG|thumb|left|Rio Branco (White River) in Roraima.ClimateExcept for the higher mountains where the climate is cooler but very wet, Roraima has an climate. This is a type of climate in which there is no season  all months have mean precipitation values of at least 60 mm.  It is usually found at latitudes within five degrees of the equator  which are dominated by the Convergence Zone. The equatorial climate is denoted Af in the climate classification.  rainforest is the natural vegetation in equatorial regions. VegetationThe Amazon represents over half of the planets remaining rainforests and comprises the largest and most species-rich tract of rainforest in the world. Wet tropical forests are the most species-rich biome, and tropical forests in the Americas are consistently more species rich than the wet forests in Africa and Asia.(Turner, I.M. 2001. The ecology of trees in the tropical rain forest.  University Press, Cambridge.  ISBN 0-521-80183-4)  As the largest tract of tropical rainforest in the Americas, the Amazonian rainforests have unparalleled biodiversity. More than 1/3 of all species in the world live in the Amazon Rainforest.(Amazon Rainforest, Amazon Plants, Amazon River Animals) HistoryImage:Boa Vista antiga 2.jpg|thumb|right|Vista, Roraima in 1924.Since the beginnings of the 16th century, the region now considered the state of Roraima was disputed territory, because of its rich mineral reserves. It was sought by the Spanish, Portuguese, Dutch and English until the beginning of the last century. But in 1943, together with a section from the state of Amazonas, the Federal Government created the territory of Branco, which became Roraima in 1962. In 1988, Roraima became a state by decision of the National Congress. The name of the state was taken from Roraima, whose name comes from the Pemon words roroi (cyan) and ma (large).DemographicsImage:Orla Taumanan.JPG|thumb|Orla Taumanan in Vista, Roraima.According to the IBGE of 2007, there were 405,000 people residing in the state. The population density was 1.8 inh./km.Urbanization: 80.3% (2004); growth: 4.6% (19912000); Houses: 97,465 (2005).(Source: PNAD.)The last PNAD (National Research for Sample of Domiciles) census revealed the following numbers: 278,000 Brown (Multiracial) people (68.8%), 81,000 White people (20.0%), 29,000 Black people (7.4%), 15,000 Asian or Amerindian people (3.8%).()The Brazilian Indian agency, (FUNAI) estimates the states indigenous population at 30,715.(FUNAI) The largest indigenous groups are the Macuxi  (16,500)(http://www.socioambiental.org/pib/epi/verbetinho/comfoto/macuxi.htm) and the better-known Yanomami. (11,700)(http://www.socioambiental.org/pib/epienglish/yanomami/yanomami.shtm.) Much of the states indigenous population lives in several large, legally recognized indigenous reserves and a number of smaller ones, totalling 46.13% of the land area of the state.(http://www.socioambiental.org/e/nsa/detalhe?id2669)Trivial facts* Vehicles: 74,181 (March/2007)* phones: 148,000 (April/2007)* Telephones: 67,000 (April/2007)* Cities: 15 (2007).(Source: IBGE.)EconomyThe sector is the largest component of GDP at 87.5%, followed by the sector at 8.7%. Agriculture represents 3.8%, of GDP (2004). Roraima exports: wood 74%, leather 22.6% (2002).Share of the Brazilian economy: 0.1% (2005).Educationthumb|right|Federal University of Roraima.Portuguese is the official national language, and thus the primary language taught in schools.  But English and Spanish are part of the official school curriculum.Educational institutions* Federal de Roraima (UFRR) (Federal University of Roraima);* Universidade Estadual de Roraima (UERR) (State University of Roraima);* Instituto Federal de Educao Cincia e Tecnologia de Roraima (IFRR);* Faculdade de Cincias Humanas, Biolgicas e da Sade (FCHBS);* Faculdade de Teologia de Boa Vista (Fatebov); * Faculdade Roraimense de Ensino Superior (Fares);* Faculdades Cathedral - Boa Vista (Cathedral-Boa Vista); * Faculdade Atual da Amaznia - (FAA) Infrastructure International AirportVista International Airport was opened on February 19, 1973, and underwent its first big remodeling in 1998. The passenger terminal, runway and apron were all enlarged, and a separate taxiway was built. The airport has the capacity to receive 675,000 passengers a year.HighwaysImage:Imagem 049.JPG|thumb|Br-174, Boa Vista-Venezuela.*BR-174;*BR-210;*BR-431;*BR-432;*BR-410;*RR-171; *RR-175;*RR-202; *RR-203.FlagThe blue of the flag represents the pure air and the sky of Roraima, the white strip symbolizes peace, and the green to the right represents the forests and fields. The star - symbolizing the state in the national flag of Brazil - is yellow, which symbolizes the mineral resources of the state. The red line in bottom stands for the equator, which cuts through the state. The flag was designed by the artist Mrio Barreto, and was adopted by Law No.133 of June 14, 1996.References External links * Brazil* Official Website* Brazilian Tourism Portalaf:Roraimaar:ast:Roraimazh-min-nan:Roraimabr:Roraimabg:ca:Roraimacs:Roraimacy:Roraimada:Roraimade:Roraimaosariikes:Roraimaeo:Rorajmoeu:Roraimafa:fr:Roraimaga:Roraimagl:Roraimaio:Roraimabpy:id:Roraimaia:Roraimais:Roraimait:Roraimahe:ka:kw:Roraimasw:Roraimalv:Roraimalt:Roraimamk:mr:ms:Roraima(staat)ja:no:Roraimann:Roraimaoc:Roraimapnb:pms:Roraima(stan)pt:Roraimaro:Roraimaru:simple:Roraimask:Roraimasr:sh:Roraimafi:Roraimasv:Roraimatet:Roraimath:tg:tr:Roraimauk:vi:Roraimavo:Roraimawar:Roraimayo:Roraimazh:
316860
Folsom_State_Prison
 director        Rick Hill, WardenFolsom State Prison is a State Prison located in the city of Folsom, States,  north east from the state capital of Sacramento. Opened in 1880, Folsom is the second-oldest prison in the state of California after San Quentin and was the first in the country to have electricity.()() Folsom was one of the first maximum security prisons, and as such witnessed the execution of 93 condemned prisoners over a 42-year period. It is possibly best known in popular culture for two concerts performed at the facility by musician Cash in the late 1960s. Folsom State Prison is one of 33 prisons operated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. Facilities Both FSP and State Prison, Sacramento (SAC) share the mailing address: Represa, CA  95671.( )( ) Represa (translated as dam from the language) is the name given in 1892 to the State Prison post office because of its proximity to a dam on the American that was under construction at the time (this dam was replaced in 1955 by the Dam).(Durham, David L. Californias Geographic Names. A Gazetteer of Historic and Modern Names of the State. Clovis, CA: Word Dancer Press, 1998. ISBN 1884995144)As of the States 2000 Census, FSP and SAC had a combined inmate population of 7,246 housed at level 1 and 2 security, the two lowest levels of security for prisons operated by the CDC. Level 1 prisoners are housed in open dormitories without a secure perimeter, and Level 2 prisoners may be housed in open dormitories with secure fences and armed guard coverage. However, there are no dormitories within the FSP secure perimeter, and prisoners are housed in one man cells, two to a cell. In 2004, the majority of level 2 prisoners were moved to other prisons and level 3 prisoners took their place. FSPs population in early 2005 was approximately 3,400.There are five housing units within the secure perimeter, including the original two-tiered structure. Unit 1 is the most populous cellblock in the United States, with a capacity of nearly 1,200 inmates on four five-tiered sections.All cells include toilet, sink, bunks and storage space for inmate possessions. There are two dining halls, a large central prison exercise yard, and two smaller exercise yards. The visiting room includes an attached patio as well as space for non-contact visits.Historythumb|200px|right|Folsom Prison museum in 2008FSP is Californias second-oldest prison, long known for its harsh conditions in the decades following the Gold Rush. Construction of the facility began in 1878 on the site of the Stony Bar mining camp along the River. The prison officially opened in 1880. Inmates spent most of their time in the dark behind solid boiler plate doors in stone cells measuring 4 feet by 8 feet (1.2 by 2.4 m) with 6 inch (150 mm) eye slots. Air holes were drilled into the cell doors in the 1940s, and the cell doors are still in use today.After the State of California took sole control of the death penalty in 1891, executions were held at Folsom and at Quentin State Prison. Folsoms last execution was held on December 3, 1937; after that point, all executions occurred at San Quentin.(History of Capital Punishment in California. Department of Corrections. Retrieved on August 16, 2010.)FSP was the first prison in the world to have electric power, which was provided by the first hydroelectric powerhouse in California. The quarry at FSP provided granite for the foundation of the state capitol building and much of the gravel used in the early construction of Californias roads.Although FSP now houses primarily medium security prisoners, FSP was one of Americas first maximum-security prisons; a total of 93 prisoners were hanged at FSP between December 13, 1895, and December 3, 1937. After that time executions were carried out in the chamber at Californias Quentin Prison.Californias vehicle plates have been manufactured at FSP since the 1930s. Other prison industries include fabrication and a print shop.Folsom was built to hold 1,800 inmates. In 1968 each prisoner in Folsom lived in his own cell. Almost every one of the prisoners was in an education program or learning a trade. Most prisoners who were released did not return to prison after being released. Laura Sullivan of Public Radio said that the costs of housing prisoners barely registered in the states budget. In 2009 Folsom was overcrowded, having 4,427 inmates. Around that year most of its prisoners who were released returned to prison after being released.(Sullivan, Laura. Folsom Embodies Californias Prison Blues. Public Radio. August 13, 2009.) Inmate programs   PIA The PIA program includes administration, a plate factory where the inmates have been making California license plates since before the 1930s, maintenance, fabrication, a sign shop, and a furniture factory(). Vocational  The Vocational Inmate Program formerly included auto body & fender, mechanics, building maintenance, electronics, graphic arts, janitorial, landscape gardening, masonry, mill and cabinet, office services, and welding.  Half of these programs have been eliminated due to budget cuts in 2010.(). Academic  The Academic Inmate Program includes Adult Basic Education, High School/GED, English as a Second Language, a literacy program, Computer Assisted Instruction(). Other  Community Service Crews, Youth Diversion Program, Religious Program, Folsom Project for the visually impaired. Arts in Corrections was a very successful program closed due to budget cuts in 2010.(). Escape attempts Since Folsom was one of the first maximum-security prisons in the US, the inmates were desperate to escape. Prior to the completion of the granite wall in the 1920s, the prison saw numerous escape attempts; the first one occurring shortly after the first inmates arrived in the 1880s. Throughout Folsoms violent and bloody history, numerous riots and escape attempts have resulted in both inmate and staff deaths.(Folsom Prison). 1920 Prison train attempt In 1920, three convicts hijacked a prison train that was used to move materials and smashed it through a prison gate to escape. One of the escaped convicts was never recaptured.() 1932 Diving suit attempt An inmate tried to escape in 1932 using a diving suit fashioned from a football bladder, a goggle lens and other scrounged materials. According to Floyd Davis, a prison guard of 13 years who continued to volunteer at the museum after his retirement, the inmate only made one mistake: he didnt make his breathing tube long enough, and ended up drowning in the power house mill pond.()Guards had to drain the pond to recover the inmates body.() September 19, 1937 Approximately 40 inmates had been waiting to talk to Warden Larkin concerning upcoming parole hearings when seven of the inmates suddenly attacked him. As they took him into the yard other guards started firing. In the commotion that followed Officer Martin and Warden Larkin were both stabbed to death. Officer Martin died at the scene and Warden Larkin died of his wounds five days later.The inmates involved in the attack were said to have used shanks, prison-made knives, to attack the Warden and the officer. Also, a prison-made wooden pistol was found, and was carved and meant for use in the attack.One of the seven inmates who attempted to escape was wanted for the murder of Officer James Hill, of the Marlow, Oklahoma, Police Department, on April 20, 1931.Two of the escaping attempts were shot and killed during the incident. The remaining five were all sentenced to death and eventually executed. Two suspects, including the one who had murdered Officer Hill, were executed in the gas chamber on December 2, 1938. Two others were executed on December 9, 1938, the leader of the group was executed on December 16, 1938. June 5, 1987 (Glen Stewart Godwin) A notable Folsom Prison escape was Stewart Godwin, whose escape from Folsom earned him a spot on the Ten Most Wanted Fugitives list.In 1987, Godwin attempted to escape during his incarceration at Vocational Institute in California, and he was moved to Folsom State Prison, a maximum-security prison. Authorities believe Godwins wife Shelly Rose Godwin and his former cellmate in Deuel, Lorenz Karlic, helped to plan his escape.()A hacksaw and other tools had been smuggled into the prison for Godwin. On June 5, 1987, he cut a hole through fence wire and escaped into a drain that emptied into the River. Godwin dropped through a manhole and crawled 750 feet through the pitch-black drain. Either Godwins wife or Karlic, an accomplice, had left a raft that Godwin used to float down the river, following painted arrows on rocks that directed him where to go.(In June 1987, Karlic was arrested in California,() and convicted for aiding Godwins escape.()In January 1988, Shelly Godwin was classified as a federal fugitive for her role in her husbands escape. She was captured by the FBI in Texas, on February 7, 1990.() October 19, 2010 Two minimum-security inmates, William Howard, 43, and Daniel Summet, 34, escaped from Folsom on October 19, 2010.()Prison spokesman Lt. Anthony Gentile did not elaborate on the circumstances of how the men got away, only saying that the two men fled from the prisons Minimum Support Facility,( and that the escape was discovered when the two failed to report to their work areas.()Folsom State Prison correctional staff and CDCRs Office of Correctional Safety agents initiated escapee apprehension efforts.(The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the local law enforcement agencies and the Highway Patrol have been notified and are all searching for the two men.( Violent incidents In 1937, a warden of FSP, Clarence Larkin, was stabbed during an escape attempt and died from his wounds.During the 1970s and 1980s violence at Folsom peaked, when the Brotherhood and other gangs made prisons increasingly dangerous. The establishment of Secure Housing Units, first at State Prison, Sacramento, and later at Bay State Prison and State Prison, Corcoran, did much to control gang-related violence.On August 27, 2010, seven inmates at Folsom were admitted to a hospital after officers discharged firearms during a riot involving 200 inmates.  None of the inmates injuries were life-threatening, and no corrections officers were injured during the incident.(BBC: Seven injured as guards open fire in US jail riot)In popular cultureFSP was made known to the outside world by country music legend Cash.  Cash narrated a fictional account of an outlaws incarceration in his song Prison Blues (1956).  In addition, Cash performed two live concerts at FSP. The first was in 1966 and the most famous live concert was at the FSP cafeteria on January 13, 1968, which was recorded as the album Folsom Prison. Cash later said of the FSP inmates they were the most enthusiastic audience I have ever played to.(Sullivan, James. California prison concerts defined outlaw persona. San Francisco Chronicle, September 13, 2003.) The Folsom Prison Blues single from that album was #1 on the country music chart for four weeks, and the album was on the top 200 pop album chart for 122 weeks.( A 40th anniversary tribute concert was to take place in the same cafeteria at FSP on 13, 2008, with a special appearance by Cashs original drummer W.S. Fluke Holland.(Associated Press. Johnny Cash tribute at Folsom prison canceled. 9, 2008.) The original plans were to stream the concert over the internet, with four nonprofit groups underwriting the show and sharing in any profits the show might realize.( However, a few days before the concert was to occur, it was canceled in a dispute over filming rights, media access, and security concerns.(Furillo, Andy. Folsom Prison concert is off. The promoter balks at rules to let the media film a tribute to Johnny Cash. Sacramento Bee, January 9, 2008.)FSP has been the location of a number of feature films, including in Cell Block 11, Heat, Me, Jericho Mile, 48 Hours, Diggstown, parts of the Line (a biopic of Cash), and the Walls of Folsom Prison, which was the inspiration for Cashs song. The television drama Jump Street also featured FSP when Depps character Tom Hanson was imprisoned for murder.FSP was renamed for the movie Frankie and Johnny with Al Pacino. In the FSP Museum there is the identification of the fake Penitentiary.A Johnny Cash tribute band on the East coast is named The Folsom Prison Gang.(www.TheFolsomPrisonGang.com) Notable prisoners *Barger of the Angels*Bunker*Cleaver*Joseph Gamsky, aka Joe Hunt, of the Boys Club*Stewart Godwin, whose escape from Folsom earned him a spot on the Ten Most Wanted Fugitives list*Hooker*James, musician*Kemper, the co-ed killer*Knight, owner of Row Records*Leary*Manson*Menendez*Mitose*Ed Morrell, accomplice to the Evans-Sontag railroad robbers of the 1890s*Bobby Purify (Original singer of Im Your Puppet)*Rossi, star of the Planet show Pit Boss*Ryan, U.S. Congressman who while an Assemblyman had posed as a prisoner to investigate conditions.*Sherley, musician*Trejo, actor References  External links *Folsom State Prison  official site* California Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation Official website*Code of Silence documentary film*Folsom Embodies Californias Prison Blues  August 13, 2009 NPR story*Folsom Prison Boasts A Rich History Spanning One Hundred Thirty Years. Department of Corrections and RehabilitationState Prisonvangladtat de FolsomState PrisonState Prison
318484
National_Radio_Astronomy_Observatory
The National Radio Astronomy Observatory (NRAO) is a Federally Funded Research and Development Center of the States Science Foundation operated under cooperative agreement by Universities, Inc for the purpose of astronomy.  NRAO  designs, builds, and operates its own high sensitivity telescopes for use by scientists around the world.(About the NRAO)LocationsCharlottesville, VirginiaNRAO headquarters is located on the of Virginia grounds. The North American ALMA Science Center and the NRAO Technology Center are also located in Charlottesville. This site is the workplace of nearly 100 scientists, including Richard Fisher and Mangum. (Charlottesville NRAO Facilities)Green Bank, West VirginiaImage:GBT.png|200px|thumb|left|Bank TelescopeNRAO is the operator of the worlds largest fully steerable telescope, the Bank Telescope, which stands near Green Bank, West Virginia.(The NRAOs Green Bank Telescope)  The observatory contains many other notable telescopes, among them the  telescope that utilizes an mount uncommon for radio telescopes, three  telescopes forming the Bank Interferometer, a  telescope used by school groups and organizations for small scale research, a fixed radio horn built to observe X-1, a bunk house to facilitate these guests, as well as  a reproduction of the original antenna built by Karl Jansky while he worked for Bell Labs to detect the interference that was discovered to be previously unknown natural waves emitted by the universe.(Other Telescopes at NRAO Green Bank, West Virginia)Green Bank is in the States National Radio Quiet Zone, which is coordinated by NRAO for protection of the Green Bank site as well as the Grove, West Virginia monitoring site operated by the Security Agency.  The zone consists of a  piece of land where fixed transmitters must coordinate their emissions before a license is granted.  The land was set aside by the Communications Commission in 1958, as a radio quiet zone; the area closest to the telescope is free of fixed radio transmitters, and all other fixed radio transmitters including TV and radio towers inside the zone are required to transmit such that interference at the antennas is minimized by methods including limited power and using highly directional antennas.  With the advent of wireless technology and microprocessors in everything from cameras to cars it is difficult to keep the sites free of radio interference.  To aid in limiting outside interference, the area surrounding the Green Bank observatory was at one time planted with pines characterized by needles of a certain length as to block electromagnetic interference at the wavelengths used by the observatory.  At one point, the observatory faced the problem of North American flying squirrels tagged with Fish & Wildlife Service telemetry transmitters.  Electric fences and other radio wave emitters have caused great trouble for the astronomers in Green Bank.(The National Radio Quiet Zone)Socorro, New Mexicoright|thumb|200px|VLA: a 27-dish interferometerThe NRAOs facility in Socorro is the Operations Center (AOC).  Located on the Mexico Tech campus, the AOC serves as the headquarters for the Large Array (VLA), which was the setting for the movie Contact, and the control center for the Long Baseline Array (VLBA).  VLBA telescopes are located in Hawaii, the States Virgin Islands, and several sites across the continental United States(Socorro, New Mexico NRAO Facilities)Tucson, ArizonaOffices are located on the of Arizona campus.  NRAO formerly operated the 12 Meter Telescope on Peak.  NRAO suspended operations at this telescope and funding was rerouted to the Large Millimeter Array (ALMA) instead.(Tucson, Arizon NRAO Facilities)  The Radio Observatory now operates the 12 Meter Telescope.(Arizona Radio Observatory)Santiago, ChileThe Large Millimeter Array (ALMA) site in Chile is at ~5000 m (~16,500 ft) altitude near Chajnantor in northern Chile.(ALMA) This is about 40 km (about 25 miles) east of the historic village of Pedro de Atacama, 130 km (about 80 miles) southeast of the mining town of Calama, and about 275 km (about 170 miles) east-northeast of the coastal port of Antofagasta.(ALMA Location)References(External links*NRAO National Radio Astronomy ObservatoryRadio Astronomy Observatory  Radio Astronomy ObservatoryRadio Astronomy Observatoryja:Radyo Gkbilim Gzlemevizh:
319301
Cradle
Cradle may refer to:Mechanical devices:*Bassinet, a small bed, often on rockers, in which babies and small children sleep* cradle, supports a ship that is dry docked* (grain), in agriculture is a device based upon a scythe to cleanly reap and harvest grain* (mining), used to separate gold from other rocks.* cradle, a device that demonstrates conservation of momentum and energy via a series of swinging spheresArts and literature:* (band), a band that Suzi Quatro played in, in the early 1970s before she became famous* Cradle (novel), a novel by Arthur C. Clarke and Gentry Lee.* (song), a single released by British girl group Atomic Kitten* The Cradle, a 2007 horror film starring Haas and Emily Hampshire* of filth, an Extreme metal band from Suffolk, England* (circus act), an aerial circus act* to Cradle: Remaking the Way We Make Things, a recycling and industrial management book As a metaphor for humanitys origins:* of Humankind, a World Heritage Site near Johannesburg in South Africa, where many early hominid remains were discovered* of civilization, any of the various regions regarded as the earliest centers of civilization* of Liberty (disambiguation)Other:* (circus act) (also known as aerial cradle or casting cradle), a type of aerial circus act* (wrestling), a very basic move in amateur wrestling* to Cradle, a biomimetic approach to the design of systems.de:Cradleja:
320247
Special_Forces_(United_States_Army)
anniversariesThe United States Army Special Forces, also known as the Green Berets because of their distinctive service headgear, are a special operations force. Army Special Forces are tasked with six primary missions: unconventional warfare, internal defense, reconnaissance, direct action, rescue, and counter-terrorism. The first two emphasize language, cultural, and training skills in working with foreign troops. Other duties include combat and rescue (CSAR), security assistance, peacekeeping, assistance, humanitarian demining, counter-proliferation, psychological operations, manhunts, and counter-drug operations; other components of the States Special Operations Command or other U.S. government activities may also specialize in these secondary areas.() Many of their operational techniques are classified, but some nonfiction works() and doctrinal manuals are available.()()()The original and most important mission of the Special Forces had been unconventional warfare, while other capabilities, such as direct action, were gradually added.Their official motto is oppresso liber (supposedly meaning ), a reference to one of their primary missions, training and advising foreign indigenous forces.()Currently, Special Forces units are deployed in Enduring Freedom. They are also deployed with other SOCOM elements as one of the primary American military forces in the ongoing War in Afghanistan. As a special operations unit, Special Forces are not necessarily under the command authority of the ground commanders in those countries. Instead, while in theater, SF soldiers may report directly to States Central Command, USSOCOM, or other command authorities.The Central Intelligence Agencys (CIA) highly secretive Activities Division (SAD) and more specifically its elite Special Operations Group (SOG) recruits soldiers from the Armys Special Forces.(Waller, Douglas (3 February 2003). The CIA Secret Army. TIME (Time Inc). http://www.time.com/time/magazine/article/0,9171,1004145-3,00.html) Joint Army Special Forces and CIA operations go back to the famed MACV-SOG during the War.(SOG: The Secret Wars of Americas Commandos in Vietnam by John L. Plaster) This cooperation still exists today and is seen in the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan.(Haney, Eric L. (2002). Inside Delta Force. New York: Delacorte Press)(Efran, Shawn (producer), Army Officer Recalls Hunt For Bin Laden, 60 Minutes, CBS News, 5 October 2008.)History and traditionsthumb|1st Special Forces Regiment distinctive unit insignia, bearing the motto de oppresso liberInsigniaOn a wreath of the colors (Argent and Sable), two arrows saltire-wise Argent - that is, two silver arrows crossed with a dagger, also silver, above them, surrounded by a black ribbon.The crest is the crossed arrow collar (branch) insignia of the Special Service Force (a joint World War II American-Canadian commando unit organized in 1942), but was changed from gold to silver to create visual harmony with the shield, as well as to make a difference from the collar insignia.DescriptionA silver color metal and enamel device 1 1/8 inches (2.86 cm), in height consisting of a pair of silver arrows in saltire, points up and surmounted at their junction by a silver dagger with black handle point up; all over and between a black motto scroll arcing to base and inscribed DE OPPRESSO LIBER in silver letters.SymbolismThe crest is the crossed arrow collar insignia (branch insignia) of the First Special Force, World War II. The motto supposedly translates from Latin to Free From Oppression. However, the actual words mean free from oppressed and are therefore probably grammatically inaccurate, see oppresso liber.BackgroundThe distinctive unit insignia was approved on 8 July 1960. The insignia of the 1st Special Forces was authorized to be worn by personnel of the U.S. Army Special Forces Command (Airborne) and its subordinate units on 7 March 1991.HistorySome of the of Strategic Services have much more similarity in terms of mission with the original U.S. Army Special Forces function, warfare (UW), acting as cadre to train and lead guerrillas in occupied countries. The Special Forces motto, oppresso liber (Latin: to free the oppressed) reflects this historical mission of warfare against an occupying power. Specifically, the three-man Jedburgh teams provided leadership to Resistance units. The larger of Strategic Services OSS Operational Groups (OG) were more associated with SR/DA missions, although they did work with resistance units. Colonel Bank, considered the founding commander of the first Special Forces Group created, served in OSS during World War II.While American guerrilla operations in the Japanese-occupied Philippines are not part of the direct lineage of Army Special Forces, some of the early Special Forces leadership were involved in advising and creating the modern organization. They included Russell Volckmann, who commanded guerrillas in Luzon and in Korea,()Blackburn, who also served with the Northern Luzon force, and Colonel Fertig, who developed a division-sized force on Mindanao.During the Korean War, Nations Partisan Forces Korea operated on islands and behind enemy lines. These forces were also known as the 8086th Army Unit, and later as the East Command Liaison Detachment, Korea, FECLD-K 8240th AU. These troops directed North Korean partisans in raids, harassment of supply lines, and the rescue of downed pilots. Since the initial Special Forces unit, the 10th Special Forces Group (Airborne) was activated on 19 June 1952, and the Korean War broke out on 25 June 1950, U.S. Army Special Forces did not operate as a unit in that war. Experience gained in the Korean War, however, influenced the development of U.S. Army Special Forces doctrine. U.S. Army Special Forces (SF) are, along with psychological operations detachments and Rangers, the oldest of the post-World War II Army units in the current States Special Operations Command (USSOCOM). Their distinctive uniform item is the green beret. Their main mission was to train and lead unconventional warfare (UW) forces, or a guerrilla force in an occupied nation that no one is allowed to know. U.S. Army Special Forces is the only U.S. Special Operations Force (SOF) trained to employ UW. The 10th Special Forces Group was the first deployed SF unit, intended to operate UW forces behind enemy lines in the event of a Pact invasion of Western Europe. As the United States became involved in Southeast Asia, it was realized that specialists trained to lead guerrillas could also help defend against hostile guerrillas, so SF acquired the additional mission of Internal Defense (FID), working with Host Nation (HN) forces in a spectrum of counter-guerrilla activities from indirect support to combat command.Special Forces personnel qualify both in advanced military skills and the regional languages and cultures of defined parts of the world. While they have a Direct Action (DA) capability, other units, such as Rangers, are more focused on overt direct action raids conducted in uniform but potentially behind enemy lines. SF personnel have the training to carry out covert DA, and other missions, including clandestine SR. Other missions include peace operations, counter-proliferation, counter-drug advisory roles, and other strategic missions. As strategic resources, they report either to USSOCOM or to a regional Combatant Commands.File:Alamo Scouts Logo.jpg|90px|thumb|The U.S. 6th Army Special Reconnaissance Unit aka the Scouts included in lineage of the U.S. Special ForcesTheir lineage dates back to include more than 200 years of unconventional warfare history, with notable predecessors including the War Swamp Fox Marion, the WWII OSS Jedburgh Teams, Detachment 101 in Burma, and the Scouts. Since their establishment in 1952, Special Forces soldiers have distinguished themselves in Vietnam (17 Medals of Honor), El Salvador, Panama, Haiti, Somalia, Bosnia, Kosovo, Afghanistan, Iraq, the Philippines, and, in an FID role, Enduring Freedom - Horn of Africa, which was transferred to Africa Command in 2008.SF team members work closely together and rely on one another under isolated circumstances for long periods of time, both during extended deployments and in garrison. Because of this, they develop clannish relationships and long-standing personal ties. SF officers (NCO) often spend their entire careers in Special Forces, rotating among assignments to detachments, higher staff billets, liaison positions, and instructor duties at the U.S. Army F. Kennedy Special Warfare Center and School (USAJFKSWCS). Special Forces officers, on the other hand, historically spend a limited amount of time early in their careers assigned to SF detachments. They are then required to move to staff positions or to higher command echelons. With the creation of USSOCOM, SF commanders have risen to the highest ranks of U.S. Army command, including command of USSOCOM, the of Staff of the United States Army, and of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.Creation of Army Special ForcesSpecial Forces were formed in 1952, initially under the U.S. Army Psychological Warfare Division headed by then Brigadier General A. McClure.() For details of the early justification for Special Forces, see HUMINT and Covert Action.Special Operations Command was formed by the U.S. Army Psychological Warfare Center which was activated in May 1952. The initial Special Forces Group was formed in June 1952, and was commanded by Colonel Aaron Bank. Its formation coincided with the establishment of the Psychological Warfare School, which is now known as the F. Kennedy Special Warfare Center and School.() Bank served with various of Strategic Services (OSS) units, including Jedburgh teams advising and leading Resistance units before the Battle of Normandy, or the D-Day invasion of 6 June 1944. Bank is known as the father of the Special Forces.The 10th SFG deployed to Tlz, Germany the following September, the remaining cadre at Bragg, North Carolina formed the 77th Special Forces Group, which in May 1960 became 7th Special Forces Group.()The Green BeretThe origins of the Green Beret which Special Forces personnel wear can be traced to Scotland during the Second World War. Army Rangers and of Strategic Services (OSS) operatives who underwent training from the Commandos were awarded the Green Beret upon completion of the grueling and revolutionary commando course. However, this green beret was not authorized by the U.S. Army among the Rangers and OSS operatives who earned them. Raff, one of the first Special Forces officers, is credited with the re-birth of the green beret.() In 1961, President F. Kennedy authorized them for use exclusively by the U.S. Special Forces. Preparing for an 12 October visit to the Special Warfare Center at Fort Bragg, North Carolina, the President sent word to the Centers commander, Brigadier General P. Yarborough, for all Special Forces soldiers to wear green berets as part of the event. The President felt that since they had a special mission, Special Forces should have something to set them apart from the rest. In 1962, he called the green beret a symbol of excellence, a badge of courage, a mark of distinction in the fight for freedom.It was President Kennedy who was responsible for the rebuilding of the Special Forces and giving us back our Green Beret, said Forrest Lindley, a writer for the newspaper Stars and Stripes who served with Special Forces in Vietnam. People were sneaking around wearing it when conventional forces werent in the area and it was sort of a cat and mouse game, he recalled. When Kennedy authorized the Green Beret as a mark of distinction, everybody had to scramble around to find berets that were really green. We were bringing them down from Canada. Some were handmade, with the dye coming out in the rain.Special Forces have a special bond with Kennedy, going back to his funeral. At the commemoration of the 25th anniversary of JFKs death, Gen. Michael D. Healy, the last commander of Special Forces in Vietnam, spoke at Arlington Cemetery. Later, a wreath in the form of the Green Beret would be placed on the grave, continuing a tradition that began the day of his funeral when a sergeant in charge of a detail of Special Forces men guarding the grave placed his beret on the coffin.()The wearers of the Green Beret caught the publics imagination and were the subject of a best selling, if semi-fictional, book The Green Berets by Moore,() a hit record, of the Green Berets performed and jointly (with Moore) written by Sadler, who was himself a Green Beret, The Green Berets produced, directed and starring, Wayne, and a strip and comic book, Tales of the Green Beret, written by Moore with artwork by Kubert. See States Army Special Forces in popular culture.First deployment in Cold War-era Europe10th Special Forces Group was responsible, among other missions, to operate a stay-behind guerrilla operation after a presumed Soviet overrunning of Western Europe, in conjunction with the program that later became controversially known as Gladio. Through the Act, it acquired a large number of Eastern European immigrants who brought much area and language skills. As well as preparing for the Pact invasion that never came, Vietnam and other areas of South Vietnam, El Salvador, Colombia, Panama and Afghanistan are the major modern conflicts that have defined the Special Forces.Southeast Asia (Indochina Wars)The Vietnam era saw the testing and shaping of Special Forces policy and action for the United States. The mission of the Special Forces changed rapidly in the first years from a force which had initially been used like its WWII predecessors as an internal strike force into a training force which helped develop unconventional warfare and counterinsurgency tactics. The period between 19611965 were especially formative.(The first U.S. Special Forces operations in Vietnam were in 1957, when soldiers from the 1st Special Forces Group trained fifty eight Vietnamese Army soldiers at the Training Center in Nha Trang. Special Forces units deployed to Laos as Mobile Training Teams (MTTs) in 1961, White Star (later named 404), and they were among the first U.S. troops committed to the War.() Beginning in the early 1950s, Special Forces teams deployed from the United States and Okinawa to serve as advisers for the fledgling Vietnamese Army. As the United States escalated its involvement in the war, the missions of the Special Forces expanded as well. Since Special Forces were trained to lead guerrillas, it seemed logical that they would have a deep understanding of counter-guerrilla actions, which became the Internal Defense (FID) mission. The 5th Special Forces Group mixed the UW and FID missions, often leading Vietnamese units such as Montagnards and lowland Irregular Defense Groups.()The deep raid on Son Tay, attempting to recover U.S. prisoners of war, had a ground element completely made up of Special Forces soldiers.()File:Bruce Rusty Lang March 1970.jpg|thumb|B. R. Lang, wearing 6th SFG flash, 1970. (TDY Laos 404; 1971 and Observations Group).The main SF unit in South Vietnam was the Special Forces Group (Airborne). SF soldiers assigned to the 5th Group earned seventeen Medals of Honor in Vietnam, making it the most prominently decorated unit for its size in that conflict. Army Special Forces personnel also played predominant roles in the highly secret, multi-service Assistance Command Vietnam and Observation Group (MACV-SOG), with an extraordinarily large number of covert U.S. military personnel lost MIA while operating on and Observations Group (SOG) reconnaissance missions. During the prolonged conflict the Army Special Forces trained regular and paramilitary units of several Allied nations as well as US reconnaissance members; supervised the indigenous Civilian Irregular Defense Group stationed throughout Vietnam in fortified camps and as backup reserves; monitored the border region and infiltration routes; conducted strategic intelligence missions and fielded numerous elements engaged in special operational tasks.(Stanton, Shelby, Green Berets at War: U.S. Army Special Forces in Southeast Asia 1956-1975, Presidio Press, 1985 ISBN 978-0804118842 and Stanton, Shelby, Special Forces at War: An Illustrated History, Southeast Asia 1957-1975, Zenith Press, 2008 ISBN 978-0760334492)The Beret Affair: U. S. Special Forces received a severe black eye when in July 1969 Colonel Robert Rheault, Commander of 5th Special Forces Group (Airborne), six subordinate Green Beret officers, including his headquarters staff intelligence officer, and a sergeant first class (SFC) were arrested for the murder((Jeff Stein, Murder in Wartime: The Untold Spy Story that Changed the Course of the Vietnam War. (New York: St. Martins Press, 1992) 6062) of Thai Khac Chuyen, a suspected North Vietnamese double agent. It was suspected that Chuyen was providing the North Vietnamese Army information about GAMMA and the indigenous agents used by the 5th Special Forces Group. An attempted cover-up was uncovered when the SFC became concerned that he might be a fall guy and contacted the local Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) office chief. In September 1969 Secretary of the Army Stanley Resor announced that all charges would be dropped since the CIA, in the interests of national security, had refused to make its personnel available as witnesses; implying some sort of involvement.(Seals, Bob (2007) The Green Beret Affair: A Brief Introduction, http://www.militaryhistoryonline.com/20thCentury/articles/greenberets.aspx)El SalvadorIn the 1980s, U.S. Army Special Forces trainers were deployed to Salvador. Their mission was to train the Salvadoran Military, who at the time were fighting a civil war against the left-wing guerrillas of the Marti National Liberation Front (FMLN). In 1992, the FMLN reached a ceasefire agreement with the government of El Salvador. Following the success of SF in El Salvador, the 3rd Special Forces Group was reactivated in 1990.ColombiaIn the late 1980s, major narcotics trafficking and terrorist problems within the region covered by the Southern Command (USSOUTHCOM) worsened. USSOUTHCOM was (and remains) responsible for all of South America, Central America, and the Caribbean (CARIBCOM). The 7th Special Forces Group deployed detachments, trainers and advisers in conjunction with teams from the 1st Psychological Operations Battalion to assist Host Nation (HN) forces. During the late 1990s, 7 SFG(A) also deployed to Colombia and trained three Counter Narcotics Battalions and assisted in the establishment of a Brigade Headquarters. These were the first units of their kind in Colombia and each is known as Batalln Contra Narcotraficantes or BACNA. These elements continue to be very successful against the narcotics industry which thrives in Colombia.() U.S. Army Special Forces detachments still rotate among various locations within Colombia, training HN units in counter-guerrilla and counter-narcotics roles, and SF detachments routinely deploy to other countries within the USSOUTHCOM area of responsibility.Invasion of PanamaIn late 1988, tensions between the United States and Panama were extremely high with the Panamanian leader, Noriega, calling for the dissolution of the agreement that allowed the United States to have bases in his country. In December 1989 President H. W. Bush activated the planning section for Operation Just Cause/Promote Liberty. Just Cause was the portion of the mission to depose Noreiga and return Panama to democracy.() Originally scheduled to begin at 0200 hrs. on 20 December, it actually kicked off at 2315 hrs when part of a Special Forces detachment that was waiting for the signal to begin was discovered above a gate above a Panamanian checkpoint. Just Cause was the first mission to have a very large contingent of Special Operations Forces on the ground. The units that were involved with the mission were as follows: Joint Task Force Delta (Delta Force), Joint Task Force South (7th SFG, 5th SFG, 3rd SFG, 4th PSYOP Group, the reinforced 1st Brigade of the Airborne Division, and all three battalions of the 75th Rangers, and numerous other units from other forces such as the Navy SEALs, Marine Force Recon, and Air Force Combat Control Teams. The invasion was successful at deposing Noriega but led to widespread looting and lawlessness in the following weeks.(Panama Companies Sue U.S. for Damages. New York Times. 21 July 1990.)AfghanistanFile:Spops2004afghanm60.jpg|thumb|A 19th Special Forces Group soldier mans an machine gun on a HMMWV in Afghanistan, in March 2004. An AT4 anti-tank rocket can be seen in the foreground.Special Forces units were the first military units (a Special Forces MSG wearing the Green Beret ring was the first person in country to seek out the Northern Alliance) that went into Afghanistan under Major General Geoffrey C Lambert after the September 2001 attacks, although CIA paramilitary officers from the famed Activities Division (SAD) were the first U.S. forces in the country to prepare for their arrival.(Woodward, Bob (2002) Bush at War, Simon & Schuster, Inc.)(At the Center of the Storm: My Life at the CIA, George Tenet, Harper Collins, 2007) A number of Special Forces operational detachments worked with Afghan Alliance troops, acting as a force multiplier, especially by using new techniques for precise direction of heavy air support. Since the initial invasion, the 3rd and 7th SFGs have been charged with conducting operations in Afghanistan. SF has been conducting its bread-and-butter, Unconventional Warfare, fighting the enemy in its own or influenced territory. During the daytime, SF will often be meeting with local village elders and working with the people to win over the hearts and minds as well as trying to identify possible Taliban spies in the villages. SF has worked closely with Affairs and Operations to provide villages with food, water, medicine, medical treatment and clinics, and even education programs to the people. As well as humanitarian assistance such as building roads, schools, and wells. This also requires SF to have to constantly patrol the areas to defend the villages from Taliban attacks. At night, SF will often be hunting down the Taliban and other insurgencies in the area, conducting raids on camps, training centers, drug-smuggling operations, and other Taliban safe-havens. As well as ambushing weapons, supplies, and drug convoys and clearing hidden paths in the mountains that border Pakistan and Afghanistan, including mining operations on paths that the Taliban use, conducting reconnaissance, and capturing or killing high-ranking terrorist leaders. SF will almost always work with Afghan forces, who they have often trained. This shows the people that it is their own Afghans stopping the Taliban, not the Americans. SF soldiers will also make small changes to their appearance, such as growing beards, growing their hair longer, and wearing traditional Afghan scarfs or belts to show that they are not trying to force any American culture on them but rather that they respect their culture and traditions.Iraq Just as in Afghanistan, SF were the first military units in Iraq after the initial entry of JSOC (Joint Special Operations Command) and the CIA.(Plan of Attack, Bob Woodward, Simon and Shuster, 2004.)(Operation Hotel California: The Clandestine War inside Iraq, Mike Tucker, Charles Faddis, 2008, The Lyons Press) 10th SFG was heavily deployed to Northern Iraq, where they, along with CIA/SAD officers(All Necessary Means: Employing CIA operatives in a Warfighting Role Alongside Special Operations Forces, Colonel Kathryn Stone, Professor Anthony R. Williams (Project Advisor), United States Army War College (USAWC), 7 April 2003) contacted, organized, and trained Kurdish, anti-Saddam Forces. During the initial invasion, 10th SFG and CIA/SAD officers led one of the most successful campaigns in Iraq, the Group along with its Kurdish allies defeated six Iraqi Army Divisions with limited air support and no SF soldiers were killed. The joint Kurdish-Special Forces units killed over one-thousand Iraqi Army soldiers and captured hundreds more.(( Likewise, 5th SFG (1st BN) was deployed in Western Iraq. One battalion infiltrated the country weeks before the initial invasion in order to conduct DA strikes to destroy Saddams SCUD missile capability. 5th SFG also organized anti-Saddam forces and, like 10th SFG, led an extremely successful operation which inflicted serious casualties to the Iraqi Army in Baghdad right after conventional forces had seized it. With major combat operations over, SF were charged with building a new Iraqi Army, eliminating Party members, and, most importantly, finding Saddam and his sons.OrganizationU.S. Army Special Forces is divided into five duty (AD) and two National Guard (ARNG) Special Forces groups. Each Special Forces Group (SFG) has a specific regional focus. The Special Forces soldiers assigned to these groups receive intensive language and cultural training for countries within their regional area of responsibility (AOR).() Due to the increased need for Special Forces soldiers in the on Terror, all Groupsincluding those of the National Guard (19th and 20th SFGs)have been deployed outside of their areas of operation (AOs), particularly to Iraq and Afghanistan. A recently released report showed Special Forces as perhaps the most deployed SOF under SOCOM, with many soldiers, regardless of Group, serving up to 75% of their careers overseas, almost all of which had been to Iraq and Afghanistan.Basic Element  SF Operational Detachment-A (ODA) compositionA Special Forces company consists of usually six ODAs (Operational Detachments-A) or A-Teams.(USASOC. Special Forces  Shooters and thinkers. WWW.ARMY.MIL The official homepage of the United States army (26 Oct 2009). Retrieved on 5 January 2010)(Special Forces Operational Detachment Alpha (SFOD A)) The number of ODAs can vary from company to company, with each ODA specializing in an infiltration skill or a particular mission-set (e.g. Military Freefall (HALO), combat diving, Air Assault, mountain warfare, maritime operations, or urban operations).An ODA consists of 12 men, each of whom has a specific function (MOS or Occupational Specialty) on the team, however all members of an ODA conduct cross-training. The ODA is led by an 18A (Detachment Commander), usually a Captain, and a 180A (Assistant Detachment Commander) who is his second in command, usually a Warrant Officer One or Chief Warrant Officer Two. The team also includes the following enlisted men: one 18Z team sergeant (Operations Sergeant), usually a Master Sergeant, one 18F (Assistant Operations and Intelligence Sergeant), usually a First Class, and two each, 18Bs (Weapons Sergeant), 18Cs (Engineer Sergeant), 18Ds (Medical Sergeant), and 18Es (Communications Sergeant), usually Sergeants First Class, Staff Sergeants or Sergeants. This organization facilitates 6-man split team operations, redundancy, and mentoring between a senior specialist NCO and his junior assistant.Company HQ Element  SF Operational Detachment-B (ODB) compositionThe ODB, or B-Team, is the headquarters element of a Special Forces company, and it is usually composed of 1113 soldiers. While the A-team typically conducts direct operations, the purpose of the B-Team is to support the companys A-Teams both in garrison and in the field. When deployed, in line with their support role, B-Teams are usually found in more secure rear areas. However, under some circumstances a B-Team will deploy into a hostile area, usually to coordinate the activities of multiple A-Teams.The ODB is led by an 18A, usually a Major, who is the Commander (CO). The CO is assisted by his Company Officer (XO), another 18A, usually a Captain. The XO is himself assisted by a Company Technician, a 180A, generally a Chief Warrant Officer Three, who assists in the direction of the organization, training, intelligence, counter-intelligence, and operations for the company and its detachments. The Company Commander is assisted by the Company Sergeant Major, an 18Z, usually a Sergeant Major. A second 18Z acts as the Operations Sergeant, usually a Master Sergeant, who assists the XO and Technician in their operational duties. He has an 18F Assistant Operations Sergeant, who is usually a Sergeant First Class. The companys support comes from an 18D Medical Sergeant, usually a Sergeant First Class, and two 18E Communications Sergeants, usually a Sergeant First Class and a Staff Sergeant.Note the distinct lack of a weapons or engineer NCO. This is because the B-Team generally does not engage in direct operations, but rather operates in support of the A-Teams.The following jobs are outside of the Special Forces 18-series Career Management Field (CMF), but hold positions on a Special Forces B-Team. Soldiers in these positions are not Special Forces qualified, as they have not completed the Forces Assessment and Selection Course (SFAS) or the Forces Qualification Course (SFQC or Q Course):* The Supply NCO, usually a Staff Sergeant, the commanders principal logistical planner, works with the battalion S-4 to supply the company.* The Nuclear, Biological, Chemical (NBC) NCO, usually a Sergeant, maintains and operates the companys NBC detection and decontamination equipment, and assists in administering NBC defensive measures.()Battalion HQ Element  SF Operational Detachment-C (ODC) compositionThe ODC, or C-Team, is the headquarters element of a Special Forces Battalion. As such, it is a command and control unit with operations, training, signals and logistic support responsibilities to its three subordinate line companies. A Lieutenant Colonel (O-5) commands the battalion and the C-Team and the battalion Command Sergeant Major (E-9) is the senior NCO of the battalion and the C-Team. There are an additional 2030 SF personnel who fill key positions in Operations, Logistics, Intelligence, Communications and Medical. A Special Forces battalion usually consists of four companies: A, B, C, and Headquarters/Support.SF Group strengthUntil recently an SF Group has consisted of three Battalions, but since the Department of Defense has authorized U.S. Army Special Forces Command to increase its authorized strength by one third, a fourth Battalion will be activated in each active component Group by 2012.A Special Forces Group is historically assigned to a Combatant Command or a theater of operations. The C-detachment (ODC) is responsible for a theater or a major subcomponent, and can raise brigade or larger guerrilla forces. Subordinate to it are the B-detachments (ODB), which can raise battalion and larger forces. Further subordinate, the ODAs typically raise company-sized units when on UW missions. They can form 6-man split A detachments that are often used for Strategic Reconnaissance (SR). Groups Selection and trainingThe United States Army Special Forces soldier trains on a regular basis over the course of their entire career. The initial formal training program for entry into Special Forces is divided into four phases collectively known as the Special Forces Qualification Course or, informally, the Q Course. The length of the Q Course changes depending on the applicants primary job field within Special Forces and their assigned foreign language capability but will usually last between 55 to 95 weeks. After successfully completing the Special Forces Qualification Course, Special Forces soldiers are then eligible for many advanced skills courses. These include, but are not limited to, the Military Free Fall Parachutist Course (MFF), the Combat Diver Qualification Course and the Special Forces Sniper Course (SFSC).Special Forces MOS descriptions*18A   Special Forces Officer(Special Forces Officer | GoArmy.com)*180A  Special Forces Warrant Officer(U.S. Army Recruiting Commands Warrant Officer Recruiting Information Site)*18B   Special Forces Weapons Sergeant(Special Forces Weapons Sergeant | GoArmy.com)*18C   Special Forces Engineer Sergeant(Special Forces Engineer Sergeant | GoArmy.com)*18D   Special Forces Medical Sergeant(Special Forces Medical Sergeant | GoArmy.com)*18E   Special Forces Communications Sergeant(Special Forces Communications Sergeant | GoArmy.com)*18F   Special Forces Assistant Operations and Intelligence Sergeant*18X   Special Forces Candidate (Active Duty Enlistment Option)(Special Forces Candidate | GoArmy.com)*18Z   Special Forces Operations SergeantNote: Individuals desiring a career in Special Forces who have no prior military service or who have separated from military service may enlist directly into the 18X MOS, and upon successful completion of upwards of six months of initial training be given the chance to be selected at the Special Forces Assessment and Selection Course (SFAS).It should be noted that other personnel in MOS designations outside of 18 series often support SF teams directly.Vietnam era officers Special Forces MOS incorporated the branch (infantry, artillery etc.) MOS with a 3 prefix indicating Special Forces qualified. Hence, an infantry officer MOS, 1542, would become 31542. See the following Army Regulation.AR 611-103(1967)Five-character military occupational specialties a. A prefix digit or letter added to abasic MOS creates an additional five-characterMOS which carries the appropriate prefix titleindicated in AR 611-101. The basic four-digitMOS with its proper title is retained as originallyawarded. The provisions for the award,designation as primary, withdrawal, and reportingof MOS apply equally to both four andfive-character MOS. Six-character MOS arenot authorized; i.e., two prefix characters willnot be added to a basic MOS to form asix-character MOS.b. Example;1542 Infantry Unit commanderbecomes 31542 Special Forces.DA Form 66, will reflect both thebasic MOS code and, when appropriate five-character code. The four-digitmust be awarded, prior to or simultaneous withthe five-digit MOS code.c. The following special provisions pertainto prefix digit 3, Special Forces, willbe awarded to officer personnel whosuccessfully complete the SpecialForces Officer Course, 33-G-F3, orwho have acquired knowledge of thecharacteristics, capabilities, and limitationsof Special Forces organizationsthrough practical experienceand are considered qualified by theCommanding General USAJFKCENSPWARor the Special Forces GroupCommander to perform the duties ofSpecial Forces Officer.Cultural referencesSee also*Special Forces Operational Detachment-Delta (Delta Force)*Intelligence Agencys Activities Division*Task Force 2*of special forces units*Assistance Command, Vietnam - Studies and Observations Group*U.S. Navy SEALs*Air Service*Forces Association*Special Warfare Memorial Statue*U.S. Army Rangers*States Army Special Forces in popular cultureReferencesExternal links* Special Forces Command website* Special Forces Recruiting at Fort Bragg official website* United States Army John F. Kennedy Special Warfare Center and School* Official website of the Special Forces Association* United States Special Operations Command* United States Army Special Forces Overview Ordusunun Xsusi tyinatl qvvlriStates Army Special ForcesStates Army Special Forces Command (Airborne)Especiales del Ejrcito de los Estados UnidosForces jedinice Amerike vojskeStates Army Special Forcesja:Army Special ForcesArmy Special ForcesVerdes   sile Kopenske vojske ZDABeretsArmy Special Forcesth:Ordusu zel Harekt Birlikleri   zh:
322876
Hispania_Tarraconensis
File:Tarraconensis.png|thumb|300px|The Iberian Peninsula in approx. 300 AD, showing in green the province of Hispania Tarraconensis (north/central/east Spain). 1 legion deployed in 125.Hispania Tarraconensis was one of three provinces in Hispania. It encompassed much of the Mediterranean coast of Spain along with the central plateau. Southern Spain, the region now called Andalusia, was the province of Baetica. On the Atlantic west lay the province of Lusitania, partially coincident with modern day Portugal.HistoryThe Imperial Roman province called Tarraconensis, supplanted Citerior, which had been ruled by a consul under the late Republic, in Augustuss reorganization of 27 BC. Its capital was at Tarraco (modern Tarragona, Catalonia). The Wars (29&ndash;19 BC) brought all of Iberia under Roman domination, within the Tarraconensis. The Cantabri in the northwest corner of Iberia (Cantabria) were the last people to be pacified. Tarraconensis was an province and separate from the two other Iberian provinces &mdash; Lusitania (corresponding to modern Portugal plus Spanish Extremadura) and the province Baetica, corresponding to the southern part of Spain, or Andalusia. Servius Sulpicius Galba, who served as Emperor briefly in 68&ndash;69, governed the province since 61. the Elder served as procurator in  Tarraconensis (73). Under Diocletian, in 293, Hispania Tarraconensis was divided in three smaller provinces: Gallaecia, Carthaginensis and Tarraconensis. The province of Hispania Tarraconensis lasted until the invasions of the 5th century, beginning in 409, which encouraged the Basques and Cantabri to revolt, and ended with the establishment of a Visigothic kingdom.The invasion resulted in widespread exploitation of metals, especially gold, tin and silver. The alluvial mines at Medulas show that engineers worked the deposits on a very large scale using several aqueducts up to  long to tap water in the surrounding mountains. By running fast water streams on the soft rocks, they were able to extract large quantities of gold by mining methods. When the gold had been exhausted, they followed the auriferous seams underground by tunnels using fire-setting to break up the much harder gold-bearing rocks. the Elder gives a good account of the methods used in Spain, presumably based on his own observations.PeopleThe Phoenicians and Carthaginians colonized the Mediterranean coast in the 8th to 6th centuries BC. The Romans arrived in the 2nd century BC. The Greeks also had established colonies along the coast.ReligionThe most popular deity in Roman Spain was Isis, followed by Mater, the great mother. The Carthaginian-Phoenician deities Melqart (both a solar deity and a sea-god) and Tanit-Caelestis (a mother-queen with possible lunar connections) were also popular. The Roman pantheon quickly absorbed native deities through identification (Melqart became Hercules, for example, having long been taken by the Greeks as a variant of their Heracles). Baal Hammon was the chief god at Carthage and was also important in Hispania. The Egyptian gods Bes and Osiris had a following as well.ExportsExports from Tarraconensis included timber, cinnabar, gold, iron, tin, lead, pottery, marble, wine and oil.See also*the Elder*peoples of the Iberian Peninsula*MedulasExternal links*World of the Imperium Romanum: Hispania*Detailed Map of Pre-Roman Peoples in Iberia (around 200 BC)*Historical Outline of the Roman conquest of Hispania and the Province of Tarraconensis*Spanish site dedicated to Roman technology, especially aqueducts and minesTarraconensisca:TarraconenseTarraconensisTarraconensisTarraconensisde:Tarraconensises:TarraconenseTarraconensisTarraconensisfr:TarraconaiseTarraconensisTarraconensisit:TarraconenseTarraconensisTarraconensisja:TarraconensisTarraconensispt:TarraconenseTarraconensis ( )TarraconensisTarraconensisth:Tarraconensis ( )zh:
323753
New_England_(New_South_Wales)
New EnglandFile:New England.jpg|thumb|250px|Approximate boundaries of the New England North West region within South WalesNew England or New England North West is the name given to a generally undefined region about 60 kilometres inland, that includes the Tablelands (or New England Tablelands) and the West Slopes regions in the north of the state of South Wales, Australia.(Shaw, John H., Collins Australian Encyclopedia, William Collins Pty Ltd., Sydney, 1984, ISBN 0 00 217315-8)HistoryThe region has been occupied by Australians for thousands of years, notably in the west by the Kamilaroi people. In the highlands, the original languages, which are now extinct, were Anaiwan (or Nganaywana) to the south of Guyra and Ngarrabal and Marabal to the north of Guyra.The first European to explore the New England area was English explorer Oxley, who crossed the southern part of the New England Range near the Falls before he discovered and named Port Macquarie in 1818. In 1827 Allan Cunningham travelled north along the western edge of the Range until he reached the Downs in Queensland. In 1831 Mitchell (explorer) reached Wallamoul Station near Tamworth and explored to the River then followed it to Narrabri. Moving on Mitchell found a deep, broad river which was the Gwydir. In 1832, Mitchell cut across the plains to the Gwydir River near Moree. The team then spent several weeks charting the tributaries between the Gwydir and the Barwon Rivers.(Lea, David A.M et al., An Atlas of New England Vol. 2  The Commentaries, Dept. of Geography, UNE, Armidale, 1977)  Hamilton Collins Sempill was the first settler in the New England area when he took up the Wolka run in 1832, establishing slab huts where Langford now stands close to Walcha. During the 1830s further squatters moved their sheep flocks onto the Northern Tablelands as they had been displaced by the Agricultural Company, which dominated resources in the Hunter Valley.( When the area was opened up for settlement in the 1830s, this led to the gazetting of nine pastoral districts. These districts had a small police force and a Commissioner of Crown Lands.(Gilbert, Lionel, New England Readings, Armidale College of Advanced Education, Armidale, 1977) Australian red cedar (ciliata) cutters moved into the headwaters of the River in the early 1830s to harvest the valuable trees. The ranges between Kempsey and Glen Innes yielded about  in 1950.(Chisholm, Alec H. (ed.), The Australian Encyclopaedia, Vol. 2  Cedar Industry, Halstead Press, Sydney, 1963)Work commenced in 1838 with the use of convicts to build a road, then known as Majors Line, across the Great Dividing Range to link the wool-growing settlement of Walcha with Port Macquarie. This road was later named the Highway. On 22 May 1839 the New England District was gazetted thus: New England District: Bounded on the east by a line north by compass from the top of Werrikimber Mountain which is at the head of the Hastings River; on the south by a line west by compass from the top of Werrikimber Mountain to the Great Dividing Range; on the west by the western extreme of the Great Dividing Range so as to include the Tableland and on the north the boundary is indefinite.(Starr, Joan and Mike Nicholas, Pioneering New England, Rigby, Adelaide, 1978) In 1840 there were 66 separate pastoral licences, in 1842 it rose to 98, 1845  116; and by 1848 there were 132. Only 10 new runs were registered between 1848 and 1855.( In 1843 the Downs district was separated from the New England.(This region ceased to be a statistical division after 1874, but the counties of Arrawatta, Clarke, Clive, Gough, Hardinge, Hawes, Sandon and Vernon approximated the regions limits. In 1847 these counties, with the exception of Hawes and Vernon formed part of the Unsettled District of the colony.( By 1850 all major communication routes had been forged, with little government assistance.During the 1860s the famous bushranger, Thunderbolt, robbed properties, mail coaches and hotels throughout the region. Thunderbolt was shot dead in May 1870 by Constable Walker at Kentucky Creek, near Uralla.(BUSHRANGER PROFILES: Thunderbolt Retrieved 2009-10-15) The population of the New England Region, including the slopes in 1957 was 143,788 and in 1971 there were 164,128 people, according to the census data.( In the 2006 census the New England region had a population of 180,000 which included the local government areas of Armidale Dumaresq, Inverell, Walcha, Glen Innes Severn, Gunnedah, Guyra, Gwydir, Liverpool Plains, Moree Plains, Narrabri, Tamworth Regional and Uralla.(Hughes, Tim, Walcha News newspaper, 15 April 2010, p.2,)MiningGold was discovered in 1851 at Rocky River, approximately two kilometres west of Uralla and started a rush to the area. Then gold was found at Hanging Rock and nearby Swamp Creek in 1852.(Gold and Grit, A History of Nundle Shire Council, 19061981, Ian Lobsey,) In the early 1850s some alluvial gold was found at Mulla Creek and Rywung (now Weabonga) on Swamp Oak Creek. In 1852 the first licenses to prospect were taken out.In the late 19th century several gold and antimony mines were established at places such as Halls Peak and Hillgrove, as well as two ambitious hydro-electric schemes to power them, the remains of which can be seen today along the Styx River and at Gara Gorge. The first gold mining was recorded at Tia in 1866 and in 1873 a reef was discovered at McLeods Creek, near Walcha. The discovery of the Torrington Tin Lode in was made 1881 but the small prospectors soon lost control to overseas mining companies. Tin and arsenic were mined from the 1880s at the Ottery Mine, near Emmaville. Copper was discovered at Gulf Creek, near Barraba, in 1889 and the first mine was established there in 1892. At its peak, in 1901, the copper mine was one of the largest in the state. Asbestos was first mined at Woodsreef, also near Barraba, from 1919 to the 1980s.( Mining had a major influence on the rise and fall of other towns and villages such as, Bingara, Bear Hill, Elsmore, Emmaville, Metz, Nundle, Stannifer, Tingha and Torrington.Railway serviceConstruction of the Northern Tablelands railway service commenced in the 1870s and the Main North railway line reached Werris Creek and west Tamworth in 1878, Armidale in 1883 and Queensland in 1888. The Main North railway line is now closed north of Armidale.The railway line from Werris Creek to Gunnedah opened in 1879, Narrabri in 1884 and Moree in 1897, Mungindi in 1914. The line is currently truncated to Weemelah between Moree and Mungindi.() The line between Werris Creek and Moree is also known as the North-West line.(A History of the Mungindi Branch Line Milne, R. Australian Railway Historical Society Bulletin, May 1995 pp115-136)  A branch line was opened from Moree to Inverell in 1901.()  This line was closed in 1994.  A branch line was opened between Camurra (11 km north of Moree) to North Star and Boggabilla in 1932 but it is now closed beyond North Star.() Another branch was opened from Narrabri to Junction in 1903.Natural disastersThe major weather events in the region were: * June 1950 when 1 person drowned in the flooded Barwon River, and 250,000 sheep were lost in the Moree area.* October 1950  2 drowned in the Namoi area.* February 1955  nearly every home in Narrabri was flooded.* February 1956  1 drowned in the flooded Peel River* January 1962  Walchas worst flood when 40 business houses and 39 residences were inundated.* February 1971  5 killed, $25 million damage to stock and crops in the flooded Namoi area.* January 1974  Namoi flood area: $4 million property damage, $45 m roads and bridges. 500,000 sheep lost, worth $23m. $15m crop losses. $3 million beef cattle loss.(* September 1996  A severe storm, with strong winds, heavy rain and hail, hit Armidale and caused widespread damage.(Funding to repair hail damaged Armidale showground Retrieved 2009-10-6)* November 2000  The worst floods in half a century devastated Gunnedah, Narrabri and Wee Waa.(Floods  New South Wales Retrieved 2009-10-6)* November 2008  Devastating damage occurred in the Tamworth, Somerton, Gunnedah and Weabonga areas after flash flooding.(Tamworth declared disaster zone after flash flooding Retrieved 2009-10-6)The New England and its boundariesNew England has no clearly defined boundaries, and the term has several possible definitions. These boundaries also vary according to the units responsible for services and include, county councils, local government areas, electorates and the Pastures Protection Boards (now the Livestock Health and Pest Authority) etc.( The New England region does not have a of Meteorology (Australia) forecast as such, but the whole of the Northern Tablelands and part of the North West Slopes and Plains forecasts cover this region.(New South Wales Forecast Areas Map Retrieved 2009-10-6) The narrowest and most common definition of New England consists of the Northern Tablelands highland area which forms part of the Dividing Range, from the Range in the south to the border of Queensland in the north.  This tableland region is about 320 kilometres long by approximately 130 km wide. It includes substantial areas more than 800 metres above sea-level, with a distinctive cold climate and distinctive vegetation. This highland region is often referred to as the New England Tableland, New England Plateau, or Northern Tablelands.  There are widespread high points over 1,000 m and the highest point at Round Mountain is almost 1,600 m above sea level. This definition of New England includes the towns and districts of Tenterfield, Glen Innes, Guyra, Inverell, Armidale and Walcha.((Delbridge, Arthur, The Macquarie Dictionary, 2nd ed., Macquarie Library, North Ryde, 1991) A broader definition of the New England Region covering 98,574 km, includes areas beyond the highlands which can also be considered to be the North West Slopes region and the Plains. This definition is frequently known as New England North West(New England North West Retrieved 2009-9-27) or less commonly the Northern Region(Dept. of local government Retrieved 200-11-3) or Northern Inland Region(Northern Inland Region Retrieved 2009-10-7) and includes the western valleys of the River and Namoi River and their tributaries, and the foothills and spur ranges which generally form the western side of the central Northern Tablelands. Towns and districts such as Moree, Narrabri, Gunnedah,  Tamworth, and Quirindi, are included in the New England region according to this basis. Smaller towns include, Manilla, Barraba, Bingara, Boggabri, Mungindi, Wee Waa and Werris Creek.( File:AELEC.JPG|thumb|right|200px|The Equine and Livestock Events Centre  The two traditional centres of New England are Armidale and Tamworth. Armidale has many beautiful parks in the city and is the northern gateway to the spectacular Wild Rivers National Park and some of the gorge country. Tamworth is now best known as the centre of Australias music industry and the home of the Equine and Livestock Events Centre (AELEC) and Regional Entertainment Centre (TREC). At its broadest definition, during the England New State Movement the New England Region included the northern coastal lowlands of New South Wales, known as the North Coast and Rivers region, and including cities such as Lismore and Grafton. Several proposals were made for a new Australian state of New England and this included the North Coast region in the boundaries. Apart from this usage, the Mid North Coast and Northern Rivers region are not considered to be part of New England.Police stations in New England Local Area Command (LAC) are: Armidale, Ashford, Bundarra, Deepwater, Delungra, Emmaville, Glen Innes, Guyra, Inverell, Tenterfield, Tingha, Uralla and Yetman. Bendemeer, Nowendoc, Walcha and Walcha Road are in the Oxley LAC.(Oxley LAC Retrieved on 17-3-2009)Geography and ecologyImage:New England Tableland.jpg|thumb|Rocky ridges like this are scattered across the New England landscapeThe topography of the region is dominated by the Northern Tablelands plateau.  The eastern side of the plateau is drained by the various headwaters and tributaries of the Clarence River, River and the River. The eastern rivers are short and swift, and in many places form deep gorges and waterfalls.  Notable waterfalls include the Falls at Walcha plus the Falls and Falls which are on Way east of Armidale. These gorges fragment the eastern side of the plateau, which in some areas such as England National Park and Point Lookout are quite close to the coast.  There are many National Parks along the rugged eastern fringes of the highlands including Rock National Park, which has the regions highest peak, and National Park.(NPWS, Discover the National Parks of the New England, McMahon Graphics, Glen Innes, NSW)The western side of the plateau is somewhat less rugged, and is drained towards the west by the tributaries of the Severn River, the Gwydir River and the River.  These rivers form part of the Murray-Darling Basin.  There are large dams at Dam on the Gwydir and at Dam, Dam and Rock Dam in the Namoi catchment, plus Dam on the Severn River.  The Range is a major western spur of the highlands, culminating in Kaputar near Narrabri.(The hilltops of the Great Dividing Range are basalt from north of Uralla to Glen Innes, and the eastern slopes are the lighter trap soils.  On the western slopes near Bendemeer, Bundarra, Kentucky and Tenterfield the country is granite, with extensive sandy loams.(Business in Regional NSW  > NSW Regions Northern inland (New England  North West) Retrieved 2009-9-25)The New England lies in the temperate zone, and the climate is generally free from extremes of heat and cold. The greatest heat is usually experienced in the north-west around Narrabri and Mungindi. Winter frosts are common on the Northern Tablelands and winter snow is not unusual in this area.( The Northern Tablelands receives most of its rain between late summer and early autumn with an annual average rainfall of about 800 mm, with the eastern escarpment having falls of around 2,000 mm average.(FloraWattles (Acacias), native apples (floribunda), black sallee (Eucalyptus stellulata), Blakelys red gum (Eucalyptus blakelyi), Hillgrove box (Eucalyptus retinens), New England blackbutt (Eucalyptus andrewsii), broadleaved New England stringybark (caliginosa), Manna gum (viminalis), New England blackbutt (Eucalyptus andrewsii), New England peppermint (nova-anglica), ribbon gum (Eucalyptus nobilis), silvertop stringybark (Eucalyptus laevopinea) wild cherry and yellow box (melliodora) and stringybark (caliginosa) trees are common across the Northern Tablelands.( The river oak (cunninghamiana) grows along many creeks and river beds on the eastern and western slopes.Bolivia Hill and the adjacent nature reserve are the only recorded locations of the endangered Bolivia Hill Boronia (Boronia boliviensis),() Bolivia Homoranthus (Homoranthus croftianthus),(Bolivia Homoranthus Retrieved on 18 January 2009) Bolivia Stringybark (Eucalyptus boliviana), the shrub Bolivia Hill Pimelea (Pimelea venosa)() and the vulnerable Bolivia wattle (Acacia pycnostchya).The rare Hillgrove spotted gum (michaeliana) can be found near Hillgrove and in parts of the Wild Rivers National Park.On the Western Slopes Caleys ironbark (Eucalyptus caleyi), McKies stringybark (Eucalyptus mckiena), red stringybark (Eucalyptus macrorhynca), river red gums (camaldulensis), rough-barked apple (Angophora), silver-leaved ironbark (Eucalyptus melanophloia nophloia), tumbledown gum (Eucalyptus dealbata), white box (Eucalyptus albens) and white cypress pine (columellaris) are commonly found.Some of the invasive weeds and plants found in the New England region include:* Blackberry (Rubus fruticosus), competes with desirable pastures and harbours pest animals.* Bracken competes with desirable pastures and causes toxicity to stock.* Lantana (Lantana camara), invades the bushland* Mother of millions (delagoensis) causes severe toxicity to stock* Nodding thistle (Carduus nutans)* Pattersons Curse (plantagineum) competes with desirable pastures and causes toxicity to stock.* Saffron thistle (lanatus)* Serrated Tussock (trichotoma),  competes with desirable pastures* Johns wort (Hypericum perforatum) competes with desirable pastures and causes toxicity to stock.(Northern Inland Weeds Retrieved 2009-11-11)FaunaCommon animals that may be encountered across the New England region include: kangaroos, echidnas, wallabies, possums and wombats. Common birds are: cockatoos, currawongs, magpies, crows, wild ducks, galahs, parrots, kookaburras,  ravens, rosellas and emus (on the western slopes). Snakes, lizards, Jacky Dragons (Amphibolurus muricatus) and goannas may also be encountered.Endangered species that may be seen include the Rock-wallaby (Petrogale penicillata) which may be spotted in isolated sections of Wild Rivers National Park. Bundarra is one of only three breeding areas in New South Wales for the endangered Honeyeater.() National Park is the home of the rare (native) River Mouse which was considered to be extinct until it was re-discovered in 1981. The River Snapping Turtle (Elseya belli) is a species of turtle found only in the upper reaches of the Namoi River, Gwydir River and Macdonald River.(Threatened Species of the New England Tablelands & NW Slopes of NSW, NSW National Parks & Wildlife Service, 2003, ISBN 0 7313 6673 5)Pest animals in the New England region include, foxes, rabbits, feral goats and feral pigs.EconomyThe New England region has a great diversity of mineral deposits ranging from large coal deposits in the Werris Creek to Boggabri area to metallics and gemstones on the tablelands. Antimony, coal, gold, sapphires and tin have been the most important economic commodities mined in the New England region.There are numerous other business activities across the region ranging from small enterprises to large multi-national corporations that are producing goods for domestic and international markets. Aviation training is provided by the Tamworth-based BAE Systems flight training college, the Australasian-Pacific Aeronautical College.(Business in Regional NSW  > NSW Regions Northern inland (New England  North West Retrieved 2009-10-10)  Cattle and sheep are the predominant types of livestock produced in the New England and they have been produced since their importation during the earliest days of European settlement. The Northern Tablelands produce some of Australias best fine wool and beef cattle. The western slopes are major areas for cotton and wheat. Other primary production activities include dairying, the production of grains, lamb, pork, fruit, potatoes, poultry, eggs, various mining activities, timber production, viticulture and aquaculture.Transport and communicationsmnl exmouth june05.jpg|thumb|right|Abandoned railway north of ArmidaleThe New England region is traversed by five major highways and a concentrated network of minor roads. On the tablelands the England Highway, which links Tamworth, Uralla, Armidale, Guyra, Glen Innes and Tenterfield is a major route linking New South Wales and Queensland. The Highway is a major route linking Victoria and Queensland through Narrabri and Moree. Way from Gloucester provides the shortest route from Sydney to the New England and continues through Walcha, Uralla and Bundarra to Inverell. The Oxley Highway, Highway, the scenic Way and Highway traverse the New England region from west to east. On Western Slopes the Highway runs in a north-western direction for 620 km, from Willow Tree passing through Quirindi, Gunnedah, Narrabri and Wee Waa until it reaches Bourke. Way is a tourist route that runs from Nundle to Warialda in the north and then east to Inverell and Glen Innes passing through some rich gem areas.(Fossickers Way Retrieved 2009-9-26)The major towns have air, coach and rail services that supplement the road network. The Main North railway line following the same route as the New England Highway to Queensland was the first railway link between the states, however the coastal railway is now used and the New England line is disused north of Armidale.EducationThe New England region has a comprehensive range of educational facilities available including 125 public schools.(NSW Public Schools Retrieved 2009-10-6) Armidale is the home of the University of New England, Australias oldest regional university and was the location of the former Armidale Teachers College. Other Armidale schools include, England Girls School (NEGS), Armidale School (TAS), High School, Duval High School, Catholic High School and Presbyterian Ladies College. Calala, Tamworth is the home of Memorial Agricultural High School, a public high school for boys. The Anglican School for Girls, High School, High School, High School and Public School are the other principal schools that are located in Tamworth. The New England Institute of TAFE has campuses in Tamworth, Armidale, Boggabilla, Glen Innes, Gunnedah, Inverell, Moree, Narrabri, Quirindi and Tenterfield.Health servicesOn 25 August 2000 the New England North West Westpac Rescue Helicopter Service (WRHS) commenced operation after four years of fundraising and planning. The New England North West WRHS operates 24 hours a day and 7 days a week with an annual average of 130 missions.(A decade of saving rural lives, Rural Guide magazine, December 2009)National parksThere is a wide range of 27 main national parks and over 30 nature reserves in the New England area of the NSW National Parks and Wildlife Service region, plus Kaputar National Park which is in the Central Region.(09 Guide to NSW National Parks, DECC, 2008) National parks including Heritage listed areas that form part of the Eastern Rainforest Reserves (CERRA), gorge country and wild rivers on the rugged eastern fringe of the region include:* Rock National Park which includes the highest peak in the region, Round Mountain* Fawkes River National Park* England National Park* Wild Rivers National Park* National Park* National ParkNew England Countryside: King George Avenue in TamworthNew State MovementNew England has been the home of Australias most persistent attempt to form a new state within the Australian commonwealth. Many New England people long resented being governed from Sydney, especially when, as is usually the case, there is a Labor government in New South Wales, dominated by urban interests. In the 1930s and again in the 1960s, the England New State Movement campaigned for New England to be separated from New South Wales. The movement was closely allied with the Country Party, which could have expected to form the government of such a new state.On 29 April 1967 a referendum in the region on the creation of a new state in northern NSW returned a no vote of 54%.(Farrell, John J., Opting Out and Opting In: secession and the new state movements, Armidale and District Historical Society Journal, No. 40, April 1997, pp. 139148. quoted in http://www.archivists.org.au/files/Conference_Papers/2006/Logan_ASAConference2006.pdf)Chapter VI of the Constitution allows new states to be formed, but only with the consent of the Parliament of the state in question. It has never been likely that the New South Wales Parliament would consent to the separation of New England.See also*of New England*district of Northern Tablelands*of regions in Australia*Tablelands, New South Wales*Land ActsReferencesExternal links*Look and See photographs*New England North West*New South Wales Forecast Areas MapEngland (Australien) ()(Australie)England (Australia)
324807
Amatol
:Not to be confused with the barbiturate Amytal.Amatol is a highly material made from a mixture of TNT and nitrate.() Its name originates from the words ammonium and toluene (a raw material of TNT). Amatol was used extensively during War I and War II, typically as an explosive in military weapons such as aircraft bombs, shells, charges and mines.It was eventually replaced with alternative explosives such as B, torpex and tritonal.Manufacture and useAmatol exploits the synergy between TNT and ammonium nitrate: TNT has a high velocity and good brisance, but is comparatively expensive and complex to manufacture and is also deficient in oxygen. This oxygen deficiency can be seen from the black smoke residue(http://www.youtube.com/watch?vvb3y6m-buco) from a pure TNT explosion. When compared to TNT, ammonium nitrate has a fairly low velocity and correspondingly low brisance, but is extremely cheap and easy to manufacture. More important, it contains a surplus of oxygen which TNT can use during detonation. Depending on the ratio of ingredients used, amatol leaves a residue of white or grey smoke after detonation. Amatol allowed existing supplies of TNT to be expanded considerably, with little reduction in the destructive power of the final product, so long as the amount of TNT in the mixture did not fall below 60%. These were highly attractive features during major wars, when there was an insatiable demand for high explosives.The amatol production process is very simple, another reason why it was so popular during major conflicts: TNT is gently heated until it melts, acquiring the physical characteristics of a syrup. Then the correct weight ratio of powdered ammonium nitrate is added and mixed in. Whilst this mixture is still in a molten state, it is poured into empty bomb casings and allowed to cool and solidify. However, the lowest grades of amatol could not be produced by casting molten TNT. Instead, flaked TNT was thoroughly mixed with powdered ammonium nitrate and then compressed or extruded.The colour of amatol ranges from off-white to slightly yellow or pinkish brown, depending on the mixture used, and remains soft for long periods of storage. It is also hygroscopic, which complicates long-term storage. To prevent moisture problems, amatol charges were coated with a thin layer of pure molten TNT or alternatively bitumen. Long-term storage issues were rarely a problem during major conflicts because munitions charged with amatol were generally used soon after manufacture.Amatol should not be stored in containers made from copper or brass, as it can form dangerous compounds. It is relatively stable, but may be detonated by severe impact. Primary explosives such as mercury fulminate were often used as a detonator, in combination with an booster charge such as tetryl.The explosive charges hidden in HMS Campbeltown during the Nazaire Raid of 1942 contained amatol. Additionally, the British X class submarines which planted explosive charges beneath the German battleship Tirpitz in September 1943 used two saddle charges containing a total weight of four tons of amatol. Warheads for the German flying bomb and rockets also contained amatol.A derivative of amatol is amatex, consisting of 51% ammonium nitrate, 40% TNT, and 9% RDX.AmmoniteAmatol is rarely encountered today, except in legacy munitions or ordnance. However, a form of amatol still exists under a different name  ammonite. Ammonite is a civilian explosive, generally comprising a 20/80 mixture of TNT and ammonium nitrate. Typically, it is used for quarrying or mining purposes. It is a popular civilian explosive in Europe and China. Because the proportion of TNT is significantly lower than in its military counterpart, ammonite has much less destructive power. However, given the particular purposes for which ammonite is used, this is not a problem. In general, a 30 kilogram charge of ammonite is roughly equivalent to 20 kilograms of TNT.Amatol, the townAmatol was the name given to a munitions factory and planned community built by the United States government in Mullica Township, New Jersey during the First World War. ()References(See also*Ammonal*Minol*Hexanite* cs:Amatolde:Amatoles:Amatolfr:Amatolit:Amatololv:Amatolsnl:Amatolja:pl:Amatolpt:Amatolru:sk:Amatolsl:Amatolfi:Amatolivi:Amatol
326732
Wheel_of_Time_locations
thumb|200px|A map of the Lands between the Mountains of Dhoom, the Aryth Ocean, the Sea of Storms and the Spine of the World.This article is about countries, cities, towns, and other important locations in Robert Jordans Wheel of Time fantasy fiction series.  With the publication in 1997 of World of Robert Jordans The Wheel of Time (often called The Guide), much of the information previously available only by gathering from the various maps and culling from the books became readily available, along with much additional, supporting detail.Robert Jordan is very clear that the world before the Breaking was much different geographically, and thus physical descriptions must first differentiate between the planets appearance in the Age of Legends or The World Since the Breaking (after insane male Sedai and the Dark Ones minions shattered the world, drastically altering it geographically).  At the time of the books (the Third Age: 3,000+ years since the Breaking), the planet consists of the following: two major oceans (with associated seas and small islands), a northern and southern ice cap, the Main Continent (also called the Eastern Continent), the Seanchan continent and a continent to the southeast (Land of Madmen).()Randland is a name adopted by fans to refer to the imaginary world of Wheel of Time fantasy book series by Jordan during the time period he calls the New Era, and is derived from the name of the central character alThor.  Like many other writers, Robert Jordan never officially names his world, so (in lieu of another name) Randland has come into accepted common usage---so that fans have something to call it, although clues scattered throughout the series often suggest the world is own respective planet earth, particularly in of the World with Cold War references to Soviet Russia and later in Shadow Rising a character finds metal Mercedes Benz logo.The WestlandsThe Westlands refers to the western portion of the main continent. The Westlands extend from the range known as The Spine of the World (sometimes the Dragonwall) in the east to the Aryth Ocean (which no inhabitant of the Westlands has crossed in centuries) in the west, and from the Great Blight in the north to the Sea of Storms in the south.Although no scale appeared on the maps in the books themselves, a scale did appear on the world map in the guidebook accompanying the series.() The scale on this map suggests that the distance from the edge of the continent on the west to The Spine of the World in the east is approximately 3,000 miles. This concurs broadly with the designers who worked on The Wheel of Time roleplaying game, who suggested a scale of 1  400 miles on the colour endpaper maps in the hardback editions of the books. By their calculations Randland therefore measures roughly 3,500 miles from the west coast to the Spine of the World.A reliable way of measuring the maps emerged in the prequel novel Spring, which gave the straight-line distance from Tar Valon to the sea south of Tear as 400 leagues (1,600 miles).Borderland CountriesThe Borderlands are the four northern kingdoms that border the Blight itself. For three thousand years the nations bordering the Blight have guarded the Westlands against Shadowspawn from the Blight. The culture of the Borderlands is the most martial of all of the Westlands, and many of the best soldiers hail from the Borderlands. Borderlanders often refer to the other countries of the Westlands as the Southlands and their inhabitants as Southlanders, and some show contempt for Southland culture, viewing Southlanders as feeble and ill-disciplined, with a weakness for pomp and ceremony, and prone to division and faction (e.g., playing the infamous Daes Daemar). Because of the Borderlands close proximity to the Great Blight and Ghul, Sedai are highly respected, even revered; a stark contrast with the cool reception they typically receive in other lands.ArafelOne of the Borderland nations, Arafel is located between Kandor on the west and Shienar on the east. The capital of Arafel is the city of Shol Arbela. The current ruler is King Paitar Nachiman; his sister Kiruna is an Sedai of the Green Ajah, allied with the Salidar sisters.As with all the Borderlands, Arafel is a martial nation. Arafellin men tend to wear two curved swords on their backs, one hilt protruding above each shoulder. Both genders wear their hair in long braids, with bells on the end. Sometimes they will also wear bells on their coat sleeves or dangling from the tops of their boots, as decoration.The countrys name likely comes from the Hebrew word arafel (A Ra Fel), which means mist cloud darkness or a dense fog, generally used in reference to the Apocalypse.KandorThe nation of Kandor is one of the four nations of the Borderlands, lying between Saldaea and Arafel. The capital Chachin lies near the northern border, just south of the Plain of Lances. The current ruler of Kandor is Queen Ethenielle. Kandori are famous merchants, and are said to have strange ideas about debts and repayment. Kandori men are noted for wearing pearl earrings and forked beards.  Kandori merchants wear chains across their chests.SaldaeaSaldaea is the westernmost of the four Borderlands countries and is larger than Shienar and Arafel combined. Maradon is the capital of Saldaea; her Queen is Tenobia.ShienarShienar is the easternmost of the Borderlands countries; the capital is Fal Moran. The current ruler of Shienar is Easar Togita.CountriesAltaraAltara is a country located between Illian and Amadicia. The river Eldar forms its western border. The nation is not united and often some nobles have more power than the King or Queen. Its capital, a port, is Ebou Dar, located in the south. The banner of Altara is two golden leopards on a field checked four-by-four in red and blue.AmadiciaAmadicia is a landlocked nation in the southwest of the main continent, stretching from the southern end of the Mountains of Mist to the northern edge of the Shadow Coast (an uninhabited region). It is best known as the home of the Children of the Light, a highly militaristic religious order that claims to serve the Light and oppose the One wherever he is found. Because of the Children hatred and distrust for those who can wield the One Power, Aes Sedai are forbidden to enter Amadicia. Amadicia was in theory a monarchy, most recently reigned over by King Ailron, but the Children were the real ruling power in Amadicia until the coming of the Seanchan.AndorAndor is the strongest single country in the Westlands (the southwestern section of the Eastern continent). It is located in the middle of the Westlands, and is one of the largest nations.  After the death of the King Hawkwing, Ishara, the first Queen of Andor, persuaded her husband Souran Maravaile (one of Hawkwings generals) to lift his siege of Tar Valon and instead establish a country. Ishara believed in holding on to a relatively small section of Hawkwings vast but crumbling empire, instead of fighting for the whole. The capital of Andor is Caemlyn.Arad DomanArad Doman is a coastal nation in the north-west of the main continent, lying between the Aryth Ocean on the west and the Mountains of Mist in the east. To the south lies Almoth Plain. To the north is an unclaimed region between Arad Doman and Saldaea.The capital city of Arad Doman is Bandar Eban, a port city at the mouth of the river Dhagon and a major center of trade. Katar (in the disputed Almoth region) is an important mining city in the Mountains of Mist whose nobles are powerful enough that they have to be occasionally reminded that they are subject to Arad Doman.CairhienCairhien is located in the east central part of the The Westlands, on the east it borders with the Spine of the World. The sign of Cairhien is a golden sun rising on a field of deep blue. The capital of Cairhien is a city of the same name.Cairhien, like many of the current nations, became sovereign at the end of the War of the Hundred Years. For four hundred years after, it enjoyed a period of unprecedented wealth. This was due primarily to the Aiel, who granted Cairhienen the exclusive right to cross the Aiel Waste and trade for silk in Shara. This prosperity ended when Laman Damodred cut down Avendoraldera, a cutting from the Tree of Life and a gift from the Aiel, and unknowingly sparked the Aiel War. During this war the city of Cairhien was burned and partially destroyed, and as of the rise of the Dragon Reborn, its famous topless towers had not yet been totally rebuilt.Cairhien is currently under the hand of Elayne Trakand.She laid claim to the land in Towers of Midnight after claiming the lion throne of Andor.GhealdanGhealdan is a relatively minor country, known for its production of alum. The capital is the city of Jehannah. The current ruler is Queen Alliandre, but she rules in name only as the country is a battleground between several armies.The homeland of the False Dragon Ablar, Ghealdan suffered a great deal from Logains depredations. Logain was eventually captured by Sedai and taken to Tar Valon to be gentled. Before Ghealdan could recover, however, Dagar, the self-proclaimed Prophet of the Dragon, recruited an army of Dragonsworn who terrorised the southern parts of Ghealdan and destabilised the government. The present Queen, Alliandre, is the fourth monarch in six months; her two immediate predecessors ended their reigns after being defeated by Masemas followers, one by suspected suicide, the other by abdication. Alliandre thought it appropriate to come to an accommodation with Masema. Ghealdan was further thrown into confusion by the arrival of the Shaido Aiel, Perrin Aybara as representative of the Dragon Reborn, and most recently Seanchan forces.Recently, Ghealdan has been placed under the protection of Perrin Aybara, Lord of the Two Rivers.IllianIllian is a powerful merchant nation north of the Sea of Storms, with a capital city of the same name.  It is a center of commerce specializing in fishing, shipping, shipbuilding, and smuggling.  Political deadlock often leaves residents free to pursue their mercantile ambitions without official interference.  Illian has a thousand-year rivalry with its eastern neighbor, Tear.MurandyMurandy is a landlocked nation in the south of the main continent, bordered on the north by Andor, the north-west by Ghealdan, the south-west by Altara, and the south by Illian. To the east, across the River Cary, are the Hills of Kintara, which are part of no nation. The capital city is Lugard, and the present ruler is King Roedran Almaric do Arreloa aNaloy.The people of Murandy, much like the people of Altara, do not really consider themselves the residents of a nation, owing allegiance instead to a town or to a local lord. As a result, King Roedran has very little effective power, especially outside Lugard. The constant squabbling between noble families and their followers also provides ample opportunities for interference by powerful neighbouring nations, especially Andor. Murandians are, however, capable of overcoming their differences if they face invasion by their neighbours. Murandians are widely regarded as uncouth and undisciplined.The capital city of Lugard is located in central Murandy, and at a major crossroads. Trade always flourishes there, regardless of whatever political upheaval may be engulfing the city or nation; it is this trade which keeps the city alive. Lugard is one of the few cities in the world which have more inns and stables than houses and shops. The city was once surrounded by a tall stone wall, which has fallen into disrepair. The many thieves who call Lugard home consider any foreigner a fair mark, and the unpaved roads and alleys are dangerous to travel alone.Murandy plays only a minor role in world politics. The lack of an effective ruler makes it difficult for Murandy to defend itself, much less to make its presence felt in the rest of the land. It is thought by many to have been modeled in part on Ireland, or possibly Wales; the interference of Andor (thought to be based on England)almost domination in some instancesin Murandian affairs bears this out.TarabonThe nation of Tarabon was formed after the demise of Hawkwings empire, and the founders set a pattern that continues to modern times: joint rule by a male King and a female Panarch, with clear division of responsibility and authority. Tarabon fell into civil war after the events at Falme, and was eventually occupied by the Seanchan. The last Panarch, Amathera, was deposed and enslaved by the Seanchan, and the fate of the King is unknown. Tarabon is presently under Seanchan military government. The Seanchan in Tarabon have been heavily attacked during the events in of Dreams, as Rodel Ituralde leads over 20,000 men in a series of raids and skirmishes across the country.Its capital, Tanchico, is located on the coast of the Aryth Ocean, about five miles up the River Andahar.  The city is built on and around three prominent peninsulas.Taraboners believe that they have some of the most ancient lineage of all nations, and refer to themselves as the Tree of Man.  They wear veils that cover all of the face but their eyes.TearTear is one of the richest nations in the land.  This comes in part from controlling the greatest port on the Sea of Storms, at the mouth of the River Erinin. A great deal of Tears wealth comes from the oil produced on the countrys numerous olive farms. This is supplemented by lucrative trade in grain, fish and spices.Two RiversThe nation of the two rivers was formed by Lord Perrin Goldeneyes under an agreement with Elayne Queen of Andor). It is known for the quality of its wool, tabac and channelers.City StatesAringillIntriguingly, the nation of Andor does not include much land on the west bank of River Erinin.  Cairhien holds most of both banks to the north (except the very north where Andor controls a small portion of both banks). The southern half of Andors eastern border is some miles inland, thus in this area the Erinin actually falls outside national boundaries.  Here is located the large city Aringill on the west bank, the small and unwalled town of Maerone on the east bank, and several villages nearby.There is much speculation as to why Andor chooses not to annex Aringill.  The question is all the more striking since the Andoran presence is pronounced, extending to the garrisoning of a considerable number of the Queens Guardapparently at the invitation of Aringill.Aringill is a fairly new city, having been either unoccupied or no larger than a small town as recently as 800 NE.()FalmeSince the Breaking of the world, the anchorage on Toman Head has been a coveted port location.  It has not been confirmed, but supposedly there has been a city where Falme now stands since soon after the Breaking.The first country Falme belonged to was Safer, ruled by King Eawynd.  In 209 AB, Safer joined the Compact of the Ten Nations.  At that time, the city where Falme now stands was called Miereallen.  Safer survived the Trolloc Wars, but in a greatly weakened condition.  Eventually the country collapsed, though the city struggled on.()The next country to control the city was Darmovan.  It is likely that the residents of Falme participated significantly in the famous Peoples Uprising that squashed a rebellion against High King Hawkwing (exact date unknown, but some time between FY 963 and 986).After the War of the Hundred Years, the nation of Almoth came into being.  It controlled most of the Almoth Plain, as well as Toman Head and thus Falme. All that is known at this point is that the country simply faded away sometime before 600 NE.(In the books, the first Seanchan army (Forerunners) landed in Falme on Toman Head, but was driven back into the sea, by an army of Whitecloaks, and an army of dead heroes called back by the horn of Valere.Far MaddingA city-state in the east central part of the Westlands. It lies at the north end of the Plains of Maredo near the borders of Andor, Illian, and Tear. There is a Waygate nearby.Far Madding lies on an island in the center of a lake. There are three gates and three bridges connecting the city to the mainland. The Caemlyn Gate leads to the Ajalon Bridge and the village of Glancor. The Illian Gate leads to the Ikane Bridge and the village of Daigan. The Tear Gate leads to the Goim Bridge and the village of South Bridge.There are three Strangers Markets in Far Madding where foreigners are allowed to trade. They are the Amhara Market, the Avharin Market and the Nethvin Market. They are named after the three most revered women in Far Madding history. At the center of the city is the Counsels Plaza and the Hall of the Counsels.Far Madding is noteworthy for its restrictive policy on carrying weapons. Foreigners are obliged to either surrender their weapons at a bridge guard-house on arrival, or (for a small fee) have sheathed weapons peace-bound, i.e., held in the sheath by a wire net. The peace-bonds are inspected on leaving the city, and tampering attracts a hefty punishment. Within the city itself, there are considerable numbers of street guards employed to keep the peace.In the time after the Breaking, the city was known as Aren Mador and was the capital of Essenia. After the Trolloc Wars, the city was known as Fel Moreina. After the War of the Hundred Years, Far Madding was the capital of Maredo until it dissolved. Far Madding is now an independent city-state and a major center of commerce.In the Hall of the Counsels there is a terangreal known as the guardian. This terangreal simulates the effects of an Ogier Stedding, rendering it impossible for channellers to sense or touch the True Source, unless they are in possession of so-called wells. These wells are able to store small amounts of the One Power, and can be used within the boundaries of the terangreal.  However, Rand alThor seems to indicate that it might be possible to channel the True Power (the source of power controlled by the Dark One), claiming that the guardian Blocks the One Power... the One Power only. The area of influence is far greater for men than for women. The terangreal will also pinpoint the location of anyone channelling in the vicinity.Far Madding is unusual among the states of Randland, in that the society is matriarchal in nature. All merchants are women, and men are the ones cared for with allowances or money willed to them. The system of government is also unusual; Far Madding, like Tear, is an oligarchy rather than a monarchy. The city is ruled by thirteen Counsels, giving their name to the Plaza and Hall described previously; the First Counsel is a among equals.KatarKatar is a sizable mining town situated in the Mountains of Mist to the southeast of Arad Doman. While technically independent, there is evidence in the books that it is under the protection of Arad Doman.MayeneMayene is a small but wealthy city-state, historically dominated by its powerful neighbor Tear. The ruler of Mayene is called the First; currently this is Berelain sur Paendrag Tanreall, who, like all of her family, claims to be a direct descendant of the famous king Artur Paendrag Tanreall (Artur Hawkwing), the most powerful ruler since the Breaking of the World. Similarly, Mayenes sign is a golden hawk, Artur Hawkwings sign. This affectation probably has claim in truth---given that Mayene is small and weak among modern city-states and nations---and the Wheel of Times habit of Raising up that which was cast down, and casting down that which was raised up.  That relative insignificance (small and out-of-the-way) may be what has allowed the remnant of Hawkwings line to continue uninterrupted thus far.The Firsts primary duty is to keep Mayene independent from Tear, which claims Mayene as a province. Mayenes independence despite these designs relies on the Mayeners knowledge of the location of the secret oilfish shoals, which oil is highly valued and competes with similar products from Tear, Illian, and Tarabon.Another tool the Mayener rulers once used to assist them in maintaining Mayenes autonomy was a terangreal doorway which took them to the land of the Aelfinn. Anyone may enter this doorway once in their life; on the other side, they are allowed to ask any three questions, and will receive three true answers. These answers were a great aid to the Firsts in maintaining Mayenes independence, but one young First, who had already stepped through the doorway in his lifetime, eventually bargained it away to Tear. Despite this loss, the Mayeners are intent on remaining apart from the High Lords of Tear; this wish led Berelain to ally Mayene with the Dragon Reborn, the first ruler to do so freely.The name is reminiscent of Mycenae.Mayene in a way, according to wotmania.com, resembles the cities of the League which were independent city states relying on trade and commerce for their power.Other significant westland locationsDragonmountDragonmount is a massive volcanic mountain formed during the Breaking of the World after Therin Telamon was confronted by Elan Morin Tedronai (Ishamael). Lews Therin drew enough of the One Power that the air turned to fire, the fire to light liquified,() a lightning bolt struck from a clear sky to the point where Lews Therin was standing, bored into the earth and created a volcano, and split the river Erinin in two, creating an island that is now the home of Tar Valon. The mountain became known as Dragonmount, where the Dragon would be Reborn according to prophecy, and its summit, which often smokes like a volcano, is high enough to cast a shadow over Tar Valon at certain times of day.Drowned LandsThe Drowned Lands are a wide expanse of wetlands separating the city-state of Mayene from the remainder of the Westlands.Haddon MirkAn expansive forest located between Tear and Cairhein. It served as a hiding place for a nameless false Dragon who was caught and executed by the Tairens before anyone could learn who he was, and later for the rebellions against Rand alThor in Cairhein and Tear. The forest itself was described as being so thick that it would be easy to lose an army within it.The Spine of the WorldThe Spine of the World, also known as the Dragonwall, is a mountain range that separates the Waste from the Westland Countries. The only known crossings are near Tarwins Gap in Shienar and the Jangai Pass in northern Cairhein.SteddingStedding are the homelands of the Ogier.  Various stedding are spread all across the world and are places of natural beauty and power.  They are shielded from the One Power in some way that prevents any person from channeling or wielding the One Power within a stedding, and a person who can channel cannot even sense the True Source while in a stedding.  Wielding the One Power, while outside the stedding, will produce no results within the stedding.  Shadowspawn such as Trollocs and Myrddraal will not willingly enter a stedding without being driven or under the greatest need.The Shadow Coast and Windbiters FingerThe Shadow Coast is a largely uninhabited area in the south-west of the Westlands, known to be the home of two Ogier stedding, while Windbiters Finger is an archipelago extending out into the Aryth Ocean in a perfectly straight line. It is unknown as to why the Shadow Coast is named so; whether for connections to the Shadow or otherwise has gone unspecified.Worlds EndWorlds End dominates the far western edge of Saldaea, a sheer cliff face overlooking the Aryth Ocean near the Great Blight. The landward side is known to be the planting grounds for Saldaean ice peppers.Places of the Dark OneThe Blasted LandsThe arid lands north of the Blight and the Mountains of Dhoom leading to Shayol Ghul, and seen only in the dreams of Rand, Perrin and Mat when they were pulled into Telaranrhiod by Baalzamon.and when Moridin holds council with the rest of the ForsakenThe BlightThe Blight is the area in the northern reaches of the main continent and the northern reaches of Seanchan, though no Shadowspawn live on the Seanchan continent.     It is a nightmarish land as all life there is corrupted by the nearby influence of the Dark One. Almost everything in the Great Blight deals death in some way. All the vegetation is toxic and home to insects that can cause a hideously painful demise. There are even remnants of twisted species created by Aginorparticularly one species, the Worms, which are apparently the larval stages of jumara, unable to mature. Worms are able to kill Myrddraal with ease, and were even able to deal one of the Forsaken a nasty (if non-fatal) surprise.Going into the Blight seems to be a traditional way to die heroically. Aiel men who discover they can channel go into the Blight to hunt the Dark One.Mountains of DhoomA high mountain range spanning from Worlds End in Saldaea to Tarwins Gap in Shienar and beyond, separating the Great Blight in the south from the Blasted Lands and Shayol Ghul in the north. Very few venture into the Mountains of Dhoom except in the greatest of needs, for it is said that there are creatures living in the high passes that are feared even by those living in the Great Blight.Pit of DoomThe Pit of Doom is located in the The Blight in the valley of Thakandar, under ShayolGhul and is the site of the Dark Ones prison. A tunnel leads down to the fiery Pit of Doom where the barrier between the real world and the Dark Ones prison is thinnest.Shayol GhulShayol Ghul is a mountain beyond the Blight in the north of the known world. It is the place in the physical world to which the Ones prison is closest. The Dark One can exert far greater control over the mountain and the surrounding area than other places in the physical world, and his high-ranking followers such as the Chosen travel there to commune with him. Below the mountain lies the fog-shrouded valley called Thakandar, site of the forge where the swords of Myrddraal are created.Aiel WasteThe Aiel Waste is a vast, arid land to the east of the Westlands, separated from the latter by the mountain range known as the Spine of the World, or the Dragonwall, to the west, the chasms and precipices of Shara to the east, the Blight in the north, and the Sea of Storms in the south. These four borders, and the hot, dry, roadless terrain keep the Waste an isolated land, as does the Aiels harsh treatment of foreigners. Blistering temperatures ravage the land by day and glacial ones freeze it at night. It is a land of mountains and valleys dotted by numerous rock formations, including many spires. It has almost no vegetation and what there is, is small and virtually useless. Not many animals live in the Waste, but the ones that do are usually as treacherous as the land itself.Despite the daunting environment, the Aiel people make the Waste their home. The majority of Aiel live in and among the rock formations. These holds, as they are called, are approximately the size of villages. The Aiel have their own name for the Waste, the Three-Fold Land: First, because it is a shaping stone to make them; second, it exists as a testing ground to prove their worth; third, it serves as a punishment for their sins against the Sedai.  The Aiel have absolute control of the land and only allow peddlers, gleemen and Tinkers to enter it. During the Trolloc wars, the Trollocs gave it the name Djevik KShar, or The Dying Ground, due to the immense ferocity and fighting prowess of the Aiel.SharaThe land bordered by mountains to the west (the Aiel Waste is on the far side of them), and to the north by the Great Blight.The Sharans, much like the Aiel, are secretive of their ways among outsiders. But the people of Shara take this a step further than their neighbors to the west. Outsiders are only allowed to enter several specially designated trading towns. These towns are surrounded by high walls, with no view of the outside world. Outsiders who attempt to ascend the wall, or leave the trading towns, are killed immediately. Seafarers who land on the Sharan shore, by choice or not, are similarly executed.Farstrider indicated in his writings that lying to outsiders actually seemed to be a part of Sharan culture. Folk trading with the Sharans have learned to check their purchases, as Sharans obviously believe they need not tell outsiders the truth about the goods they are purchasing. Trading with the Sharans is a dangerous business, though one that is extremely profitable. For the most part, the Sea Folk and Aiel conduct all trade with the Sharans. The Aiel permitted the Cairhienin to trade with the Sharans in return for an ancient debt, until King Laman cut down the Avendoraldera, a shoot of the Tree of Life, to make his throne, leading to his execution by the Aiel and the declaring of Cairhienin anathema.Like everywhere else, there are those in Shara who can channel the One Power. These people are known as the Ayyad. They live in towns separate from the rest of the Sharan people; other Sharans intruding in these towns are killed. Male Ayyad are not killed immediately. Instead, they serve as breeding stock for female Ayyad. These males are kept in ignorance of the outside world, and are killed as soon as they reach the age of 21 or show signs of channeling.The Sharans are ruled by a monarch, called Shboan if female and Shbotay if male. The Sharan monarch dies every seven years, which the Sharan people simply accept as the will of the Pattern. At this point, the monarchs widow(er) remarries and becomes monarch; the new spouse will be widowed in an additional seven years and reign in turn. Unknown to most, the monarchs are actually killed by the Ayyad, who are the true power in Shara.Aspects of Shara seem to be based upon the lands of East Asia, such as their intentional isolation from the other lands as well as the presence of treaty ports and a silk road.The Land of MadmenLittle is known about this separate, island continent, except that, apparently, all channelers there are insane, and civilization did not survive the Breaking. It is directly south and well below the equator from the main continent, near the Southern Icecap.(ReferencesExternal links* Encyclopedia of the Wheel of Time* TarValon.Net - Wheel of Time Internet Community* Black and white map that appears in most of the books* Large colour map covering the main Randland continent* Shayol Ghulit:Randland  - uit Het Rad des Tijdsoch platser i Sagan om Drakens terkomst
326925
Castleton,_Derbyshire
Castleton is a honeypot village in the Derbyshire District, in England.  The village lies at the western end of the Hope Valley on the Water, a tributary of the Noe. The village is situated between the areas known as the Dark Peak (to the north) and the White Peak (to the south). Castletons population was 649 at the 2001 census. History Castleton village was mentioned as Pechesers in the Domesday book in 1086 where Arnbiorn and Hundingr held the land of Peverels castle in Castleton.(Domesday Book: A Complete Translation. London: Penguin, 2003. ISBN 0-14-143994-7 p.750) This land and Peverels castle were amongst the manors belonging to William Peverel that also included Bolsover and Glapwell. Castleton later prospered from lead mining; the Mine, one of the oldest lead mines in the country, is situated  west of the village (see also lead mining history). This created and enlarged local caverns, four of which are now open to the public as Cavern, John Cavern, Cavern and Cliff Cavern. A limited supply of Blue John is mined locally. Geography Castleton is situated between the gritstone plateau of the Peak to the north and the gentler limestone scenery of the Peak to the south. It lies at the western end of the Hope Valley and consequently is surrounded on three sides by hills. Most prominent is the ridge to the north. This is called the Ridge; it runs east from Tor to Tor and Hill, via the pass (hause) of Cross, where paths from many directions can be seen converging to cross over to Edale. Road communications Castleton used to be on the road from Sheffield to Chapel-en-le-Frith, on the way to Manchester.  Leaving Castleton, the western road used to go over Mam Tor, but after continual collapses and repairs (Mam Tor is called the Shivering Mountain because of its very loose shales) it was eventually abandoned.The only westbound exit from Castleton is now the unclassified road over the narrow Winnats, now more frequently called Winnats Pass. This road is very narrow and steep, and unsuitable for heavy vehicles or high volumes.  Road signage has been designed to discourage through trafficonly local destinations are shown.  Thus, most traffic enters and leaves the village on the eastern (Hope-Hathersage-Sheffield) road; for traffic going west this involves a long diversion via the villages of Bradwell and Forest. Public transport Castleton has a small bus station. There are many bus services to Castleton, but in the winter some services are withdrawn (except on Sundays, when extra buses are laid on  the reverse of the situation in larger English towns). All-year routes with a good frequency include the 272, operated by South Yorkshire, Hulleys and TM Travel, which runs from Castleton to Sheffield and the 173 to Bakewell, operated by Hulleys.  One return bus a day is operated to Buxton.There is no railway station, but Hope station is a walk of about  away, and train tickets to Hope and Edale are valid on connecting buses to Castleton.Photo galleryImage:Peveril castle.jpg|Peveril Castle dominates the Castleton skylineImage:Castleton-Castle Hotel.jpg|The Castle HotelImage:Castleton, Peak District.jpg|The Three Roofs CafImage:Castleton school.jpg|The school in CastletonImage:GarlandKing&Consort.jpg|The Castleton Garland King and his consort Tourism Castleton attracts large numbers of tourists, and there are many pubs (some with accommodation), tea shops and guest houses to supply their needs.  There is also a large car park, an information centre, several outdoor shops and a youth hostel. Many schools visit the area for educational studies such as GCSE coursework. It is also a major walking centre, where routes up Cave Dale, The Winnats, Tor and Hollins Cross meet. Events On Garland Day (Apple Day  29 May), a Garland King is paraded around the streets wearing an extremely large garland of flowers,(Roy Hattersley on Oak Apple Day Daily Mail 2007) followed by local girls dressed in white with flowers. The village is also famous for its display of Christmas lights and decorations during the festive season.  There are four show caves to visit (one of them by boat) and at least one of them is open all yearFamous people*Ambrose: a Puritan author, was a churchman here in 1627.(1911 Encyclopdia Britannica)*William Dawkins: found important fossils near Castleton*Roe: industrialist was born here in 1715 Walking Castleton is popular with walkers, as the area is very beautiful, there is plenty of accommodation, and there are many public footpaths leading from the village. There are easy walks along the river to Hope, Brough, Bamford and (rather further) Hathersage, or there is a short strenuous walk up onto the Great Ridge, where magnificent views can be enjoyed before descending to Edale or returning to Castleton.  Hayfield is a short days walk away beyond Edge.  A medium-distance two- or three-day trail, the Way, starts in Castleton by running south down Dale (past the rear of the castle) before climbing out of the village and heading for Monyash, Youlgreave, and Matlock.On televisionThe town was featured in Haunted: Midsummer Murders episode three where the team investigates the murder of an engaged couple said to take place in the 18th century. Much of the investigation takes place in Cavern. One of the conspirators, James Ashton, is said to have confessed to the murders on his deathbed after being haunted by the dead couple. He also implicated others involved. Castleton also featured in national news reports in the early 1980s following the murder of Renhard near the battlements of Peveril Castle.The local underground caves were used as the filming location for the underworld, ruled by the evil of the Green Kirtle (played by Kellerman), in the 1990 BBC adaptation of Silver Chair (one of the Narnia books written by Lewis).(http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0098912/locations)The town is also featured briefly in the play Devil is an Ass by Ben Johnson, first performed in 1616.ReferencesExternal links*Derbyshire Guide*Pigots 1835 Directory*Minerals, Mines and Quarries*Castleton, Derbyshire(Derbyshire)(Derbyshire)Derbyshire
328125
Utashinai,_Hokkaid
 is a city located in Sorachi Subprefecture, Hokkaid, Japan.  It is Japans smallest city by population.  It was formerly a prosperous mining city, but has declined greatly since the closing of the coal mines.  The population hit a maximum of 46,000 in 1948.The name is derived from the Ainu Uta Ushi Nai meaning River connected to a sandy beachAs of 2008, the city has an estimated population of 4,845 and a density of 86.5 persons per km. The total area is 55.99 km.Efforts to transform Utashinai from a gritty coal mining town to an alpine tourist destination have met with mixed success.  The town has adopted a Swiss theme as part of its tourist oriented strategy, and many new buildings are Swiss chalet style.  A medium sized ski hill, Kamoidake, attracts a decent crowd of locals and hosts frequent ski meets, while a spring resort called Tyrol, after the Austrian region, is known throughout Hokkaid for the quality of its water.  However, despite these new projects, Utashinai continues to experience population decline and economic stagnation.  The high school closed in 2007, with students now traveling to Sunagawa, Akabira or Takikawa for their secondary education.   History *1890 Sorachi Coal Mine opened, founding of Utashinai.*1897 Utashinai Village split away from Nae Village (now the city of Sunagawa)*1900 Ashibetsu Village splits off*1906 Utashinai becomes a Second Class Municipality*1919 Utashinai becomes a First Class Municipality*1922 Akabira Village split off*1940 Utashinai becomes a town.*1949 Part of the town splits off into Kamisunagawa Town.*July 1, 1958 Utashinai becomes a city.*1971 Sumitomo closes Utashinai Mine*1988 Kamiutashinai mine closed*1995 Sorachi Mine closed*2003 Mid-Sorachi Merger Conference established*2004 Merger Conference disbanded. External links *  Official websitede:Utashinaigl:Utashinaiio:Utashinaiit:Utashinaija:pl:Utashinaipt:UtashinaiHokkaidru:Hokkaidotg:uk:HokkaidHokkaidzh-yue:zh:
329151
Fort_McMurray
footnotes              Fort McMurray is an urban service area in the Regional Municipality (R.M.) of Wood Buffalo in Alberta, Canada.()() It was previously incorporated as a city on September 1, 1980.() It became an urban service area when it amalgamated with Improvement District No. 143 on April 1, 1995 to create the Municipality of Wood Buffalo (later renamed to the R.M. of Wood Buffalo on August 14, 1996).( Despite its current official designation of urban service area, many locals, politicians and the media still refer to Fort McMurray as a city. History River valley (from Highway 63).JPG|200px|thumb|left|View of the Clearwater River valley from Highway 63Before the arrival of Europeans in the late 18th Century, the Cree were the dominant Nations people in the Fort McMurray area. The oil sands were known to the locals and the surface deposits were actually used to waterproof their canoes. In 1778, the first of the European explorers, Pond, came to the region in search of furs as the European demand for this commodity at the time was strong. Peter Pond explored the region further south along the Athabasca River and the Clearwater River, but chose to set up a trading post much farther north by the Athabasca River near Lake Athabasca. However, his post closed in 1788 in favour of Fort Chipewyan, now the oldest continuous settlement in Alberta.(The History of Fort McMurray)In 1790, the explorer Alexander MacKenzie made the first recorded description of the oil sands. By that time, trading between the explorers and the Cree was already occurring at the confluence of the Clearwater and Athabasca Rivers. The Bay Company and the North West Company were in fierce competition in this region. Fort McMurray was established there as a Hudsons Bay Company post by 1870, and continued to operate as a transportation stopover in the decades afterwards.The community has played a significant role in the of the petroleum industry in Canada. Oil exploration is known to have occurred as early as the early 20th Century, but Fort McMurrays population remained very small, no more than a few hundred people. By 1921 there was serious interest in developing a refining plant to separate the oil from the sands. Alcan Oil Company was the first outfit to begin bulk tests at Fort McMurray. The nearby community of Waterways was established to provide a terminus for waterborne transportation, until 1925, when the and Great Waterways Railway reached there.Abasands Oil was the first company to successfully extract oil from the oil sands through hot water extraction by the 1930s, but production was very low. Fort McMurray gradually grew to over 1,100 bpd by War II, and Fort McMurray was set up by the US and Canadian forces as staging ground for the Canol project.Fort McMurray and Waterways amalgamated as the village of McMurray (the Fort was dropped until 1962, when it was restored to reflect its heritage) by 1947, and became a town a year later. Fort McMurray was granted the status of new town so it could get more provincial funding. By 1966, the towns population was over 2,000.In 1967, the Great Canadian Oil Sands (now Suncor) plant opened and Fort McMurrays growth took off afterwards. More oil sands plants were opened up, especially after 1973 and 1979, when serious political tensions and conflicts in the Middle East triggered oil price spikes. The population of the town reached 6,847 by 1971 and climbed swiftly to 31,000 by 1981, a year after its incorporation as a city.The city continued to grow for a few years even after the oil bust caused by the collapse in world oil prices and the Energy Program, which was scrapped after the Progressive Conservative Party formed the of Canada in 1984. The population peaked at almost 37,000 in 1985,() then declining to under 34,000 by 1989.() Low oil prices since the oil price collapse in 1986 slowed the oil sands production greatly, as oil extraction from the oil sands is a very expensive process and lower world prices made this uneconomical. However, the price increases since 2003 have made oil extraction profitable again.On April 1, 1995, the City of Fort McMurray and Improvement District No. 143 were amalgamated to form the Municipality of Wood Buffalo.  The new municipality was subsequently renamed to the Regional Municipality (R.M.) of Wood Buffalo on August 14, 1996.( As a result, Fort McMurray was no longer officially designated a city.  Instead, it was designated an urban service area within a specialized municipality. The amalgamation resulted in the entire R.M. of Wood Buffalo being under a single government in which Fort McMurray is the municipal seat. Geography right|200px|thumb|Vista Ridge, a local ski hill.Fort McMurray is  northeast of Edmonton on Highway 63, about  west of the Saskatchewan border, nestled in the boreal forest at the confluence of the River and the Clearwater River. It is located  above sea level. Fort McMurray is the largest community in the Regional Municipality of Wood Buffalo.spruce, aspen, poplar and birch are the most prominent native trees in and around town. spruce and tamarack occur in poorly drained areas and pine may be seen on the driest sites. aspen, spruce and cherry are among the exotic trees occasionally seen. Climate Fort McMurray has a borderline continental climate (climate classification Dfb, just above a climate), with long, very cold winters and fairly warm but short summers. The town lies at a lower elevation than most other parts of Alberta, so under the right conditions it can be a hot spot for Alberta or even all of Canada (as in April 1980 when its daily mean temperature of 10.0C was unsurpassed by any other Canadian station).  Temperatures average -19C in winter with the lowest recorded -50.6C, (-58F).() In July temperatures average 17C, with the highest recorded being 37C in August.(  Its annual precipitation amounts to 455.5 millimetres (17.9 in) and falls mainly in the summer months, its snowfall is 155.8 centimetres (61.3 in)( and appears within a range of 5 to 7 months.dateMarch 2011 Economy Fort McMurray is considered the heart of one of Albertas (and Canadas) major hubs of oil production, located near the Oil Sands. Besides the sands, the economy also relies on gas and oil pipelines, forestry and tourism. The two largest oil sand mining companies are Syncrude and Energy.Fort McMurrays growth is characteristic of a boomtown.(Telegraph Article, Saturday Magazine-15/9/07)  Housing prices and rents are far higher in Fort McMurray than one would expect in such a remote area. In 2006, Fort McMurray had the highest prices in Alberta.(Edmonton Journal - prices in Fort McMurray) The Albertan government has promised to release more land for residential construction, particularly in Timberlea on the north side. Demographics  Municipal census The population of Fort McMurray is 76,797 according to the R.M. of Wood Buffalos 2010 municipal census, which includes a shadow population of 1,539 residents.() However, the 2010 Official Population List published by Municipal Affairs presents Fort McMurrays official population as 64,128, which includes its 2010 shadow population of 1,539 and its 2007 permanent population of 62,589.()This is the second time that the annual Official Population List publication did not reflect the latest municipal census results published by the R.M. of Wood Buffalo. In 2008, the municipalitys previous municipal census presented Fort McMurrays population as 72,363 (70,304 permanent and 2,059 non-permanent residents).() However, the 2008 municipal census population was not accepted as an official population by Alberta Municipal Affairs due to the use of statistical extrapolation instead of 100% door-to-door enumeration.()() Therefore, the 2008 Official Population List published Fort McMurrays 2007 population, instead of its 2008 population, as the urban service areas official population for 2008.()()According to historic municipal census data, Fort McMurray experienced an average annual growth rate of 6.1% between 2000 and 2010.( The R.M. of Wood Buffalo estimates the population of Fort McMurray to increase to 133,000 by 2028.(If Fort McMurray were still incorporated as a city, it would be the fifth largest in Alberta (after Calgary, Edmonton, Red Deer and Lethbridge). Federal census 150px|thumb|Jubilee Centre (city hall)In the 2006 Census, Canada recorded a population of 47,705 in Fort McMurray living in 19,021 dwellings, a 23.4% increase from its 2001 population of 38,667. It had a land area of  and a density of .() The same year however, the R.M. of Wood Buffalo counted a population of 64,444 in its municipal census, which included a shadow population of 2,301 living in hotel/motel and campground accommodations.() The discrepancy in the results was attributed to differences in census methodologies where Statistics Canada used a jure method while the municipality used a facto method.() Migration Fort McMurray is a multicultural community, attracting people from all corners of Canada and the world. Albertans make up almost half the number of migrants to Fort McMurray, followed by 17% of people originating from the province of and Labrador. Notable residents * Phillips, ice hockey player, Senators* Upshall, ice hockey player, Panthers* Pratt, ice hockey player, Sabres* Colin Murphy, ice hockey player, Pirates (AHL)* Lines, singer* Henstridge, actress* Cardinal, actress* Pogge, ice hockey player, Charlotte Checkers (AHL)* Sampson, former Vancouver-based television/voice actor.* Nils Edenloff, front man for the Alberta Advantage(http://blogs.wsj.com/speakeasy/2011/03/02/rural-alberta-advantage-mines-memories-of-home/) Infrastructure  Transportation ;Air200px|thumb|Float plane taking off at the Snye.McMurray Airport (ICAO Code CYMM, IATA Code YMM) is serviced by Canada, Canada Jazz, Air, McMurray Aviation, Sunjet, Air and WestJet with scheduled flights to Calgary, Edmonton, Fort Chipewyan, Fort Smith, Lethbridge, Peace River, Saskatoon, Toronto, Vancouver and St. Johns. The airport is also serviced by various oil companies with corporate and charter flights. Flights are frequently booked to capacity because of the high transient worker population and people unwilling to drive on Highway 63.;Public transitMcMurray Transit (FMT) operates in the community, with routes that extend to all subdivisions on the south side and most of the subdivisions on the north side.(Transit website);BusGreyhound Canada and Red Arrow operate scheduled passenger bus services to Edmonton and other communities along Highway 63, as well as other destinations further south.;Highways and roadsmcmurray hwy 63.jpg|right|200px|thumb|Looking north on Highway 63Highway 63 is the only highway between Fort McMurray and Edmonton. Due to the industrial demands of the oilsands, Highway 63 boasts some of the highest tonnage per kilometer in Canada, and the largest and heaviest loads that trucks have ever carried. Construction to twin Highway 63(http://www.gov.ab.ca/acn/200602/1946897B7668C-CCE6-D174-2B879CA4358438E2.html) by the Government of Alberta is currently underway. Highway 881 also provides access to the region from La Biche.() Fort McMurray is also served by Highway 69, a short spur off of 63 that connects Fort McMurray with its airport and a few rural residential developments to the southeast.;RailCN discontinued the Muskeg Mixed (train) to Fort McMurray in 1989, and there has been no passenger rail service since. Education 200px|thumb|Timberlea Public School (Elementary)The Fort McMurray Public and Catholic School Districts both serve the Primary, Elementary, and Secondary Education needs of students in Fort McMurray.Based in the Abasand subdivision, Boral Francophone School serves the needs of Francophone students in the area.College is a publicly funded college and vocational institute based in the area known for both its Instrument Repair diploma as well as for its role in training workers for the Sands.  Known as the cultural hub of the Regional Municipality of Wood Buffalo, Keyano College contains both a state-of-the-art theatre and recital hall, hosting a variety of musical and theatrical events that attract upwards of 50,000 visitors each season. Media  See also *of communities in Alberta*of hamlets in Alberta*College*sands*Pond References  External links *Regional Municipality of Wood BuffaloMcMurrayMcMurrayko:ja:McMurrayMcMurrayMcMurrayMcMurrayMcMurrayMcMurrayuk:-McMurray
330072
Weston-super-Mare
Weston-super-Mare is a resort, town and civil parish in the authority of Somerset, which is within the ceremonial county of Somerset, England. It is located on the Channel coast,  south west of Bristol, spanning the coast between the bounding high ground of Hill and Hill. It includes the suburbs of Oldmixon, West Wick and Worle. Its population according to the 2001 census was 71,758.() Since 1983, Weston has been twinned with Hildesheim, Germany.()()Although there is evidence in the local area of occupation since the Age, it was still a small village until the 19th century when it became a seaside resort, and was connected with local towns and cities by a railway, and two piers were built. The growth continued until the second half of the 20th century, when tourism declined and some local industries closed. During the 21st century a regeneration programme is being undertaken. Attractions include the Helicopter Museum, Museum, the Grand Pier and the SeaQuarium aquarium. The Paddle Steamer Waverley and MV Balmoral offer day sea trips from Knightstone Island to various destinations along the Bristol Channel and Estuary. Cultural venues include The Playhouse, The Winter Gardens, and The Blakehay Theatre & Community Arts Centre.Owing to the large range in the Bristol Channel, the low tide mark in Bay is about a mile from the seafront. Although the beach itself is sandy, low tide uncovers areas of thick mud, hence the colloquial name, Weston-super-Mud.  These mudflats are very dangerous to walk in and are crossed by the mouth of the River Axe. Just to the north of the town is Sand Point which marks the lower limit of the Severn Estuary and the start of the Bristol Channel. It is also the site of the Hope and geological Site of Special Scientific Interest. In the centre of the town is Ellenborough Park, another Site of Special Scientific Interest due to the range of plant species found there.ToponymyWeston comes from the Anglo-Saxon for the west tun or settlement and the Latin super mare meaning upon sea.()()The descriptive part of its name, super-Mare, is unusual because it is in medieval Latin to distinguish it from other settlements named Weston.()HistoryEarly historyWestons oldest structure is Camp, on Hill, dating from the Age.()() Batch was a castle that once stood overlooking the town. The present site has an earthwork mound of  in diameter which is believed to be the remains of a motte.()The parish was part of the Winterstoke Hundred.()The medieval church of St John has been rebuilt,() but its preaching cross survives. The former rectory is an early 19th century structure with later additions. Though it remains adjacent to the church it has not been a parsonage house since the end of the 19th century. Today it is known as Glebe House and is divided into flats.()The Old Thatched Cottage restaurant on the seafront carries the date 1774; it is the surviving portion of a summer cottage built by the Revd. William Leeves of Wrington.()19th centuryEarly in the 19th century, Weston was a small village of about 30 houses, located behind a line of sand dunes fronting the sea, which had been created as an early sea wall after the Bristol Channel floods of 1607.( The Pigott family of Brockley, who were the local Lords of the Manor, had a summer residence at Grove House. Weston owes its growth and prosperity to the era boom in seaside holidays. Construction of the first hotel in the village started in 1808; it was called Reeves (now the Royal Hotel).() Along with nearby Burnham-on-Sea, Weston benefited from proximity to Bristol, Bath and Wales. The first attempt at an artificial harbour was made in the late 1820s at the islet of Knightstone and a slipway built from Anchor Head towards Birnbeck Island.(Image:WSM Birnbeck Pier.JPG|300px|altStructure supported on metal legs coming out of the sea, stretching from the land showing several white buildings to an island with buildings on it. A lifeboat house with slipway is attached to the side. In the distance across the water are hills and buildings.|thumb|left|Pier.Kingdom Brunel and his family lived in Weston, at Swiss Villa (eastern corner of Alexandra Parade and Swiss Road), while he was supervising the construction of the and Exeter Railway in the area.() With the opening of the railway in 1841, thousands of visitors came to the town from Bristol, the Midlands and further afield, on works outings and Holidays. Also, mining families came across the Channel from South Wales by paddle steamer. To cater for them, Pier was completed in 1867, offering in its heyday amusement arcades, tea rooms, funfair rides and a photographic studio. However, it now stands in a derelict state and has been added to Heritages at Risk Register,() but is still possible for visitors to marvel at the structure from behind the barbed wire. It was designed by Birch with ironwork by the Isia Foundry of Newport, Monmouthshire. It is a grade II* building.()Large areas of land were released for development from the 1850s onwards. Large detached villas, for the middle classes, were built on the southern slopes of Worlebury Hill. Semi-detached and terraced housing was built on the low moorland, behind the sea front in an area known as South Ward. Many of these houses have now been turned into bedsits by their owners. Most of the houses built in the Victorian era are built from stone and feature details made from Stone, influenced by local architect Price.In 1885, the first transatlantic telegraph cable of the Cable Company was brought ashore and the company started a long association with the town, ending in 1962.()Marconi, the inventor of wireless telegraphy, successfully transmitted radio signals across the Bristol Channel in the spring of 1897, from Penarth (near Cardiff) to Down (just south west of Weston, on the other side of the River Axe).()A second railway, the Clevedon and Portishead Railway, opened on 1 December 1897, connecting Weston to Clevedon.(Maggs, Colin G. (1990). The Weston Clevedon & Portishead Light Railway: The Oakwood Press. ISBN 0-85361-388-5.) The terminus station was at Ashcombe Road. The railway was extended to Portishead on 7 August 1907 but was closed  in 1940.(()ArchitectureMuch of the character of the Weston-super-Mare built environment has been created by the use of local stone, much of it from the Town Quarry, in the construction of its buildings.  Notable among the architects working in the 19th century was Price (18351912).  Many examples of his work are still to be seen: The Town Hall, The Mercury Office, The Constitutional Club (originally The Lodge of St Kew), villas and numerous other domestic dwellings. The Odeon Cinema is notable for fully retaining its Deco features both internally and externally, and retaining its original organ, a Compton form 1935.20th centuryLocal traders, unhappy that visitors were not coming as far as the centre of the town, began the construction of a new pier closer to the main streets. Opened in 1904, and known as the Grand Pier, it was originally planned to be  long.() Further development occurred after War I, with the Winter Gardens and Pavilion in 1927,() the open air pool, with its arched concrete diving board,() and an airfield dating from the inter-war period. Deco influences can be seen in much of the towns architecture from this period.During War II evacuees were accommodated in the town, however the area was also home to war industries, such as aircraft and pump manufacture, and an Air Force station at Locking. The town was also on a return route from bombers targeting Bristol and was itself bombed by the Luftwaffe. The first bombs fell in June 1940, but the worst blitzes took place in January 1941 and in June 1942. Large areas of the town were destroyed, particularly Orchard Street and the Boulevard. On 3 and 4 January 1941, 17,000 bombs fell on the town.() The Ministry set up a Q-station decoy at Bleadon in an attempt to divert the bombers to an unpopulated area.() In the later part of the war, Army troops were billeted in the area, but they were relocated in the run-up to D-Day.Helicopter MuseumWeston-super-Mare opened in 1936 by No.24 Group, with a single tarmac runway. It served as flying candidates selection and initial training facility, and as a relief airport during War II, latterly as the Air Force Staff College from April 1944 to April 1946.() After the war it served as a logistics supply station, with helicopter makers Helicopters on site until closure in 1987.() Today there is an operational heliport on site used occasionally by the Search and Rescue service. The former Westland site, which closed in 2002, houses The Helicopter Museum featuring examples of Westland aircraft. Pride of place is given to an immaculate Wessex HCC Mk.4, formerly of the Queens Flight.()Residential areas outside the town centre include the Oldmixon, Coronation, and Bournville estates, which exhibit examples of mid to late 20th century architecture. Newer housing has since been built towards the east of the town in North Worle and Locking Castle, locations nearer to the motorway.Weston-super-Mare has expanded to include the established villages of Milton, Worle, Uphill, Oldmixon, West Wick and St. Lawrence, as well as new areas such as St. Georges and Locking Castle.In 1986, General Hospital was opened on the edge of Uphill village, replacing the Queen Alexandra Memorial Hospital on The Boulevard, which was opened in 1928.()21st centuryaltA tapering tower, with metal hoops around the upper part.|right|thumb|80px|SilicaA structure known as Silica was installed at Big Lamp Corner during 2006.()It is a piece of public art, an advertising sign, a retail kiosk selling newspapers and hot food, as well as a bus shelter. It has been criticised by local residents who liken it to a carrot or a space ship, although it is meant to symbolise mans harmony with the sea. This was part of Somerset Councils ongoing civic pride initiative that has sought to revitalise Weston-super-Mares public spaces, which had suffered a period of decline. Other public space improvements have been made throughout the town such as improvements to the street scene in Grove Park Village.()On 28 July 2008, the pavilion at the end of the Grand Pier was completely destroyed by a fire. Eleven fire engines and 80 fire-fighters were unable to contain the blaze which is believed to have started in the north-east tower of the Pavilion.() A competition was held to design a new pavilion,and the project awarded to the winning architect Angus Meek Architects of Bristol. Construction work began on the pier and new pavilion in 2009, and was scheduled to re-open in July 2010() following a 39 million re-building programme. After continuing problems and set-backs leading to the pier not opening until a formal opening ceremony on 23 October 2010, the overall costs have reached 51 million. During the same period a 34 million redevelopment of the promenade, including refurbishment of the Marine Lake and pedestrianisation of Pier Square. As part of the work, a scour protection apron and splash wall were added as part of flood prevention measures.()At the end of the 20th and start of the 21st centuries, the town saw a growth in residential rehabilitation treatment centres for people with drug and alcohol problems, with attendant crime and social problems. These problems were highlighted by Westons MP, John Penrose during his speech in the House of Commons in 2005.()By 2009, it was home to around 11% of rehabilitation places in the UK and North Somerset council proposed an accreditation system examining the quality of counselling, staff training, transparency of referral arrangements, along with measures of the treatments effectiveness and site inspections.()GovernancealtStone building with colonnaded entrance. Above is a clock tower.|thumb|left|Weston-super-Mare town hall.Made an district in 1894, Weston-super-Mare became a borough in 1937. In 1974, under the Government Act 1972, it was merged into the Woodspring district of the County of Avon, and became a Trustees town. Weston-super-Mare regained its town council in 2000, becoming a civil parish.(Before 1974, Weston-super-Mare was in the County of Somerset. When Avon was split up in 1996, it became the administrative headquarters of the authority of Somerset, one of the successor authorities, which remains part of the county of Somerset.()The MP for the Weston-super-Mare parliamentary constituency is John Penrose of the Conservative Party, who won the seat in the 2005 General Election.()Weston is within the South West England constituency of the Parliament which elects six MEPs using the method of proportional representation.GeographyaltTwo photographs showing the sea wall and buildings. The left had side is an expanse of sand in the top picture and water covered in the bottom picture.|thumb|right|Low and high tidesThe mainly flat landscape of Weston is dominated by Hill, 109 metres (357 ft),() which borders the entire northern edge of the town, and Hill, 176 metres (577 ft) ( which together with the River Axe, and Down at Uphill form its southern border. In the centre of the town is Ellenborough Park a of Special Scientific Interest due to the range of plant species found there.()The beach of Bay lies on the western edge of the town. The upper part is sandy but the sea retreats a long way at low tide exposing large areas of mud flats (hence the colloquial name of Weston-super-Mud).() The tidal range in this part of the Channel is great, and since beach and mud flats are on a gentle slope, attempting to reach the sea at times of low tide is inadvisable as the sand gives way to mud which is very deep and has frequently resulted in loss of life over the years. Driving on the beach (which is permitted in certain areas) occasionally results the drivers of vehicles being caught unawares as they drive too close to the sea and break through the sand into the underlying mud and are then stuck.The tidal rise and fall in the Estuary and Bristol Channel can be as great as ,() second only to of Fundy in Canada.()() This tidal movement contributes to the deposition of natural mud in bays such as Weston. There has been concern about pollution levels from industrial areas in Wales and at the eastern end of the Bristol Channel, however this tends to be diluted by the Atlantic waters. There are measurable levels of chemical pollutants and little is known about their effects. Of particular concern are the levels of cadmium and to a lesser degree residual pesticides and hydrocarbons.()Just to the north of the town is Sand Point which marks the lower limit of the Estuary and the start of the Channel. It is also the site of the Hope  and geological Site of Special Scientific Interest.()ClimateAlong with the rest of West England, Weston has a temperate climate which is generally wetter and milder than the rest of the country.() The annual mean temperature is approximately . Seasonal temperature variation is less extreme than most of the United Kingdom because of the adjacent sea temperatures. The summer months of July and August are the warmest with mean daily maxima of approximately . In winter mean minimum temperatures of  or  are common.( In the summer the Azores high pressure affects the south-west of England, however convective cloud sometimes forms inland, reducing the number of hours of sunshine. Annual sunshine rates are slightly less than the regional average of 1,600 hours.( In December 1998 there were 20 days without sun recorded at Yeovilton. Most the rainfall in the south-west is caused by Atlantic depressions or by convection. Most of the rainfall in autumn and winter is caused by the Atlantic depressions, which is when they are most active. In summer, a large proportion of the rainfall is caused by sun heating the ground leading to convection and to showers and thunderstorms. Average rainfall is around . About 815 days of snowfall is typical. November to March have the highest mean wind speeds, and June to August have the lightest winds. The predominant wind direction is from the south-west.(DemographyAccording to the Kingdom Census 2001, the population of Weston-super-Mare is 71,758.(This makes it the largest settlement in North Somerset, which has a total population of 188,564. 20.7% of the towns population are aged 65 or over, compared with the national average of 16%.(98.6% of the population are white, compared with 90.9% nationally.(In 1831 the town population was 1,310,() and in 1801 just 138.() In 2001, the town comprised 31,715 households,( while in 1829 it comprised just 250.() The vast majority (98.6%) of the population described themselves as white in the 2001 census. 73.1% are Christian, with 17.7% describing themselves as having no religion. No other religious groups achieved as much as 0.5%.(EconomySince the 1970s, Weston has suffered a decline in popularity as a holiday destination, similar to all British seaside resorts.() This was a product of the advent of cheap foreign holidays together with the demise of the traditional works holidays associated with heavy and manufacturing industries elsewhere in UK. The town had become a centre of industries such as helicopter production, and maintenance at the GKN Westland factory until its closure in 2002,() however the company still retains a design office under the name GKN Aerospace Engineering Services at the Winterstoke Road site. Road transport links were improved with the motorway running close by, and the town now supports light industries and distribution depots, including Lidls distribution centre for its southern based stores, and functions partly as a dormitory town for Bristol.()  Vutrix, one of the largest semiconductor and video/audio distribution equipment companies within the television broadcasting industry is based in the town.() Two of the towns largest employers are the local council and College, which has recently begun to offer university degrees as a secondary campus of Spa University.(TourismaltBuilding on stilts above sand.|thumb|The SeaQuarium marine aquarium on the beachWeston-super-Mare is still a popular tourist destination, with attractions such as the long sandy beach, the Helicopter Museum,() Museum, the Grand Pier, the SeaQuarium aquarium and the seasonal Wheel of Weston.()  In 2009 a survey by England placed the pier at Weston amongst the top ten free attractions in the country.() On the Beach Lawns is a Railway operated by steam and diesel locomotives, and a putting green. The Paddle Steamer Waverley and MV Balmoral offer day sea trips from Knightstone Island to various destinations along the Channel and Severn estuary.()The Deco Tropicana, once a very popular lido on the beach, has suffered years of neglect.  It closed to the public in 2000, and despite a number of abortive designs and schemes to bring it back to life, its future lies in the balance.()International HeliDays, in association with The Helicopter Museum, are staged at the beach lawns over a long weekend around the end of July, where up to 75 helicopters from Europe fly in for static display. Helicopter Air Experience flights also take place on a regular basis from the Museum heliport. There is also an annual display by the Arrows.()Since the 1970s the number of visitors staying in the town has decreased.() In 1995 there were 4 million visitors but by 2005 this had risen to 5.3 million.() In 2007 69% of visitors to the resort were day visitors, which had grown since 2005 when 58% of visitors were day trippers.() The 2005 survey showed that day visitors stay in Weston-super-Mare for an average of six hours whilst overnight visitors stay for an average of five nights. The largest percentage of visitors (22%) were from the West Midlands. Weston was found to attract two distinct groups grey tourists over the age of 60 and families with young children.(On Thursdays throughout the summer, Weston Bike Nights is a weekly motorcycle meeting on the promenade, organised by Royal British Legion Riders Branch to raise money for Poppy Appeal.()In July 2011, North Somerset Council gave planning approval to the 50 million Leisure Dome,() a  ski slope to be built on the site of Locking. The site, which is due to open early in 2013, will include  a  wall, a wind tunnel for indoor skydiving, indoor surfing, a BMX track, a health and fitness club, and a number of shops and restaurants. The ski slope will be the longest in the United Kingdom.TransportThe  long  gauge Tramways network opened on 12 May 1902. The main route ran from Pier along the sea front to the Sanatorium (now Royal Sands); a branch line ran to the railway station and on to the tram depot in Locking Road. The fleet originally consisted of 12 double deck cars and 4 open-sided rack cars. The system was bought out by the competing bus company and closed on 18 April 1937, by which time the fleet comprised 8 double deck and 6 toast racks.() An earlier proposal for the Weston and Clevedon Tramway to run along the streets of the town to the sea front had failed to materialise, leaving the line as an ordinary railway with a terminus in Ashcombe Road.()Weston is close to junction 21 of the motorway, to which it is linked by a dual-carriageway relief road built in the 1990s. This replaced Locking Road as the designated A370 route and avoided some of the traffic congestion along that narrower urban road.()The and Exeter Railway arrived in Weston-super-Mare on 14 June 1841. This was not the route that serves todays railway station, but rather a single-track branch line from , mid way between the present day  and Uphill junctions, which terminated at a small station in Regent Street close to the High Street. A second larger station was constructed in 1866 to replace this, when planning permission was gained to create a loop station from the main line. After legal action was taken by residents along the proposed route new route through issues of planning blight, the station on the current site was constructed in 1881.()()File:Weston-super-Mare station 158750.jpg|thumb|right|altA two coach train beneath a lattice bridge|railway stationToday the station is situated close to the town centre and less than ten minutes walk from the sea front. It has direct services to London Paddington() operated by Great Western, and also trains to stations such as Bristol,  and .() CrossCountry services run to Birmingham and the North.() The station has two platforms.() Other stations are located at  and . During the middle of the day they are served by the local trains between Taunton, Bristol and Cardiff, but during the peak periods London trains call at both stations.( Weston Milton station is on the single track loop and therefore has only one platform, while Worle is on the main line and has two side platforms. The Weston loop diverges just to the southwest of Worle station, and the junction is therefore known as Worle Junction.(Most bus services are provided by Somerset & Avon() or Webberbus.() All services call at stops in the Regent Street and Big Lamp Corner area, including some stops in the adjacent High Street. Some town services and those to Bay, Wells, Burnham-on-Sea and Airport start from or run via the main railway station. The service to Bay is sometimes operated by an open top bus. Express and Bakers Dolphin operate long distance coach services, mostly from the coach terminal in Locking Road Car Park which is close to the railway station.The nearest operational airport to Weston is Airport, located  away at Lulsgate.EducationThe Authority of North Somerset, provides support for 78 schools, delivering education to approximately 28,000 pupils.() Infant and primary schools in Weston include: Ashcombe Primary, Becket Primary, Bournville Primary School, Castle Batch Primary school, Christ Church C of E Primary, Corpus Christi Catholic Primary, Herons Moor Community Primary, Hutton C of E Primary, Kewstoke Primary, Mead Vale Primary, Milton Park Primary, St. Georges V.A. Church Primary, St Marks VA Church of England/Methodist Ecumenical Primary School, Walliscote Primary, Windwhistle Primary and Worlebury St. Pauls C.E.V.A. First School.Secondary education is provided by Mathematics and Computing College, Community School, Community School and  Community School. Further and education is provided by College.() The towns four secondary schools GCSE results are in the bottom five and are below the average for schools in Somerset.()Culture300px|altWhite building behind the beach. It has a dome and colonnades to left and right.|thumb|left|The Winter GardensThe town contains several arts venues. The Playhouse serves both tourists and the local population. The Winter Gardens on the seafront hosts shows, exhibitions and conferences. The Blakehay Theatre & Community Arts Centre is a small venue housed in a former Baptist church.() All Saints Church hosts regular concerts, some of high national standing. This church is also used for recording, especially by the Ensemble and has featured on BBC TV programme of Praise.()Weston-super-Mare is home to a small colony of artists who have found inspiration in the west coast light, the townscape, and surrounding sea and landscapes, and who have set up studios in the town.The Odeon Cinema was opened in 1935 and is a building in the modernist style designed by Cecil Howitt. It houses the only Compton theatre pipe organ in an Odeon cinema outside London and is one of only two working theatre organs left in the country still performing in their original location in commercially operating cinemas. This Compton organ was installed in 1935 and is the only one left in the West Country, the next nearest being the Leicester Square, London. All other models have been either restored and moved elsewhere, or destroyed.() Occasional organ concerts continue to be held at the venue. The building has II Listed status.()Weston-super-Mare has a small number of live music venues of note. Scallys hosts more established touring rock bands,() while the Back Bar, The London, and The Imperial hold regular mic nights which attract a wide array of local musicians, as well as artists from further afield.()() The On The Beach concert has ben hosted annually since 2006 by 4 youth programme T4. Well known bands and singers perform four or fewer of their hits. However, the vocals are mimed as the event is being produced for live TV broadcast.()The Weston Arts Festival takes place each year during September and October using local venues including the Blakehay Theatre, Playhouse, All Saints, and galleries and offering a wide range of cultural events.()Weston is also the final event on the November Country Carnival circuit, when a large number of brightly illuminated floats parade through the streets.()The towns weekly newspaper is the & Somerset Mercury, which has been serving the population since 1843. It is now owned by publishing company Archant.() There are also two online publications The Weston Echo, and Weston super Mare People.The town was the subject of a song Sunny Weston-super-Mare performed by local band Wurzels.() The last scenes of The Remains of the Day, a James Ivory film of 1993, were shot at locations in the town including the Grand Pier and the Winter Gardens.()LandmarksThe Grand Pier, one of the most popular tourist attractions in the town which previously housed funfair style attractions, a go-kart track, cafes, a fudge factory, and a host of arcade games, underwent a 34 million re-development after a fire in 2008 destroyed the main pavilion.() After a harsh winter which delayed progress, the new pier pavilion reopened on 23 October 2010.()Westons first pier, Pier, standing on a small island to the north of the bay is currently closed to the public. The current owners, Manchester-based company Splash purchased the pier in 2006.  A competition was held as a means to encourage redevelopment of the site for commercial use.  To date, no firm plans are in place, and the future of Birnbeck Pier is uncertain.() The pier houses lifeboat station.Knightstone Island historically housed a theatre, swimming pool and sauna.() After years of disrepair and dereliction, the area has been redeveloped by Redrow Homes. During 2006/2007, luxury apartments and commercial outlets have been built on the site. Consideration has been taken due to the building status of much of the site.() Boat trips from here include the Waverley and Balmoral and trips to Holm and Holm islands as well as short trips around Weston Bay.(The Tropicana outdoor swimming pool that is located on the southern section of the sea front has not been occupied since 2000.() A private developer, Henry Boot, was selected to re-develop the site with a new Life Station leisure complex, which was planned to include a six lane,  swimming pool, water park, 96-bed hotel, restaurant, eight-screen cinema, 14 retail units, and a 20-lane bowling alley. The redevelopment was beset by delays and controversy.() A group of local residents challenged the council over its decision to appoint Henry Boot, asking to put forward their own proposals for the site.() In November 2009, the plans were finally abandoned,() leaving the future of the site uncertain.  In 2010 the council invited submissions from developers for a new, less ambitious, scheme to redevelop the site with a swimming pool at its heart.  A decision on a new scheme is expected towards the end of 2010.() The local authority announced on 23 August 2011 that it was giving developers six months to propose plans for a smaller development otherwise they will arrange to demolish the Tropicana.()Religious sitesMost of the towns churches and chapels are neo-Gothic 19th century structures. The Medieval village church of St John the Baptist was completely demolished in 1824 to make way for a new and larger place of worship.(All Saints Church was built between 1898 and 1902 to a design by Frederick Bodley and completed by his pupil F.C. Eden in the 14th century style so favoured by Bodley. It is a Grade II* building.()There is a Orthodox Church of St Andrew the Apostle in Grove Road, Milton.()SportFootball team A.F.C. play in the South at the purpose-built Woodspring Stadium, which opened in August 2004.()There are two rugby clubs in the town; RFC, formed in 1875,() and Hornets RFC, formed in 1962.() Weston play in National League 3 West finishing 9th in the 2010/11 season, whilst Hornets were 2010/11 Champions of the Somerset Premier League and will play 2011/12 season in the Western Counties division.  These are national level 5 and level 7 respectively in the English rugby union system.County Cricket Club played first class and one-day matches for one week a season on a pitch prepared at Clarence Park, near the sea front. This began in 1914 and continued until the last festival in 1996.()Cricket Club play at Park Ground.()The town is well known amongst motocross enthusiasts for staging the Weston race every autumn. In addition, races are also held for youth riders, sidecarcross riders and bike competitors.() The 2008 winner of the Weston Beach Race was ten time World Motocross Champion Everts of Belgium.()Notable peopleNotable current and former residents of the town include:File:Alexander Blue Plaque.jpg|thumb|Blue Plaque marking the birthplace of V. Alexander, 1st Earl Alexander of Hillsborough* V. Alexander, 1st Earl Alexander of Hillsborough: Minister of Defence in the Attlee government, raised in Weston-super-Mare()* Archer: author, politician and convicted perjurer()* Jhonn Balance: musician, founding member of TV and founder of Coil()* Blackmore: guitarist and founding member of Purple, Rainbow and Night.()* Christopherson: musician, founding member of Gristle and TV()* Cleese: actor and member of Python()* Dando: murdered broadcaster and journalist, after whom the sixth form centre at College and a garden in Grove Park are named()* Stanley Eddington: one of the foremost astrophysicists of the early 20th century, grew up in the town()* Fowler: game show champion(Daphne Fowler - Quiz Players)* Graves: actor, born in the town 30 June 1963()* Hope: comedian and actor, lived here as a child()* Sean Martin: writer and film director()* Con ONeill: actor()* Oldmixon (16731742): historian; born in Oldmixon()* The Revd. Dr John Polkinghorne KBE FRS: particle physicist and theologian.()* Price: (18351912) architect;() responsible for much of the architecture of the built environment in Weston-super-Mare and the distinctive character of the town* Radmilovic: Olympic gold medal athlete()* Taylor: footballer; born 25 February 1972 in the town()()* Trego: cricketer()ReferencesFurther reading******External links** Weston-super-Mare town council* Official Weston-super-Mare tourism website*  super Marede:Weston-super-Marees:Weston-super-Marefr:Weston-super-Mareit:Weston-super-Marela:Weston-super-Marenl:Weston-super-Mareno:Weston-super-Marenn:Weston-super-Marepl:Weston-super-Marero:Weston-super-Mareru:--simple:Weston-super-Marefi:Weston-super-Maresv:Weston-super-Marevo:Weston-super-Mare
332293
Quesnel,_British_Columbia
Quesnel () is a small city that is part of the Cariboo District of Columbia, Canada. Located nearly evenly between the cities of Prince George and Williams Lake, it is on the main route to northern British Columbia and the Yukon. It is claimed to be home to one of the worlds largest gold pans (disputed by Alaska and others).Quesnel is city to Shiraoi, Japan and Val-dOr, Quebec. Quesnel hosted the 2000 British Columbia Winter Games, an annual provincial amateur sports competition. To the east of Quesnel lie Wells, Barkerville, and Lake Provincial Park, a popular canoeing destination in the Mountains.HistoryThe name derives from Maurice Quesnel, who accompanied Simon Fraser on his journey to the Ocean.Quesnel came to called Quesnellemouth to distinguish it from Quesnel Forks, 60 miles up river. In 1870 it had been shortened to Quesnelle and by 1900 it was spelled the way it is now. Quesnel is located along the gold mining trail known as the Wagon Road and was the commercial centre of the Gold Rush. It also marks one end of the MacKenzie Heritage Trail.Because of its location on the River it was also an important landing for sternwheelers during 1862 until 1886 and then from 1909 until 1921. The last sternwheeler on the upper Fraser was Quesnels own namesake craft, and home town product, the Quesnel.Geography and climate* Location: * Elevation: * Average Annual Snowfall: * Average Annual Rainfall: * Frost Free Days: 179* Average Winter Temperature: * Extreme Minimum Temperature: * Average Summer Temperature: * Extreme Maximum Temperature: * Time Zone: Standard TimeClimateDemographicsQuesnel had a population of 9,326 people in 2006, which was a decrease of 7.1% from the 2001 census count. The median household income in 2005 for Quesnel was $54,044, which is slightly above the British Columbia provincial average of $52,709.()AdministrationCouncil:* Mayor: Sjostrom (elected November 2008)* Peter Couldwell* Mike Cave* Sushil Thapar* Laurey Roodenburg* Coralee Oakes* Ron PaullCanadian Federal Member of Parliament:* Harris, Party of CanadaMember of Columbia Legislative Assembly:* Bob Simpson, Democratic Party of British ColumbiaFestivitiesright|thumb|The Quesnel gold pan.Billy Barker Days is held every year on the third weekend in July. It celebrates Quesnels heritage and the first gold miner, William Barker (for whom Barkerville is named), to strike it rich in the Quesnel area. To kick off Billy Barker Days there is an annual Crash to Pass event. There is a large fair in downtowns Lebourdais Park. Throughout the weekend there are performers from all over Canada. There are contests and prizes, as well as many things for children to do, including a Kids Day. The food is quite popular too, with many locals who set up food booths. The Rodeo goes on all weekend, and the whole thing ends with a fireworks display on Sunday evening.Sports Figure skating The Quesnel Figure Skating Club operates at the Twin Arenas, is 50 years strong, and are the winners of the National Show it off for Skate Canada Contest.  They will be hosting a visit/seminar with Kurt Browning in the fall of 2011.  March 2012 will see the QFSC hosting the CNCR Regional Championships. Hockey Quesnel was home to the BCHLs Millionaires junior A hockey team, they are moving to Chilliwack for the 2011/2012 season.() Quesnel also has a minor hockey association. Soccer Soccer leagues in Quesnel include the Youth Soccer Association for youth soccer and the Mixed Soccer Association & Fun Soccer League for Adult soccer. The Strikers are Quesnels youth rep teams.Other sportsQuesnel also has minor softball, lacrosse, and football leagues. Some other sports such as rugby and cricket are played as non-organized sports but are not very popular. Taekwondo is a popular activity and Quesnel boasts one of the longest running clubs in BC. Deanes Black Belt Academy has been running nonstop since 1984.(www.quesnelkarate.com)Notable residents*Walker - Notable explorer.*Gassoff - Late NHL player.*Dallman - former York Islanders player.Neighbourhoods and nearby communities*Quesnel View*Quesnel*Red Bluff*Rich Bar*Dragon Lake*Cottonwood*NazkoSister citiesQuesnel has city agreements with the following cities:*  Val-dOr, Quebec, Canada*  Shiraoi, JapanEducationReferencesExternal links* City of Quesnel website* North Cariboo Visitors website* Quesnel Info website* Quesnel Community Portal* BritishColumbia.com - Quesnel(British Columbia)(Colombie-Britannique)pt:Quesnelsv:Quesnelvo:Quesnel
335201
List_of_company_name_etymologies
This is a list of company names with their name origins explained. Some origins are disputed.#*Century Fox  Film studio; formed in 1935 through the merger of William Foxs Fox Film, and Twentieth Century Pictures.(UCLA Film & Television Archive  Collections  Twentieth Century-Fox. Cinema.ucla.edu. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*23andme  Using the 23 pairs of chromosomes that make up each persons genome, the company helps individuals make sense of their own genome.(Google-Launches DNA Test!, 23 January 2008, date accessed 27 April 2008)*27b/6  The apartment where Orwell wrote the novel Nineteen Eighty Four was number 27B on level 6.(Go away. 27bslash6.com (2011-05-15). Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*37signals  Web development company; named for the 37 radiotelescope signals identified by astronomer Horowitz as potential messages from intelligence.(>> 33 > Whats in a Name?. 37signals. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*3Com  Network technology producer; the three coms are computer, communication, and compatibility.(Investor Information | Investor FAQs. 3Com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*3M  from the companys original name, Minnesota Mining and Manufacturing Company.(History. Solutions.3m.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*7-Eleven  Convenience stores; renamed from U-Totem in 1946 to reflect their newly extended hours, 7:00 am until 11:00 pm()A*Records  named after founders Herb Alpert and Jerry Moss(Archival Collection. Unitproj.library.ucla.edu. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*A&P  from Atlantic & Pacific in Atlantic and Pacific Tea Company, a U.S.-based supermarket chain.*Root Beer  named after founders Roy Allen and Frank Wright()*AMRO  in the 1960s, the Handel-Maatschappij (Dutch Trading Society; 1824) and De Twentsche Bank merged to form the Bank Nederland (ABN; General Bank of the Netherlands); in 1966, the Amsterdamsche Bank and the Rotterdamsche Bank merged to form the Amro Bank; in 1991, ABN and Amro Bank merged to form ABN AMRO.*Accenture  from Accent on the future. The name Accenture was proposed by a company employee in Norway as part of an internal name finding process (BrandStorming). Before 1 January 2001, the company was called Consulting.(The Long View: Putting An Accent On the Future. Accenture.com (2001-01-01). Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Acer  Born as Multitech International in 1976, the company changed its name to Acer in 1987. The Latin word for sharp, acute, able and facile*Adecco  named from the merger of Swiss staffing company Adia with French staffing company Ecco.(Company History  Adecco  the world leader in human resource solutions)*Adidas  from the name of the founder Adolf (Adi) Dassler.(History. Adidas-group.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Systems  from the Adobe Creek that ran behind the house of co-founder Warnock.(http://www.adobe.com/aboutadobe/pressroom/pdfs/fastfacts.pdf)*Ahold  a holding company of Albert Heijn and other supermarkets. For its 100th anniversary in 1987, Ahold was granted the title of Koninklijke  (Royal in Dutch) by the of the Netherlands, changing its name to Koninklijke Ahold (Royal Ahold).(Royal Ahold  AHO Annual and Transition Report (foreign private issuer) (20-F) Item 1. Description of Business. Sec.edgar-online.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Ahlstrom  named after founder Ahlstrm*Akai  named for its founder, Masukichi Akai.( Akai. Synthmuseum.com (2006-11-14). Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Akamai  from the Hawaiian word akamai  meaning smart or clever;(Hawaiian Dictionaries. Wehewehe.olelo.hawaii.edu (2009-04-27). Retrieved on 8 July 2011.) the company defines it as intelligent, clever and cool.(11 August 1999  Akamaize Adopted into Technology Lexicon. Akamai.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*AKZO  named from the 1969 merger of Algemene Kunstzijde Unie (AKU) and Koninklijke Zout Organon (KZO).(History)*Acoustics  from the companys original name, Akustische und Kino-Gerte (Acoustic and Cinema Equipment)*Alcatel-Lucent  Alcatel was named from Socit Alsacienne de Constructions Atomiques, de Tlcomunications et dElectronique.(Alcatel History) It took over Lucent Technologies in 2006.*Alcoa  Aluminum Company of America.(About Alcoa: Trademark History. Alcoa. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Aldi  portmanteau for Albrecht (name of the founders) and discount*Romeo  the company was originally known as ALFA, an acronym for Anonima Lombarda Fabbrica Automobili. When Nicola Romeo bought ALFA in 1915, his surname was appended.*Alstom  set up as Alsthom in 1928 by Socit Alsacienne de Constructions Mcaniques and Compagnie Franaise Thomson-Houston, it changed the spelling to Alstom in 1997.*AltaVista  Spanish for high view.*ALZA  from the name of the founder Alex Zaffaroni.*Amazon.com  founder Bezos renamed the company Amazon (from the earlier name of Cadabra.com) after the worlds most voluminous river, the Amazon. He saw the potential for a larger volume of sales in an online (as opposed to a bricks and mortar) bookstore. (Alternative: Amazon was chosen to cash in on the popularity of Yahoo, which listed entries alphabetically.)*AmBev  American Beverage Company, the largest Brazilian beverage company and fourth in the world. In 2004 it merged with Interbrew to create Inbev, which in turn purchased Anheuser-Busch in 2008 to form InBev.*Theatres  American Multi-Cinema: the company pioneered multi-screen cinemas.(AMC Theatres. AMC Theatres (2009-03-16). Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*AMD  Advanced Micro Devices*AMKOR  AMericanKORea(Amkor Technology. Amkor.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Corporation  The original developers of the 16-bit Amiga computer chose the name, which means a female friend in Spanish and Portuguese, because it sounded friendly, and because it came before rivals (Inc. and Atari) alphabetically.(DeMaria and Wilson (2003) High Score!: The Illustrated History of Electronic Games p.109 ISBN 0-07-223172-6)*Amoco  AMerican Oil COmpany  now part of BP*Amstrad  Amstrad Consumer Electronics plc was founded by Lord Michael Sugar in the UK. The name is a contraction of Alan Michael Sugar Trading.*InBev  Formed by the 2008 purchase of Anheuser-Busch by InBev. Anheuser-Busch was named for the companys original founder, Anheuser, and his later partner Busch.*Corporation Limited  The business and marketing arm of Indian Space Research Organization (ISRO). The name Antrix is an anglicized version of Antariksh, from the Sanskrit word for space or sky.*AOL  from America Online. The company was founded in 1983 as Quantum Computer Services.*Apache  according to the projects 1997 FAQ: The Apache group was formed around a number of people who provided patch files that had been written for NCSA httpd 1.3. The result after combining them was A PAtCHy server.(Apache HTTP Server Project. Web.archive.org (1997-04-15). Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Apple  For the favorite fruit of co-founder Jobs and/or for the time he worked at an apple orchard, and to distance itself from the cold, unapproachable, complicated imagery created by other computer companies at the time  which had names such as IBM, DEC, and Cincom*Computers  early UK-based microcomputer company founded by ACT (Applied Computer Techniques), a business software and services supplier. The company wanted a fruity name (Apple and Acorn were popular brands) that included the letters A, C and T. Apricot fit the bill.*Arbys  the enunciation of the initials of its founders, the Raffel Brothers. The partners wanted to use the name Big Tex, but were unsuccessful in negotiating with the Akron businessman who was already using the name. So, Forrest said, We came up with Arbys, which stands for R.B., the initials of Raffel Brothers, although I guess customers might think the initials stand for roast beef.*Arcelor  created in 2001 by a merger of Arbed (Luxembourg), Aceralia (Spain) and Usinor (France) with the ambition of becoming a major player in the steel industry.*AREVA  named from the region of vila in northern Spain, location of the Arevalo abbey. Arevalo was shorted to AREVA.*Aricent  communications software company name created in 2006 by combining two words arise and ascent.*Limited  named after the microprocessor developed by small UK company Acorn as a successor to the 6502 used in its BBC Microcomputer. ARM originally stood for Acorn Risc Machine. When the company was spun off with backing from Apple and VTI, this was changed to Advanced Risc Machines.*& Hammer  based on the arm and hammer of Vulcan, the Roman god of fire and metalworking. It was previously the logo of the Vulcan Spice Mills in Brooklyn. When James Church, the son of Church & Dwight founder Austin Church, came to Church and Dwight from Vulcan Spice Mills, he brought the logo with him.()*ARP  company that made analog synthesizers in the 1970s, named after founder Alan Robert Pearlman.*Artis (zoo in Amsterdam)  from the Latin phrase, Natura Artis Magistra, or Nature is Arts Teacher*Asda  Asda Stores Limited was founded as Associated Dairies & Farm Stores Ltd in 1949. However the formation of the Asda name occurred in 1965 with the merger of the Asquith chain of three supermarkets and Associated Dairies; Asda is an abbreviation of Asquith and Dairies, a large UK supermarket chain that is now a subsidiary of Wal-Mart.*ASICS  an acronym for Anima Sana In Corpore Sano, which, translated from Latin, means Healthy soul in a healthy body. Originally the citation is mens sana in corpore sano, but MSICS does not sound as good.*Ask.com  search engine formerly named after Jeeves, the gentlemans gentleman (valet, not butler) in G. Wodehouses series of books. Ask Jeeves was shortened to Ask in 2006.*Asus   named after Pegasus, the winged horse of Greek mythology. The first three letters of the word were dropped to get a high position in alphabetical listings. An Asus company named Pegatron, using the spare letters, was spun off in 2008.(Asus aims for the gorgeous market. Guardian. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Martin  from the Aston Hill races (near Clinton) where the company was founded, and the surname of Martin, the companys founder.*AT&T  the American Telephone and Telegraph Corporation officially changed its name to AT&T in the 1990s.*Atari  named from the board game Go. Atari is a Japanese word to describe a position where an opponents stones are in danger of being captured. It is similar, though not identical, to check in chess. The original games company was American but wanted a Japanese-sounding name.*ATI  Array Technologies Incorporated*ATS  Auto Technik Spezialerzeugnisse, a German company producing light alloy wheels and motor parts, which ran its own Formula 1 racing team in the late 1970s and early 1980s.*Audi  Latin translation of the German name Horch. The founder Horch left the company after five years, but still wanted to manufacture cars. Since the original Horch company was still there, he called his new company Audi, the Latin form of his last name. In English it is hark.B*Photo Video  Blimie Schreiber and her husband, company founder Herman Schreiber.*B&Q  from the initials of its founders, Richard Block and David Quayle*Babolat  named for its founder, Pierre Babolat*Bahco  from the name B.A. Hjort & Company. Founder Berndt August Hjort signed a deal to distribute the tools of inventor Petter Johansson.*& Olufsen  from the names of its founders, Peter Bang and Svend Olufsen, who met at a School of Engineering in Denmark.*Bally  originally Lion Manufacturing, the company changed its name to Bally after the success of its first popular pinball machine, Ballyhoo.*Banesto  from Banco Espaol de Crdito (Spanish Credit Bank)*BAPE  A Bathing Ape is a cult clothing company founded by Tomoaki Nigo Nagao in 1993.(Breaking Down Bapes TheHipHopIcon.com, 2007. Retrieved 4 October 2007) The name is derived from a Japanese saying, A Bathing Ape In Lukewarm Water, which Nigo says is a reference to the young generation being spoiled, pampered and too complacent.()*BASF  from Badische Anilin und Soda Fabriken. Anilin and Soda were the first products. Badisch refers to the location in the state of Baden, Germany (Black Forest region).*Bauknecht  founded as an electrotechnical workshop in 1919 by Gottlob Bauknecht, and now a Whirlpool brand.*Bayer  named after Friedrich Bayer, who founded the company in 1863.*BBC  British Broadcasting Corporation, originally Broadcasting Company.*BBVA  Banco Bilbao Vizcaya Argentaria, a Spanish banking group formed in 1999 from the merger of Banco Bilbao Vizcaya and Argentaria.*Research  from the companys former name, Business Communications Company.*Systems  from the first initial of each of the companys three founders: Bill Coleman, Ed Scott and Alfred Chuang.*BEML  Bharat Earth Movers Limited, a government of India company.*& Jerrys  named after Ben Cohen and Jerry Greenfield, who founded an ice cream parlor in 1978 after completing a correspondence course on ice cream making from Pennsylvania State University. The company, Ben & Jerrys Homemade Holdings, Inc. was later taken over by Unilever.*BenQ  Bringing Enjoyment and Quality to life(BenQ Corporation | Introduction: International Directory of Company Histories)*BHP  Broken Hill Proprietary, named after the town of Hill, where BHP was founded (now BHP Billiton)*BIC Corporation  the pen company was named after one of its founders, Marcel Bich. He dropped the final h to avoid a potentially inappropriate English pronunciation of the name.*& Decker  named after founders S. Duncan Black and Alonzo G. Decker.*Blaupunkt  Blaupunkt (Blue dot) was founded in 1923 under the name Ideal. Its core business was the manufacturing of headphones. If the headphones came through quality tests, the company would give the headphones a blue dot. The headphones quickly became known as the blue dots or blaue Punkte. The quality symbol would become a trademark and the trademark would become the company name in 1938.*BMW  Bayerische Motoren Werke (Bavarian Motor Works).*Boeing  named after founder William E. Boeing. It was originally called Pacific Aero Products Co.*Bosch  named after founder Robert Bosch. Robert Bosch GmbH (full company name) is a German diversified technology-based corporation.*Corporation  named after founder Bose.*BSNL  from Bharat Sanchar Nigam Limited (India Communications Corporation Limited).*BP  formerly British Petroleum, now BP. (The slogan Beyond Petroleum has incorrectly been taken to refer to the companys new name following its rebranding effort in 2000.)*BRAC  Bangladesh Rural & Advancement Committee, worlds largest NGO (non governmental organization).*Bridgestone  named after founder Shojiro Ishibashi. The surname Ishibashi () means stone bridge, or bridge of stone.*Corp.  sporting goods company named after founder, W.H. Brine. It was taken over by Balance in 2006.*Sports  an anglicized version of Bruchs, the maiden name of the wife of founder Morris Goldenberg.*BSA  Birmingham Small Arms Company.*BT  formerly British Telecom (from BT Group, formerly British Telecommunications plc.)*Buick  Named for its founder, Dunbar Buick. The company was the original focal point for Motors, established in 1908 as a holding company for Buick plus other companies acquired by C. Durant. Buick survives to this day as a GM brand.*Bull  Compagnie des machines Bull was founded in Paris to exploit the patents for punched card machines taken out by Norwegian engineer Rosing Bull.*Corporation  founded in 1886 as the American Arithmometer Company and later renamed after the adding machine invented by William Seward Burroughs. The company took over Corporation and became Unisys.*Bultaco  Spanish company of motorcycles, which disappeared in the 1980s. Its name is based on the name of its founder, Paco Bult.*BHEL  Bharat Heavy Electricals Limited, a government of India company.C*CA   Computer Associates was founded in 1976 as Computer Associates International, Inc. by Wang*C&A  named after the brothers Clemens and August Brenninkmeijer, who founded a textile company called C&A in the Netherlands in 1841.*Cadillac  named after the 18th century French explorer Laumet de La Mothe, sieur de Cadillac, founder of Detroit, Michigan. Cadillac is a small town in the South of France. The company, founded in 1902, was purchased by General Motors in 1909 and survives to this day as a GM brand.*CAE  originally Canadian Aviation Electronics*Campagnolo  from the name of its founder, Campagnolo.*Canon  Originally (1933) Precision Optical Instruments Laboratory the new name (1935) derived from the name of the companys first camera, the Kwanon, in turn named after the Japanese name of the Buddhist bodhisattva of mercy.*Caprabo  Catalan supermarkets, founded by Carb, Prats and Bonet.*Carrefour  chain of supermarkets and hypermarkets which started with a store near a crossroads (carrefour in French) in Annecy.*Caterpillar  Originally Holt Tractor Co, merged with Best Tractor Co. in 1925. A company photographer exclaimed aloud of a Holt tractor that the tracks movement resembled a caterpillar moving along the ground. The name stuck.*Pacific Airways Limited  The airline was founded on 24 September 1946 by American Roy C. Farrell and Australian Sydney H. de Kantzow, with each man putting up HK$1 to register the airline. They named it Cathay Pacific because Cathay was the ancient name given to China; and Pacific because Farrell speculated that they would one day fly across the Pacific.*Casio  from the name of its founder, Kashio Tadao, who had set up the company Kashio Seisakujo as a subcontractor factory.*CBS  Columbia Broadcasting System*CDAC  Centre for Development of Advanced Computing, a government of India company.*Celera  inspired by celerity or swiftness (in decoding the human genome), with era of the cell a secondary meaning.()*Cenex  short for Central Exchange*Group  from the first letters of Information Management Consultant in French (Conseillers en Gestion et Informatique).*Chevrolet  named after company co-founder Chevrolet, a Swiss-born auto racer. The company was merged into General Motors in 1917 and survives only as a brand name.*Chello  a Dutch internet service provider, its name was originally pronounced say hello (in Dutch the letter C at the beginning of a word is pronounced say). This did not catch on and now it is pronounced cello (as in the stringed instrument).*Chrysler  named after the company founder, P. Chrysler.*Ciba Geigy  CIBA, named from Chemical Industry Basel (after Basel in Switzerland), merged with a company named after its founder Johann Rudolf Geigy-Merian. It became Novartis (below) after a merger with Sandoz.*Pizza  from the first letters of the last names of the founders of the franchise (Joe Croce and Mike Cole).*Cigna  CIGNA was formed in 1982 through the combination of Insurance Company of North America (INA) and Connecticut General (CG). The name is combination of the letters of the predecessor companies, CG and INA.(CIGNA Company History. Cigna.com (2011-01-04). Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Cincom  originally called United Computer Systems, which was similar to several other software and services companies of the day. Two of the three founders visited Philco (Philadelphia Company), and this inspired them to create a new company name derived from Cincinnati (where it was based) and Computer (its business).*Cisco  short for San Francisco.*Citron  named after Andr-Gustave Citron (18781935), a French entrepreneur of Dutch descent. He was the fifth and last child of the Dutch Jewish diamond merchant Levie Citroen and Mazra Kleinmann (of Warsaw, Poland). The Citroen family moved to Paris from Amsterdam in 1873 where the name changed to Citron.*Coca-Cola  derived from the coca leaves and nuts used as flavoring. Coca-Cola creator S. Pemberton changed the K of kola to C to make the name look better.*Coleco  began as the Connecticut Leather Company.*Colgate-Palmolive  formed from a merger of soap manufacturers Colgate & Company and Palmolive-Peet. Peet was dropped in 1953. Colgate was named after William Colgate, an English immigrant, who set up a starch, soap and candle business in New York City in 1806. Palmolive was named for the two oils (Palm and Olive) used in its manufacture.*COLT  from City Of London Telecom*Comcast  from communications and broadcast.*Compaq  from computer and pack to denote a small integral object; or: Compatibility And Quality; or: from the companys first product, the very compact Portable.*COMSAT  a contraction of communications satellites. This American digital telecommunications and satellite company was founded during the era of U.S. President F. Kennedy era to develop the technology.*ConocoPhillips  formed from the merger of Conoco (from Continental Oil Company) and the Petroleum Company.*Copersucar  Brazilian production cooperative in sugar and alcohol, its name is a contraction of Cooperativa de Aucar e lcool.*Corel  from Cowpland Research Laboratory, after the name of the companys founder, Dr. Cowpland.(Cowpland/Corel (Profile). Thecanadianencyclopedia.com (1997-05-05). Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Cosworth  automotive engineering company named after company founders Mike Costin and Keith Duckworth.*CPFL  Companhia Paulista de Fora e Luz (Paulo Company of Light and Power), one of the largest in Brazil, based in Campinas.*& Evelyn  toiletry company named after gardener Evelyn, and the tree that bears Crabapples*Cray  supercomputer company named after its founder, Cray.*Press  originally Chemical Rubber Company*Cromemco  early microcomputer company in Silicon Valley (circa 1975198?) founded by two PhD students who once lived at Stanford Universitys Crothers Memorial Hall (a dormitory).*Cutco   Cooking Utensils Company.()*CVS  originally Consumer Value Stores. CEO Tom Ryan has said he now considers CVS to stand for Customer, Value, and Service.D*Daewoo  company founder Kim Woo Chong called it Daewoo which means Great House or Great Universe in Korean.*Trucks  from 1932 the companys name was Van Doornes Aanhangwagen Fabriek (Van Doornes Trailer Factory). In 1949 the company started making trucks, trailers and buses and changed the name into Van Doornes Automobiel Fabriek (Van Doornes Automobile Factory).*Daihatsu  the first kanji from Osaka (, the kanji is here pronounced dai) and engine (, the first kanji is hatsu). Engine manufacturers were listed on the Tokyo and Osaka Stock Exchanges, and their names shortened to the first kanji. (The company listed on the Tokyo exchange is Tohatsu.)*Danone (Dannon in the U.S.)  Isaac Carasso in Barcelona made his first yoghourts with the nickname of his first son Daniel (DAN-ONE)*Datsun  first called DAT, from the initials of its financiers Den, Aoyama and Takeuchi. Soon changed to DATSON to imply a smaller version of their original car, then (as SON can mean loss in Japanese) again to DATSUN when they were acquired by Nissan.*Debian  project founder Ian Murdock named it after himself and his girlfriend, Debra.*DEC  Digital Equipment Corporation, a pioneering American minicomputer manufacturer founded by Olsen and taken over by Compaq, before Compaq was merged into Hewlett-Packard (HP). It was generally called DEC (deck), but later tried to rebrand itself as Digital.*DEKA  named after its founder Dean Kamen, developer of the Segway, iBOT, HomeChoice Dialysis and other products.*Delhaize  named after its founders, Jules Delhaize and his brothers, who originated from Charleroi (Belgium). They opened the first European self-service supermarket in Ixelles/Elsene, a Brussels borough.*Dell  named after its founder, Dell. The company changed its name from Dell Computer in 2003.*& Fourcade, Inc.  interior designer company named after its founders Denning and Fourcade in 1960.*DHL  named after its founders, Adrian Dalsey, Larry Hillblom, and Robert Lynn.*Sporting Goods  named after its founder, Dick Stack, who opened a bait and tackle shop in 1948 with a $300 gift from his grandmother.(Dicks Sporting Goods. Dickssportinggoods.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Digg, Inc.- Kevin Roses friend David Prager (The Screen Savers, This Week in Tech) originally wanted to call the site Diggnation, but Kevin wanted a simpler name. He chose the name Digg, because users are able to dig stories, out of those submitted, up to the front page. The site was called Digg instead of Dig because the domain name dig.com was previously registered, by Walt Disney Internet Group. Diggnation would eventually be used as the title of Kevin Rose and Alex Albrechts weekly podcast discussing popular stories from Digg.*Digi-Key  electronic component distributor whose name is derived from founder Dr. Ronald Stordahls amateur radio telegraphic keyer, the IC Keyer Kit, which utilized digital integrated circuits.*Walt Disney Company, named for its co-founder Disney.*Dixons  commonly-used abbreviation for DSG International plc (Dixons Stores Group), a UK-based retailer. The company was founded in 1937 by Charles Kalms and Michael Mindel. When opening their first photographic shop in Southend, they only had room for six letters on the fascia, and chose the name Dixons from the phone book.*DKNY  Donna Karan New York.*Dow  named after its founder, Henry Dow.*Reade  named after Duane and Reade Streets in lower Manhattan, where the chains first warehouse was located.( Founded in 1960 by the brothers Abraham, Eli, and Jack Cohen, Duane Reade started as a three-store health-and-beauty chain that took the name of the two streets that bounded its lower-Broadway warehouse.)*Dynegy  the Natural Gas Clearinghouse changed its name in 1998 to reflect its self-described traits as a dynamic energy company. Dynergy had already been taken by a German health foods company.E*EA Games  EA is from Electronic Arts. The company was founded in May 1982 as Amazin Software and changed its name to Electronic Arts in October the same year.*eBay  Pierre Omidyar, who had created the Auction Web trading website, had formed a web consulting concern called Echo Bay Technology Group. Echo Bay did not refer to the town in Nevada, It just sounded cool, Omidyar reportedly said. Bay Mines Limited, a gold mining company, had already taken EchoBay.com, so Omidyar registered what (at the time) he thought was the second best name: eBay.com.*EDS  Electronic Data Systems, founded in 1962 by former IBM salesman Perot. According to the company history:(Timeline | eds.com) He chose Electronic Data Systems from potential names he scribbled on a pledge envelope during a service at Highland Park Presbyterian Church in Dallas.*Eidos  named from a Greek word meaning species. The company became well-known for its Tomb Raider series of games.*Eletropaulo  One of the largest Brazilian companies in electricity generation and distribution, its name derives from Companhia de Electricidade de So Paulo.*Embraer  Brazilian aircraft manufacturer, its name is an abbreviation of Empresa Brasileira de Aeronutica (Brazilian Aeronautics Company).*EMBRAPA  Brazilian state agricultural research and development company, its name is an abbreviation of Empresa Brasileira de Pesquisa Agropecuria (Brazilian Agriculture Research Company).*EMBRATEL  an abbreviation of Empresa Brasileira de Telecomunicaes (Brazilian Telecommunications Company). Brazils largest telecommunications company, it was a monopoly until 1992 when it was privatized and sold to MCI, then later resold to Telmex.*Corporation  named from the initials of the founders, Richard Egan and Roger Marino. There has long been a rumor that another partner provided the third letter (C). Other reports indicate the C stands for Company. EMC adopted the EMC notation to refer to Einsteins famous equation, E  mc.*EMI  formerly Electric and Musical Industries Ltd.*Emporis  Empor comes from the German and means aloft, rising. One of the worlds largest providers of data concerning buildings.*Equifax  Equitable and factual*& Young  Named for the companys founders, A.C. Ernst and Arthur Young.*Ericsson  Telefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson is named after its founder Lars Magnus Ericsson, who opened a telegraph equipment repair shop in Stockholm, Sweden, in 1876.(Company Facts. Ericsson. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*ESPN  Entertainment and Sports Programming Network*ESRI  Environmental Systems Research Institute, the first geographic information system (GIS) software company founded by Jack and Laura Dangermond in Redlands, California, in 1969*Epson  Epson Seiko Corporation, the Japanese printer and peripheral manufacturer, was named from Son of Electronic Printer*Esso  the enunciation of the initials S.O. in Standard Oil of New Jersey.*Exxon  a name contrived by Esso (Standard Oil of New Jersey) in the early 1970s to create a neutral but distinctive label for the company. Within days, Exxon was being called the double cross company but this eventually subsided. (Esso is a trademark of ExxonMobil.) Esso had to change its name in the U.S. because of restrictions dating to the 1911 Standard Oil antitrust decision.F*F5 Networks  originally F5 Labs  taken from the Fujita scale of ratings for tornado intensity, where F5 is the most intense to be used in normal practice even though the scale can physically describe up to F12 which corresponds to wind velocities of Mach 1.0.*FAS  abbreviation for iseanna Saothair (Labour Facilities Foundation).  Fs means grow in Irish.*Facebook  name stems from the colloquial name of books given to newly enrolled students at the start of the academic year by university administrations in the US with the intention of helping students to get to know each other better.*Isaac Corporation  named after founders Bill Fair and Earl Isaac.*Fazer  Finnish food company named after its founder, Fazer.*FCUK  French Connection United Kingdom.*FedEx  abbreviation of Federal Express Corporation, the companys original name.(FedEx Historical Timeline. Fedex.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Fegime  abbreviation for Fdration Europenne des Grossistes Indpendants (European Federation of Independent Electrical Wholesalers).*Ferodo  anagram of the name of its founder, Herbert Froode.*Ferrari  from the name of its founder, Ferrari.*Fiat  acronym of Fabbrica Italiana Automobili Torino (Italian Automobile Factory of Turin)*Finnair  from Finland and air. Originally called Aero Osakeyhti, which led to its international flight code, AY.*Firestone  named after its founder, Firestone.*Guys  American restaurant chain founded by five guys  Jerry Murrell and his four sons. The five guys would later become the Murrell sons, after Jerry and his wife Janie had a fifth son two years after opening their first restaurant.()()*Fluke  named after its founder, John Fluke, Sr.*Motor Company  named after its founder, Ford, who introduced automobile mass production in 1914.*Research  from the family name of the mother of the founder Forrester Colony.*FranklinCovey  named after Franklin and Covey. The company was formed from the 1997 merger of FranklinQuest and the Covey Leadership Center.*Fuji  named after Mount Fuji, the highest mountain in Japan.G*Garmin  named after its founders, Gary Burrell and Dr. Min Kao.*Gartner  named after its founder, Gideon Gartner, who left the firm in 1992 to start Giga (named from Gideon Gartner).*Pizza  Gatti was the maiden name of Pat Eure, wife of company founder Jim Eure.*Media  named after the merger of the GWR Group and Capital Radio Group in May 2005. GWR was launched in 1985 after the merger of Radio West and Wiltshire Radio.*Genentech  from Genetic Engineering Technology.*GEICO  from Government Employees Insurance Company*Gerdau  Largest producer of long steel in the Americas, named from the surname of the founder: Johannes Heinrich Kaspar Gerdau.*Glaxo  a dried-milk company set up in Bunnythorpe, New Zealand, by Joseph Edward Nathan. The company wanted to use the name Lacto but it was similar to some already in use. Glaxo evolved and was registered on 27 October 1906. GlaxoSmithKline was a 2000 merger of Wellcome and SmithKline Beecham.*Ges.m.b.H.  named after its founder, Glock.*Goodyear  named after the founder of vulcanization, Goodyear, the Goodyear Tire and Rubber company was founded by Frank Seiberling in 1898.*Google  an originally accidental misspelling of the word googol and settled upon because google.com was unregistered. Googol was proposed to reflect the companys mission to organize the immense amount of information available online.*Global Group  an advertising and marketing agency supposed to have derived its name from the colour of the walls of its first office.*Groupon  chief executive Andrew Mason used the derivation as his five-word acceptance speech at the 2011 Webby Awards ceremony: Its short for group coupon.(Welcome to the Webby Awards. Webbyawards.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Grundig  named after its founder, radio dealer-turned-manufacturer Grundig, in 1945.*Aerospace  named after the Stream current that starts in the Gulf of Mexico and crosses the Atlantic. The company traces its origins to the Aircraft Engineering Corporation, which was sold and renamed in 1985.H*Hagen-Dazs  Name was invented in 1961 by ice-cream makers and Rose Mattus of the Bronx to convey an aura of the old-world traditions and craftsmanship.(Hagen-Dazs | Company | History. Haagen-dazs.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.) The name has no meaning.*Haier  Chinese  sea and  (a transliteration character; also means you in Chinese). Portion of transliteration of German Liebherr .*H&M  named from Hennes & Mauritz. In 1947, Swedish businessman Erling Persson established Hennes, a ladies clothing store, in Vsters, Sweden. Hennes is Swedish for hers. In 1968, Persson bought the Stockholm premises and inventory of a hunting equipment store called Mauritz Widforss. The inventory included a collection of mens clothing, which prompted Persson to expand into menswear.*Haribo  from the name of the founder and the German home town of the company: Hans Riegel, Bonn.*Kardon  named after its founders Dr. Sidney Harman and Bernard Kardon.*Productions  production company founded by Oprah Winfrey. Harpo is Oprah backwards.*Hasbro  founded by Henry and Helal Hassenfeld, the Hassenfeld Brothers.*HBOS  UK-based banking company formed by the merger of the Halifax and the Bank of Scotland.*HCL  Hindustan Computers Ltd, Indian software company founded by Nadar.*Corporation  named after its founder Leon Hess.*HP  Hewlett and Packard tossed a coin to decide whether the company they founded would be called Hewlett-Packard or Packard-Hewlett.*Hispano-Suiza  a former Spanish luxury automotive and engineering firm; its name  literally meaning Spanish-Swiss  refers to Spanish origin of the company and Swiss origin of its head engineer Birkigt*Hitachi  old place name, literally sunrise*HMV  from His Masters Voice, which appeared in 1899 as the title of a painting of Nipper, a Jack Russell terrier, listening to a gramophone.*Hoechst  from the name of a district in Frankfurt.*Honda  from the name of its founder, Honda.*Honeywell  from the name of Honeywell, founder of Honeywell Heating Specialty Co. It later merged with Minneapolis Heat Regulator Company and was finally called Honeywell Inc. in 1963.*Hospira  the name, selected by the companys employees, is derived from the words hospital, spirit, inspire and the Latin word spero, which means hope. It expresses the hope and optimism that are critical in the healthcare industry.*Hotmail  Founder Jack Smith got the idea of accessing e-mail via the web from a computer anywhere in the world. When Bhatia came up with the business plan for the mail service he tried all kinds of names ending in mail and finally settled for Hotmail as it included the letters HTML  the markup language used to write web pages. It was initially referred to as HoTMaiL with selective upper casing. (At one time, if you clicked on Hotmails mail tab, you would have seen HoTMaiL in the URL, but since Hotmail is now Windows Live Mail, it is no longer there.)*Block  after the founders, brothers Henry W. and Richard Bloch (with Bloch changed to Block to avoid mispronunciation).*HSBC  Hongkong and Shanghai Banking Corporation.*Corporation  A contraction of its original corporate name, High Tech Computer Corporation.*Bay Company  in 1670, a Royal Charter granted the lands of the Hudson Bay watershed to the Governor and Company of Adventurers of England trading into Hudson Bay. The company ceded the territory to Canada in 1870.(Hbc Heritage  Our History  Overview. Hbc.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Hyundai  connotes the sense of the present age or modernity in Korean.I*IBM  named by Tom (Thomas John) Watson Sr, an ex-employee of National Cash Register (Corporation). To one-up them in all respects, he called his company International Business Machines.*ICL  abbreviation for Computers Limited, once the UKs largest computer company but now a service arm of Fujitsu, of Japan.*Farben  Interessen-Gemeinschaft Farbenindustrie AG was so named because the constituent German companies produced dyestuffs among many other chemical compounds. The consortium is most known today for its central participation in the World War II Holocaust, as it made the B gas used in the chambers.*Iiyama  manufacturer of monitors and TVs named after the Japanese city, Iiyama.*IKEA  a composite of the first letters in the Swedish founder Kamprads name in addition to the first letters of the names of the property and the village in which he grew up: Ingvar Kamprad Elmtaryd Agunnaryd.*IMI  Imperial Metal Industries. Split off from Imperial Chemical Industries.*InBev  the name was created after the merger of the Belgian company Interbrew with Brazilian Ambev*Inditex  a Spanish group named from Industria de Diseo Textil (Textile Design Industry).*Technologies  derived from Infinity and Aeon. The name was given to Siemenss Semiconductor branch (called Siemens HL or Siemens SC/SSC) when it was spun off.*Infosys  An Indian software major. Information Systems*Ingenico  electronic payment device manufacturer based in Paris and named from the French Ingenieux Compagnie (Ingenious Company).*Inktomi  an internet search engine, acquired by Yahoo! in 2002, was named after Iktomi, a spider-trickster spirit from Lakota Indian legends.*Intel  Robert Noyce and Gordon Moore initially incorporated their company as N M Electronics. Someone suggested Moore Noyce Electronics but it sounded too close to more noise. Later, Integrated Electronics was proposed but it had already been taken, so they used the initial syllables (INTegrated ELectronics). To avoid potential conflicts with other companies with similar names, Intel purchased the name rights for $15,000 from a company called Intelco. (Source: Intel 15 Years Corporate Anniversary Brochure)*Systems  an Indian company named from the famous philosophical dictum: I think therefore I am (ergo sum).(Ittiam l About Us l Identity)J*J2TV  from television and film production company formed by Malcolm in the Middle actor Justin Berfield and producer Jason Felts.*JAL  from Japan Airlines*Airways  founded in 1927 as Aeroput (Airway in Serbian). From 1947, it was known as JAT (Jugoslovenski Aero Transport). After the break-up of the former Yugoslavia (and after Federal Republic of Yugoslavia changed its name to Serbia and Montenegro), the company kept the name, Jat, but not as an abbreviation.*Motors  from Janeek (the owner) and Wanderer (the motorcycle product).*JBL  from James B Lansing, an electronics designer*& Johnson  Originally a partnership between brothers James Wood Johnson and Edward Mead Johnson in 1885, the addition of brother Robert Wood Johnson I led to formal incorporation as Johnson & Johnson in 1887.*JVC  Japan Victor Company (Victor Company of Japan, Ltd) was founded in 1927 as a US subsidiary, The Victor Talking Machine Company of Japan, Limited. JVC developed the VHS video cassette format.K*Kalev  after Kalev, the character from mythology and epic Kalevipoeg.*Kawasaki  from the name of its founder, Kawasaki*KFC  short for Kentucky Fried Chicken. It is popularly believed that the company adopted the abbreviated name in 1991 to avoid the unhealthy connotations of the word fried. The rumor that it was because the Commonwealth of Kentucky trademarked the name Kentucky is false. Commercials in the early 2000s tried to imply that the abbreviation stands for Kitchen Fresh Chicken, but in 2007 KFC decided to return to the original Kentucky Fried Chicken branding (although the corporate name remained KFC).*Limited  named after Kenneth (Ken) Wood, who founded this kitchenware company as Woodlau Industries in the UK in 1947. It is not related to Electronics, which started as Kasuga Radio Co in Japan in 1946 and became Trio Corporation in 1960.*Kenworth Truck Company  Kenworth Truck Company was formed in 1923 and is named after the two principal stockholders Harry Kent and Edgar Worthington.*Motors  the name Kia () roughly translates as Rising from Asia in Hanja.*Kinkos  from the college nickname of founder, Orfalea. He was called Kinko because he had curly red hair. The company was bought by FedEx for $2.4 billion in 2004.*Kmart  Named for S. Kresge, who opened the first Kmart in 1962 as a division of his S. S. Kresge Company. The company became Kmart Corporation in 1977. After purchasing Sears, Roebuck & Company in 2005, the merged company became Holdings Corporation, with Kmart continuing as a discount store chain within the new structure.*Kodak  Both the Kodak camera and the name were the invention of founder Eastman. The letter K was a favorite with Eastman; he felt it a strong and incisive letter. He tried out various combinations of words starting and ending with K. He saw three advantages in the name. It had the merits of a trademark word, would not be mis-pronounced and the name did not resemble anything in the art. There is a misconception that the name was chosen because of its similarity to the sound produced by the shutter of the camera.*Komatsu  Japanese construction vehicle manufacturer named from the city of Komatsu, Ishikawa, where it was founded in 1917.*Konica  it was earlier known as Konishiroku Kogaku. Konishiroku in turn is the short for Konishiya Rokubeiten which was the first name of the company established by Rokusaburo Sugiura in the 1850s.*Korg  named from the surnames of the founders, Tsutomu Katoh and Tadashi Osanai, combined with the letters rg from the word organ.*KPMG  from the last names of the founders of the firms which combined to form the cooperative: Piet Klijnveld, William Barclay Peat, James Marwick, and Reinhard Goerdeler.()*Kroger  American supermarket chain named after its founder, Barney Kroger*KUKA  founded in 1898 in Augsburg, Germany as Keller Und Knappich Augsburg, it shortened its name to KUKA. Today, it is a manufacturer of industrial robots and automation systems.*Kyocera  from Kyoto Ceramics, after Kyoto in Japan.L*Lada  from the name of a Slavic goddess, and used as a trading name by Russian automobile manufacturer AvtoVAZ ( in Russian). VAZ is derived from Volzhsky Automobilny Zavod.*Lancme  began in 1935, when its founder, Armand Petitjean, was exploring the ruins of a castle, Le Chateau de Lancme (Loir-et-Cher) while vacationing in the French countryside. Petitjeans inspiration for the companys symbol, a rose, was the many wild roses growing around the castle.*LCL  from Le Crdit Lyonnais.*Lego  combination of the Danish leg godt, which means to play well.()  Lego also means I put together in Latin, but Group claims this is only a coincidence and the etymology of the word is entirely Danish. Years before the little plastic brick was invented, Lego manufactured wooden toys.*Group  a portmanteau of Le- (from former name Legend) and novo, pseudo-Latin for new. This Chinese company took over IBMs PC division.*Products  Named from the founders Leslie Smith and Rodney Smith, who were school friends but not related. This British company made the Matchbox series of die-cast toys, similar to Dinky toys.(Matchbox Models of Yesteryear history. Moy.robbinsplace.com (1947-01-19). Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*3 Communications  Level 3 is a reference to the layer of the model.*LG  from the combination of two popular Korean brands, Lucky and Goldstar. (In Mexico, publicists explained the name change as an abbreviation to Linea Goldstar, Spanish for Goldstar Line)*Lexmark  in the 1980s, IBM wanted to spin off its printer and typewriter businesses. The main production facility for this business segment was in Kentucky, and the code name for the spinoff was Lexington Marketing.*Lionbridge  the word localisation, which is the service this company offers, is often shortened to L10N. That is the first letter of the word and the last letter of the word, with 10 letters missing in between, hence L 10 N, which looks like lion. Bridge is the second part of the word as translation bridges gap between people and markets that do not have a common language.*Studios  games studio named after Mark Webleys pet hamster, which died a week before the company was founded.(GameSpy.com  Article: Developer Origins. Archive.gamespy.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.) Webley worked for Bullfrog, and co-founded Lionhead with Molyneux, Tim Rance and Steve Jackson in July 1997. Microsoft bought the company in April 2006.*Loblaws  Canadian supermarket chain named for founder Loblaw. *Martin  Aerospace manufacturer, a combination of Corporation and Marietta, which is a combination of L. Martin Company and American-Marietta Corporation.*LoJack  LoJack (the stolen-vehicle recovery system) is a pun on the word hijack (to steal a vehicle).*Longines  In 1862 the new company Ancienne Maison Auguste Agassiz, Ernest Francillon, Successeur was born. At that time watchmaking in the area used the skills of people working outside the comptoir dtablissage, often at home. In 1866 Ernest Francillon bought two plots of land on the right bank of the river Suze at the place called Les Longines and brought all of the watchmaking skills under one roof. This was the first Longines factory.*Lonsdale  boxing equipment manufacturer named after the Belt, a boxing trophy donated by the English Lord Lonsdale.*LOral  In 1907, Eugne Schueller, a young French chemist, developed an innovative hair-color formula. He called his improved hair dye Aurole.*LOT  LOT Polish Airlines. Lot in Polish means flight.*Software  Kapor named his company after the Position or Padmasana. Kapor used to be a teacher of Transcendental Meditation technique as taught by Maharishi Mahesh Yogi.*Technologies  a spin-off from AT&T, it was named Lucent (meaning luminous or glowing with light) because light as a metaphor for visionary thinking reflected the companys operating and guiding business philosophy, according to the Landor Associates staff who chose the name.(Thinking: Articles: Lucent. Landor. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.) It was taken over by Alcatel to form Alcatel-Lucent in 2006.*Lukoil  From the first letters of the three companies that merged to form the Russian oil giant: Langepasneftegaz, Uraineftegaz, and Kogalymneftegaz, plus the English word oil.*Lycos  from Lycosidae, the family of spiders.(Gobbling Up Sites and Web Surfers, Lycos Chooses to Aim Much Higher. Online.wsj.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)M*Maggi  food company named after its founder, Julius Maggi. It was taken over by Nestl in 1947 and survives as a brand name.*Malv - Hungarys national airline carrier. Its name comes from Magyar Lgikzlekedsi Vllalat - meaning Hungarian Air-traffic Company.*MAN  abbreviation for Maschinenfabrik Augsburg-Nrnberg (Augsburg-Nuremberg Machine Company). The MAN company is a German engineering works and truck manufacturer.*Mandriva  new company formed from the merger of Mandrake Linux and Connectiva Linux*Associates  named from Manhattan Beach, California, where the company was founded, before it moved to Atlanta, Georgia.*Manugistics  Manufacturing + Logistics, a supplier of supply chain optimization software.*Financial  founded in 1887 as Manufacturing Life Insurance Company*Mars  named after Frank C. Mars and his wife, Ethel, who started making candy in 1911. Their son, Forrest E. Mars, joined with Bruce Murrie, the son of a Hershey executive, to form M&M Ltd (from Mars & Murrie). Forrest took over the family business after his fathers death and merged the two companies in 1964. After retiring from Mars, Inc. in 1993, Forrest founded Ethel M. Chocolates, named after his mother.*Corporation  from the names of the founder Alex Manoogian, Screw and Company. Masco Screw Products Co. was founded in 1929.*AG  Named for founder Wilhelm Mast and its main product, Jgermeister (German for hunt master) liqueur.*Mattel  a portmanteau of the founders names Harold Matt Matson and Elliot Handler.*GmbH  It was founded in 1909 by Wilhelm Maybach with his son Karl Maybach.*Mazda Motor Corporation  the company was founded as Toyo Kogyo, started manufacturing Mazda brand cars in 1931, and changed its name to Mazda in 1984. The cars were supposedly named after Mazda, the chief deity of the Zoroastrians, though many think this explanation was created after the fact, to cover up what is simply a poor anglicized version of the founders name, Jujiro Matsuda. This theory is supported by the fact that the company is referred to only as Matsuda in Japan.*MBNA  originally a subsidiary of Maryland National Corporation, MBNA once stood for Maryland Bank, NA (NA itself standing for National Association, a federal designation representing the banks charter).*McDonalds  from the name of the brothers McDonald and Mac McDonald, who founded the first McDonalds restaurant in 1940.*Communications  Microwave Communications, Inc. The company later merged with Worldcom to create Worldcom. The MCI was dropped in 2000 and the acquiring company changed its name to MCI when it emerged from bankruptcy in 2003.*Mercedes  from the first name of the daughter of Jellinek, who distributed cars of the early Daimler company around 1900.*Industries  named after Orville D. Merillat, who founded the company in 1946.*Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer (MGM)  Film studio formed from the merger of three other companies: Metro Picture Corporation, Goldwyn Pictures Corporation, and Louis B. Mayer Pictures. Goldwyn Picture Corporation in turn was named after the last names of Samuel Goldfish, and Edgar and Archibald Selwyn.*MFI  from Mullard Furniture Industries. The original company was named after the founders wife, whose maiden name was Mullard.*Cars  from Morris Garages after co-founder William Morris. Under Chinese ownership, the company says: We want Chinese consumers to know this brand as Modern Gentleman.(Telegraph.co.uk: As Longbridge stands empty, the MG Rover jigsaw takes shape 6,000 miles away. Issued 2006/06/18; retrieved 2006/07/01.)*Microlins  from Microcomputers and Lins, a Brazilian city where the company was founded by Carlos Semenzato*Technology  computer memory producer named after the microscopic parts of its products. It is now better known by its consumer brand name: Crucial.*Microsoft  coined by Bill Gates to represent the company that was devoted to microcomputer software. Originally christened Micro-Soft, the - disappeared on 3/2/1987 with the introduction of a new corporate identity and logo. The slash between the o and s the Microsoft logo emphasizes the soft part of the name and conveys motion and speed.*Games  derived from the name of an airport on the southwestern part of Chicago.*Limited  Mincom was founded in Brisbane, Australia in 1979. Currently the largest software company in Australia and the fourth oldest ERP company globally. The company initially created software to specifically assist mining companies and the name Mining computing.*Minolta  Minolta was founded in Osaka, Japan in 1928 as Nichi-Doku Shashinki Shten (; literally: Japan-Germany camera shop). It was not until 1934 that the name Minolta first appeared on a camera, the Minolta Vest.*MIPRO  stands for MIcrophone PROfessionals. MIPRO is a manufacturer of wireless microphones.*MIPS  originally stood for Microprocessor without Interlocking Pipeline Stages. When interlocks where added to a later implementation, the name was redefined to not be an acronym but just a name. (The name also connotes computer speed, by association with the acronym for millions of instructions per second.)*MITIE  an acronym for Managamenet Incentive Through Investment Equity*Mitel  from Mike and Terrys Lawnmowers, after the founders Michael Cowpland (see also: Corel) and Terry Matthews, and the companys original business plan.*MITRE  Massachusetts Institute of Technology Research Establishment (however The MITRE Corporation asserts that its name is not an acronym)*Mitsubishi  the name Mitsubishi () has two parts: mitsu means three and hishi (changing to bishi in the middle of the word) means diamond (the shape). Hence, the three diamond logo. (Note that diamond in this context refers only to the rhombus shape, not to the precious gem.)*Solutions  Latin for You (plural) are being protected.*Inc.  The name Morningstar is taken from the last sentence in Walden, a book by Henry David Thoreau; the sun is but a morning star*Motorola  Founder Paul Galvin came up with this name when his company (at the time, Galvin Manufacturing Company) started manufacturing radios for cars. Many audio equipment makers of the era used the ola ending for their products, most famously the Victrola phonograph made by the Talking Machine Company. The name was meant to convey the idea of sound and motion. It became so widely recognized that the company later adopted it as the company name.*Foundation  from the name of the web browser that preceded Navigator. When Marc Andreesen, co-founder of Netscape, created a browser to replace the Mosaic browser, it was internally named Mozilla (Mosaic-Killer, Godzilla) by Zawinski.()*Mozy - from the words MOre Zetabytes for Your mom. It was initially named Breakaway Data Services for Your Mom, or Bdsym*MRF  from Madras Rubber Factory, founded by K M Mammen Mappillai in 1946. He started with a toy-balloon manufacturing unit at Tiruvottiyur, Chennai (then called Madras). In 1952 he began manufacturing tread-rubber and, in 1961, tyres.*Lighting  from the companys original location of Muscatine County, Iowa, where it still operates a large manufacturing facility.*Mustek   Taiwanese electronics manufacturer with name derived from Most Unique Scanner Technology.*MVC  from Music and Video Club, the name of a UK-based entertainment chain.N*Nabisco  formerly The National Biscuit Company, changed in 1971 to Nabisco.*Electronics  Audio equipment manufacturer named for New Acoustic Dimension.*Napster  The service was named Napster after Fannings hairstyle-based nickname.*Corporation  from National Cash Register.*NEC  from Nippon Electric Company.*Nero  Burning ROM named after Nero burning Rome (Rom is the German spelling of Rome).*Nestl  named after its founder, Nestl, who was born in Germany under the name Nestle, which is German (actually, Swabian diminutive) for birds nest. The company logo is a birds nest with a mother bird and two chicks.*Netscape  Originally the product name of the companys web browser (Mosaic Communications Netscape Web Navigator). The company adopted the product name after the University of Illinois threatened to sue for trademark infringement over the use of the Mosaic name. Netscape is the combination of network and landscape.*Nike  named for the Greek goddess of victory.*Nikon  the original name was Nippon Kogaku, meaning Japanese Optical.*Nintendo  Nintendo is the transliteration of the companys Japanese name, nintendou (). The first (nin) can be translated as to entrusted; ten-dou means heaven.*Nissan  the company was earlier known by the name Nippon Sangyo which means Japan Industries.*Nokia  started as a wood-pulp mill, the company expanded into producing rubber products in the Finnish city of Nokia. The company later adopted the citys name.*Nortel Networks  named from Nortel (Northern Telecom) and Bay Networks. The company was originally spun off from the Bell Telephone Company of Canada Ltd in 1895 as Northern Electric and Manufacturing, and traded as Northern Electric from 1914 to 1976.*Novartis  after the Latin expression novae artes which means something like new skills.*Novell  Novell, Inc. was earlier Novell Data Systems co-founded by George Canova. The name was suggested by Georges wife who mistakenly thought that Novell meant new in French. (Nouvelle is the feminine form of the French adjective Nouveau. Nouvelle as a noun in French is news.)O*OCZ  play on the word Overclockers.(What You Didnt Know About Ryan Petersen  Toms Hardware. Tomshardware.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Onkyo translates as sound harmony*Ooyala - the word Ooyala () means cradle in Telugu, as in a cradle of innovation.*Oracle  Larry Ellison, Ed Oates and Bob Miner were working on a consulting project for the CIA. The code name for the project was Oracle. The project was designed to use the newly written SQL database language from IBM. The project was eventually terminated but they decided to finish what they started and bring it to the world. Later they changed the name of the company, Relational Software Inc., to the name of the product.*Ornge  new name (2006) for Air Ambulance, chosen to reflect the orange color of its aircraft. It was intended to provide a unique branding but the ornge.com misspelling was already used by an advertising portal.*Osram  from osmium and wolfram.P*Paccar  from Pacific Car and Rail.*PCCW  originally Pacific Century Development, the companys English name was changed from Pacific Century CyberWorks Limited to PCCW Limited on 9 August 2002. It owns Hong Kong Telecom.*Pamida  U.S. retailer founded by Jim Witherspoon and Lee Wegener, it took its name from the first two letters of the names of Witherspoons three sons: Patrick, Michael and David. It became a division of another American retailer, Shopko, in 2000, but is again a separate company after being spun off in 2007.*Pemex  An abbreviation of the full name of the state-owned Mexican oil/gasoline company, Petrleos Mexicanos (Spanish for Mexican Petroleum).*Pennzoil  formed by a merger of South Penn Oil (Penn), a former Oil subsidiary, and Oil (zoil).*Pepsi  named from the digestive enzyme pepsin.*Petrobras  An abbreviation of the Brazilian oil companys full name, Petrleo Brasileiro (Portuguese for Brazilian Petroleum).*Peugeot - Named after Emile Peugeot.*Philco  from the Philadelphia Storage Battery Company. The pioneering U.S. radio and television manufacturer was taken over by Ford and later by Philips.*Philips  Royal Philips Electronics was founded in 1891 by brothers Gerard (the engineer) and Anton (the entrepreneur) Philips.*Piaggio  Named after founder Rinaldo Piaggio.*Pixar  from pixel and the co-founders name, Alvy Ray Smith. According to the biography The Second Coming of Steve Jobs by Alan Deutschman, the el in pixel was changed to ar because ar is frequently used in Spanish verbs, implying the name means To Pix.*PMC-Sierra  PMC from Pacific Microelectronics Centre, a research arm of BC Tel, and Sierra from the company that acquired it, Sierra Semiconductor, presumably so named because of the allure of the Sierra Nevada mountains to members of a California-based company.*Porsche  car company named after founder Porsche, an Austrian automotive engineer. The family name may have originated in the Czech name Bore (boresh).*Prada  an Italian high fashion house named after the founder Mario Prada, who founded Prada in Milan 1914.*PricewaterhouseCoopers  Global professional services firm named as a result of the merger of Price Waterhouse and Coopers & Lybrand in 1998. It now trades as PwC.*& Gamble  named after the founders, William Procter, a candlemaker, and James Gamble, a soapmaker, who pooled their resources after marrying two sisters. The company was founded in Cincinnati in 1837.(Procter & Gamble  Ohio History Central  A product of the Ohio Historical Society. Ohio History Central (2005-07-01). Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*ProfSat  Brazilian satellite-based education company, meaning Professional Sateliite.*Proton  Malaysian car manufacturer, where the name is derived from Perusahaan Otomobil Nasional*Guitars  named after its founder, Reed Smith.*Psion  UK computer company named by its founder, South Africa-born Dr David Potter, from Potter Scientific Instruments Or Nothing.Q*Q8  the acronym for these gas stations sounds like Kuwait, that is, the letter Q followed by the number 8. It is the abbreviation for Petroleum International Limited.*Qantas  from its original name, Queensland and Northern Territory Aerial Services.*Qimonda  Qimonda carries different meanings and allows associations in different languages. Qi stands for flowing or breathing energy, and it was thought that the combination of the English word key and the Latin mundus would be intuitively understood in the Western World as key to the world.*Quad  an acronym for Quality Unit Amplified Domestic. Quad Electroacoustics was founded in 1936 by Peter Walker, and was formerly called the Acoustical Manufacturing Company.*Quark  named after the subatomic particle. The word quark originates from Wake by Joyce.*Qualcomm  Quality Communication*QVC  Quality, Value and ConvenienceR*Rabobank  Raiffeisen-Boerenleenbank (Dutch for Farmers Loan Bank), a combination of the two cooperatives that merged to form the company.*RAND  Research ANd Development.*Raytheon  Light of the gods. Maker of missiles such as Patriot, Maverick, Sidewinder and Tomahawk, among other military technology.*RCA  Radio Corporation of America.*& Colman  named from the merger of Reckitt & Sons with J&J Colman in 1938. Colmans, best known for its mustard, was founded by Jeremiah Colman in 1814. Isaac Reckitt founded Reckitt & Sons in 1840.(http://www.rb.com/DocumentDownload.axd?documentresourceid101)*Benckiser  consumer goods giant named from the merger of Britains Reckitt & Colman and the Dutch company Benckiser NV in December 1999. The latter was named after its founder, Johann A. Benckiser.*Hat  while at college, company founder Marc Ewing was given the Cornell lacrosse team cap (with red and white stripes) by his grandfather. People would turn to him to solve their problems and he was referred to as that guy in the red hat. By the time he wrote the manual of the beta version of Red Hat Linux he had lost the cap, so the manual included an appeal to readers to return his Red Hat if found.*Reebok  alternate spelling of rhebok (Pelea capreolus), an African antelope.*Renault - named after the founder Louis Renault.*Motor Car Company  car manufacturer founded in 1904 by E. Olds, and named from its founders initials. Later, the rock band Speedwagon took its name from one of its trucks, the Speed Wagon.*Repsol  name derived from Refinera de Petrleo de eScombreras Oil (Escombreras is an oil refinery in Cartagena, Spain) and chosen for its euphony when the, then, state-owned oil company was incorporated in 1986. Previously Repsol was a lubricating-oil trademark.*In Motion  from the phrase poetry in motion, which company founder Lazaridis had seen used to describe a football player.*Rickenbacker  named after co-founder Rickenbacher, with the spelling anglicised. The company started as the Electro String Instrument Corporation in 1931.*Robeez  baby-shoe company named after the founders son Robbie (Robert).() Robeez was taken over by Rite in 2006.*Rolls-Royce  name used by plc and Motor Cars, among others. In 1884 Henry Royce started an electrical and mechanical business, making his first car, a Royce, in 1904. He was introduced to Stewart Rolls on 4 May that year. The pair entered into a partnership in which Royce would manufacture cars to be sold exclusively by Rolls, and the cars would be called Rolls-Royce.*Security  formed from the first letters of the family names of its founders Rivest, Shamir and Adleman.S*Saab  founded in 1937 in Sweden as Svenska Aeroplan aktiebolaget (Swedish Aeroplane Company); the last word is typically abbreviated as AB, hence Saab and Saab Automobile AB.*Sabre  Semi-Automatic Business Research Environment.*Brewery  after the village in Parish, Estonia, where the company was founded.*Samsonite  named from the Biblical character Samson, renowned for his strength.*Samsung  meaning three stars in Korean.*Sanyo  meaning three oceans in Japanese.*SAP  SystemAnalyse und Programmentwicklung (German for System analysis and program development), a company formed by five ex-IBM employees who used to work in the Systems/Applications/Projects group of IBM. Later, SAP was redefined to stand for Systeme, Anwendungen und Produkte in der Datenverarbeitung (Systems, Applications and Products in Data Processing).*SAS  Scandinavian Airlines System, the flag airline carrier of Sweden, Norway and Denmark.*Institute  originally an abbreviation for Statistical Analysis System.*Sasol  Suid-Afrikaanse Steenkool en Olie. (Afrikaans for South African Coal and Oil).*Aramco  the Aramco name was derived in 1944 when California Arabian Standard Oil Company (Casoc) changed its name to Arabian American Oil Company. The Saudi government purchased the company in 1980, and changed its name to Saudi Arabian Oil Company or Saudi Aramco in 1988.(Home. Saudiaramco.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*SCB  from Standard Chartered Bank. The name Standard Chartered comes from the two original banks from which it was founded  The Chartered Bank of India, Australia and China, and The Standard Bank of British South Africa.*Schick  manufacturer of shaving razors and blades, named after the inventor Schick.(Free Your Skin. Schick. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*SCO  from Santa Cruz Operation. The companys office was in Cruz, California. It eventually formed Inc. and sold off its operating system division to Systems, which is based in Utah. Caldera Systems changed its name to International and then to SCO Group (at which point SCO no longer stood for anything).*SEAT  an acronym from Sociedad Espaola de Automviles de Turismo (Spanish Corporation of Touring Cars).*Air  from the sealed air found in its most notable product, Bubble Wrap.*Sega  Service Games of Japan was founded by Marty Bromley (an American) to import pinball games to Japan for use on American military bases.*Seiko  Seiko, now referred to in katakana as (seiko), was originally named in kanji as (also seiko). The two characters were taken from the phrase , the companys vision which roughly translates to a factory:kojyothat successfully:seikoproduces:seisanexquisit:seikoand precise:seimitsuwatches.  According to Seikos official company history, titled A Journey In Time: The Remarkable Story of Seiko (2003), Seiko is a Japanese word for exquisite or minute (both spelled ), as well as a word for success (spelled ).*Sennheiser  named after one of its founders, Sennheiser.*setcom  software engineering and testing for communications, an international group of companies active in the field of wireless test solutions.*SGI  Silicon Graphics Inc.*Sharp  Japanese consumer electronics company named from its first product, an ever-sharp pencil.*Shell  Royal Dutch/Shell was established in 1907, when the Royal Dutch Petrol Society Plc. and the Shell Transport and Trading Company Ltd. merged their operations. The Shell Transport and Trading Company Ltd had been established at the end of the 19th century by commercial firm Samuel & Co (founded in 1830). Samuel & Co were already importing Japanese shells when they set up an oil company, so the oil company was named after the shells.*Siemens  founded in 1847 by von Siemens and Johann Georg Halske. The company was originally called Telegraphen-Bau-Anstalt von Siemens & Halske.*Apart  company co-founders Ben and Mena Trott were born six days apart (in September 1977).*Skanska  from Aktiebolaget Sknska Cementgjuteriet (Scanian Cement Casting Company)*SKF  from Svenska Kullagerfabriken AB, a Swedish manufacturer founded in 1907. See also Volvo.*Auto  the car company was founded in 1895 and originally named Laurin & Klement after its founders, Vaclav Laurin and Klement. It was taken over by Works, an industrial conglomerate, in 1924, and adopted the koda name from koda. koda Auto was split off after World War II and is now part of Volkswagen.*Skype  the original concept for the name was Sky-Peer-to-Peer, which morphed into Skyper, then Skype.(Skype Forums > The name Skype. Forum.skype.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Smart  Swatch + Mercedes + Art*Software  named from John Irvings Hotel New Hampshire, a surreal novel in which a smart bear plays an important role, according to founder Jason Cohen.(How to pick a company name. Blog.asmartbear.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.) In 2007, he sold to AutomatedQA, which renamed itself after its more memorable subsidiary in 2010.*Smeg  founded by Vittorio Bertazzoni in Italy in 1948 as Smalterie Metallurgiche Emiliane Guastalla (metal enamelling factory).(Smeg Australia. Smeg.com.au. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Smilebit  former Sega development studio named from what they hope to make you do (smile), and the smallest unit of computer information (bit). The company developed Set Radio.*SNK  Shin Nihon Kikaku, Japanese for Plans for a New Japan.*Sony  from the Latin word sonus meaning sound, and sonny a slang word used by Americans to refer to a bright youngster, since we were sonny boys working in sound and vision, said Akio Morita. The company was founded as Tokyo Tsoshiu Kogyo KK (Tokyo Telecommunications Engineering Corporation) in 1946, and changed its name to Sony in 1958. Sony was chosen as it could be pronounced easily in many languages.*Sorcim  Micros backwards. Sorcim was the original publisher of the SuperCalc spreadsheet in 1980. It was taken over by Computer Associates.*SPAR  originally DE SPAR, from Door Eendrachtig Samenwerken Profiteren Allen Regelmatig (Dutch, meaning All will benefit from united co-operation). De spar in Dutch translates as the fir tree, hence the fir tree logo. As the company expanded across Europe, the name was shortened by dropping the article, DE.*Sperry  company founded by Ambrose Sperry (18601930), originally as Sperry Gyroscope Company. Sperry took over Univac, and eventually was itself taken over by Burroughs. The merged companies became Unisys, from United Information Systems.*Spiratone  from the last name of founders Spira and Hans Spira. The company was founded as Spiratone Fine Grain Laboratories. The tone suffix was common in the photographic industry (an example cited by Spira is Royaltone) at the time of the companys founding in the 1940s.*Sprint  from its parent company, Southern Pacific Railroad INTernal Communications. At the time, pipelines and railroad tracks were the cheapest place to lay communications lines, as the right-of-way was already leased or owned.* Corporation  named from its founders Scott King, Stanley Ray Day, and Sam Patterson.* International  from Stanford Research Institute, established by the trustees of University, California*Works  name created to reflect the merger of Stanleys Bolt Manufactory of New Britain, Connecticut (founded by Trent Stanley) and the Stanley Rule and Level Company (founded by his cousin Henry Stanley).*Starbucks  named after Starbuck, a character in Herman Melvilles novel Moby-Dick, also a variation of Starbo; at the time, a local mining camp north of Seattle.()*Stellent  coined from a combination of the words stellar and excellent.*Ruger  from its founders, McCormick Sturm and B. Ruger.*STX  pronounced as the word sticks because, when first founded, STX manufactured only sticks*Subaru  from the Japanese name for the constellation known to Westerners as Pleiades or the Seven Sisters. Subarus parent company, Heavy Industries, was formed from a merger of six companies, and the constellation is featured on the companys logo.*Microsystems  its founders designed their first workstation in their dorm at University, and chose the name Stanford University Network for their product, hoping to sell it to the college. They did not.*SuSE  from Software und System-Entwicklung (software and system development). The company was bought by Novell for its Linux distribution.*Suzuki  from the name of its founder, Michio Suzuki.T*Bell  named after founder Glen Bell.*Talgo  from Tren Articulado Ligero Goicoechea-Oriol (Spanish for Goicoechea-Oriol Light Articulated Train), Goicoechea and Oriol being the founders of the company.*Airlines  named from Transportes Areos Marlia (Marilias Air Transport). Marlia is a city in So Paulo state, Brazil.*Portugal  from Transportes Areos Portugueses (Portuguese Air Transport).*Group  conglomerate named after Tata, considered the father of Indian industry.*Taxan  made-up name chosen partly because Takusan is a Japanese word for many or much and was considered propitious, but mainly because the head of the company, in the U.S. at the time, Tak Shimizu was known by everyone as Tak-san.*TCBY  Originally, the companys name was This Cant Be Yogurt, but a lawsuit from a competitor named I Cant Believe Its Yogurt! forced TCBY to create a new backronym for its initials: The Countrys Best Yogurt.*TCL  from Today China Lion. Derived from literal translation of  from Chinese to English.*TCS  from Tata Consultancy Services, from Indias Group, named after founder and legendary industrialist Tata.*Corporation  from Tokyo Denki Kagaku (Tokyo Electronics and Chemicals).*TEPCO  Tokyo Electric Power Company*Tesco  founder Jack Cohen  who sold groceries in the markets of the East End from 1919  acquired a large shipment of tea from T. E. Stockwell. He made new labels by using the first three letters of the suppliers name and the first two letters of his surname.*Teva Naot  outdoors shoe company is named after the modern Hebrew word for nature (pronounced tehvah)*Texaco  from The Texas Company U.S.A.(Texaco Brand Portal)*THX  from Holman Crossover, the name of the technologys inventor and the audio technology of a crossover amplifier. It may be a backronym, as the technology is owned by Lucass company, and he directed 1138.*Software  The Information Bus Company. The company was founded by Vivek Ranadive as Teknekron Software Systems in 1985.* Hortons  Canadian fast food doughnut, sandwich and coffee shop named after founder and hockey player Horton. In Canada Tim Hortons is nicknamed Tims and Timmys -- in America, the chain is nicknamed Timmy Hos*N.V.  Thomas Nationwide Transport, an Australian company which was acquired by the Dutch postal company in 1996; the postal company renamed itself TNT in 2005.*Toshiba  named from the merger of consumer goods company Tokyo Denki (Tokyo Electric Co) and electrical firm Shibaura Seisaku-sho (Shibaura Engineering Works).*Toyota  from the name of the founder, Sakichi Toyoda. Initially called Toyeda, it was changed after a contest for a better-sounding name. The new name was written in katakana with eight strokes, a number that is considered lucky in Japan.*Triang  operating name for Lines Bros Ltd, which was founded by William, Walter and Arthur Edwin Lines. Three Lines make a triangle*Tucows  an acronym for The Ultimate Collection Of Winsock Software.(About Us  History. Tucows Inc. (2008-01-01). Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*TVR  derived from the first name of the company founder TreVoR Wilkinson*TWA  derived from Trans World Airlines.  Before the airline opened up its first international route from New York to Paris in the 1950s, it was a domestic operation that focused on serving Los Angeles and San Francisco from New York, operating under the name Transcontinental and Western Air.  Keeping the initials and rebranding as a global airline was a stroke of marketing continuity genius.*Twinings  named after founder Thomas Twining, who set up a tea-shop on the Strand in London in 1706.(Discover a World of Tea. Twinings. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Twitter  Having rejected the name Twitch for their networking service, co-founder Dorsey says: we looked in the dictionary for words around it and we came across the word twitter and it was just perfect. The definition was a short burst of inconsequential information, and chirps from birds. And thats exactly what the product was.(http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/magazine-14785537)U*Foundation  named from a Zulu word (nt) that translates as humanity to others.*Umbro  Umbro was founded in 1924 by the Humphrey (Umphrey) Brothers, Harold C. and Wallace.*Unilever  name created to reflect the merger of Margarine Unie and Lever Brothers, agreed in 1929. Brothers was named after its founders, Hesketh Lever and his brother, James.*UNIMED  Brazilian cooperative of physicians, meaning Unio de Medicos (Physicians Union)*Unisys  from United Information Systems, the new name for the company that resulted from the merging of two old mainframe computer companies, Burroughs and Sperry Univac/Sperry Rand. It united two incompatible ranges. The new-born Unisys was briefly the worlds second-largest computer company, after IBM.*Corporation  the Union Oil Company of California, founded in 1890*UPS  United Parcel Service of America, Inc.*UUNET  one of the industrys oldest and largest Internet Service Providers, named from UNIX-to-UNIX Network.V*Vaisala  Finnish company named after its founder, Professor Visl*Valtra  from Valmet Tractors, where Valmet is the name of a Finnish state-owned company (originally Valtion Metallitehtaat  English: State Metalworks)*Varig  A Brazilian airline, its name is an abbreviation of Viao Area Rio-Grandense, because it was founded in the state of Grande do Sul.*Verizon  a portmanteau of veritas (Latin for truth) and horizon.*Virgin  founder Branson started a magazine called Student while still at school. In his autobiography, Losing My Virginity, Branson says that when they were starting a business to sell records by mail order, one of the girls suggested: What about Virgin? Were complete virgins at business.*VMware  Virtual Machine ware*Vodafone  from Voice, Data, Telefone. Vodafone made the UKs first mobile call at a few minutes past midnight on 1 January 1985.*Volkswagen  from the German for peoples car. Porsche wanted to produce a car that was affordable for the masses  the Kraft-durch-Freude-Wagen (or Strength-Through-Joy car, from a Nazi social organization) later became known, in English, as the Beetle.*Volvo  from the Latin word volvo, which means I roll. It was originally a name for a ball bearing being developed by SKF.W*Wachovia  from the Latin version of the German wachau, the name given to a region in North Carolina by German settlers because it reminded them of a river near their home in Germany. Many companies founded in or around Charlotte, North Carolina have Wachovia in their name.*Waitrose  upmarket UK supermarket chain originally named after the founders, Wallace Waite, Arthur Rose and David Taylor. The Taylor was later dropped.*Walgreens  named after founder Charles R. Walgreen, Sr.(Page Through Our Past. Walgreens. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Wal-Mart  named after founder Sam Walton*Laboratories  from the name of the founder, Wang, the inventor of core memory.* Fargo  From the founders of the original Wells Fargo company, Wells and G. Fargo. (When Norwest purchased Wells Fargo in 1998, it chose to retain the Wells Fargo name.)*Wendys  Wendy was the nickname of founder Dave Thomas daughter Melinda.*Digital  special effects company co-founded by The Lord of the Rings director Peter Jackson. Weta are a group of about 70 species of insect found in New Zealand, where Weta Digital is based.*H Smith  founded by Henry Walton Smith and his wife Anna in London, England, in 1792. They named their small newsagents shop after their son William Henry Smith, who was born the same year.*Williams-Sonoma  founded by Chuck Williams in Sonoma, California.*Wipro  from Western India Palm Refined Oil Ltd Technologies. The company started as a modest Vanaspati and laundry soap producer and is now also an IT services giant.*Wonderware  Wonderware was the project code name for the company prior to its launch. Upon making the company a legal entity, the code name was retained as the company name.*Worlds of Wonder  founder Don Kingsborough wanted an eyecatching stock symbol, and Worlds Of Wonder provided WOW. The company went bankrupt in 1988.*WPP  global advertising and marketing company founded by Sorrell in 1985. He bought an existing listed company, Wire & Plastic Products PLC, to use as a shell.(http://www.wpp.com/NR/rdonlyres/4C57C126-254B-42A6-9ACF-07DD591AF6C9/0/wpp_fast_facts_mar_11.pdf)*WWE  From World Wrestling Entertainment, the name of the company from 2002 to 2011. The previous name of World Wrestling Federation (WWF), used since 1979, was changed after a court case brought by the World Wildlife Fund (WWF), which is now called the Wide Fund for Nature.X*Xerox  named from xerography, a word derived from the Greek xeros (dry) and graphos (writing). The company was founded as The Haloid Company in 1906, launched its first XeroX copier in 1949, and changed its name to Haloid Xerox in 1958.(The History of Xerox. Inventors.about.com (2010-06-15). Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Xobni  inbox, backwards*Energy  Founded in 1986 as Cross Timbers Oil Company, it went public under the stock ticker XTO, and changed its name to XTO Energy Inc in 2001. It is now owned by Exxon Mobil.(About XTO. Xtoenergy.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)Y*Yahoo!   The word Yahoo was invented by Swift and used in his book Travels. It represents a person who is repulsive in appearance and barely human. Yahoo! founders Filo and Jerry Yang jokingly considered themselves yahoos. Its also an interjection sometimes associated with United States Southerners and Westerners expression of joy, as alluded to in Yahoo.com commercials that end with someone singing the word yahoo. It is also sometime jokingly referred to by its backronym, Yet Another Hierarchical Officious Oracle.(The History of Yahoo!  How It All Started. Docs.yahoo.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*YKK  zipper manufacturer named from Yoshida Kogyo Kabushikikaisha (Yoshida Company Limited) after the founder, Tadao Yoshida. The letters YKK were stamped onto the zippers pull tabs.*Yakult  Official claims state that the name is derived from jahurto, an older form of jogurto, the Esperanto word for yogurt. However, it has also been claimed that the name is derived from the fact that the product was developed from ancient Mongolian practices of culturing yaks milk in a sack made from a yaks stomach  the combination of Yak and Culture in English giving the product name as Yakult.*Yamaha  after Torakusu Yamaha, who founded the company as Nippon Gakki Seiz Kabushiki Gaisha (Japan Musical Instrument Manufacturing Corporation) in 1897 after repairing a reed organ. The official name was changed to Yamaha Corporation on 1 October 1987.(Corporate Profile  Yamaha  UK and Ireland. Uk.yamaha.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Yoplait  from the merger of Yola and Coplait in 1965.(A Bit of History. Yoplait.ca. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)Z*Zamzar  Based on a character (Gregor Samsa) from the Bohemian author Kafkas book Metamorphosis. In the novel Kafka describes the story of a young man who is transformed whilst sleeping into a gigantic insect. A version of the mans name was used as the basis for the company name because of its powerful association with change and transformation.(Zamzar - About Us. Zamzar.com. Retrieved on 27 Sep 2011.)*Technologies  a contraction derived from the names of Zeev Suraski and Andi Gutmans, the two founders.*ZERO Corporation  Founded by Herman Zierold as Zierold Metal Corporation, it is the parent company of Halliburton. In 1952, when then owner Jack Gilbert noticed that many of the companys customers mispronounced and misspelled Zierold as Zero, he changed the name of the company to Zero Manufacturing.(ZERO Manufacturing, Inc.  History. Zerocases.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Zimmer  named after Justin O. Zimmer, who co-founded the medical equipment company in Warsaw, Indiana, in 1927.(Zimmer History. Zimmer.com. Retrieved on 8 July 2011.)*Zuse  pioneering German computer company named after its founder, Konrad Zuse (19101995). He built his first computer in his parents living room at the end of the 1930s. Zuse was taken over by AG. The name is now supposedly echoed by SuSE (Software und System-Entwicklung: Software and system development).See also*of companies named after people*of oldest companies*of etymologiesReferencesvon Unternehmen mit Namensherkunftserklrungen
336685
Federated_Malay_States
:This article is not to be confused with the Malay States.footnotes  1 Also the state capital of Selangor   Malay using Jawi (Arabic) script   Later Chief Secretaries to the Government and Federal SecretariesThe Federated Malay States (FMS) was a federation of four states in the Peninsula&mdash;Selangor, Perak, Sembilan and Pahang&mdash;established by the British government in 1895, which lasted until 1946, when they, together with the Settlements and the Malay States, formed the Union. Two years later, the Union became the of Malaya and finally Malaysia in 1963 with the inclusion of Sabah (then Borneo), Sarawak and Singapore.The Kingdom was responsible for foreign affairs and defence of the federation, whilst the states continued to be responsible for their domestic policies. Even so, the British Resident General would give advice on domestic issues, and the states were bound by treaty to follow that advice. The federation had Lumpur, which was then part of Selangor, as its capital. The first FMS Resident General was Sir Swettenham.The federation along with the other Malay states of the peninsular and British possessions was overrun and occupied by the Japanese.  After the liberation of Malaya due to the Japanese surrender, the federation was not restored. However, the federal form of government was retained as the principal model for consolidating the separate States as an independent of Malaya  and the Federations later evolution into Malaysia.Constituent States and First DurbarAlthough the Resident General was the real administrator of the federation, each of the four constituent states of the federation retained their respective hereditary rulers (sultans).  At the formation of the Federated Malay States, the reigning sultans were:# Sultan Alaiddin Sulaiman Shah of Selangor# Sultan Idris Murshidul Adzam Shah I of Perak# Yamtuan Tuanku Muhammad Shah of Sembilan# Sultan Ahmad Muadzam Shah of PahangIn 1897 the first Durbar was convened in the royal town of Kangsar, Perak as the platform for discussions for the four Rulers.  This formed the basis for the of Rulers that was created later on under Article 38 of the Malaysian Constitution on August 27, 1957.Flag and emblem of the Federation  Flag of the Federated Malay States (1895 - 1946).svg|thumb|right|20px 1:2. Flag of the Federated Malay States (1895-1946)The Federated Malay States had a flag of its own until its dissolution in 1946.  The flag consisted of four different-colored stripes, namely, from top to bottom, white, red, yellow and black. Combination of any color represents the four states that formed the FMS - red, black and yellow are for Negeri Sembilan; black and white for Pahang; black, white and yellow for Perak; and red and yellow for Selangor.  The same design concept is used in Malaysian national emblem.  In the middle is an oblong circle with a Malayan tiger in it.The National History Museum located near the Merdeka in Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia, has a replica of the federations flag.Coat of armsthumb|right|Coat of arms of the Federated Malay States (1895-1946)The coat of arms of the Federated Malay States featured a shield guarded by two tigers. On the top of the shield is the crown (known as Eastern Crown in English heraldry), as symbol of the federation of monarchies under the protection of the United Kingdom. A banner with the phrase Dipelihara Allah (Under Gods (Allah) Protection) written in Jawi is located underneath the shield. The combinations of the four colors of the shield represents the colors of the flag of the states of the FMS (in the same way the flag of the FMS represents the states)# Red and yellow for Selangor# Black, white and yellow for Perak# Red, black and yellow for Sembilan# Black and white for PahangThis design forms the basis of the Federation of Malayas (later Malaysia) national emblem with the guardian tigers element and a quartered shield of four colours (white, red, yellow and black) in the central part of the shield representing the Federated Malay States.The phrase Dipelihara Allah was also adopted as the current state motto for the state of Selangor.Naval EnsignIn addition to a state flag, the Federated Malay States also had a jack or ensign for use on government ships. The ensign, with the four colors of the FMS, was flown by HMS Malaya (commanded by Captain Boyle under the 5th Battle Squadron of the Grand Fleet) during the of Jutland in the North Sea, which was the largest and the only full scale clash of battleships during World War One.The Treaty of Federation and Administrationthumbnail|Malay Rulers at the first Durbar, Kuala Kangsar, PerakBritish ProtectorateThe protectorate of the Federated Malay States was established after the four Rulers of Selangor, Perak, Negeri Sembilan and Pahang agreed to a federation and centralized administration in 1895 and in which the Treaty of Federation was drawn up and signed on the 1st of July 1896.  By this treaty and the previous acceptance of the British Residents System in Selangor (1875), Perak (1874), Negeri Sembilan (1873) and Pahang (1888); the FMS were officially turned into a nominally independent protectorate of Great Britain (not to be confused with the British possessions like the territories of the Straits SettlementsWith the Treaty of Federation the Malay Rulers effectively gave up their political power in their states, having to act after consulting and only with the due consent of their respective Residents.  However, the United Kingdom pledged not to interfere in matters relating to native Malay traditions and Islamic affair.Structure of the Federated Malay StatesA well-ordered system of public administration was established, public services were extended, and large-scale rubber and tin production was developed.  This control was interrupted by the Japanese invasion and occupation from 1941 to 1945 during World War II.Federal CouncilThe British established the Federal Council in 1889 to administer the FMS.  It was headed by the High Commissioner (The Governor of the Straits Settlement), assisted by the Resident-General, the Sultans, the four state Residents and four nominated unofficial members. This structure remained until the Japanese invaded Malaya on 8 December 1941.Resident-GeneralFrom 1896 to 1936, real power lay in the hands of the Resident-General, later known as Chief Secretary of the Federation. Chief Secretary to the GovernmentFederal SecretariesAfter 1936 the Federal Secretaries were no more than coordinating officers,under the authority of the High Commissioners, which are always the Governors of the Straits SettlementsState CouncilIn the Federated Malay States, the individual State were still ruled by the Sultan but was now advised by the State Council for the purpose of administrating the State.  The State Council was made up of the Resident (or in certain cases by the Secretary to the Resident), native chiefs, and representative(s) of the Chinese community nominated by the Sultan.  The council discussed matters of interest for each respective state such as legislative and administrative issues as well as revision of all sentence of capital punishment. The Resident and his staff (mostly consist of European and Malay) carried on with the administrative work.Residents Selangor*1875 - 1876  James Guthrie Davidson*1876 - 1882  Bloomfield Douglas                 (b. 1822 - d. 1906)*1882 - 1884  Frank Athelstane Swettenham        (b. 1850 - d. 1946)*1884 - 1888  John Pickersgill Rodger (1st time) (acting) (b. 1851 - d. 1910)*1889 - 1892  William Edward Maxwell             (b. 1846 - d. 1897)*1892 - 1896  William Hood Treacher              (b. 1849 - d. 1919)*1896 - 1902  John Pickersgill Rodger (2nd time) (s.a.)*1902 - 1910  Henry Conway Belfield              (b. 1855 - d. 1923)*1910 - 1913  Reginald George Watson             (b. 1862 - d. 1926)*1913 - 1919  Edward George Broadrick            (b. 1864 - d. 1929)*1919 - 1921  Arthur Henry Lemon                 (b. 1864 - d. 1933)*1921 - 1926  Oswald Francis Gerard Stonor       (b. 1872 - d. 1940)*1926 - 1927  Henry Wagstaffe Thomson            (b. 1874 - d. 1941)*1927 - 1931  James Lornie                       (b. 1876 - d. 1959)*1932 - 1933  G.E. Cater*1933 - 1935  George Ernest London               (b. 1889 - d. 1957)*1935 - 1937  Theodore Samuel Adams              (b. 1885 - d. 1961)*1937 - 1939  Stanley Wilson Jones               (b. 1888 - d. 1962)*1939 - 1941  G.M. Kidd*1941 Norman Rowlstone Jarrett (acting)  (b. 1889 - d. 1982)Perak*1874 - 1875  Wheeler Woodford Birch       (b. 1826 - d. 1875)*1876 - 1877  James Guthrie Davidson*1877 - 1889  Hugh Low (from 1883, Sir Hugh Low) (b. 1824 - d. 1905)*1889 - 1896  Frank Athelstane Swettenham        (b. 1850 - d. 1946)*1896 - 1902  William Hood Treacher              (b. 1849 - d. 1919)*1902 - 1903  John Pickersgill Rodger            (b. 1851 - d. 1910)*1905 - 1910  Ernest Woodford Birch              (b. 1857 - d. 1929)*1910 - 1912  Henry Conway Belfield              (b. 1855 - d. 1923)*1912 - 1913  William James Parke Hume (1st time) (acting)                (b. 1866 - d. 1952)*1913 - 1919  Reginald George Watson             (b. 1862 - d. 1926)*1919 - 1920  George Maxwell                     (b. 1871 - d. 1959)*1920 - 1921  William James Parke Hume (2nd time)                         (s.a.)*1921 - 1926  Cecil William Chase Parr           (b. 1871 - d. 1943)*1926 - 1927  Oswald Francis Gerard Stonor       (b. 1872 - d. 1940)*1927 - 1929  Henry Wagstaffe Thomson            (b. 1874 - d. 1941)*1929 - 1930  Charles Walter Hamilton Cochrane   (b. 1876 - d. 1932)*1931 - 1932  Bertram Walter Elles               (b. 1877 - d. 19...)*1932 - 1939  G.E. Cater*1939 - 1941  Marcus Rex                         (b. 1886 - d. 1971)Negeri Sembilan*1888 - 1891  Martin Lister (1st time)           (b. 1857 - d. 1897)*1891 - 1894  W.F.B. Paul*1894 - 1895  Robert Norman Bland                (b. 1859 - d. 1948)*1895 - 1897  Martin Lister (2nd time)           (s.a.)*1898 - 1901  Woodford Birch              (b. 1857 - d. 1929)*1901 - 1902  Henry Conway Belfield              (b. 1855 - d. 1923)*1902 - 1903  Egerton                     (b. 1858 - d. 1947)*1904 - 1910  Douglas Graham Campbell            (b. 1867 - d. 1918)*1910 - 1911  Richard James Wilkinson            (b. 1867 - d. 1941)*1912 - 1919  Henry Lemon                 (b. 1864 - d. 1933)*1919 - 1921  J.R.O. Aldworth (acting)*1921 - 1925  Edward Shaw Hose                   (b. 1871 - d. 1946)*1925 - 1928  Ernest Charteris Holford Wolff     (b. 1875 - d. 1946)*1928 - 1932  James William Simmons              (b. 1877 - d. 19...)*1932 - 1937  John Whitehouse Ward Hughes        (b. 1883 - d. 19...)*1937 - 1939  Gordon Lupton Ham                  (b. 1885 - d. 1965)*1939 - 1941  John Vincent Cowgill               (b. 1888 - d. 1959)Pahang*1888 - 1896  John Pickersgill Rodger            (b. 1851 - d. 1910)*1896 - 1900  Hugh Clifford (1st time)           (b. 1866 - d. 1941)*1900 - 1901  Arthur Butler                      (b. 18... - d. 1901)*1901   D.H. Wise (acting)*1901 - 1903  Hugh Clifford (2nd time)           (s.a.)*1905 - 1908  Cecil Wray*1908 - 1909  Harvey Chevallier (acting)*1909 - 1910  Edward Lewis Brockman              (b. 1865 - d. 1943)*1910 - 1911  Warren Delabere Barnes             (b. 1865 - d. 19...)*1911 - 1917  Edward John Brewster               (b. 1861 - d. 1931)*1917 - 1921  Cecil William Chase Parr           (b. 1871 - d. 1943)*1921 - 1922  F.A.S. McClelland (acting)         (b. 1873 - d. 1947)*1922 - 1926  Henry Wagstaffe Thomson            (b. 1874 - d. 1941)*1926 - 1929  Arthur Furley Worthington          (b. 1874 - d. 1964)*1929 - 1930  C.F.J. Green*1931 - 1935  Hugh Goodwin Russell Leonard       (b. 1880 - d. 19...)*1935 - 1941  C.C. BrownAdministrative subdivisionsrightFor the purpose of efficient administration, all the states of the federation were further divided into districts (Malay: Daerah).  Each district was administered by a District Office (Malay: Pejabat Daerah) headed by a District Officer (Malay: Pegawai Daerah).  40px|borderPerakState capital : TaipingDistricts:: 1. Ulu Perak (Upper Perak): 2. Larut and Krian: 3. Kuala Kangsar: 4. Kinta: 5. Hilir Perak (Lower Perak): 6. Batang Padang:Notes::The territories of Dinding and Island was ceded to the British, administered as part of the  Settlement. Returned to the government of Perak in 1935.40px|borderSelangorState capital : Lumpur (also as the Federal capital)Districts:: 7. Kuala Selangor: 8. Ulu Selangor: 9. Kuala Lumpur: 10. Klang: 11. Ulu Langat: 12. Kuala Langat40px|borderNegeri SembilanState capital : SerembanDistricts:: 13. Coast District: 14. Seremban District: 15. Jelebu: 16. Kuala Pilah: 17. Tampin:Notes::Tuan (also known as Cape Rachado) was a Dutch possession (originally Portuguese before 1641), passed to the British in 1824. Administered as an exclave of Malacca until today.40px|borderPahangState capital : LipisDistricts:: 18. Ulu Pahang: 19. Temerloh: 20. Kuantan: 21. PekanThe Federated Malay States as a forerunner to Malaysiathumb|left|750px|Evolution of MalaysiaEconomyFrom the earlier period of the federation the currency in used was the Straits dollar issued by the Board of Commissioners of Currency.  As the currency depreciated over time, it was pegged at two shillings four sterling pence in 1906.  In 1939, the British government introduced a new currency, Malayan dollar (ringgit in Malay) for used in Malaya and Brunei replacing the Straits dollar at par value.  It had the smallest denominations of 1 cent to a highest of 1000 Malayan dollar and retained the exchange rate as was from the Straits dollar.The Federated Malay States main economic activity was mostly focused on agriculture and mining with emphasis on rubber and tin. FMS and Malaya as a whole was the main supplier of these two commodities for the British industrial need.  Rubber estates or plantations were established in all four states and tin was mined primarily in the Klang valley in Selangor and the Kinta valley in Perak.  This labor intensive economic activities prompted the British to bring in immigrant workers from Southern India to work at the plantations and workers from Southern China to mine the tin.The economic condition in the period can be viewed as self-sustainable, as the income of the federation was more than what was expended in terms of maintaining the administration and economic activities.  In the later period, a lot of resources was poured into the development of the city of Lumpur, as the capital of the federation.  This period also saw rapid growth in terms of communications infrastructure such as interstate roads, a gauge railway line from Penang to Singapore, and the Port Swettenham (present day Klang). Public schools and academic institutions were also opened along with an improvement in public health.  An area in the city was also gazetted as a settlement for the Malay called Kampung Baru.  Public buildings were also constructed such as the Kuala Lumpur railway station, the Bangunan Sultan Abdul Samad complex and Jamek.  The table and section below illustrated the economic growth of the federation and its member states.Note: All values are in Straits Dollar (One dollar fixed at two shillings and four pence sterling). Data for Pahang included only from 1890 onwards Ref: Harrison, Cuthbert Woodville. An Illustrated Guide to the Federated Malay States. 1923SelangorThe revenue of Selangor in 1875 amounted to only $115,656; in 1905 it had increased to $8,857,793.  Of this latter sum $3,195,318 was derived from duty on tin exported, $1,972,628 from finance, federal receipts, and $340,360 from land revenue. The trade balance was chiefly derived from the revenue farms, which included the right to collect import duty on opium and spirits.  The expenditure for 1905 amounted to $7,186,146, of which sum $3,717,238 was on account of federal charges and $1,850,711 for public works.  The value of the imports in 1905 was $24,643,619 and that of the exports was $26,683,316, making a total of $51,326,935 equivalent to 5,988,000.  Tin is the principal export.  The amount exported in 1905 was 17,254 tons. The total area of alienated mining land at the end of 1905 amounted to .PerakThe revenue of Perak in 1874 amounted to $226,333.  That for 1905 amounted to $12,242,897. Of this latter sum $4,876,400 was derived from duty on exported tin, $2,489,300 from railway receipts, $505,300 from land revenue and $142,800 from postal and telegraphic revenue.  The remainder is mainly derived from the revenue farms, which are leased for a short term of years, conveying to the lessee the right to collect import duties upon opium, wine and spirits, to keep pawnbroking shops, and to keep public licensed gambling-houses for the use of non-Malay only.  The expenditure for 1905 amounted to $10,141,980. Of this sum $4,236,000 was expended upon railway upkeep and construction and $2,176,100 upon public works.  The value of the imports into Perak during 1905 was over $20,000,000, and that of the exports exceeded $40,000,000, making a total of over $60,000,000, equivalent to about seven million sterling. The output of tin from Perak ranged between 18,960 tons, valued at $23,099,506 in 1899, and 26,600 tons, valued at $35,500,000, in 1905.  The fluctuating character of the output was due to the uncertainty of the labour supply. The mining population was recruited exclusively from the districts of southern China, and during certain years an increased demand for labourers in China itself, in French Indo-China, in the Dutch colonies, and in South Africa temporarily and adversely affected immigration to the Straits of Malacca.  The output had, moreover, been affected from time to time by the price of tin, which was $32.20 per pikul in 1896, rose to $42.96 in 1898, to $74.15 in 1900, and averaged $80.60 in 1905.  Exclusive of tin, the principal exports were $108,000 worth of Para rubber, $181,000 of copra, $54,000 of hides, $48,000 of patchouli, and considerable quantities of timber, rattans and other jungle produce.Negeri SembilanThe revenue of the Negri Sembilan amounted to only $223,435 in 1888. In 1898 it had increased to $701,334, in 1900 to $1,251,366, and in 1905 to $2,335,534.  The revenue for 1905 was derived mainly as follows: - customs $1,268,602, land revenue $145,475, land sales $21,407, while the revenue farms contributed $584,459.  The expenditure in 1905 amounted to $2,214,093, of which $1,125,355 was expended upon public works.  The trade returns for 1905, which are not, however, complete, showed an aggregate value of about $13,000,000. The value of the tin exported during 1905 exceeded $6,900,000, and the value of the agricultural produce, of which gambier represented $211,000 and damar $80,000, amounted to $407,990.PahangThe revenue of Pahang in 1899 amounted to only $62,077; in 1900 to $419,150.  In 1905 it was $528,368.  The expenditure in 1905 amounted to $1,208,176.  Of this sum $736,886 was expended on public works.  Pahang is still a source of expense to the federation, its progress having been retarded by the disturbances which lasted from December 1891 until 1895, with short intervals of peace, but the revenue was steadily increasing, and the ultimate financial success of the state is considered to be secure.  Pahang owed something over $3,966,500 to Selangor and $1,175,000 to Perak, which had financed it for some years out of surplus revenue.  The value of the imports in 1905 was $1,344,346, that of the exports was $3,838,928, thus making a total trade value of $5,183,274.  The most valuable export is tin, the value of which in 1905 amounted to $2,820,745. The value of the gutta exported exceeded $140,000, that of dried and salted fish amounted to nearly $70,000, and that of timber to $325,000.EducationPress and PublicationsMilitary History   WWI and the FMS With the threat of Germany, the British Navy was in a drive for expansion.  As a contribution, the Government and people of the Federated Malay States; agreed to finance the commissioning of HMS Malaya in a motion proposed in the Federal Council by His late Highness the Sultan of Perak in 1913, supported by His late Highness the Sultan of Selangor.  The battleship which cost $25,000,000 (approximately 2,945,709) was one of five of the Queen Elizabeth Class, displacing 31,000 tons, mounting fifteen-inch (381 mm) guns and capable of .  The most modern ships of their day, they formed the 5th Battle Squadron and fought as such at Jutland in 1916. HMS Malaya was also refurbished and was in service throughout World War Two.WWII - Japanese invasion and dissolutionAfter the Japanese landed in Malaya on December 1941, the Japanese forces began their invasion of the Peninsula. Ipoh, the state capital of Perak, fell on December 1941. Lumpur, the capital of the Federated Malay States and the State of Selangor, was captured on January 1942. Seremban, the state capital of Negeri Sembilan, was captured two days later. Kuantan, the capital of the eastern component state of Pahang, fell earlier on December 1941. All of Malaya including Singapore remained under Japanese occupation until the surrender of the Japanese home islands.After the war the federation was dissolved formally on April 1946, and was incorporated into the Union thereafter. It will be preceded by the of Malaya in 1948 and gain independence in 1957.Postage stampsWhile the four states issued their own stamps as before, there were additional issues for the Federated States as a whole.Notable eventThe Federated Malay States was also within the flight path of American aviator, Earhart, on her Thailand - Singapore leg during her final and fatal attempt to cross the globe in 1937. Permission to enter the FMS airspace with provision to land in Airport was given on 7 June 1937.References* Harrison, Cuthbert Woodville. An Illustrated Guide to the Federated Malay States. 1923* George Palmer Putnam Collection of Amelia Earhart Papers  Purdue UniversitySee also* Malay States* states* The Straits Settlements* Malaya (1915)* Treaty of 1874* Federated Malay States Appeals Order in Council, 1912 Malay Statesmalais fdrsMalajskih DravaMelayu BersekutuMelayu BersekutuMalay StatenFederados Malaios th:zh:
338937
White_Pass_and_Yukon_Route
The White Pass and Yukon Route (WP&Y, WP&YR)  is a Canadian and U.S. Class II narrow gauge railroad linking the port of Alaska, with Whitehorse, the capital of Yukon. An isolated system, it has no direct connection to any other railroad. Equipment, freight and passengers are ferried by ship through the Port of Skagway, and via road through a few of the stops along its route. The railroad is a subsidiary of Clublink and operated by the Pacific and Arctic Railway and Navigation Company (in Alaska), the British Columbia Yukon Railway Company (in Columbia) and the British Yukon Railway Company, originally known as the British Yukon Mining, Trading and Transportation Company (in Yukon), which use the trade name White Pass and Yukon Route.ConstructionThe line was born of the Gold Rush of 1897. The most popular route taken by prospectors to the gold fields in Dawson City was a treacherous route from the port in Skagway or Alaska, across the mountains to the Canadian border at the summit of the Pass or the Pass. There, the prospectors were not allowed across by Canadian authorities unless they had one ton of supplies. This usually required several trips across the passes. There was a need for better transportation than pack horses used over the White Pass or human portage over the Chilkoot Pass. This need generated numerous railroad schemes. In 1897, the Canadian government received 32 proposals for Yukon railroads, and most were never realized.In 1897, three separate companies were organized to build a rail link from Skagway to Selkirk, Yukon,  away. Largely financed by British investors, a railroad was soon under construction. A  gauge was chosen. The narrow roadbed required by narrow gauge greatlt reduced costs when the roadbed was blasted in solid rock. Even so, 450 tons of explosives were used to reach White Pass summit. The narrow gauge also allowed for a tighter radius to be used on curves, making the task easier by allowing the railroad to follow the landscape more, rather than having to be blasted through it .Construction started in May 1898, but they encountered roadblocks in dealing with the local city government and the towns boss, Smith. The President, Samuel H. Graves (18521911), was elected as chairman of the vigilante organization that was trying to expel Soapy and his gang of confidence men and rogues. On the evening of July 8, 1898, Soapy Smith was killed in the  on Juneau Wharf with guards at one of the vigilantes meetings. Samuel Graves witnessed the shooting. The railroad helped block off the escape routes of the gang, aiding in their capture, and the remaining roadblocks in Skagway subsided. On July 21, 1898, an excursion train hauled passengers for  out of Skagway, the first train to operate in Alaska. On July 30, 1898, the charter rights and concessions of the three companies were acquired by the White Pass & Yukon Railway Company Limited, a new company organized in London. Construction reached the  summit of White Pass,  away from Skagway, by mid-February 1899. The railway reached British Columbia on July 6, 1899. In the summer of 1899, construction started north from Carcross to Whitehorse,  north of Skagway.  The construction crews working from Bennett along a difficult lakeshore reached Carcross the next year, and the last spike was driven on July 29, 1900, with service starting on August 1, 1900. By then much of the Gold Rush fever had died down.At the time, the gold spike was actually a regular iron spike. A gold spike was on hand, but the gold was too soft and instead of being driven, was just hammered out of shape.Pass & Yukon.jpg|thumb|120px|left|Drumhead logos such as this often adorned the ends of observation cars on the WP&Y.thumb|lef|150px|The Klondike: Summit Station, 1900.Operations before World War IIAs the gold rush wound down, serious professional mining was taking its place; not so much for gold as for other metals such as copper, silver and lead. The closest port was Skagway, and the only route there was via the White Pass & Yukon Routes river boats and railroad.While ores and concentrates formed the bulk of the traffic, the railroad also carried passenger traffic, and other freight. There was, for a long time, no easier way into the Yukon Territory, and no other way into or out of Skagway except by sea.Financing and route was in place to extend the rails from Whitehorse to Carmacks, but there was chaos in the river transportation service, resulting in a bottleneck. The White Pass instead used the money to purchase most of the riverboats, providing a steady and reliable transportation system between Whitehorse and Dawson City.While the WP&YR never built between Whitehorse and Fort Selkirk, some minor expansion of the railway occurred after 1900.  In 1901, the Taku Tram, a  portage railroad was built at Taku City, British Columbia, which was operated until 1951.  It carried passengers and freight between the S.S. Tutshi operating on Lake and the M.V. Tarahne(The name Tarahne was derived from a Tlingit phrase which meant village of gardens.  , at  pp. 243 (tar  garden), 250 (an  village). The e or i sound at the end of ahn is the Tlingit possessed suffix, in this case meaning that the village (ahn) is possessed by gardens (tar).  Most households in Atlin in 1907 had vegetable gardens.  , at page 271.) operating across Lake to British Columbia. (While the Tutshi was destroyed by a suspicious fire around 1990, the Tarahne was restored and hosts special dinners including murder mysteries.  Lifeboats built for the Tutshis restoration were donated to the Tarahne.) The Taku Tram could not even turn around, and simply backed up on its westbound run. The locomotive used, the Duchess, is now in Carcross.In 1910, the WP&YR operated a branch line to Pueblo, a mining area near Whitehorse. This branch line was abandoned in 1918; a haul-road follows that course today but is mostly barricaded; a Whitehorse Star editorial in the 1980s noted that this route would be an ideal alignment if the Alaska Highway should ever require a bypass reroute around Whitehorse.By June 1914, the WP&YR had 11 locomotives, 15 passenger cars, and 233 freight cars operating on  of trackage; generating $68,368 in passenger revenue and $257,981 in freight revenue; still a profitable operation as operating expenses were only $100,347.  () While all other railroads in the Yukon (such as the Klondike Mines Railway at Dawson City) had been abandoned by 1914, the WP&YR continued to operate.During the Depression, traffic was sparse on the WP&YR, and for a time trains operated as infrequently as once a week.Image:WP&Y 02064.jpg|thumb|left|White Pass Railway train on the shores of LakeFile:White Pass and Yukon Route Railroad Building.jpg|thumb|left|White Pass and Yukon Route Railroad Building is now a museum and home of the Gold Rush National Historical Park{| DepotStationStationStationStationStationStationStationStationStationStationDepotStationStationswitchBritish Columbia-Yukon borderStationStationStationDepot Barry Station(Named for Donald E. Barry (1944-2000), White Pass conductor.)Station  Station Station  Border aka MP 19.5Tunnel TunnelSwitchback GulchStationMountain tunnel Mountain tunnel Station BridgeStation ?Station?Station RoadStation BridgeStation Bridgeaka MP 4.8Station  BridgeStation2 switches, pocket, & diamondDepot|} |} Operations during World War IIAlaska became strategically important for the United States during World War II; there was concern that the Japanese might invade it, as Alaska was the closest part of the United States to Japan. The U.S. Army took control, bringing some newly built and many used steam locomotives (such as the S118 Class) brought from closed U.S. narrow gauge lines to the railroad.There are two persistent myths that show up in almost every book or article which mentions the role of the White Pass & Yukon Route in the building of the Alcan Highway during the Second World War. The myths concern the eleven new 2-8-2 MacArthur type locomotives that the U.S. Army brought to theWP&YR in 1943. Myth #1 is that they were converted from  gauge to  gauge by the WP&YR shops in Skagway, Alaska. Myth #2 is that they were built for Iran and diverted to the WP&YR.These locomotives, designated USA 190 to USA 200, were constructed by Locomotive Works as  gauge and shipped fully assembled.  No modification was needed.  The MacArthur was designed by the Locomotive Company for  (cape gauge) and the smaller gauges were cleverly accommodated with various widths spacers (rings) between the wheels and the truck side frames on same length axles. The spacers were  wide in the case of  gauge and  wide in the case of  gauge. In total, nearly 800 MacArthurs were produced by ALCO, Baldwin, and a few other manufacturers.The reason USA 190200 were never destined for Iran as is often mistakenly stated in books relating WP&YR history, is that Irans government railway was, and is,  (gauge). Also, because of scarce water and extensive tunnels, Iran was the first case where the Army primarily used diesel locomotives. USATC narrow gauge locomotives were never destined for Iran.The first locomotives of the MacArthur design that Baldwin Locomotive Works built were USA 190200 for the WP&YR, which makes them unique. This initial 1942 sales order to Baldwin for 60 MacArthur  (gauge) locomotives was for Indias extensive meter gauge railway system. The first eleven were diverted to the WP&YR as , the next 15 went to India as meter gauge, another 20 went to Rail as , and the remaining 14 were meter gauge for India where the order was destined before the Alaskan and Australian diversions.()()(White Pass & Yukon Route Fan Page.)The White Pass saw record volumes of traffic as it served as a vital supply route for construction materials for the new Highway and other projects. As many as 17 trains were operated daily. In one record period of 24 hours, 37 trains rolled into Whitehorse.19461982Image:WhitePassSteamLocomotive.jpg|thumb|left|The White Pass locomotive is shown here between British Columbia, and SkagwayImage:White Pass Diesel Locomotive.jpg|thumb|left|One of the present day White Pass locomotives is shown here at Alaskathumb|left|White Pass and Yukon Route No 93In 1951, the White Pass and Yukon Corporation Ltd., a new holding company, was incorporated to acquire the three railway companies comprising the WP&YR from the White Pass and Yukon Company, Ltd., which was in liquidation. The railway was financially restructured. While most other narrow gauge systems in North America were closing around this time, the WP&YR remained open. In 1959, the first dividend to stockholders was paid, at 10 cents per share.()The railroad dieselized in the mid to late 1950s, one of the few North American narrow gauge railroads to do so. The railroad bought shovelnose diesels from General Electric, and later road-switchers from Locomotive Company (Alco) and Locomotive Works, as well as a few small switchers.The railroad was an early pioneer of intermodal freight traffic, commonly called container; advertising of the time referred to it as the Container Route. The WP&YR owned an early ship (the Clifford J. Rogers, built in 1955), and in 1956 introduced containers, although these were far smaller than the truck-sized containers than came into use in the United States in 1956 and could not readily be handed off to other railroads or ship lines.The Faro lead-zinc mine opened in 1969. The railway was upgraded with seven new  locomotives from the Alco, new freight cars, ore buckets, a carrier at Whitehorse to transfer from the railways new fleet of trucks, a new ore dock at Skagway, and assorted work on the rail line to improve alignment. In the fall of 1969, a new tunnel and bridge that bypassed Dead Horse Gulch were built to replace the tall steel cantilever bridge that could not carry the heavier trains. This enormous investment made the company dependent on continued ore traffic to earn the revenue, and left the railway vulnerable to loss of that ore-carrying business.As well, passenger traffic on the WP&YR was increasing as cruise ships started to visit Alaskas Passage. There was no road from Skagway to Whitehorse until 1978. Even after the road was built, the White Pass still survived on the ore traffic from the mines.During this time, the green-yellow engine colour scheme, with a thunderbird on the front, was replaced with blue, patterned with black and white. (The green-yellow scheme was restored in the early 1990s, along with the thunderbird. As of 2005, however, one engine still had the blue colour scheme. The steam engines, however, remain basic black.)In 1982, metal prices plunged, striking with devastating effect on the mines that were the White Pass and Yukon Routes main customers. Many, including the Faro lead-zinc mine, closed down, and with that traffic gone, the White Pass was doomed as a commercial railroad. Hopeful of a reopening, the railway ran at a significant loss for several months, carrying only passengers. However, the railway closed down on October 7, 1982.The Northwestel telephone directory issued for April 1, 1982, for Yukon and Northern British Columbia, carried on its cover (wraparound front and back) a photograph, provided by White Pass, of a White Pass train, led by Engine 98, traveling south through Bennett, an irony, as the trains were no longer running for more than half the time the directory was in use.Some of the roads Alco diesels were sold to a railroad in Colombia, and three (out of four, and one of these was wrecked) of the newer Alco diesels built by and in storage with Alcos Canadian licensee MLW (Locomotive Works) were sold to Gypsum in City, California. Only one of these modern narrow gauge diesels, the last narrow gauge diesel locomotives built for a North American customer, was delivered to the White Pass. The five diesels sold to Colombia were not used there as they were too heavy, and were re-acquired in 1999  one was nearly lost at sea during a storm as it broke loose on the barge and slowly rolled towards the edge.The railway was the focus of the first episode of the BBC television series Little Railways in 1983.Revival, 1988presentThe shutdown, however, was not for long. Tourism to Alaska began to increase, with many ships stopping at Skagway. The scenery of the White Pass route sounded like a great tourist draw; and the rails of the White Pass & Yukon Route were laid right down to the docks, even along them, for the former freight and cruise ship traffic. Cruise operators, remembering the attraction of the little mountain climbing trains to their passengers, pushed for a re-opening of the line as a railway. The White Pass was and is perfectly positioned to sell a railroad ride through the mountains to cruise ship tourists; they do not even have to walk far.Following a deal between White Pass and the United Transportation Union representing Alaska employees of the road, the White Pass Route was reopened between Skagway and White Pass in 1988 purely for tourist passenger traffic. The White Pass Route also bid on the ore-haul from the newly reopened Faro mine, but its price was considerably higher than road haulage over the Highway.The railway still uses vintage parlor cars, the oldest four built in 1881 and predating WP&YR by 17 years, and four new cars built in 2007 follow the same 19th century design. At least three cars have wheelchair lifts.A work train actually reached Whitehorse in late August, 1988, its intent being to haul two locomotives, parked in Whitehorse for six years, to Skagway to be overhauled and used on the tourist trains. While in Whitehorse for approximately one week, it hauled the parked rolling stock  flatcars, tankers and a caboose  out of the downtown areas sidings, and the following year, they were hauled further south, many eventually sold. Most of the tracks in downtown Whitehorse have now been torn up, and the lines terminus is six city blocks south of the old train depot at First Avenue and Main Street. A single new track along the waterfront enables the operation, by a local historical society,  of a tram for tourist purposes.Image:Beauty Fraser BC.JPG|thumb| Scenery near BC.Image:White Pass Parlor Cars.jpg|thumb|Parlor cars seen at BC.thumb|Steam Locomotive #73thumb|Steam Locomotive No 69 filling water at Glacier station 2011.thumb|White Pass and Yukon Route shops in Skagway, AlaskaAfter customs and Labour Union jurisdictional issues were resolved, the WP&YR main line reopened to Fraser in 1989, and Bennett in 1992. A train reached Carcross in 1997 to participate in the Ton of Gold centennial celebration. A special passenger run, by invitation only, was made from Carcross to Whitehorse on October 10, 1997, and there are plans to eventually re-open the entire line to Whitehorse if a market exists. So far, the tracks are only certified to Carcross by the Canadian Transportation Agency; on July 29, 2006, White Pass ran a train to Carcross and announced passenger service to begin in May 2007, six trains per week, with motorcoach return trips. Since the distance between Skagway and Whitehorse is , and the distance of line between Skagway & Carcross is , this means that about 58% of the original line is now used again.WP&YR acquired some rolling stock from CNs Newfoundland operations, which shut down in November 1988; the acquisition included 8 side-pivot, drop-side air dump cars for large rocks, and 8 longitudinal hoppers for ballast, still painted in CN orange. These cars were converted from Newfoundlands  gauge to White Pass and Yukon Routes  gauge.Most trains are hauled by the lines diesel locomotives, painted in green (lower) and yellow (upper), but one of the lines steam locomotives is still in operation too, #73, a 2-8-2 Mikado-type locomotive. Another steam locomotive, #40 a 2-8-0 Consolidation type locomotive was on loan from the  Georgetown Loop R.R. in Colorado for upwards of five years, but was returned after only two years. Former WP&Y 69, a 2-8-0, was re-acquired in 2001, rebuilt, and re-entered service in 2008.Also operational, a few times a year, is an original steam-powered snowplow, an essential device in the lines commercial service days. (The rotaries were retired in 1964, along with the remaining steam engines that pushed them, and snow clearing was done by caterpillar tractor.) While it is not needed as the tourist season is only in the summer months, it is a spectacle in operation, and the White Pass runs the steam plow for railfan groups once or twice a winter, pushed by two diesel locomotives (in 2000 only, it was pushed by two steam locomotives, #73 and #40).The centennial of the Golden Spike at Carcross was re-enacted on July 29, 2000, complete with two steam engines meeting nose-to-nose (#73 and #40), and a gold-coated steel spike being driven by a descendant of WP&YR contractor James Heney.One organization chartered a steam-pulled train from Carcross to Fraser, with a stopover at Bennett, on Friday, June 24, 2005.  When expected participants seemed unlikely to arrive in the planned numbers, surplus seats were sold to the public, 120 USD or 156 CAD, with bus return to Carcross from Fraser. This represents the first paid passenger trips out of Carcross since 1982, a feature that started regular service in 2007.White Pass president Gary Danielsen advised a CBC Radio interviewer that service to Whitehorse would require an enormous capital investment to restore the tracks, but the company is willing if there is either a passenger or freight potential to make it cost effective.A June 2006 report on connecting Alaska to the continental railroad network suggested Carmacks as a hub, with a branch line to Whitehorse and beyond to either Skagway or Haines.In addition to the restoration of the actual rail line, several former White Pass steam locomotives are currently in operation at tourist attractions in the United States.  Locomotives 70, 71, and 192 are at the Dollywood theme park in Forge, Tennessee. Locomotive 190 is at Railroad in North Carolina.In late June 2010, the railroad and the City of Skagway entered into an agreement whereby the two would jointly advocate for the restoration of freight service on the line, including the revival of the trackage north of Carcross and the possibility of constructing new track north to Carmacks.  The expansion would require federal funds, and if completed, would serve the regions mining industry.()AccidentsIn 1951, engine #70 caught a guardrail with its snowplow and rolled over on its side. The locomotive is still in operation at Dollywood in Pigeon Forge, Tennessee.In 1994, during rock removal operations, a backhoe operator accidentally struck a petroleum pipeline near the railroad tracks. The operators mistake caused the pipeline to rupture and spill between  of heating oil into the Skagway river. Roadmaster Edward Hanousek, Jr. and President Paul Taylor were later both convicted of violating the Water Act and lying to investigators as a result of the accident.()()A serious derailment on 3 September 2006 resulted in the death of one section worker.()(TSB Accident Report) A work train, Engine 114 pulling eight gravel cars, derailed approximately  south of Bennett, injuring all four train crew, two Canadian and two American; one died at the scene and the others had to be airlifted to a hospital. Passenger operations on the blocked section had ended for the season just before the accident. In February 2007, Engine 114 was taken for repair to the Coast Engine and Equipment Company (CEECO) in Tacoma, Washington.Locomotives and carsThe White Pass and Yukon Route railroad has had a large variety of locomotives and cars.See also* of heritage railways in Canada* of heritage railroads in the United States* of narrow gauge railways in British ColumbiaReferencesGeneral references* * * *:*:*External links* Official company website* Historic WP&Y route map* A WP&YR friend and fan web site by Boerries Burkhardt* 4/15/1899; The first railway to the Klondike - The White Pass and Yukon RailwayPass and Yukon RailwayPass and Yukon Routeja:Pass & Yukon RoutePass and Yukon RoutePass and Yukon RailwayPass and Yukon Route
340081
A38_road
The A38, part of which is also known as the Devon Expressway, is a major A-class road in England.The road runs from Bodmin in Cornwall to Mansfield in Nottinghamshire. It is  long, making it one of the longest A-roads in England. It was formerly known as the Leeds  Exeter Trunk Road, when this description also included the A61.  Prior to the opening of the motorway in the 1960s and 1970s, the A38 formed the main holiday route from the Midlands to Somerset, Devon and Cornwall.Considerable lengths of the road in the West Midlands closely follow roads,(Margary (1967), 140-1 287-8 and 305-6.) including part of Street.(Taylor (1979), page 190.)  Between Worcester and Birmingham the current A38 follows the line of a Saxon road;(Taylor (1979), page 96.)Route descriptionBodmin to BirminghamThe road starts on the eastern side of Bodmin at a junction with the A30 before traversing the edge of the town to meet the A30 again. It travels through the picturesque Glynn Valley to Dobwalls and Liskeard, which are bypassed by a carriageway. The Dobwalls section contains the most sophisticated bridge yet constructed in the UK. The A38 continues through the Cornish countryside, bypassing the centre of Saltash and continuing through the Tunnel. Immediately after the tunnel the Tamar is crossed using the Bridge where the route resumes dual carriageway status. The section from Plymouth to Exeter is called the Devon Expressway, it forms the southern border of Dartmoor National Park, and serves as a southward extension of the motorway opening in 1977.(. It is  long and was completed in the early 1970s.() There are several grade separated junctions along its length mainly for local traffic; including a three-level stacked roundabout for the A386, which heads out towards Dartmoor National Park. The route was reserved for the Parkway as early as 1943, when it was included in the Plan for Plymouth.() In the early 1990s, the Marsh Mills junction was significantly remodelled, reducing the size of the roundabout and building a flyover over the top of it, allowing free flowing access from the Plympton bypass onto the Parkway. The viaducts carrying the A38 over the Plym, which after the construction of the Marsh Mills flyover became the Exeter bound sliproads, were built in 1969-1970 as part of the Plympton bypass. They were replaced in the 1990s due to suffering from Silica Reaction,() and the project, completed in February 1996 at a cost of 12.25million, involved the worlds largest sideways bridge slide at the time for the , 5,500 tonne bridge.()() This required the road to be closed for only 48 hours, which won it an AA National Motoring Award in 1996 for innovation and minimisation of traffic congestion.()The Brent bypass opened in 1974 and the Ivybridge bypass in 1973, both on new alignments. The A38 passes Endsleigh Garden Centre, which used to have direct access from the dual carriageway, although since the early 2000s this has been closed and the garden centre is accessed from the Westover junction for Ivybridge. After Ivybridge, the route roughly parallels the original route, bypassing the village of Lee Mill which is now home to a large trading estate. The road widens to a three-lane dual carriageway for the Plympton bypass. This opened in 1971( and was the first section of the Devon Expressway to built on a new alignment, as well as being the first sizeable dual carriageway section of the route. The route originally ended at the Marsh Mills roundabout, which when opened was the largest in Europe.()The section of the A38 between the A382 junction and Ashburton was built on a new alignment parallel to the old road, and was opened in 1974. Mills, a locally well known furniture store and leisure centre, is passed by the road. The Ashburton bypass, much like the Kennford bypass, uses the alignment of a much older 1930s single carriageway bypass, which was subsequently upgraded to dual carriageway by 1974.() At the village of Buckfastleigh, the route once again bypasses on a new alignment, although due to the challenging topography of the area, the road crosses part of the village on a viaduct. From Buckfastleigh to the A385 junction, the current road follows the route of original single carriageway, with the majority of this section being upgraded between 1973 and 1974, although a small section at Dean Prior was upgraded between 1966 and 1967.( This section is of a poor quality when compared to the majority of the route between Exeter and Plymouth, containing several side turnings with short exit/entry slips, and properties which back onto the road.right|thumb|200px|Typical route confirmation sign seen on the Devon ExpresswayThe town of Chudleigh and the village of Knighton are bypassed on a new alignment, which opened in 1973, and the following section at Heathfield up to the A382 junction was upgraded from the original route between 1966 and 1968.() Some of this section follows part of the old Valley Line railway.Before Kennford, the route splits, with the A38 heading for Plymouth and the A380 heading towards Torbay. At this point, the road becomes a dual two-lane road although a third-lane emerges immediately for uphill traffic as the route climbs Haldon Hill, which has an average gradient of 1 in 20 over a 4 km distance, and a maximum gradient of around 1 in 10 (the adjacent A380 Telegraph Hill has about the same maximum gradient). The third lane is lost at the top of the hill, and the next section, the Harcombe bends is an original dual carriageway section, older than the rest of the route and this is evident with its sharp bends.The Devon Expressway ends near the village of Kennford, south of Exeter, at the terminus of the M5. This initial section was opened in 1977, along with the remaining section of the M5, and is a three-lane dual carriageway. The village of Kennford is bypassed, on an alignment of a 1930s bypass, which was upgraded to dual carriageway in the 1960s and then widened to a dual three-lane road in 1975.()A junction to the south of Exeter represents a third meeting point of the A38 with the A30, from which point the A38 multiplexes with the M5 before re-emerging from junction 27 near Waterloo Cross,  north of Exeter. From junction 27 the A38 heads north via Wellington, Taunton, Bridgwater, Highbridge and Bristol. From Waterloo Cross to Birmingham, the road is paralleled by the M5, where the A38 has reverted to taking local traffic only.From Bristol, it continues north via Gloucester, Tewkesbury, Worcester and Bromsgrove to Birmingham. Between Worcester and Birmingham the A38 followed the line of an identified Saxon road, one of six leading out of Droitwich.( At Bromsgrove, it meets the M42 and the B4096 at junction 1 at End.thumb|left|A38 Bristol Road running through Bournbrook, Birmingham, before completion of the Selly Oak BypassIt passes through Upper Catshill and meets the M5 at junction 4 near Ash. From here to Edgbaston, the road is mostly dual carriageway, single-lane sections having been replaced in the first decade of the 21st century (see history section, below).In the centre of Birmingham, a section of the road becomes the Aston Expressway motorway, running from the north-eastern side of the Inner Ring Road through Aston to the junction with the motorway at Hill Interchange, better known as Spaghetti Junction.The West Midlands section of the A38 is one of the areas chosen by the Agency to monitor the effectiveness of location signs in assisting motorists to communicate their location to the emergency services.Birmingham to MansfieldFrom Birmingham the road bypasses Coldfield and Lichfield, before taking up the route of the Roman road, Ryknild Street,(  (also spelt Icknield or Rykneld), as far as Derby. At Wychnor, the road crosses the Trent and enters the district of Staffordshire.  At Barton Turn, near the B5016 junction, the road runs right alongside the Country Route for around . This railway line follows the line of the A38 from Derby to Plymouth. From Alrewas to Burton, the path called The Way for the Millennium follows the northbound carriageway.From Clay Mills, the road passes through the district of Derbyshire, passing the grade separated junction with the A5132 for Willington. There is the with Burton services at the Burnaston A50 interchange. The road enters the City of Derby borough  north of the Littleover interchange. For nearly , the A38 forms part of Derbys outer ring road, including three roundabouts: Kingsway (or Grand Canyon) for the A5111; Markeaton for the A52; and Eaton (or Abbey Hill) for the A61 and B6179. The section of road between Kingsway roundabout to just north of Markeaton is urban in nature and thus subject to a  speed limit.Originally terminating in Derby at the junction of Babington Lane with St Peters Street (formerly the A6),  The road enters the district of Amber Valley where it passes Drum Hill just north of Little Eaton and is crossed at this point by the Way and Centenary Way. There is a junction for the B6179 to Ripley and Belper. At Alfreton, there is a grade separated junction with the A61, A615 and B6179. The section from Alfreton to the M1, the Alfreton-Normanton Bypass, opened as the A615 in the late 1960s. This section has a grade separated junction with the B600 for Somercotes and the Park industrial estate, and where it crosses the Nottingham spur of the Main Line it enters the district of Bolsover.As a 1970s upgrade to the route of the A61 north of Derby (which became the B6179), the A38 bypasses Ripley passing through former opencast mining land, before joining end-on with the former A615 Alfreton bypass at Watchorn Intersection. The road crosses the M1 at junction 28. Into Nottinghamshire, the road bypasses Sutton-in-Ashfield, dropping to a single carriageway configuration of 1980s construction, including multiple traffic light controlled junctions  such as the Mansfield, Ashfield Regeneration Route (MARR). The final section of the A38 from Sutton, past Mill Hospital into Mansfield, is purely urban in nature and is single carriageway, joining the A6009 in Mansfield Town Centre at the end of the route from Cornwall to the North Midlands.HistoryWhen first designated in 1922, the A38 ran from the centre of Plymouth to Derby.(1922 road list)  It was later extended west from Plymouth on the former route of the A389 over the Ferry to a junction with the A30 at Bodmin.  When the Tamar Bridge was opened in 1961, the A38 was rerouted on the former line of the A374, through Tideford, over the new bridge and through Crownhill, joining the old route at Plympton.  The old route of the A38, via Torpoint and the centre of Plymouth, was redesignated the A374.The A38 was extended north from Derby to the M1 motorway and Mansfield in 1977, partly on the former line of the A615.CornwallThe Liskeard bypass, stretching for  from the west of Liskeard to Trerulefoot, opened in June 1976.()A public inquiry was held for the Dobwalls bypass in February 2005, which was expected to cost 32 million.() The bottleneck was removed when the bypass, linking the existing Liskeard bypass to the current single carriageway section through the Valley opened in the Winter of 2008.() A campaign to open this road was started by villagers in Dobwalls in 1930, but planning for building the road was not granted until 2006, the work starting on 15 November that year.()In a separate improvement within the Glynn Valley, the Agency stabilised a  section of the road near Parkway railway station. The work, which commenced in October 2007, was carried out to shore-up the verge which had been built on an embankment supported by dry stone walling and the root systems of large trees. It was completed in May 2008 seeing the installation of kerbing, road drainage gulleys, safety barriers as well as increasing the verge width to allow for a new surface water drainage system.()DevonThe A38 in Devon runs between Bridge outside Plymouth and junction 31 of the M5, where the motorway ends; this section is known as the Expressway. It is mainly a two-lane dual carriageway which runs between Exeter and Plymouth serving as a continuation of the M5 motorway. It is a common route for tourists travelling to Cornwall, though those wanting to use a continuous dual carriageway route to Cornwall can use the A30 rather than the Devon Expressway. It then runs concurrently with the M5 until junction 27, where it splits and enters Somerset independent but parallel to the M5.During the mid 1960s, small sections of the route between Plymouth and Exeter were upgraded to dual carriageway, such as those at Dean Prior and Heathfield. This was followed by the construction of Plympton bypass in 1970-71, with the majority of realignment, such as the Ivybridge and Buckfastleigh bypasses, being completed during 1973-74. The route, now known as the Devon Expressway, was largely complete by 1975, with the final section between Kennford and the M5 opening in 1977, coinciding with the completion of the M5 during the same year. Whilst many of the sections were newly constructed realignments, some sections such as the Ashburton and Kennford bypasses were upgraded from the original 1930s single carriageway bypasses.()() The Parkway, the section of dual carriageway through the suburbs of Plymouth between the Tamar Bridge and Marsh Mills, was constructed in 1983-84, along a route which had been reserved for this road since 1943. This was followed by the construction of a flyover over Marsh Mills roundabout in 1992, providing a non stop route between the Plympton bypass and the Parkway.(The Plympton bypass was used for a stage in the Tour de France, the first time the race had ever come to the United Kingdom.() Popular belief is held that the Plympton bypass was newly completed, but had not yet opened. In fact, the Plympton bypass had been open some three years earlier.The viaducts carrying the A38 over the Plym, which after the construction of the Marsh Mills flyover became the Exeter bound sliproads, were built in 1969-1970 as part of the Plympton bypass. They were replaced in the 1990s due to suffering from Silica Reaction,() and the project, completed in February 1996 at a cost of 12.25million, involved the worlds largest sideways bridge slide at the time for the , 5,500 tonne bridge.()() This required the road to be closed for only 48 hours, winning it an AA National Motoring Award in 1996 for innovation and minimisation of traffic congestion.()As with any major road, accidents are likely to occur; however due to the substandard design of some sections of the route between Exeter and Plymouth, the accident rate has been identified as being above the national average for the type of road.() A spate of accidents in April 2009() heightened local awareness of the issue, with local MP Streeter calling for a review of the road. A number of improvements have been made along the route in recent years, mainly being the replacement of worn-out road surfaces, such as those at Buckfastleigh and Ivybridge.() These projects have also included the replacement of signage, and the reconstruction of exit/entry slips for side turnings, in a bid to make the road safer.Presently, the route between Plymouth and the end of M5 is all dual carriageway, and branded the Devon Expressway, being the primary route that links Plymouth to the rest of the country.Beyond the end of M5, the road runs concurrently with and as the M5 until junction 27. The original route between Exeter and junction 27 of the M5 (Waterloo Cross) was downgraded to become the B3181 when the M5 was opened in 1977SomersetFrom Junction 27 of the M5 to East Brent, the A38 runs broadly parallel to the motorway: junctions 22 to 27 are mostly spurs connecting to the road and all no further than  from it. The A38 runs around Wellington, through the county seat of Taunton, Petherton and Highbridge. Beyond Highbridge and junction 22, the road departs the motorway and resumes primary status, going through Winscombe and Langford. This route is the suggested route for accessing the south of Bristol and Airport from the South West.The centre of Bridgwater was a notorious bottle neck on the holiday route as traffic from both the A38 and the A39 had to negotiate through the town centre in order to cross the Parrett. The construction of a new reinforced concrete road bridge, the Blake Bridge, which opened in March 1958 as part of a southern bypass took much of the traffic away from the centre of Bridgwater.(Fitzhugh (1993), Bridgwater and the River Parrett: in old photographs. Stroud: Alan Sutton Publishing. ISBN 0-7509-0518-2, page 93.) The opening of the M5 in 1974 further reduced the traffic pressure. This is complemented by a link road (Western Way) linking the A38 and the A39 north and west of the town respectively.Much of the A38 through Somerset was built as single carriageway, with some three-lane passing points. However, the construction of the M5 through Somerset, in the early 1970s, led to the building of links between the A38 and the M5 in the form of new roundabouts on the A38 linking into adjacent junctions on the M5.Greater Bristol areaThe A38 serves Airport to the south west of the city, and enters the city itself at Highridge, along Bedminster Down and into Bedminster. It runs through central Bristol before leaving northwards through Croft and along Gloucester Road. It runs past Filton Airport to meet the M5 again at junction 15. Thereafter it runs through Almondsbury and by-passes Thornbury to enter Gloucestershire.South of Bristol, the road was diverted in 2001 to cater for an extension of the runway and installation of a Category 3 landing system at Bristol Airport.() The route south of the city, despite serving the airport, is single carriageway and suffers from heavy volume of traffic at peak times, and congestion along Bedminster Down. Drivers from the south are advised by road signs not to follow the A38 into the city, but to use the A3029 Winterstoke road to enter from the west, as this route has a greater capacity. As part of the Greater Bristol Strategic Transport Study, a link road is under consideration to the south of Bristol.(http://www.bristol.gov.uk/ccm/content/Transport-Streets/projects-and-schemes/major-highway-schemes.en) This is in part due to the congestion at Winterstoke Road and Barrow Gurney,(http://www.thisisbristol.co.uk/news/Village-calls-North-Somerset-clear-drains-avoid-road-disaster/article-469475-detail/article.html) both of which are very busy, especially the latter where the road can only accommodate travelling at one direction at a given time; and the incomplete Bristol Ring Road (A4174).The route to the north of the city is also very busy: it runs as a single carriageway up to the junction with the A4174 ring road at Filton, and where it runs as Gloucester Road is a busy shopping parade. Beyond the ring road, it runs as a dual carriageway past Bristol Filton Airport, which contains bases for Royal Mail, Airbus, Rolls Royce and others. Beyond the junction with M5 it runs as a broad single carriageway, again parallel to the M5 in route towards Gloucester.The present road from Bristol through Horfield was one of the additional roads added to the turnpike roads in 1749.  This passed through Thornbury to Stone, just beyond the boundary of Gloucestershire, where it met one of the turnpike roads.(Local Act 27 Geo. II c.28.)  From Almondsbury, the road approximately follows the line of the Roman road from Sea Mills to Gloucester.(Margary (1967), 104-1.)  The previous main route out of Bristol (one of twelve roads from the city, turnpiked in 1727 was Stapleton and Hambrook to the upper end of Tytherington and thence to Stone.(Local Act, 13 Geo. I, c.12)  This seems to be parts of B4058, B4424, and then unclassified roads.  However, Ogilvys Britannia shows a route following the B4058 as far as Cromhall, then through Stinchcombe Bottom, Dursley, and Cam before joining the present road.(Ogilvy (1675), 117.)GloucestershireThe Bristol turnpike roads were continued by a turpike road established in 1727, described as from the City of Gloucester to the village of Stone being the great road from the north to west of this kingdom.(Local Act, 12 Geo. I, c.24.)  Much of the road, follows a Roman road, but deviates from it between Buckover and Whitfield.(Margary (1967), 141.)The A38 was rerouted along the Gloucester Bypass when it was built, and the old route through the city became the A430. In 2007 the Gloucester South Western Bypass opened to traffic,() costing 43 million.() Though it is numbered A430 and not technically part of the A38, traffic wishing to continue on the A38 on the other side of the city is signed to use the bypass, rather than the existing A38.Beyond Gloucester, the A38 was probably only improved in 1756 under an Act dealing with roads from that city towards Cheltenham and Tewkesbury.(Pawson (1977), 348, citing Local Act 29 Geo. II, c.58; cf. Local Act 38 Geo. III, c.12.)   The next section (from Coombe Hill) was improved as one of the Tewkesbury roads, again from 1727.  The Act refers to this as the Upper Way to Gloucester in contrast to the Lower Way, which went via Wainsload Bridge.(Local Act, 12 Geo. I, c.18.)  When this Act was renewed in 1756, the road from Tewkesbury to the a farm house called the Old Blue Ball (now Bluebell Farm) was also included.  This was in Croome, Worcestershire, and was where one of the Worcester turnpikes ended.(Local Act 29 Geo. II, c.51.)  Much of this stretch of the road originated as a Roman road, but the later road left the Roman line near Naunton in Ripple.  The name Stratford Bridge on the county boundary confirms its Roman origin there.(Margary (1967), 287-8.)WorcestershireThe current A38 road follows from the southern end of one of the Worcester turnpike trusts roads which was originally (in 1726) at Stoke, but an Act of 1737 extended it to Upton Bridge (taking it past Bluebell Farm).(Local Acts, 12 Geo. I, c.12 and 10 Geo. II, c.25.)North of the city, the road was a particularly important one as it connected the saltmaking centre of Droitwich with the river Severn.  In 1706, this was described as heavily used for the carriage of salt, iron, coals and other wares.(Pawson (1977), 81.)(King (2006), 87.)  The first Turnpike Act for this road was an extremely early one, being passed in 1713 and recites:The highway from the city of Worcester to the Borough of Droitwich ... by reason of the heavy and many loads and carriages of salt and other goods which daily pass through the said road is almost impassible for the space of nine months.(Private Act, 12 Anne, stat. II, c.3.)  When it was renewed in 1725, it was extended from the Tything of Whistons to the Lower Slip of the Quay of Worcester; from Droitwich to Dyers Bridge near Bromsgrove; and through the town of Droitwich frim Netherwith Netherwich Bridge to a place called Chapel on the Bridge.(Local Act 12 Geo. I c.20.)  In 1749, this was again extended through the town of Bromsgrove to Spadebourne Bridge, immediately north of the town.(Local Act, 22 Geo. II, c.43.)  Where the road leaves Worcester, it again does not follow the line of the Roman road in the same direction until it picks up the Roman line, just south of Hussingtree.  The Roman road took a more direct line over Rainbow Hill and through Blackpole, now B4550.  From Martin Hussingtree, the A38 closely follows the Roman line to beyond Bromsgrove.(Margary (1967), 287.)  The present road deviates from its line when it was originally classified at Droitwich where the main road is a bypass, the old road now mostly being B4090.  This happens again at Bromsgrove, where A38 is again a bypass, the old line mostly now being B4091 and Bromsgrove High Street (now partly pedestrianised, then through the town centre.A short distance north of where the old A38 (now declassified) joins the Bromsgrove bypass, is End, where an old highway intersection has been replaced by Junction 1 of motorway.  Here, the road is joined from the southeast by the B4096, Alcester Road, which was from 1754 one of the roads of the Alcester turnpike trust.(Local Act, 27 Geo. II, c.54.)  The continuation northwards of B4096 is called Old Birmingham Road, because it was the original route of the turnpike to Birmingham, climbing to a pass in the Hills.  The Roman road also went through the same pass, but its route from to the pass was probably rather straighter.(  Beyond the motorway junction, the A38 was turnpiked, not as the turnpike to Birmingham, but to Halesowen and Dudley, by the 1726 Act that also turnpiked Old Birmingham Road.(Local Act, 13 Geo. I, c.15.)  The next Acts appointed separate trustees for the Dudley Road in 1742 and for the Birmingham Road in 1748.(Local Acts, 15 Geo. II, c.7; 21 Geo. II, c.22.)  The road from Ash to Longbridge was laid out as a new road in the early 1830s.(Worcestershire Rcord Office, Quarter Sessions papers, deposited plans.)  The road passed through the centre of Rubery until the 770,000 ( as of 2011), Rubery Bypass opened in December 1965.Lydiate Ash was the northern end of the M5 for many years in the 1960s, with traffic transferring onto the A38, which was diverted at this point to link with the M5.Birminghamkm415.jpg|thumb|right|Driver location sign (large and blue) and distance marker post (smaller, with a red reflective stripe) on A38 in the West MidlandsAt Longbridge, new turpike joined the Roman road and the original turnpike, and runs straight towards the city centre.  Hutton, the Birmingham historian described the road:(A. Cossons, Worcestershire turnpikes, Transactions of Birmingham Archaeological Society 64 (1946 for 1942-3), 65-66, quoting W. Hutton, History of Birmingham (2nd edition), 263-4.)Birmingham to Bromsgrove 13 miles is made extremely commodious for the first four miles under the patronage of John Kettle esq in 1772 at an expense of 5000, but afterwards is so confined that two horses cannot pass without danger; the sun and winds are excluded, and the rivers lie open to the stranger and he travels through dirt at midsummer.   The Northfield bypass, taking traffic away from the congested town centre opened on 11 April 2007.() Between Northfield and Oak, the road is likely to have been in use in the medieval period as the road approximately follows the boundary of the former Weoley Park, the great park belonging to Castle.(  A  dual carriageway bypass () of the narrow section from Selly Oak to Bournbrook opened in August 2011.(http://www.cbrd.co.uk/futures/a38-selly-oak-bypass/)( et seq) This required new bridges to carry the and Worcester Canal and the Cross-City railway line over the road.( The destination of the Roman road was clearly Fort,( but A38 turns away towards the city centre.North of the city centre, the A38 used to pass through Coldfield town centre before a bypass was built. The old route is now the A5127.  It is not clear what turnpike trust was responsible for this road or even whether it was a turnpike.StaffordshireThe road (now A5127) from the county boundary at Shenstone Woodend, through Shenstone to Lichfield was one of the roads of the Turnpike Trust, established in 1729.(Local Act, 2 Geo. II, c.5.)  However, this section of the old A38 has been replaced by new dual carriageways.Beyond Lichfield, the old A38 (now A5127) joins the Roman Street at Streethay(Margary (1967), 305-6.) and immediately after that A5127 joins the present A38.  Ryknild Street had to that point run roughly parallel to A38, but following a different line from Metchley through Wall, its line sometimes being used by modern roads (including B4138).(The section from Lichfield to Alrewas was dualled in 1958. The 500,000 ( as of 2011), section from Alrewas to Wychnor Farm near Hall, and the 150,000 ( as of 2011),section from Wychnor Farm to Barton Turn both opened in 1962.  The further section of the route was improved to dual carriageway standard, including the 350,000  section from Turn (near Barton-under-Needwood) to Branston in February 1964, bypassing upon Trent in June 1967 (costing 2.6M ( as of 2011),), which stretched from Branston to Clay Mills and actually shortened the route  now the A5121 - by ), and in recent years many of the at-grade junctions have been upgraded or stopped-up.This long stretch of road closely follows Ryknild Street (whose destination was the Roman fort at Chester) until just short of Branston where A38 swings west, perhaps to avoid low ground.  The Roman road is used by minor roads through the suburbs of Burton upon Trent and then A5121 to rejoin the present A38 beyond the Dove near Clay Mills.(  The road from Lichfield to Burton upon Trent was another of the roads maintained by the Lichfield Turnpike Trust from 1729.  This diverged from the present line at Branston, taking the road through the town centre, and is now classified as A5121.(  The road from Burton to Derby was turpiked in 1753.(Local Act, 26 Geo. II, c.59.)  Beyond the start of the Derby bypass, the old A38 has been reclassified as A5250.  This follows Ryknild Street as far as Littleover.(DerbyshireIn March 1969, the Allestree Link Road, from the A6 at Allestree to the former A61 was opened, crossing the River Derwent and Main Line.Further improvements in the late 1960s and 1970s saw construction of the 5.2 million ( as of 2011) Mickleover bypass to the south-west of Derby opened on 19 February 1975. Although the government had approved the section through Allestree as early as 1974, before the Mickleover bypass had been completed, this section had a lot of objections from nearby residents, delaying its construction (from the A52 to the A6). It was opposed directly by Derby Borough Council and the former Derby Higher Education College. The 17 million ( as of 2011) road was eventually opened on 7 September 1983, known as Queensway. An extension of the A38 northwards, crossing the M1 at Junction 28, and ending in Mansfield was built. The 3 million ( as of 2011) Eaton-Holbrook Improvement opened on 3 October 1977.The 12 million ( as of 2011)  Ripley-Swanwick Bypass was opened by Varley (MP for Chesterfield) on 21 October 1977, although the section from Alfreton to the Hartshay Hill roundabout with the A610 had been open to traffic since 5 September 1977.NottinghamshireTo the east of Junction 28 of the M1, the road used to be the A615 until October 1977. The alignment of this road is relatively modern as the dangerous junction with Berristow Lane was improved to grade-separated in the late 1990s, incorporating access to a busy shopping centre.Notable locationsSee also*on the A38*Britain road numbering schemeReferencesNotesBibliography* King, Peter (2006). Some roads out of north Worcestershire, Transactions of Worcestershire Archaeological Society 3rd series, 20 (2006). 87-102.* Margary, Ivan (1967). Roman Roads in Britain.  John Baker Publishers.* Ogilvy, John (1675). Britannia or an illustration of the Kingdom of England by a geographical and historical description of the principal roads thereof.* Pawson, Eric (1977). Transport and Economy: the turnpike roads of eighteenth century Britain. Academic Press.* Taylor, Christopher (1979). Roads & Tracks of Britain. J. M. Dent & Sons. ISBN 0-460-04329-3.External links*SABRE - A38*A38 corridor developments in Birmingham
341105
Communist_Party_of_New_Zealand
The Communist Party of New Zealand (CPNZ) was a Communist party in Zealand from the 1920s to the early 1990s. It never achieved significant political success, and no longer exists as an independent group, although the Socialist Worker organisation is considered organisationally continuous with the CPNZ. History The CPNZ was founded in March 1921, five years after the Zealand Labour Party, and it consisted mainly of some dozens of former members of the Zealand Marxian Association (established in 1918) and the old Socialist Party. The men who established the Communist Party were supporters of the Russian Bolsheviks, and remained independent from those who did not echo this support.The new CPNZ attempted to establish itself in the 1920s as a militant force in the industrial sector, mainly in the mining towns of the West Coast of the South Island, and it gained some modest successes; a few hundred supporters were recruited. In line with the Front policy of the Comintern, an attempt was made to join the Labour Party but this failed, and the two parties became fierce competitors. A Communist attempt to seize control over the main leftwing newspaper, the Worker also failed. The New Zealand Communists were frequently persecuted and arrested for sedition, their printing press (used to print The Vanguard newspaper) was seized, and in addition the party sustained considerable sectarian in-fighting. By the end of the 1920s, there were few party members left, and most of them were unemployed. These remnants started an unemployed workers movement, which grew quite large, but it was eclipsed by its Labour Party rival. In the 1935 general election, the Communists remained hostile towards the Labour Party (which won, and went on to form the first Labour Government with mass working class support). This policy was contrary to the Front policy adopted by the Comintern in 1934, but the New Zealand representative in Moscow did not return home in time to communicate the new political line to the party leadership. In the later 1930s, the Communists regained considerable influence through various organizations and trade unions, and gained an able leader in George Watson, who however was conscripted for military service, and died in action during World War II. In the immediate post-wars years, the CPNZ became a strong influence in  the Auckland Regions Trade Council and for some time had probably over a thousand supporters nationwide. Throughout this period, the party remained resolutely Stalinist in its policy, and closely followed the political line adopted by Moscow. After the invasion of Hungary in 1956, most of the intellectuals the CPNZ had attracted in the meantime left the party; some erstwhile supporters founded new journals such as Zealand Monthly Review, Comment, Socialist Forum and Here & Now. Next, in the early 1960s, the party experienced more internal strife due to the split. The party was divided between supporters of the Union under Khrushchev and those who claimed Khrushchev was a revisionist and chose instead to follow China under Zedong. Eventually, uniquely among the official communist parties of First World nations, the majority of the party and its newspaper The Peoples Voice chose to adopt Maoism. The supporters of Khrushchevs Union (mainly Auckland trade unionists) departed to form the Socialist Unity Party.Later, when Mao died and Xiaoping began to reform the Chinese system, the Communist Party of New Zealand began to follow the lead of Hoxhas Albania, which they considered to be the last truly Communist country in the world. Members of the CPNZ national leadership who continued to uphold the line of the post-Mao Communist Party, including Vic Wilcox, Alec Ostler and Don Ross were expelled and formed the Preparatory Committee for the Formation of the Communist Party of New Zealand (Marxist-Leninist).Meanwhile other former members of the CPNZ in Wellington, where the party branch had been expelled en masse in 1970, founded the Wellington Marxist Leninist Organisation, which in 1980 merged with the Northern Communist Organisation to form the Workers Communist League (WCL).After the collapse of Communism in Albania, the Communist Party of New Zealand gradually changed its views, renouncing its former support of Stalinism, Maoism, and Hoxhaism. Instead, under the leadership of its last General Secretary, Morgan, it developed a Capitalist analysis of the Stalinist states, the first CP in the world to do so . Opponents of this change departed, and established the Party of Aotearoa (a Maoist group) and the Marxist-Leninst Collective (a pro-Hoxha group). The Communist Party of New Zealand eventually merged with the International Socialist Organization in 1994. The resultant party, known as the Socialist Workers Organization, has evolved into the small but highly active Worker (Aotearoa).The CPNZ never had mass influence or real political power, but it did politically influence several generations of radicals and stimulated several important social movements, including All Racist Tours (HART) and the Progressive Youth Movement (PYM).References*Joseph Robert Powell, The history of a working class party, 1918-40.  Wellington : MA Thesis, Victoria University College, 1949*Ian Powell, The communist left and the labour movement in Christchurch up until the 1935 general election. MA Thesis, University of Canterbury, 2004.*Julie M. Hynes, The Communist Party in Otago, 1940-1947. Thesis (Dip. Arts), University of Otago, 1979.*Alex Galbraith, Reminiscences of the early history of the Communist Party of New Zealand. Typescript, 1949*The making of a New Zealand revolutionary : reminiscences of Alex Galbraith, edited, with an introduction and notes by Ray Nunes. Auckland: Workers Party of New Zealand, 1994.*Ron Smith, Working class son: my fight against capitalism and war: memoirs of Ron Smith, a New Zealand communist: self published, 1994. ISBN 0-473-02909-X*Kerry Taylor, Kiwi Comrades: The Social Basis of New Zealand Communism, 1921-1948. in K. Morgan etal eds, Agents of Revolution: New Biographical Approaches to the History of Communism, Bern: Peter Lang, 2005. *Kerry Taylor, The Communist Party of New Zealand and the Third Period in M. Worley (ed.), In Search of Revolution: International Communist Parties and the Third Period, London: I.B. Tauris, 2004. *Kerry Taylor, On the Left: Essays on Socialism in New Zealand (edited with Pat Moloney), University of Otago Press, Dunedin, 2002. *Kerry Taylor, Potential Allies of the Working Class: The Communist Party of New Zealand Maori, 1921-1952, in On the Left: Essays on Socialism in New Zealand. *Kerry Taylor, Our Motto, No compromise The Origins of the New Zealand Communist Movement, New Zealand Journal of History, 28:2 (1994). Comunista di Nuova Zelanda  
342494
Wunder_von_Lengede
File:Ellgaard, Das Wunder von Lengede, 1963.jpg|thumb|Wunder von Lengede, illustration (1963) by Ellgaard.On 7 November 1963, 11 West German miners were rescued from a collapsed mine after surviving for 14 days, an event that later became known as the Wunder von Lengede (miracle of Lengede).On 24 October 1963, the Lengede-Broistedt mine near Salzgitter was flooded with 500,000 m of muddy water after a sedimentation pond had broken its ground and the tunnels between the 60 m and 100 m levels. Out of 129 workers, 79 managed to escape during the first few hours. They used mine ventilation raises and further shafts which had been provided with ladders due to safety regulations. At first there seemed to be no hope for the remaining 50 miners. Several attempts and deliberations about possible rescue positions within the mine and the successful rescue of miners at the one or other locations gave raise to a sequence of dramatic and technically challenging rescue missions with a hitherto unseen worldwide media coverage. The float rescueAfter one day, seven more miners could be located with a small access bore hole close to the Hauptbremsberg, a central transport hub in the mine. While broader rescue drilling was under-way, due to the falling water level, they sent a message to the surface, they would try to escape on their own. Four foremen from above secretly took initiative to meet the men halfway with a makeshift float and get the men back on the surface.( The air bubbleIt had been calculated that four more workers could have survived in an air bubble on their working place.( A bore hole drilled to that very section revealed life signs.( These miners (only three had actually survived) had to be brought to the surface through an escape hole while significantly high pressure was maintained to avoid sickness and a return of the water. The rescue operations were led by several groups of experts, the medical team led by Dr. Wnsche, an aviation medic. (IM BLUT SAMMELTE SICH STICKSTOFF (Nitrogen in the blood) Interview with Dr. Otto Wnsche, Leiter des rztlichen Rettungskommandos von Lengede)The miners received games, cameras (copies of the photos were returned to them) and a special diet.( Various communication channels to friends and loved ones were established. After their rescue on 1 November, rescue equipment was moved off-site, as there seemed to be no hope for the remaining men. A memorial church service for the missing men was already scheduled for the 4th of November.( The Alter Mann rescueHowever, a worker called Htter, whose long year foreman was among the missed, suggested on the previous Sunday to the technical director Ferling a further escape zone. This last escape resort was in an abandoned part of the mine, in  (old man). Under normal conditions, it was absolutely forbidden to enter this area, but workers now and then had a look at Alter Mann areas or used them to take a rest or shortcut. The suggestion led to a final hole being drilled down to this highly dangerous and unstable area of the mine. When contact with a new group of 11 survivors was established via hammer signal, newspapers and media worldwide began to speak of a miracle. As the experienced rescuers had hoped, more than 20 miners had fled into the Alter Mann as water was rising in the newer parts of the mine. By the time the drill came down, only 11 had survived in extreme circumstances of falling rock, debris, wounded and dying comrades and different water levels. They had only a bottle of tea with them and the batteries of their helmet lamps had to be rationed. Due to the instability of the region, drilling was done in the final parts with a compressor.After a few more days of drilling rescue access holes, the 11 miners were brought to safety on 7 November after being trapped for two weeks. They were rescued from a depth of  via a  diameter shaft, using a device called bomb.  The remaining 29 workers had died; 19 were killed directly in the disaster, 10 in the aftermath while awaiting rescue. File:Deutsches Museum - Bergbau - Dahlbuschbombe Lengede 1.JPG|thumb|The original  on display at the Museum, Munich There were some harsh discussions about why and whether this last resort had not been suggested earlier. As it was revealed later, rumours about the Alter Mann as a possible refuge had been raised as early as two days after the flooding. However these had not been taken into account till the formal attempt by Htter. Spiegel described some rumours about East German involvement against critics as well a sort of psychological barrier between different hierarchy levels as reason for the late search in the Alter Mann.(13.11.1963 IN DER KAUE SPRACHEN SIE VOM ALTEN MANN, Von Hess, SPIEGEL-Redakteur Ernst http://www.spiegel.de/spiegel/print/d-46172717.html) Media presenceThe turn of events, with the various dramatic efforts to reach and rescue the survivors, attracted international media attention. The disaster attracted considerable media attention. There was stiff competition between the 365 press people and 83 journalists and technicians of TV and radio stations.( The reporters used fixed telephone lines temporarily provided and leased by the inhabitants of Lengede. Press reporter Mauz and his Volkswagen beetle got celebrity status, since he had occupied a central place 50 m away from the borehole and was using the phone line of the local railway station inn to report from the car.(13.11.1963 Helm auf PRESSE http://www.spiegel.de/spiegel/print/d-46172720.html)Others, especially press people, were less lucky. A French press journalist, Yves Grandmange was beaten 5 times while attempting interviews.( Due to the fact that special equipment provided by different TV and radio stations was also used to provide communication with the miners, these reporters received privileged access.  Chancellor Erhard personally visited the mine site and spoke with the miners.( Erhard had formally obtained permission from his cabinet members to skip normal duties and visit the site. Over 450 journalists from all over the world were present when the last miners were rescued.(Zwei Wochen im Grab (Two weeks in the grave) Die Zeit,  16.10.2003) This event, along with the of Queen Elizabeth II  10 years  earlier, became a hallmark for early TV coverage of events with international interest.(Humanities, Social Sciences and Law, Praxishandbuch Fernsehen, 2010, 11-128, DOI: 10.1007/978-3-531-92103-7_1 Allgemeine Rahmenbedingungen, by Eric Karstens and Jrg Schtte) The rescue was the first significant news story to receive actual daily breaking news television coverage, and it made watching the Tagesschau a sort of ritual in Western Germany.(entry about Tageschau in http://www.fernsehserien.de) Film portrayals 1969 Rudolf Jugert made a first movie about the events. Several documentations have been shot as well, so Das Wunder von Lengede oder Ich wnsch keinem was wir mitgemacht haben 1979 by ZDF and Das Drama von Lengede, Protokoll einer Katastrophe 2003 by the WDR. In 2003, a film titled Das Wunder von Lengede in two parts was produced by German television station Sat.1. The film was written by Rskau based on the recollections of one of the rescued miners. It was directed by Heidelbach and featured Ferch, Josef Liefers, Maria Halmer, Makatsch, Prahl, Rohde, Rohde and Heinze. It was first broadcast on 910 November 2003 and among others was televised in Sweden. See also * Copiap mining accident* Mine collapse References  Further reading  * Manfred Meier: Das Wunder von Lengede. Fischer-Taschenbuch-Verlag, Frankfurt am Main 2003, ISBN 3-596-16141-X. External links * link in German Das Unglck von Lengede Spiegel, 13 November 1963, nr. 46, Issue 17* Grubenunglck und Rettung 1963 (in German) Geschichts@tlas Niedersachsen - Information about the rescue mission* Das Wunder von Lengede (in German) nordmedia, 7 July 2009 - Information about the movievon Lengedede Lengedei Lengede 1963
344140
Baroque_architecture
File:Il Gesu.jpg|thumb|Faade of the of the Ges, the first truly baroque faade.()Baroque architecture is a term used to describe the building style of the Baroque era, begun in late sixteenth century Italy, that took the Roman vocabulary of architecture and used it in a new rhetorical and theatrical fashion, often to express the triumph of the Church and the absolutist state. It was characterized by new explorations of form, light and shadow and dramatic intensity. Whereas the Renaissance drew on the wealth and power of the Italian courts and was a blend of secular and religious forces, the Baroque was, initially at least, directly linked to the Counter-Reformation, a movement within the Catholic Church to reform itself in response to the Reformation.(The of Trent (15451563) is usually given as the beginning of the Counter-Reformation.) Baroque architecture and its embellishments were on the one hand more accessible to the emotions and on the other hand, a visible statement of the wealth and power of the Church. The new style manifested itself in particular in the context of the new religious orders, like the Theatines and the Jesuits who aimed to improve popular piety.The architecture of the High Roman Baroque can be assigned to the papal reigns of VIII, X and VII, spanning from 1623 to 1667. The three principal architects of this period were the sculptor Bernini, Borromini and the painter da Cortona and each evolved their own distinctively individual architectural expression.Dissemination of Baroque architecture to the south of Italy resulted in regional variations such as Baroque architecture or that of Naples and Lecce. To the north, the Theatine architect Guarini, Vittone and  Sicilian born Juvarra contributed Baroque buildings to the city of Turin and the Piedmont region.A synthesis of Bernini, Borromini and Cortonas architecture can be seen in the late Baroque architecture of northern Europe which paved the way for the more decorative Rococo style. By the middle of the seventeenth century, the Baroque style had found its secular expression in the form of grand palaces, first in Francewith the de Maisons (1642) near Paris by Mansartand then throughout Europe.During the seventeenth century, Baroque architecture spread through Europe and Latin America, where it was particularly promoted by the Jesuits. Precursors and features of Baroque architecture Michelangelos late Roman buildings, particularly Peters Basilica, may be considered precursors to Baroque architecture. His pupil della Porta continued this work in Rome, particularly in the faade of the Jesuit church Ges, which leads directly to the most important church faade of the early Baroque, Susanna (1603), by Maderno(For discussion of Madernos facade, see Wittkower R., Art & Architecture in Italy 16001750, 1985 edn, p. 111) Distinctive features of Baroque architecture can include:* 	In churches, broader naves and sometimes given oval forms*	Fragmentary or deliberately incomplete architectural elements*	dramatic use of light; either strong light-and-shade contrasts (chiaroscuro effects) as at the church of Abbey, or uniform lighting by means of several windows (e.g. church of Abbey)*	opulent use of colour and ornaments (putti or figures made of wood (often gilded), plaster or stucco, marble or faux finishing)*	large-scale ceiling frescoes*	an external faade often characterized by a dramatic central projection*	the interior is a shell for painting, sculpture and stucco (especially in the late Baroque)*	illusory effects like loeil(is an art technique involving extremely realistic imagery in order to create the optical illusion that the depicted objects appear in three dimensions.) and the blending of painting and architecture*	pear-shaped domes in the Bavarian, Czech, Polish, and Baroque*	and Holy Trinity columns erected in Catholic countries, often in thanksgiving for ending a plagueImage:Trier Kurfuerstliches Palais BW 1.JPG|Electors Palace in Trier, GermanyImage:Santa Susanna (Rome) - facade.jpg|Susanna in Rome, ItalyImage:Sankt Petersburg Peter-und-Paul-Kathedrale 2006 a.jpg|and Paul Cathedral in Petersburg, RussiaImage:Krakow 16.jpg|Church of Saint Peter and Paul in Krakow, Poland The Baroque and colonialism File:Church of Immaculate Conception, Panjim 1.jpg|thumb|200px|During the Portuguese colonization of Goa, India brought about many churches with baroque architecture (Our Lady of the Immaculate Conception Church)Though the tendency has been to see Baroque architecture as a European phenomenon, it coincided with, and is integrally enmeshed with, the rise of European colonialism. Colonialism required the development of centralized and powerful governments with Spain and France, the first to move in this direction.(Though there is a vast literature on the subject, a succinct overview can be found in: Francis Ching, Jarzombek, Vikram Prakash, A Global History of Architecture, Wiley Press, 2006.) Colonialism brought in huge amounts of wealth, not only in the silver that was extracted from the mines in Bolivia, Mexico and elsewhere, but also in the resultant trade in commodities, such as sugar and tobacco. The need to control trade routes, monopolies, and slavery, which lay primarily in the hands of the French during the 17th century, created an almost endless cycle of wars between the colonial powers: the religious wars, the Years War (1618 and 1648), FrancoSpanish War (1653), the War (16721678), and so on. The initial mismanagement of colonial wealth by the Spaniards bankrupted them in the 16th century (1557 and 1560), recovering only slowly in the following century. This explains why the Baroque style, though enthusiastically developed in Spain, was to a large extent, in Spain, an architecture of surfaces and faades, unlike in France and Austria where we see the construction of numerous huge palaces and monasteries. In contrast to Spain, the French, under Colbert (16191683), the minister of finance, had begun to industrialize their economy, and thus, were able to become, initially at least, the benefactors of the flow of wealth. While this was good for the building industries and the arts, the new wealth created an inflation, the likes of which had never been experienced before. Basically, the rich became richer and the poor became poorer. Rome was known just as much for its new sumptuous churches as for its vagabonds.(Peter Pater. Renaissance Rome.  (University of California Press, 1976) pp.703.) Italy  Rome and Southern Italy A number of ecclesiastical buildings of the Baroque period in Rome had plans based on the Italian paradigm of the basilica with a crossed dome and nave, but the treatment of the architecture was very different to what had been carried out previously. One of the first Roman structures to break with the Mannerist conventions exemplified in the Ges, was the church of Santa Susanna, designed by Carlo Maderno. The dynamic rhythm of columns and pilasters, central massing, and the protrusion and condensed central decoration add complexity to the structure. There is an incipient playfulness with the rules of classic design, but it still maintains rigor.The same concerns with plasticity, massing, dramatic effects and shadow and light is evident in the architectural work of da Cortona, illustrated by his design of  Luca e Martina (construction began in 1635) with what was probably the first curved Baroque church facade in Rome.(Blunt, Anthony. Borromini, 1979, 76-77) These concerns are even more evident in his reworking of Maria della Pace (1656-8). The facade with its chiaroscuro half-domed portico and concave side wings, closely resembles a theatrical stage set and the church facade projects forward so that it substantially fills the tiny trapezoidal piazza. Other Roman ensembles of the Baroque and Late Baroque period are likewise suffused with theatricality and, as urban theatres, provide points of focus within their locality in the surrounding cityscape. Probably the most well known example of such an approach is Peters Square, which has been praised as a masterstroke of Baroque theatre. The piazza, designed by Gian Lorenzo Bernini, is formed principally by two colonnades of free standing columns centred on an Egyptian obelisk. Berninis own favourite design was his oval church of al Quirinale decorated with polychome marbles and an ornate gold dome. His secular architecture included the Barberini based on plans by Maderno and the Chigi-Odescalchi (1664), both in Rome.File:RomaSIvoSapienzaCupola.jpg|left|thumb|alla Sapienza by BorrominiBerninis rival, the architect Borromini, produced designs that deviated dramatically from the regular compositions of the ancient world and Renaissance. His building plans were based on complex geometric figures, his architectural forms were unusual and inventive and he employed multi-layered symbolism in his architectural designs. Borrominis architectural spaces seem to expand and contract when needed, showing some affinity with the late style of Michelangelo. His iconic masterpiece is the diminutive church of Carlo alle Quattro Fontane, distinguished by a complicated plan arrangement that is partly oval and partly a cross and so has complex convex-concave wall rhythms. A later work, the church of alla Sapienza, displays the same playful inventiveness and antipathy to the flat surface, epitomized by an unusual corkscrew lantern above the dome.Following the death of Bernini in 1680, Fontana emerged as the most influential architect working in Rome. His early style is exemplified by the slightly concave faade of Marcello al Corso. Fontanas academic approach, though lacking the dazzling inventiveness of his Roman predecessors, exerted substantial influence on Baroque architecture both through his prolific writings and through a number of architects he trained, who would disseminate the Baroque idioms throughout eighteenth century Europe.The eighteenth century saw the capital of Europes architectural world transferred from Rome to Paris. The Italian Rococo, which flourished in Rome from the 1720s onward, was profoundly influenced by the ideas of Borromini. The most talented architects active in Rome&mdash;Francesco de Sanctis (Steps, 1723) and Raguzzini (SantIgnazio, 1727)&mdash;had little influence outside their native country, as did numerous practitioners of the Baroque, including Battista Vaccarini, Palma, and Venanzio Marvuglia.File:Mg-k Basilica Superga1.jpg|thumb|265px|di Superga near Turin by JuvarraThe last phase of Baroque architecture in Italy is exemplified by Vanvitellis Palace, reputedly the largest building erected in Europe in the 18th century. Indebted to contemporary French and Spanish models, the palace is skillfully related to the landscape. At Naples and Caserta, Vanvitelli practiced a sober and classicizing academic style, with equal attention to aesthetics and engineering, a style that would make an easy transition to Neoclassicism. Northern Italy In the north of Italy, the monarchs from the of Savoy were particularly receptive to the new style. They employed a brilliant triad of architects&mdash;Guarini, Juvarra, and Vittone&mdash;to illustrate the grandiose political ambitions and the newly acquired royal status of their dynasty. Guarini was a peripatetic monk who combined many traditions (including that of architecture) to create irregular structures remarkable for their oval columns and unconventional faades. Building upon the findings of contemporary geometry and stereometry, Guarini elaborated the concept of architectura obliqua, which approximated Borrominis style in both theoretical and structural audacity. Guarinis Carignano (1679) may have been the most flamboyant application of the Baroque style to the design of a private house in the 17th century.Fluid forms, weightless details, and the airy prospects of Juvarras architecture anticipated the art of Rococo. Although his practice ranged well beyond Turin, Juvarras most arresting designs were created for Amadeus II of Sardinia. The visual impact of his di Superga (1717) derives from its soaring roof-line and masterful placement on a hill above Turin. The rustic ambiance encouraged a freer articulation of architectural form at the royal hunting lodge of the di Stupinigi (1729). Juvarra finished his short but eventful career in Madrid, where he worked on the royal palaces at La Granja and Aranjuez. Among the many who were profoundly influenced by the brilliance and diversity of Juvarra and Guarini, none was more important than Vittone. This Piedmontese architect is remembered for an outcrop of flamboyant Rococo churches, quatrefoil in plan and delicate in detailing. His sophisticated designs often feature multiple vaults, structures within structures and domes within domes. Malta File:Malte-Melheia-NotreDame.jpg|thumb|left|200px|of Our Lady of Melliea in Malta.The island of Malta contains a variety of Baroque architecture, most importantly the capital city of Valletta. It was laid out in 1566 to fortify the Knights of Rhodes, who had taken over the island when they were driven from Rhodes by Islamic armies. The city, designed by Francesco Laparelli on a grid plan, and built up over the next century, remains a particularly coherent example of Baroque urbanism. Its massive fortifications, which were considered state of the art until the modern age, are also largely intact. Valletta became a World Heritage Site in 1980. Spain As Italian Baroque influences penetrated across the Pyrenees, they gradually superseded in popularity the restrained classicizing approach of de Herrera, which had been in vogue since the late 16th century. As early as 1667, the faades of Cathedral (by Cano) and Jan Cathedral (by Lpez de Rojas) suggest the artists fluency in interpreting traditional motifs of Spanish cathedral architecture in the Baroque aesthetic idiom. File:Santiago GDFL catedral 050318 43.jpg|thumb|left|220px|The most impressive display of Churrigueresque spatial decoration may be found in the west faade of the of Santiago de Compostela).In contrast to the art of Northern Europe, the Spanish art of the period appealed to the emotions rather than seeking to please the intellect. The Churriguera family, which specialized in designing altars and retables, revolted against the sobriety of the Herreresque classicism and promoted an intricate, exaggerated, almost capricious style of surface decoration known as the Churrigueresque. Within half a century, they transformed Salamanca into an exemplary Churrigueresque city. Among the highlights of the style, the interiors of the Charterhouse offer some of the most impressive combinations of space and light in 18th-century Europe. Integrating sculpture and architecture even more radically, Narciso Tom achieved striking chiaroscuro effects in his Transparente for the Cathedral.The development of the style passed through three phases. Between 1680 and 1720, the Churriguera popularized Guarinis blend of columns and order, known as the supreme order. Between 1720 and 1760, the Churrigueresque column, or estipite, in the shape of an inverted cone or obelisk, was established as a central element of ornamental decoration. The years from 1760 to 1780 saw a gradual shift of interest away from twisted movement and excessive ornamentation toward a neoclassical balance and sobriety. Two of the most eye-catching creations of Spanish Baroque are the energetic faades of the of Valladolid (Diego Tom, 1719) and de San Fernando in Madrid (Pedro de Ribera, 1722), whose curvilinear extravagance seems to herald Gaud and Nouveau. In this case as in many others, the design involves a play of tectonic and decorative elements with little relation to structure and function. The focus of the florid ornamentation is an elaborately sculptured surround to a main doorway. If we remove the intricate maze of broken pediments, undulating cornices, stucco shells, inverted tapers, and garlands from the rather plain wall it is set against, the buildings form would not be affected in the slightest.  Spanish America and the Philippines File:Catedral de Mxico.jpg|thumb|left|220px|Catedral Metropolitana, City, started in 1573.The combination of the Native American and Moorish decorative influences with an extremely expressive interpretation of the Churrigueresque idiom may account for the full-bodied and varied character of the Baroque in the American colonies of Spain. Even more than its Spanish counterpart, American Baroque developed as a style of stucco decoration. Twin-towered faades of many American cathedrals of the 17th century had medieval roots and the full-fledged Baroque did not appear until 1664, when a Jesuit shrine on Plaza des Armas in Cusco was built. Even then, the new style hardly affected the structure of churches. To the north, the richest province of 18th-century Spain&mdash;Mexico&mdash;produced some fantastically extravagant and visually frenetic architecture known as Mexican Churrigueresque. This ultra-Baroque approach culminates in the works of Rodriguez, whose masterpiece is the Metropolitano in City. Other fine examples of the style may be found in remote silver-mining towns. For instance, the Sanctuary at Ocotln (begun in 1745) is a top-notch Baroque cathedral surfaced in bright red tiles, which contrast delightfully with a plethora of compressed ornament lavishly applied to the main entrance and the slender flanking towers.(Exterior and Interior)The true capital of Mexican Baroque is Puebla, where a ready supply of hand-painted ceramics (talavera) and vernacular gray stone led to its evolving further into a personalised and highly localised art form with a pronounced Indian flavour. There are about sixty churches whose faades and domes display glazed tiles of many colours, often arranged in Arabic designs. The interiors are densely saturated with elaborate gold leaf ornamentation. In the 18th century, local artisans developed a distinctive brand of white stucco decoration, named alfenique after a Pueblan candy made from egg whites and sugar.The Peruvian Baroque was particularly lavish, as evidenced by the monastery of San Francisco at Lima (1673). While the rural Baroque of the Block and Estancias of Crdoba in Argentina, followed the model of Il Gesu, provincial mestizo (crossbred) styles emerged in Arequipa, Potos, and Paz. In the 18th century, architects of the region turned for inspiration to the Mudjar art of medieval Spain. The late Baroque type of Peruvian faade first appears in the Church of Our Lady of La Merced in Lima. Similarly, the Church of La Compaia, (Quito) suggests a carved altarpiece with its richly sculpted faade and a surfeit of spiral salomnica. Portugal and Portuguese EmpireImage:Queluz Palace fountains.JPG|thumb|left|250px|The National Palace near Portugal perfectly depicts Baroque architecture.Image:Palcio Nacional de Mafra (1).jpg|thumb|left|250px|National Palace a jewel of Portuguese Baroque architecture.Image:StRoque2-IPPAR.jpg|thumb|right|200px|The interior of the So Roque Church in Portugal illustrates the rich Baroque architecture in its chapels, including the chapel of St. John the Basptist, adorned in gold, the most expensive in the world.thumb|right|240px|The Palace of Brejoeira, a prime example of northern Portuguese Baroque architectureNothwithstanding a prodigality of sensually rich surface decoration associated with Baroque architecture of the Iberian Peninsula, the royal courts of Madrid and Lisbon generally favoured a more sober architectural vocabulary distilled from 17th-century Italy. The royal palaces of Madrid&mdash;La Granja, Aranjuez, Mafra, and Queluz&mdash;were designed by architects under strong influence of Bernini and Juvarra. In the realm of church architecture, Guarinis design for Santa Maria della Divina Providenza in Lisbon was a pace-setter for structural audacity in the region (even though it was never built). In Portugal, the first fully Baroque church was the of Santa Engrcia, in Lisbon, designed by royal architect Antunes, which has a Greek cross floorplan and curved facades. Antunes also designed churches in which the inner space is rectangular but with curved corners (like the Menino de Deus Church in Lisbon), a scheme that is found in several 18th century churches in Portugal and Brazil. The court of John V, on the other hand, favoured Roman baroque models, as attested by the work of royal architect Ludovice, a German who designed the Royal Palace of Mafra, built after 1715.By the mid-18th century, northern Portuguese architects had absorbed the concepts of Italian Baroque to revel in the plasticity of local granite in such projects as the surging 75-metre-high dos Clrigos in Porto. The foremost centre of the national Baroque tradition was Braga, whose buildings encompass virtually every important feature of Portuguese architecture and design. The Baroque shrines and palaces of Braga are noted for polychrome ornamental patterns, undulating roof-lines, and irregularly shaped window surrounds.Brazilian architects also explored plasticity in form and decoration, though they rarely surpassed their continental peers in ostentation. The churches of Mariana and the Rosario at Ouro Preto are based on Borrominis vision of interlocking elliptical spaces. At So Pedro dos Clrigos, Recife), a conventional stucco-and-stone faade is enlivened by a high scrolled gable squeezed tightly between the towers.8Even after the Baroque conventions passed out of fashion in Europe, the style was long practised in Brazil by Aleijadinho, a brilliant and prolific architect in whose designs hints of Rococo could be discerned. His church of Bom Jesus de Matozinhos at Congonhas is distinguished by a picturesque silhouette and dark ornamental detail on a light stuccoed faade. Although Aleijadinho was originally commissioned to design So Francisco de Assis at So Joo del Rei, his designs were rejected, and were displaced to the church of So Francisco in Ouro Preto instead. France File:Chateau-de-maison-lafitte.jpg|thumb|250px|de Maisons near Paris by Mansart (1642) The centre of Baroque secular architecture was France, where the open three-wing layout of the palace was established as the canonical solution as early as the 16th century. But it was the du Luxembourg by de Brosse that determined the sober and classicizing direction that French Baroque architecture was to take. For the first time, the de logis was emphasized as the representative main part of the building, while the side wings were treated as hierarchically inferior and appropriately scaled down. The medieval tower has been completely replaced by the central projection in the shape of a monumental three-storey gateway. De Brosses melding of traditional French elements (e.g. lofty roofs and a complex roof-line) with extensive Italianate quotations (e.g. ubiquitous rustication, derived from Pitti in Florence) came to characterize the XIII style. Probably the most accomplished formulator of the new manner was Mansart, a tireless perfectionist credited with introducing the full Baroque to France. In his design for de Maisons (1642), Mansart succeeded in reconciling academic and Baroque approaches, while demonstrating respect for the gothic-inherited idiosyncrasies of the French tradition.thumb|left|180px|Versailles chapel as seen from the tribune royale, an outstanding example of French Baroque.The Chteau of Maisons demonstrates the ongoing transition from the post-medieval chateaux of the 16th century to the villa-like country houses of the 18th. The structure is strictly symmetrical, with an order applied to each storey, mostly in pilaster form. The frontispiece, crowned with a separate aggrandized roof, is infused with remarkable plasticity and the ensemble reads like a three-dimensional whole. Mansarts structures are stripped of overblown decorative effects, so typical of contemporary Rome. Italian Baroque influence is muted and relegated to the field of decorative ornamentation.The next step in the development of European residential architecture involved the integration of the gardens in the composition of the palace, as is exemplified by Vaux-le-Vicomte), where the architect Le Vau, the designer Le Brun and the gardener Le Ntre complemented one another. From the main cornice to a low plinth, the miniature palace is clothed in the so-called colossal order, which makes the structure look more impressive. The creative collaboration of Le Vau and Le Ntre marked the arrival of the Magnificent Manner which allowed to extend Baroque architecture outside the palace walls and transform the surrounding landscape into an immaculate mosaic of expansive vistas. File:Les Invalides in Paris.jpg|thumb|200px|Invalides in Paris by Hardouin-Mansart (1676)The same three artists scaled this concept to monumental proportions in the royal hunting lodge and later main residence at Versailles. On a far grander scale, the palace is an exaggerated and somewhat repetitive version of Vaux-le-Vicomte. It was both the most grandiose and the most imitated residential building of the 17th century. Mannheim, Nordkirchen and Drottningholm were among many foreign residences for which Versailles provided a model.The final expansion of Versailles was superintended by Hardouin-Mansart, whose key design is the des Invalides), generally regarded as the most important French church of the century. Hardouin-Mansart profited from his uncles instruction and plans to instill the edifice with an imperial grandeur unprecedented in the countries north of Italy. The majestic hemispherical dome balances the vigorous vertical thrust of the orders, which do not accurately convey the structure of the interior. The younger architect not only revived the harmony and balance associated with the work of the elder Mansart but also set the tone for Late Baroque French architecture, with its grand ponderousness and increasing concessions to academicism.The reign of XV saw a reaction against the official XIV Style in the shape of a more delicate and intimate manner, known as Rococo. The style was pioneered by Pineau, who collaborated with Hardouin-Mansart on the interiors of the royal de Marly. Further elaborated by Le Pautre and Meissonier, the genre pittoresque culminated in the interiors of the Petit Chteau at Chantilly (c. 1722) and de Soubise in Paris (c. 1732), where a fashionable emphasis on the curvilinear went beyond all reasonable measure, while sculpture, paintings, furniture, and porcelain tended to overshadow architectural divisions of the interior.The Low CountriesSouthern NetherlandsFile:Leuven Sint-Michielskerk.jpg|thumb|Church of St. Michel in Leuven, Belgium by Hesius (1650)Baroque architecture in the Netherlands developed rather differently than in the Protestant North. After the Years Truce, the Southern Netherlands remained in Catholic hands, ruled by the Spanish Habsburg Kings. Important architectural projects were set up in the spirit of the Counter-Reformation. In them, florid decorative detailing was more tightly knit to the structure, thus precluding concerns of superfluity. A remarkable convergence of Spanish, French, and Dutch Baroque aesthetics may be seen in the of Averbode (1667). Another characteristic example is the Church of St. Michel at Louvain, with its exuberant two-storey faade, clusters of half-columns, and the complex aggregation of French-inspired sculptural detailing.Six decades later, a Flemish architect, Jaime Borty Milia, was the first to introduce Rococo to Spain (of Murcia, west faade, 1733). The greatest practitioner of the Spanish Rococo style was a native master, Rodrguez, responsible for the dazzling interior of the of Our Lady of the Pillar in Zaragoza (1750).Some Flemish architects such as Cobergher were trained in Italy and their works were inspired by architects such as Barozzi da Vignola and della Porta. Coberghers most major project was the Basilica of Our Lady of Scherpenheuvel which he designed as the center of a new town in the form of a heptagon.The influence of the painter Paul Rubens on architecture was very important. With his book I Palazzi di Genova he introduced novel Italian models for the conception of profane buildings and decoration in the Southern Netherlands. The courtyard and portico of his own house in Antwerp (Rubenshuis) are good examples of his architectural activity. He also took part in the decoration of the Antwerp Jesuit Church (now Carolus-Borromeuskerk) where he introduced a lavish Baroque decoration, integrating sculpture and painting in the architectural program.Northern NetherlandsFile:Koninklijk Paleis Amsterdam.jpg|thumb|right|220px|Amsterdam City Hall by van Campen (1646)There is little Baroque about Dutch architecture of the 17th century. The architecture of the first republic in Northern Europe was meant to reflect democratic values by quoting extensively from classical antiquity. Like contemporary developments in England, Dutch Palladianism is marked by sobriety and restraint. Two leading architects, van Campen and Post, used such eclectic elements as giant-order pilasters, gable roofs, central pediments, and vigorous steeples in a coherent combination that anticipated Wrens Classicism.The most ambitious constructions of the period included the seats of self-government in Amsterdam (1646) and Maastricht (1658), designed by Campen and Post, respectively. On the other hand, the residences of the of Orange are closer to a typical burgher mansion than to a royal palace. Two of these, ten Bosch and Mauritshuis, are symmetrical blocks with large windows, stripped of ostentatious Baroque flourishes and mannerisms. The same austerely geometrical effect is achieved without great cost or pretentious effects at the Stadholders summer residence of Loo. The Republic was one of the powers of 17th-century Europe and its influence on European architecture was by no means negligible. Dutch architects were employed on important projects in Northern Germany, Scandinavia and Russia, disseminating their ideas in those countries. The Dutch colonial architecture, once flourishing in the River Valley and associated primarily with red-brick gabled houses, may still be seen in Netherlands Antilles. England File:Greenwich Hospital from Thames.jpg|thumb|200px|Greenwich Hospital by Sir Wren (1694)Baroque aesthetics, whose influence was so potent in mid-17th century France, made little impact in England during Protectorate and the first Restoration years. For a decade between the death of Jones in 1652 and Wrens visit to Paris in 1665 there was no English architect of the accepted premier class. Unsurprisingly, general interest in European architectural developments was slight. It was Wren who presided over the genesis of the English Baroque manner, which differed from the continental models by a clarity of design and a subtle taste for classicism. Following the Fire of London, Wren rebuilt fifty-three churches, where Baroque aesthetics are apparent primarily in dynamic structure and multiple changing views. His most ambitious work was Pauls Cathedral, which bears comparison with the most effulgent domed churches of Italy and France. In this majestically proportioned edifice, the Palladian tradition of Inigo Jones is fused with contemporary continental sensibilities in masterly equilibrium. Less influential were straightforward attempts to engraft the Berniniesque vision onto British church architecture (e.g. by Archer in Johns, Smith Square, 1728). File:England1 144.jpg|thumb|left|220px|Howard, Yorkshire.Although Wren was also active in secular architecture, the first truly Baroque house in England was built to a design by William Talman at Chatsworth, starting in 1687. The culmination of Baroque architectural forms comes with Sir Vanbrugh and Hawksmoor. Each was capable of a fully developed architectural statement, yet they preferred to work in tandem, most notably at Howard (1699) and Palace (1705). Although these two palaces may appear somewhat ponderous or turgid to Italian eyes, their heavy embellishment and overpowering mass captivated the British public, albeit for a short while. Castle Howard is a flamboyant assembly of restless masses dominated by a cylindrical domed tower which would not be out of place in Dresden or Munich. Blenheim is a more solid construction, where the massed stone of the arched gates and the huge solid portico becomes the main ornament. Vanbrughs final work was Delaval Hall (1718), a comparatively modest mansion yet unique in the structural audacity of its style. It was at Seaton Delaval that Vanbrugh, a skillful playwright, achieved the peak of Restoration drama, once again highlighting a parallel between Baroque architecture and contemporary theatre. Despite his efforts, Baroque was never truly to the English taste and well before his death in 1724, the style had lost currency in Britain. Holy Roman Empire File:Schloss Charlottenburg.jpg|thumb|left|250px|Charlottenburg in BerlinIn the Roman Empire, the Baroque period began somewhat later. Although the Augsburg architect Holl (15731646) and some theoretists, including Furttenbach the Elder already practiced the Baroque style, they remained without successors due to the ravages of the Years War. From about 1650 on, construction work resumes, and secular and ecclesiastical architecture are of equal importance. During an initial phase, master-masons from southern Switzerland and northern Italy, the so-called magistri Grigioni and the Lombard master-masons, particularly the Carlone family from Val dIntelvi, dominated the field. However, Austria came soon to develop its own characteristic Baroque style during the last third of the 17th century. Bernhard Fischer von Erlach was impressed by Bernini. He forged a new Imperial style by compiling architectural motifs from the entire history, most prominently seen in his church of St. Charles Borromeo in Vienna. Lucas von Hildebrandt also had an Italian training. He developed a highly decorative style, particularly in faade architecture, which exerted strong influences on southern Germany. File:Karlskirche Vienna June 2006 475.jpg|thumb|right|250|St. Charless Church in Vienna, Austria.Frequently, the Southern German Baroque is distinguished from the Northern German Baroque, which is more properly the distinction between the Catholic and the Protestant Baroque. In the Catholic South, the Jesuit church of St. Michael in Munich was the first to bring Italian style across the Alps. However, its influence on the further development of church architecture was rather limited. A much more practical and more adaptable model of church architecture was provided by the Jesuit church in Dillingen): the wall-pillar church, a barrel-vaulted nave accompanied by large open chapels separated by wall-pillars. As opposed to St. Michaels in Munich, the chapels almost reach the height of the nave in the wall-pillar church, and their vault (usually transverse barrel-vaults) springs from the same level as the main vault of the nave. The chapels provide ample lighting; seen from the entrance of the church, the wall-pillars form a theatrical setting for the side altars. The wall-pillar church was further developed by the Vorarlberg school, as well as the master-masons of Bavaria. This new church also integrated well with the church model of the German late Gothic age. The wall-pillar church continued to be used throughout the 18th century (e.g. even in the early neo-classical church of an der Rot Abbey), and early wall-pillar churches could easily be refurbished by re-decoration without any structural changes, such as the church at Dillingen.File:Vierzehnheiligen-Basilika3-Asio.JPG|thumb|left|210px|Interior of Vierzehnheiligen church in BavariaHowever, the Catholic South also received influences from other sources, such as the so-called radical Baroque of Bohemia. The radical Baroque of Dientzenhofer and his son Ignaz Dientzenhofer, both residing at Prague, was inspired by examples from northern Italy, particularly by the works of Guarini. It is characterized by the curvature of walls and intersection of oval spaces. While some Bohemian influence is visible in Bavarias most prominent architect of the period, Michael Fischer (the curved balconies of some of his earlier wall-pillar churches), the works of Neumann, in particular the of the Vierzehnheiligen, are generally considered to be the final synthesis of Bohemian and German traditions.File:Church of St Nicholas of Old Town in Prague 2010.jpg|thumb|right|Church of St Nicholas, Old Town, PragueProtestant sacred architecture was of lesser importance during the Baroque, and produced only a few works of prime importance, particularly the Frauenkirche in Dresden. Architectural theory was more lively in the north than in the south of Germany, with Christoph Sturms edition of Goldmann, but Sturms theoretical considerations (e.g. on Protestant church architecture) never really made it to practical application. In the south, theory essentially reduced to the use of buildings and elements from illustrated books and engravings as a prototype. Palace architecture was equally important both in the Catholic South and the Protestant North. After an initial phase when Italian architects and influences dominated (Vienna, Rastatt), French influence prevailed from the second decade of the 18th century onwards. The French model is characterized by the horseshoe-like layout enclosing a cour dhonneur (courtyard) on the town side (chateau entre cour et jardin), whereas the Italian (and also Austrian) scheme presents a block-like villa. The principal achievements of German Palace architecture, often worked out in close collaboration of several architects, provide a synthesis of Austro-Italian and French models. The most outstanding palace which blends Austro-Italian and French influences into a completely new type of building is the Residence. While its general layout is the horseshoe-like French plan, it encloses interior courtyards. Its faades combine Lucas von Hildebrandts love of decoration with French-style classical orders in two superimposed stories; its interior features the famous Austrian imperial staircase, but also a French-type enfilade of rooms on the garden side, inspired by the apartement semi-double layout of French castles. PolishLithuanian Commonwealth File:Wilan1 DSC0894.JPG|left|250px|thumb|Palace in Warsaw (16771696).The first Baroque church in the Commonwealth was the Corpus Christi Church in Niasvizh, Belarus (15861593).( )( ) It also holds a distinction of being the first domed basilica with Baroque faade in the Commonwealth and the first Baroque piece of art in Eastern Europe.(File:Ukraine-Lviv-Cathedral of George-5.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Greek Catholic St. Georges Cathedral in Lviv (17461762).In the early 17th century, the Baroque style spread over the Commonwealth. Important Baroque churches include the SS. Peter and Paul (15971619) constructed in the early Baroque style following the pattern of the Vignolas il Ges,( ) the Vasa Chapel (16441676) of the Cathedral, Baroque equivalent to neighbouring renaissance Chapel, St. Anne (16891703) and the Visitationist Church (16921695) in Krakw, St. Casimirs Chapel (16231636) of the Cathedral, another inspiration of Wawels Sigismunds Chapel,( ) SS. Peter and Paul Church (16681676) and St. Casimirs Church (16041618, 17501755) in Vilnius, monastery (16671712) in Kaunas inspired by examples from northern Italy, the Dominican Church (17441769) modelled after St. Charless Church in Vienna( ) and St. Georges Church (17461762) in Lviv. Others significant examples include profusly decorated Jesuit Church in Pozna (16511701) with almost theatrical decoration inside, the Xavier Cathedral in Hrodna (16781705), the Royal Chapel (16781681) in Gdask, a mixture of Dutch and Polish patterns( ) and Lipka in Masuria (16811693), the northernmost Tyrolean Baroque building.( ) In Warsaw, which before War II was filled with Baroque residences, churches, and houses, and where van Gameren was active, survived few important buildings&mdash; Palace (16771696), Palace (16771683), Bernardines Church in Czerniakw (16901693) as well as late-baroque Church (16641761), Holy Cross Church (16821757) and Kazimierz Church (16881692).File:St-Anne church Krakow 003.JPG|left|thumb|250px|of St. Anne in Krakow (16891705).The magnates throughout the country competed with the kings. The monumental castle Krzytopr, built in the style palazzo in fortezza between 1627 and 1644, had several courtyards surrounded by fortifications.  Late baroque fascination with the culture and art of the central nation is reflected in Queen Masysiekas Chinese Palace in Zolochiv.( ) 18th century magnate palaces represents the characteristic type of baroque suburban residence built entre cour et jardin (between the entrance court and the garden). Its architecture, a merger of European art with old Commonwealth building traditions, is visible in Wilanw Palace, Branicki Palace in Biaystok and in Warsaw, Potocki Palace in Podlaski, Raczyski Palace in Rogalin and Winiowiecki Palace in Vyshnivets. Architects such as Christoph Glaubitz were instrumental in forming the so-called distinctive Vilnius Baroque style, which spread throughout the region.( )By the end of the century, Polish Baroque influences crossed the Dnieper into the Hetmanate, where they gave birth to a particular style of Orthodox architecture, known as the Baroque.( ) Such was its popular appeal that every medieval church in Kiev and the Ukraine was redesigned according to the newest fashion. Russia File:Menshikov palace.jpg|left|190px|thumb|Palace in Petersburg.File:WinterPalace.jpg|190px|thumb|Palace in Saint Petersburg.File:St peter and paul cathedral royal doors.jpg|left|190px|thumb|The interior of the Saint Petersburg and Paul Cathedral.File:Petropavlovsky sobor kazan.jpg|190px|thumb|Peter and Paul Church in Kazan.In Russia, Baroque architecture passed through three stages&mdash;the early Moscow Baroque, with elegant white decorations on red-brick walls of rather traditional churches, the mature Baroque, mostly imported from the Low Countries, and the late Rastrelliesque Baroque, which was, in the words of William Brumfield, extravagant in design and execution, yet ordered by the rhythmic insistence of massed columns and Baroque statuary. The first baroque churches were built in the estates of the Naryshkin family of Moscow boyars. It was the family of Natalia Naryshkina, Peter the Greats mother. Most notable in this category of small suburban churches were the Intercession in Fili (169396), the Sign in Dubrovitsy (169097), and the Saviour in Ubory (169497). They were built in red brick with profuse detailed decoration in white stone. The belfry was not any more placed beside the church as was common in the 17th century, but on the facade itself, usually surmounting the octagonal central church and producing daring vertical compositions. As the style gradually spread around Russia, many monasteries were remodeled after the latest fashion. The most delightful of these were the Convent and the Monastery in Moscow, as well as Krutitsy metochion and Solotcha Cloister near Riazan. Civic architecture also sought to conform to the baroque aesthetics, e.g., the Tower in Moscow and there is also a neo-form of this style like the Principal Medicine Store on Square. The most important architects associated with the Naryshkin Baroque were Bukhvostov and Potapov.Baroque is a name applied by art historians to a style of Baroque architecture and decoration favoured by the Great and employed to design buildings in the newly-founded Russian capital, Petersburg, under this monarch and his immediate successors. Unlike contemporaneous Baroque, favoured in Moscow, the Petrine Baroque represented a drastic rupture with Byzantine traditions that had dominated architecture for almost a millennium. Its chief practitioners  Trezzini, Schlter, and Zemtsov  drew inspiration from a rather modest Dutch, Danish, and Swedish architecture of the time. Extant examples of the style in St Petersburg are the and Paul Cathedral, the Colleges, the Kunstkamera, Hall and Palace.The Petrine Baroque structures outside St Petersburg are scarce; they include the Tower in Moscow and the Palace in Tallinn. Ukraine File:Kiev Pechersk Lavra (General).jpg|250px|thumb|left|Pechersk LavraFile:St. Michaels Catheral view.JPG|250px|thumb|right|Michaels Golden-Domed MonasteryBaroque is an architectural style that emerged in Ukraine during the Hetmanate era, in the 17th and 18th centuries. Ukrainian Baroque is distinct from the Western European Baroque in having more moderate ornamentation and simpler forms, and as such was considered more constructivist. One of the unique features of the Ukrainian baroque, were bud and pear-shaped domes, that were later borrowed by the similar baroque.( ..       8.   ) Many Ukrainian Baroque buildings have been preserved, including several buildings in Pechersk Lavra and the Monastery.The best examples of painting are the church paintings in the Holy Trinity Church of the Kiev Pechersk Lavra. Rapid development in engraving techniques occurred during the Ukrainian Baroque period. Advances utilized a complex system of symbolism, allegories, heraldic signs, and sumptuous ornamentation. Scandinavia  File:Drottningholm castle with fountain 2005-08-14.jpg|thumb|Tessins Palace illustrates the proximity between French and Swedish architectural practice.File:Copenhagen amalienborg seen from opera house.jpg|thumb|Amalienborg, a Boroque quarter in the center of Copenhagen During the golden age of the Empire, the architecture of Nordic countries was dominated by the Swedish court architect Tessin the Elder and his son Tessin the Younger. Their aesthetic was readily adopted across the Baltic, in Copenhagen and Petersburg.Born in Germany, Tessin the Elder endowed Sweden with a truly national style, a well-balanced mixture of contemporary French and medieval Hanseatic elements. His designs for the royal manor of Drottningholm seasoned French prototypes with Italian elements, while retaining some peculiarly Nordic features, such as the hipped roof (steritak). Tessin the Younger shared his fathers enthusiasm for discrete palace faades. His design for the Palace draws so heavily on Berninis unexecuted plans for the Louvre that one could well imagine it standing in Naples, Vienna, or Saint Petersburg. Another example of the so-called International Baroque, based on Roman models with little concern for national specifics, is the Palace of Madrid. The same approach is manifested is Tessins polychrome domeless Kalmar Cathedral, a skillful pastiche of early Italian Baroque, clothed in a giant order of paired Ionic pilasters. It was not until the mid-18th century that Danish and Russian architecture were emancipated from Swedish influence. A milestone of this late period is Eigtveds design for a new district of Copenhagen centred on the Palace. The palace is composed of four rectangular mansions for the four greatest nobles of the kingdom, arranged across the angles of an octagonal square. The restrained faades of the mansions hark back to French antecedents, while their interiors contain some of the finest Rococo decoration in Northern Europe. Hungary and Romania File:Eszterhzymansion100.jpg|left|221px|thumb|Front view of the palace in Fertd File:Bnffy Palace in Kluj-Napoca.PNG|right|221px|thumb|Palace in Cluj-Napoca, Transylvania File:Timisoara Dome.jpg|thumb|left|200px|St. Georges Cathedral (built between 1736 and 1774) of TimioaraIn the of Hungary, the first great Baroque building was the Jesuit Church of Trnava built by Spozzo in 162937, modelling the of the Gesu in Rome. Jesuits were the main propagators of the new style with their churches in Gyr (16341641), Koice (16711684), Eger (17311733) and Szkesfehrvr (17451751). The reconstruction of the territories devastated by the Ottomans was carried out in Baroque style in 18th century. Intact Baroque townscapes can be found in Gyr, Szkesfehrvr, Eger, Veszprm, Esztergom and the Castle District of Buda. The most important Baroque palaces in Hungary were the Royal Palace in Buda, Grassalkovich Castle in Gdll, and Esterhzy Castle in Fertd. Smaller Baroque castles of the Hungarian aristocracy are scattered all over the country. Hungarian Baroque shows the double influence of Austrian and Italian artistic tendencies as many German and Italian architects worked in the country. The main characteristics of the local version of the style were modesty, lack of excessive decoration, and some rural flavour, especially in the works of the local masters. Important architects of the Hungarian Baroque were Mayerhoffer, Oraschek and Wittwer. Anton Pilgram also worked in the Kingdom of Hungary, for example on the great Premonstratensian monastery of Jsz. In the last decades of the 18th century Neo-Classical tendencies became dominant. The two most important architects of that period were Hefele and Fellner.Some representative Baroque structures in Transylvania (Romania) are the Palace in Cluj, the Brukenthal Palace in Sibiu and the Bishopric Palace in Oradea. Besides, almost every Transylvanian town has at least a Baroque church, the most representatives of which being St. Georges Cathedral of Timioara, Saint John the Baptist Church of Mure, the Holy Trinity Cathedral of Blaj and the Piarist Church of Cluj. Turkey File:Meczet Ortaky Istambu RB1.jpg|thumb|right|210px|MosqueFile:Dolmabahe Saat Kulesi.JPG|thumb|left|210px|The Clock Tower of PalaceFile:DolmabahceMainGate.JPG|thumb|right|210px|The Main Entrance of Palace Istanbul, once the center of the Empire, hosts many different varieties of Baroque architecture.As reforms and innovations to modernize the country came out in 18th and 19th century, various architecture styles were used in Turkey, one of them was the Baroque Style. As architecture (which is also a combination of Islamic and Byzantine architecture) combined with Baroque, a new style called Ottoman Baroque appeared.Baroque architecture is mostly seen in mosques and palaces built in this centuries. The Mosque, is one of the best examples of Ottoman Baroque Architecture.The Tanzimat Era caused more architectural development. The architectural change continued with Mahmud II, one of the most reformist sultans in Turkish History. One of his sons, Abdlmecid and his family left the Palace and moved to the Palace which is the first European-style palace in the country.Baroque architecture in Istanbul was mostly used in palaces near the Bosphorus and Horn. Beyolu was one of the places that Baroque and other European style architecture buildings were largely used. The famous streets called Avenue, Nianta, Caddesi consist of these architecture style apartments.The arabesque and Ottoman flavour gives it its unique atmosphere, which also distinguishes it from the later colonial Baroque styles, largely used in the Middle East, especially Lebanon. Later and more mature Baroque forms in Istanbul can be found in the gates of the Palace, built by the famous Turkish-Armenian family, which also has a very eastern flavour, combining Baroque, Romantic, and Oriental architecture. See also * Baroque* of Baroque architecture* music* Baroque* of Portugal* of St. Anne, Talaulim* National Palace* Livres Aqueduct References  External links * Siberian Baroque* Ranking of the favourite Baroque structurebarrocaarchitekturadel Barrocobaroquearhitekturabaroccalt:Barokas#Architektraarchitectuurja:barokubarrocabarocarchitektraarkitekturth:mimarisitrc Baroquezh:
345939
Imre_Thkly
Count Imre Thkly de Ksmrk (Thkly/Tkly/Tklli Imre in Hungarian, Mirko Thkly in Croatian, Imrich Tkli in Slovak; April 25, 1657 &ndash; September 13, 1705) was a Hungarian statesman, leader of an anti-Habsburg uprising, Prince of Transylvania, and (briefly) vassal king of Hungary. Early life Imre Thkly was born at Ksmrk, Hungary (today Kemarok in Slovakia) in  September 1657. Thkly lost both parents while still a child. He studied at the Lutheran college in Eperjes (Today Preov, Slovakia) at a time when anti-Habsburg rebels and Protestants were constantly in arms against the imperial troops in Upper Hungary (present day Eastern Slovakia).In December 1670, when his father Thkly (Hungarian: Thkly Istvn), a participant of the anti-Habsburg conspiracy, was killed by imperial troops when protecting his rva castle (Slovak: Orava, now in northern Slovakia), he fled from the castle to Transylvania,  where he took refuge with his kinsman Teleki, the chief minister of Michael Apafi, prince of Transylvania. Here Thkly came into contact with refugees from Hungary (more exactly from present-day Slovakia), who had great hopes of the high-born, highly gifted youth who was also a fellow sufferer, a large portion of his immense estates having been confiscated by the Emperor. The discontent reached its height when the Emperor I, Holy Roman Emperor (February 27, 1673) suspended the Hungarian constitution, appointed Caspar Ampringen dictator, deprived 450 Protestant clergy of their livings and condemned 67 more to the galleys. Anti-Habsburg rebellion Encouraged by promises of help from XIV of France, the anti-Habsburg rebels now rose pro libertate et justitia, and chose the youthful Thkly as their leader. The war began in 1678. Eastern Hungarian Kingdom and the central Hungarian mining towns were soon in Thklys possession. In 1681, reinforced by 10,000 Transylvanians and a Turkish army under the Pasha of Nagyvrad (today Oradea, Romania), he compelled the Emperor to grant an armistice. In June 1682 he married the Croatian countess Zrinska (in Hungarian: Zrnyi Ilona), the widow of Prince I Rkczi.Thklys distrust of the Emperor now induced him to turn for help to Sultan IV, who recognized him as King of Hungary (Turkish: Muin-i Ali Osmana itaat zereyim emre, Kral- Orta Macarm ki namm Tkeli mre; i.e. eastern Slovakia and parts of northeastern present-day Hungary. Title Kral is of slavic origin and in Turkish means likewise monarch, not only the king) on condition that he paid an annual tribute of 40,000 tallers. In the course of the same year Thkly captured fortress after fortress from the Emperor and extended his dominions to the Vg (Slovak: Vh) river. At the two Diets held by him, at Kassa (today Koice, Slovakia) and Tllya, in 1683, the estates, though not uninfluenced by his personal charm, showed some want of confidence in him, fearing lest he might sacrifice the national independence to the Turkish alliance. They refused therefore to grant him either subsidies or a levy en masse, and he had to take what he wanted by force. Alliance with the Ottoman Empire Thkly materially assisted the Turks in the of Vienna in 1683, and shared the fate of the gigantic Turkish army. The Turkish Grand Vizier nevertheless laid the blame of the Turkish defeat in Vienna on Thkly, who thereupon hastened to Edirne to defend himself before the Turkish Sultan. Shortly afterwards, perceiving that the Turkish cause was now lost, he sought the mediation of the Polish king III Sobieski to reconcile him with the Emperor, offering to lay down his arms if the Emperor would confirm the religious rights of the Protestants in Hungary and grant him, Thkly, Upper Hungary (more exactly: 13 north-eastern counties of Royal Hungary) with the title of prince. Leopold refused these terms and demanded an surrender. Thkly then renewed the war. But the campaign of 1685 was a series of disasters, he was defeated at Preov and when he sought help from the Turks at Nagyvrad they seized and sent him in chains to Edirne (possibly because of his previous negotiations with Leopold), whereupon most of his followers made their peace with the Emperor. In 1686 Thkly was released from his dungeon and sent with a small army into Transylvania, but both this expedition and a similar one in 1688 ended in failure. The Turks then again grew suspicious of him and imprisoned him a second time. In 1690, however, the Turks dispatched him into Transylvania a third time with 16,000 men, and in September he routed the united forces of General Heister and Count Teleki at Zrneti. After this great victory, Thkly was elected prince of Transylvania by the Keresztnysziget (probably Opriani now) Diet, but could only maintain his position against the imperial armies with the utmost difficulty. In 1691 he quit Transylvania altogether. He led the Turkish cavalry at the of Slankamen, and served valiantly but vainly against Austria during the remainder of the war, especially distinguishing himself at the of Zenta (1697). He was excluded by name from the amnesty promised to the Hungarian rebels by the of Karlowitz (January 26, 1699). After one more unsuccessful attempt, in 1700, to recover the principality, he settled down at Galata with his wife. From Sultan II he received large estates and the title of count of Widdin. He died in 1705 in Nicomedia.References*External links*Detailed timelineThklyThklyThklyThklyImreja:ThklyThklyThklyTklimre
347832
Fifth_generation_computer
The Fifth Generation Computer Systems project (FGCS) was an initiative by JapansMinistry of International Trade and Industry, begun in 1982, to create a fifth generation computer (see of computing hardware) which was supposed to perform much calculation using parallel processing. It was to be the end result of a massive government/industry research project in Japan during the 1980s. It aimed to create an epoch-making computer with supercomputer-like performance and  to provide a platform for future developments in intelligence.(Kazuhiro Fuchi, Revisiting Original Philosophy of Fifth Generation Computer Systems Project, FGCS 1984, pp. 1-2)The term fifth generation was intended to convey the system as being a leap beyond existing machines. Computers using tubes were called the first generation; transistors and diodes, the second; circuits, the third; and those using microprocessors, the fourth. Whereas previous computer generations had focused on increasing the number of logic elements in a single CPU, the fifth generation, it was widely believed at the time, would instead turn to massive numbers of CPUs for added performance.(G.L.Simons (1983). Towards Fifth-generation Computers, National Computing Centre, Manchester, UK.)The project was to create the computer over a ten year period, after which it was considered ended and investment in a new, Sixth Generation project, began. Opinions about its outcome are divided: Either it was a failure, or it was ahead of its time. History In the late 1960s and early 70s, there was much talk about generations of computer hardware &mdash; usually three generations.# First generation: Vacuum tubes. Mid-1940s. IBM pioneered the arrangement of vacuum tubes in pluggable modules. The 650 was a first-generation computer.# Second generation: Transistors. 1956. The era of miniaturization begins. Transistors are much smaller than vacuum tubes, draw less power, and generate less heat. Discrete transistors are soldered to circuit boards, with interconnections accomplished by stencil-screened conductive patterns on the reverse side. The 7090 was a second-generation computer.# Third generation: Integrated circuits (silicon chips containing multiple transistors). 1964. A pioneering example is the ACPX module used in the IBM 360/91, which, by stacking layers of silicon over a ceramic substrate, accommodated over 20 transistors per chip; the chips could be packed together onto a circuit board to achieve unheard-of logic densities. The IBM 360/91 was a hybrid second- and third-generation computer.Omitted from this taxonomy is the zeroth-generation computer based on metal gears (such as the 4077) or mechanical relays (such as the Mark I), and the post-third-generation computers based on Very Large Scale Integrated (VLSI) circuits.There was also a parallel set of generations for software:# First generation: language.# Second generation: language.# Third generation: Structured programming languages such as C, COBOL and FORTRAN.# Fourth generation: Domain-specific languages such as SQL (for database access) and TeX (for text formatting) Background and design philosophy Throughout these multiple generations up to the 1990s, Japan had largely been a follower in the computing arena, building computers following U.S. and British leads. The of International Trade and Industry (MITI) decided to attempt to break out of this follow-the-leader pattern, and in the mid-1970s started looking, on a small scale, into the future of computing. They asked the Information Processing Development Center (JIPDEC) to indicate a number of future directions, and in 1979 offered a three-year contract to carry out more in-depth studies along with industry and academia. It was during this period that the term fifth-generation computer started to be used.Prior to the 1970s, MITI guidance had successes such as an improved steel industry, the creation of the oil supertanker, the automotive industry, consumer electronics, and computer memory.  MITI decided that the future was going to be technology. However, the Japanese language, in both written and spoken form, presented and still presents major obstacles for computers.  These hurdles could not be taken lightly.  So MITI held a conference and invited people around the world to help them.The primary fields for investigation from this initial project were:* Inference computer technologies for knowledge processing* Computer technologies to process large-scale data bases and knowledge bases* High performance workstations* Distributed functional computer technologies* Super-computers for scientific calculationThe project imagined a processing computer running on top of massive databases (as opposed to a traditional filesystem) using a programming language to define and access the data. They envisioned building a prototype machine with performance between 100M and 1G LIPS, where a LIPS is a Logical Inference Per Second. At the time typical workstation machines were capable of about 100k LIPS. They proposed to build this machine over a ten year period, 3 years for initial R&D, 4 years for building various subsystems, and a final 3 years to complete a working prototype system. In 1982 the government decided to go ahead with the project, and established the Institute for New Generation Computer Technology (ICOT) through joint investment with various Japanese computer companies. Implementation So ingrained was the belief that parallel computing was the future of all performance gains that the Fifth-Generation project generated a great deal of apprehension in the computer field. After having seen the Japanese take over the electronics field during the 1970s and apparently doing the same in the automotive world during the 1980s, the Japanese in the 1980s had a reputation for invincibility. Soon parallel projects were set up in the US as the Computing Initiative and the and Computer Technology Corporation (MCC), in the UK as Alvey, and in Europe as the Strategic Program of Research in Information Technology (ESPRIT), as well as ECRC (Computer Research Centre) in Munich, a collaboration between ICL in Britain, Bull in France, and Siemens in Germany.Five running Inference Machines (PIM) were eventually produced: PIM/m, PIM/p, PIM/i, PIM/k, PIM/c. The project also produced applications to run on these systems, such as the parallel management system Kappa, the reasoning system HELIC-II, and the automated prover MGTP, as well as applications to bioinformatics. Failure The FGCS Project did not meet with commercial success for reasons similar to the machine companies and Thinking Machines.  The highly parallel computer architecture was eventually surpassed in speed by less specialized hardware (for example, workstations and Intel x86 machines).  The project did produce a new generation of promising Japanese researchers.  But after the FGCS Project, MITI stopped funding large-scale computer research projects, and the research momentum developed by the FGCS Project dissipated.  However MITI/ICOT embarked on a Sixth Generation Project in the 1990s.A primary problem was the choice of concurrent logic programming as the bridge between the parallel computer architecture and the use of logic as a knowledge representation and problem solving language for AI applications. This never happened cleanly; a number of languages were developed, all with their own limitations. In particular, the committed choice feature of constraint logic programming interfered with the logical semantics of the languages.(Carl Hewitt Middle History of Logic Programming: Resolution, Planner, Prolog and the Japanese Fifth Generation Project ArXiv 2009.)Another problem was that existing CPU performance quickly pushed through the obvious barriers that experts perceived in the 1980s, and the value of parallel computing quickly dropped to the point where it was for some time used only in niche situations. Although a number of workstations of increasing capacity were designed and built over the projects lifespan, they generally found themselves soon outperformed by off the shelf units available commercially.The project also suffered from being on the wrong side of the technology curve. During its lifespan, GUIs became mainstream in computers; the internet enabled locally stored databases to become distributed; and even simple research projects provided better real-world results in data mining. Moreover the project found that the promises of programming were largely negated by the use of committed choice.At the end of the ten year period the project had spent over 50 billion (about US$400 million at 1992 exchange rates) and was terminated without having met its goals. The workstations had no appeal in a market where general purpose systems could now take over their job and even outrun them. This is parallel to the Lisp machine market, where rule-based systems such as CLIPS could run on general-purpose computers, making expensive Lisp machines unnecessary.(Avoiding another AI Winter, James Hendler, IEEE Intelligent Systems (March/April 2008 (Vol. 23, No. 2) pp. 2-4)In spite of the possibility of considering the project a failure, many of the approaches envisioned in the Fifth-Generation project, such as logic programming distributed over massive knowledge-bases, are now being re-interpreted in current technologies.  The Ontology Language (OWL) employs several layers of logic-based knowledge representation systems, while many flavors of parallel computing proliferate, including multi-core architectures at the low-end and parallel processing at the high end. Timeline * 1982: the FGCS project begins and receives $450,000,000 worth of industry funding and an equal amount of government funding.* 1985: the first FGCS hardware known as the Personal Sequential Inference Machine (PSI) and the first version of the Sequential Inference Machine Programming Operating System (SIMPOS) operating system is released. SIMPOS is programmed in Kernel Language 0 (KL0), a concurrent Prolog-variant with object oriented extensions. References External links* What is FGCS Technologies?  The main page of the project. Includes pictures of prototype machines.* Fifth Generation Computing Conference Report* The fifth generation: Japans computer challenge to the world- 1984 article from Computing* ICOT home page (now AITRG)*ICOT Free Software* FGCS museum*Conference proceedings on FGCS  generacija raunarageneracin de computadorasdella quinta generazione/ ja:pitej generacjida quinta gerao pete generacijezh:
349725
Bars_County
Bars (Latin: comitatus Barsiensis, Hungarian: Bars, Slovak: Tekov, German: Barsch) is the name of a historic administrative county (comitatus) of the of Hungary. Its territory is presently in central and southern Slovakia. Today in Slovakia, Tekov is the informal designation of the corresponding territory.Geographythumb|left|200px|Map of Bars CountyBars County shared borders with the Hungarian counties  (Slovak: ),  Slovak: ),  (Slovak: ), ,  (Slovak: ) and  (Slovak: ). It was situated along the Hron river between Hont in the east, Kremnica (Hungarian:  and Dbrava in the north (which were part of the county), the itava river in the west, and Beeov and Ba in the south (which was not part of the county). The rivers Hron and itava ran through the county. The county was characterised by mining. Around 1910, its area was .CapitalsThe capital of the county was the Castle, then Levice Castle, then from the late 16th century Topoianky and since the late 18th century Moravce.HistoryThe county arose in the 11th century. The southern part of this county was occupied by Empire between 1663 and 1685 and managed as Uyvar eyalet by her. In the aftermath of World War I, the area became part of newly formed Czechoslovakia, as recognized by the concerned states in the 1920 of Trianon.  Following the provisions of the controversial Vienna Award, the southern part of the area came under Hungarian control in November 1938. This was merged with the southern part of former Hont county to form Bars-Hont county, with capital Levice (Hungarian: Lva).  After World War II, the Trianon borders were restored and the area was completely in Czechoslovakia again. In 1993, Czechoslovakia was split and Tekov became part of Slovakia.DemographicsPopulation by language (1910 census):*Slovak  97,824*Hungarian  62,022*German  17,366SubdivisionsIn the early 20th century, the subdivisions of Bars/Tekov county were:vrmegye
350355
Felixstowe
Felixstowe is a seaside town on the Sea coast of Suffolk, England. The town gives its name to the nearby of Felixstowe, which is the largest container port in the Kingdom (The Ports Industry in England and Wales (2006-07)) and is owned by Hutchinson Ports UK. The town is situated across the estuary of the Orwell and the River Stour from Harwich in Essex. History A village has stood on the site since long before the conquest  The early history of Felixstowe, including its Roman, Anglo-Saxon, Norman and medieval defences, is told under the name of Walton, because the name Felixstowe was given retrospectively, during the 13th century, to a place which had already been important for well over a thousand years It continued as a linchpin in Englands defence, as proved when in 1667 Dutch soldiers landed near the Fludyers area and failed to capture Fort. The town only became a major port in 1886. In addition to shipping, tourism increased, and a pier was constructed in 1905 but is now unsafe. Indeed, during the late Victorian period (after circa 1880) it became a fashionable resort, a trend initiated by the opening of railway station, the pier, (see above) and a visit by the German imperial family. It remained so until the late 1930s. In 1953, at least 48 people died in the town in the North Sea flood. Landguard Fort Landguard Fort stands on the site of the last opposed invasion of England in 1667 and the first land battle of The of York and Marines. The current fort was built in the 18th century, and modified in the 19th century with substantial additional 19th/20th century outside batteries. The fort hosts regular military re-enactments, including day with a Knot celebration of the last invasion, art exhibitions and alternative theatre. Fort is in the care of Heritage and managed by the Fort Trust. Felixstowe Museum A museum telling the story of Felixstowe, with a reference library, historic maps, photo archive and 14 rooms of artefacts from Roman finds, the towers, military social and domestic history through two wars and into the new millennium is managed by volunteers from the Felixstowe History and Museum Society. It is located in the old submarine mining establishment building at Landguard Point, between the Fort and Port. Pier During the World War the majority of the pier, at the time one of the longest in the country and complete with its own train, was purposely demolished by Engineers to prevent it being used as an easy landing point for enemy troops. Unfortunately after the war the damage was never repaired and the pier never regained its original length. Felixstowe was also one of the few places bombed by the Italians during Blitz. Mussolinis airforce proved to be no match for the Air Force, who shot down a fair number of Italian biplanes over the Channel and around Felixstowe itself - one of the few pictures of a shot-down Italian plane over the UK being from here.By the late 1990s the pier had been neglected so badly that it was deemed to be unsafe and closed to the public. Plans have been presented from time to time since the closure of the pier for its redevelopment along with large disused areas of the seafront near the former site of the Beach railway station, but nothing has come of them. Railway stations The sole remaining railway station, known as Felixstowe Town, opened in 1898 in the well-preserved building which now houses a Co-Operative supermarket, locally known as Solar. It also houses other shops, including a pub, Play n Exchange game and joke Shop, Adam and Eve hairdressers and Felixstowe Music, which is run by Radio, the local community radio station. In its prime the railway station saw more than 20 services an hour, but now hosts only one, the service to Ipswich. The station now has only one platform, which has been created from the far end of one of the original platforms.Beach railway station was demolished in 2004 despite a storm of protest from many local people keen on saving the 137 year-old historical building which the council had branded as unsafe. The station was originally opened in 1877 and was used continuously until 1959, after which it was the site of a small printers for many years until its demolition.(Felixstowe Beach Station Destroyed)From 1877 until 1951 there was also Pier railway station sited inside the area of the modern day docks at a small pier popular with pleasure boats, and steamer link to London.( ) A dock next to the pier was approved in 1879.() Transport  Bus The main bus operators are Buses and Eastern Counties.(Bus Operators) Train railway station is the terminus of the Branch Line passenger service to Ipswich the line itself branches before the station going on to the Of Felixstowe. Felixstowe Ferry The Harbour Ferry operates between the View Point (near Landguard Fort) in Felixstowe and Halfpenny Pier, Harwich throughout the summer.(Harwich, Felixstowe and Shotley harbour foot ferry) The Bawdsey Ferry crosses the Deben from Ferry. Politics Felixstowe is administered by County Council, Coastal District Council, and Felixstowe Town Council. Suffolk Coastal District Council, the local authority, is based in Woodbridge, although it has a part-time office in Felixstowe, which is open Mondays and Wednesdays. The local parish council, Felixstowe Town Council, is based in the town hall, on the seafront at Undercliff Road West.Felixstowe is twinned with the German towns Wesel and Salzwedel.Felixstowe lies within the Suffolk Coastal parliamentary constituency. The of Parliament for Suffolk Coastal was Gummer from 1983 but he has stood down from this role to be replaced at the General Election on 6 May 2010 by Dr Therese Coffey. Landmarks Fort is a scheduled ancient monument and visitor attraction with a nearby reserve. At the opposite end of the town is  Felixstowe Ferry Golf Club which is amongst the oldest in the UK, having been established in 1881.  The Rt. Hon. Balfour, Captain of the Golf Club in 1889, became Captain of the R&A in 1894 and British Prime Minister from 19021908.Felixstowe has a recently refurbished sandy beach south from the pier, and a stoney beach north of the pier. A Victorian promenade runs along part of the beach, from the reserve in the southwest to Cobbolds Point (Maybush Lane in east), with traditional huts along most of that length. An amusement arcade with snooker halls and food outlets occupy the southern end. The pier, now disused except for a cafe and amusement arcade, stands before a leisure centre, with swimming pool, owned by the local council, now managed by a contractor.From fort to Ferry there is a walkway and is the start of the 50 mile Coast Path. The is no path between Cobbolds Point and fort as the coastal protection work now prevents pedestrian access along the beach. At low tide from Jaccobs Ladder it is possible to glimpse the seaweed-covered remains of a fort, and could possible be the place of Dommoc, in the water about 50 yards from the coast.In the very centre of the town is South Beach Mansion now in private ownership. Originally built by the Eley family (famous for the Eley cartridges); town wits called it Eley Cathedral. It then passed to the Tollemache family and was at one time owned by the of Portugal. It was also here that Kaiser II of Germany and his family came to stay in 1893 putting Felixstowe on the international social map. Since then this grand Italianate mansion has played host to Mrs Simpson (who is reputed to have invented the Club Sandwich whilst visiting here) and E. Lawrence who stayed here for two years in the 1930s under the assumed names of Ross and Shaw. During the war it was an army headquarters before becoming the Felixstowe Town Hall. With Felixstowes abdication of power to Woodbridge, the town hall was no longer needed and the property reverted to private ownership. The property has been extensively renovated and returned to its former glory in recent years.Perhaps the most striking building on the front is Harvest House. Originally built as the Felix Hotel it then became Fisonss headquarters. Now it is a home for the elderly. It is a condition of residence that on arrival new residents are at least 55 years old. Sport Felixstowe Rugby Football Union Club is the premier (and only) rugby club in Felixstowe. It was founded in 1930, and plays in the Eastern Counties Leagues. A.W. Brown, Chris Barbour, Steve Edwards, Steve Britchfield, Gareth Carr have played for the team.Felixstowe Hockey Club has three mens teams and one ladies team. The mens 1st team play in eastern league division 1. The towns only senior football team, Felixstowe & Walton United, compete in the Eastern Counties League Premier Division.The town has a sports centre, the Brackenbury, in High Road East, and football, hockey and rugby pitches, together with four bowling greens and other sporting facilities. The sports centre, owned by the council, is managed by a contractor.Felixstowe Golf Club is a links course to the northeast of the town centre. Leisure facilities The town has two main leisure facilities: the Brackenbury Sports Centre in Old Felixstowe and the Felixstowe Leisure Centre adjacent to the pier. There is a bowls club and a tennis club has hosted a large post-Wimbledon tournament. There is also a small community centre, run by the Old Felixstowe Community Association (OFCA), in Ferry Road.The library was refurbished in 2006 at a cost of 1,500,000 and has since won national awards.(The Chartered Institute of Librarians and Information Professionals (CILIP))The Spa Pavilion Theatre is a 900-seat deco-style building on the promenade, owned by the district council and managed by a private contractor; Status Quo played there in the 1970s; Hendrix, Who, Zeppelin, Showaddywaddy, Slade and Jerry all played at the old Pier Pavilion which was demolished and is now the leisure centre. There is also a Sunday market that is larger than that at nearby Ipswich.Radio is the community radio station that has broadcasts on 107.5 FM to the local area and via the internet. The Port of Felixstowe Felixstowe is Britains largest container port.The main navigation channel is dredged to 14.5 metres below datum, and a depth of up to 15 metres alongside the quay, Felixstowe boasts deep-water able to accommodate the worlds latest generation of deep-draughted ultra post-Panamax vessels. There is a continuous quay of over 2.3 km, equipped with 25 ship-to shore gantry cranes.It has congested road links to the Midlands via the A14 and to London via the A12 road. The single-track railway line to Ipswich has recently been upgraded to allow larger containers, and many containers are now transported by rail.The port is owned by Whampoa Ltd() with additional land on the peninsula owned by College, Cambridge.()The port has its own Police Authority, which also currently has jurisdiction over the area local to the port (with permission from Constabularys Chief Inspector). Alongside the Port Police, they also have their own joint ambulance & fire service. One of the port ambulances, call sign Alpha 1, can also come off port to attend 999 emergencies in Felixstowe. Parishes St. Felix is the Catholic Parish in Felixstowe.(http://www.suffolkchurches.co.uk/felixrc.htm)St. John the Baptist is an ecclesiastical parish in Felixstowe.(http://www.suffolkchurches.co.uk/felixjohn.htm) Notable residents People originating from or associated with Felixstowe include:* Ainsley, footballer* Field Marshal Henry Hynman Allenby, 1st Viscount Allenby, soldier, Allenby Park in St. Andrews Road is named after him* Cavendish, The Navigator, Elizabethan explorer, born in Trimley St Martin* Hook, UNRWA officer, killed in the line of duty* Jenkins, actor* Allen, Detroit Techno producer* Kemp, actor, Z-Cars* E. Lawrence, Lawrence of Arabia, based at RAF Landguard under the name John Hume Ross* Mills, actor* Pandolfi, broadcaster and actor* The Duchess of Windsor, Mrs Simpson, spent time at Felixstowe waiting for Edward VIIIs abdication* Ward, economist and writer, pupil at Jesus & Mary Convent in Felixstowe* Barham, Former Headmaster, and renowned Baritone.* Clements (1956-), cricketer References  External links * Felixstowe Town Council* Felixstowe Museum* * Landguard Fort* Felixstowe Radio* http://suffolk.activeboard.com/t15671028/felixstowe-and-ferry/ Photos of Felixstowede:Felixstowefr:Felixstowefy:Felixstoweit:Felixstowenl:Felixstoweno:Felixstowenn:Felixstowepl:Felixstowero:Felixstoweru:simple:Felixstowefi:Felixstowesv:Felixstowe
350699
One_Big_Union_(concept)
rightThe One Big Union is a concept which emerged in the late 19th and early 20th centuries amongst working class unionists.Unions initially organised as craft or unions.  Workers were organized by their skill: carpenters, plumbers, bricklayers, each into their respective unions.  Capitalists could often divide craft and trade unionists along these lines in demarcation disputes.  As capitalist enterprises and state bureaucracies became more centralised and larger, some workers felt that their institutions needed to become similarly large.  A simultaneous disenchantment with the perceived weakness of craft unions caused many unions to organize along industrial lines.As envisioned by the Workers of the World (IWW), however  which for many years prior to 1919 had been associated with the concept(Marion Dutton Savage, Industrial Unionism in America, 1922, page 176.)  One Big Union was not just the idea that all workers should be organised into one big union. In the 1911 pamphlet One Big Union, IWW supporters Father J. Hagerty and Trautmann enumerated two goals: One Big Union needed to combine the wage-workers in such a way that it can most successfully fight the battles and protect the interests of the workers of today in their struggles for fewer hours of toil, more wages and better conditions, and it also must offer a final solution of the labor probleman emancipation from strikes, injunctions, bull-pens, and scabbing of one against the other.(Thomas J. Hagerty and W. E. Trautmann, One Big Union, An Outline of a Possible Industrial Organization of the Working Class, with Chart, 1st edition, Charles H. Kerr & Company, 1911.  See also William E. Trautmann, One Big Union,  1st edition (1913?) http://www.marxists.org/history/usa/unions/iww/1911/trautmannobu.htm; retitled as One Great Union, 5th revised edition (1915)   http://debs.indstate.edu/t7778o5_1915.pdf.   ) One Big Union was the notional organizational concept, while the IWWs revolutionary industrial unionism was the organizing method by which that concept could be realized. Organizing the One Big Union of all workers the world over was meant to achieve working class control.(Letter from the IWWs Marine Transport Workers union Port of New York organizing committee to Irish workers, as recorded in Revolutionary Radicalism, New York (State) Legislature, Joint Legislative Committee to Investigate Seditious Activities, Clayton Riley, page 898.) But the One Big Union organizations were resisted by government and industry, and subverted by existing trade unions. By 1925, only the concept of One Big Union remained.One Big Union in practiceThe One Big Union concept was adopted and promoted by the Industrial Workers of the World after the publication of the One Big Union pamphlet in 1911, and is still used by the organization.(http://www.iww.org/culture/official/obu/index.shtml retrieved March 21, 2009.) Members of the IWW historically, and currently, signed letters (and other communications) with the closing, Yours for the O.B.U.(Philip Sheldon Foner, History of the labor movement in the United States, 1980, 4th edition, page 133.) Many commentators consider One Big Union to be synonymous with the Industrial Workers of the World.( One of the popular IWW publications was called One Big Union Monthly.(Philip Sheldon Foner, History of the labor movement in the United States, 1980, 4th edition, page 166.)The One Big Union concept was promoted by the IWW in various ways, including as an invitation to racial equality. One IWW leaflet proclaimed:To Colored Workingmen and Women: If you are a wage worker you are welcome in the I.W.W. halls, no matter what your color. By this you may see that the I.W.W. is not a white mans union, not a black mans union, not a red or yellow mans union, but a working mans union. All of the working class in one big union.(Philip Sheldon Foner, History of the labor movement in the United States, 1980, 4th edition, page 125.)The IWW used the same sort of arguments to welcome women into the workforce.(Philip Sheldon Foner, History of the labor movement in the United States, 1980, 4th edition, pages 127-28.) The appeal subsequently proclaimed the intent to organize all wage workers . . . into One Big Union, regardless of creed, color, or nationality . . . An injury to one is an injury to all.(Philip Sheldon Foner, History of the labor movement in the United States, 1980, 4th edition, page 243.) The immediate goal of One Big Union was better pay, shorter hours, and better surroundings.(Philip Sheldon Foner, History of the labor movement in the United States, 1980, 4th edition, page 278.) The IWW propagandized, Organize in one big union and fight for a chance to live as human beings should live. All together now and victory will be ours.(Philip Sheldon Foner, History of the labor movement in the United States, 1980, 4th edition, page 356.)HistoryNorth Americas One Big Union movementFounding organizationsIn America, the most significant early impetus for the One Big Union concept came from the Federation of Miners (WFM) which was headquartered in Colorado. The WFM and its allies first launched the Labor Union (WLU).The Western Labor Union was initially intended to displace the conservative Federation of Labor (AFL) in the West. The WLUs rebranding in 1902 as the Labor Union (ALU)(All That Glitters, pp. 63.) was a direct response to actions by (AFL) President Gompers.The WFM and the ALU then cooperated to found the IWW.The IWW was conceived as a global union with the goal of organizing the entire world. The concept of One Big Union, growing out of the IWWs revolutionary program, evolved over a period of time:In moving toward revolutionary industrial unionism, Denvers labor radicals were not building from scratch; rather, they drew upon and elaborated ideas and strategies generated by the previous twenty years of Denvers labor history...  Although the labor wars of 1903-4 may have triggered the formation of the IWW, the ideological synthesis it would uphold had been worked out in the American Labor Unions leadership by the summer of 1903...(David Brundage, The Making of Western Labor Radicalism: Denvers Organized Workers, 1878-1905, 1994, page 138. The American Labor Union was founded as the Western Labor Union.)The WFM had been founded as a conservative trade union after a bitter and violent strike in Coeur dAlene in 1892. The WFM conducted a successful strike in Cripple Creek in 1894, notable for the exceedingly rare intervention of the state on the side of the striking miners. But the strike which some historians believe shaped the philosophy and tactics of the WFM, and which ultimately resulted in the WFM embracing revolutionary unionism and the eventual promulgation of the One Big Union concept, occurred against mine owners in Leadville. Out of that struggle came the 1897 proclamation of the State Trades and Labor Council of Montana, a document which broke with the past  declaring that the old form of organization is unable to cope with the recent aggressions of plutocracy  and called for a new type of labor organization.(William Philpott, The Lessons of Leadville, Colorado Historical Society, 1995, pages 71,82.)The WFM wasnt that organization. It had poured resources into the Leadville strike, and yet was defeated.(William Philpott, The Lessons of Leadville, Colorado Historical Society, 1995, pages 66,68.) Additional resources which had been promised by the AFL were not provided.(William Philpott, The Lessons of Leadville, Colorado Historical Society, 1995, pages 81,92.) The solution was organizing western laborers and western unions into a new umbrella-like federation(William Philpott, The Lessons of Leadville, Colorado Historical Society, 1995, pages 82-83.) (i.e., the WLU, the ALU, and eventually, the IWW.) These conclusions represented an absolute rejection of the AFL, of its conservative philosophy and its complacent demeanor.(William Philpott, The Lessons of Leadville, Colorado Historical Society, 1995, page 83.)But the WFM did undergo substantial changes. In contrast to the AFL, the WFM,...opened itself to all potential members and also to ideas and values in conflict with Capitalism. It accepted any member of a bona fide union without initiation fee upon presentation of a valid union card. It demanded neither a closed shop nor an exclusive employment contract. It sought jobs for all, not merely the organized and highly-skilled few.(Melvyn Dubofsky, Big Bill Haywood, 1987, page 17.)Members of the WFM ...saw no advantage to huddling within their traditional crafts; they sought to mobilize all workers across a given industry to confront employers&mdash;and governments&mdash;with their aggregate clout. With little stake in the status quo, they invested their faith in sweeping political programs to remedy the grim conditions in which they worked and lived.(Anthony Lukas, Big Trouble, 1997, page 210.)In 1905, WFM leaders initiated a meeting of thirty prominent socialists and labor radicals in Chicago. This group analyzed industrial and social relations from the revolutionary viewpoint and drafted a manifesto. Enumerating labors grievances, it criticized craft unions for creating a skilled aristocracy, and suggested one big industrial union embracing all industries and founded on the class struggle. Printed in great quantities, this invitation to the first convention of the IWW was sent around the country.(Joyce Kornbluh, One Big Union: The Philosophy of Industrial Unionism, The Lucy Parsons Project, http://flag.blackened.net/lpp/iww/kornbluh_one_big_union.html retrieved March 19, 2009.)The One Big Union concept growsThe IWW organised in United States, Canada, Australia, and other countries, employed creative tactics, and advocated the strike as a favorite method for workers to gain control of industries. But One Big Union spread far beyond the IWW. The revolutionary character of the OBU can be appreciated from a statement by the Brotherhood of Metal Workers Industrial Union, a 1909 offshoot of the Association of Machinists. In 1919 this organization published the following,The workers, not only of America, but of all countries, are determined to get the full value of the price they paid and will yet pay. There can be no peace until the workers not only control, but also own, the means of life, liberty, and happiness. To accomplish this, it necessitates the ownership of all industries by a government of workers, for the workers, which can and will be accomplished by the One Big Union.(Revolutionary Radicalism, New York (State) Legislature, Joint Legislative Committee to Investigate Seditious Activities, Clayton Riley, page 935.)Also in 1919, the International Federation of Workers in the Hotel, Restaurant, Lunchroom, Club and Catering Industry (IFWHRLC) called upon its members to terminate any AFL memberships and was judged by investigators, on the basis of an explanation of industrial unionism in the Hotel Worker, one of its publications, to be a revolutionary organization based upon the One Big Union principle, having for its objective the establishment of a new social order and the seizure of industry.(Revolutionary Radicalism, New York (State) Legislature, Joint Legislative Committee to Investigate Seditious Activities, Clayton Riley, pages 921-930.) The Hotel Worker stated, in part:Under industrial unionism, all the Workers in one industry form One Big Union of that industry. Instead of being split up into a lot of separate units, with divided and often conflicting interests, they strengthen and unite their forces in one mighty and irresistible combination.(Hotel Worker, October 5, 1919, Page 3, as recorded in Revolutionary Radicalism, New York (State) Legislature, Joint Legislative Committee to Investigate Seditious Activities, Clayton Riley, pages 920-21.)The Journeymen Bakers and Confectioners International Union of America (JBCIUA) came under suspicion for hosting a delegation of the IWW, and for forming a committee to explore a merger with the IFWHRLC.(Revolutionary Radicalism, New York (State) Legislature, Joint Legislative Committee to Investigate Seditious Activities, Clayton Riley, pages 931-932.) Investigators concluded that such events confirmed the organization of One Big Union along I. W. W. lines to control all the workers in the food industry in this state, as  well as in the greater part of the country.( Cognizant of repression of the period that came to be called the Scare, the JBCIUA passed a resolution which stated, in part,...that our best friends and advisors sic are being martyrized sic by the capitalistic system, in the present period of worst reaction, and have been thrown into jail for long terms.(Revolutionary Radicalism, New York (State) Legislature, Joint Legislative Committee to Investigate Seditious Activities, Clayton Riley, page 933.)In 1919 in the United States the newly-formed Labor Party (CLP) sought to attach itself to the One Big Union movement, and to industrial unionism. The CLP urged all its members to join industrial unions.(Revolutionary Radicalism, New York (State) Legislature, Joint Legislative Committee to Investigate Seditious Activities, Clayton Riley, pages 802-804,814-15.) The IWW concluded that the Russian revolution and local communist activities had a divisive effect on the general anti-capitalist movement, but this effect was not immediately apparent.(Fred W. Thompson, Patrick Murfin, The IWW: Its First Seventy Years, 1905-1975, 1976, pages 127-128.)Australias One Big UnionThe One Big Union movement was organized in Australia.(John Castell Hopkins, The Canadian Annual Review of Public Affairs, 1919, page 305.) The concept was initially considered in 1908, when the idea of adopting the Preamble of the Industrial Workers of the World was voted upon by the New South Wales Trade Union Congress,(James Thomas Sutcliffe, A History of Trade Unionism in Australia, Macmillan & co. ltd., 1921, page 156.) and the first concrete step toward one big union was adopted in 1912.(James Thomas Sutcliffe, A History of Trade Unionism in Australia, Macmillan & co. ltd., 1921, page 167.) In 1917, the Labour Minister for the New South Wales Government said in a speech,...an important conference of Trade Unionists was held in Sydney to further the idea of one big union... to get the Unionists formed into a one big union organization which, at any time, by the proclamation of a strike, could stop all production and transport, and force from any government in office whatever concessions were demanded... The men at the head of this movement are in favor of action as against political action... With consummate skill the men who initiated this idea have got possession of the whole Labour movement.(James Thomas Sutcliffe, A History of Trade Unionism in Australia, Macmillan & co. ltd., 1921, page 176.)An organization called the One Big Union Propaganda League (OBUPL) was formed in Brisbane on September 10, 1918, growing out of former IWW strongholds in the north.(Verity Burgmann, Revolutionary industrial unionism, 1995, page 255.) With help from IWW members, the OBUPL gained considerable support from the rank and file of craft unions, emphasizing job control and bottom-up organizing.(Verity Burgmann, Revolutionary industrial unionism, 1995, page 256.)However, Australian trade union officials, aided in part by the Party, succeeded in changing the character of the OBU from that envisioned by the IWW, and also by the International Industrial Union (WIIU), a group that had split off from the IWW, and was active in Australia. The One Big Union movement ceased to challenge capitalism in Australia, but rather sought to function within capitalism; it evolved from an industrial to a craft basis; it developed into a top-down bureaucracy. By 1924 the Australian OBU ceased to be viable.(Verity Burgmann, Revolutionary industrial unionism, 1995, page 261.)Canadas One Big UnionIn 1919 in Canada, unionists who were discontent with policies of the Trades and Labour Congress of the Dominion formed a union called One Big Union (OBU).( The Canadian OBU movement had been inspired by the IWW,(Paul Buhle, Taking Care of Business, Samuel Gompers, George Meany, Lane Kirkland, and the Tragedy of American Labor, 1999, page 105.) and like the IWW, it favored the general strike.(Philip S. Foner, History of the Labor Movement in the United States, 1987, page 81.) However, the concept of One Big Union in western Canada did not gain widespread acceptance until the Western Labor News reported that the idea had been adopted by the Australian Workers International Industrial Union in South Melbourne, Australia.(David Jay Bercuson, Confrontation at Winnipeg, McGill-Queens Press - MQUP, 1990, pages 97-98.) That Australian workers organization went beyond unionism to advocate the abolition of private ownership of the means of production.(David Jay Bercuson, Confrontation at Winnipeg, McGill-Queens Press - MQUP, 1990, page 98.) Because of recent history in Western Canada, an increasing acceptance of industrial unionism accompanied a growing appreciation of the general strike, and the need for an OBU to call it.(David Jay Bercuson, Confrontation at Winnipeg, McGill-Queens Press - MQUP, 1990, pages 98-99.) A mood of militancy had been growing in Western Canada for some time.(David Jay Bercuson, Confrontation at Winnipeg, McGill-Queens Press - MQUP, 1990, page 100.)The OBU spread rapidly in Canada. Lodges, trades councils, and provincial federations withdrew from their international organizations, and joined the OBU, culminating in a membership of nearly fifty thousand the first year.( The OBU also generated considerable support for dual affiliation. This incarnation of the OBU movement was also attacked by mainstream labor, in the person of L. Lewis,( and other AFL officials.The One Big Union organization in Canada differed structurally from the IWW. While the IWW organized on industrial lines, the OBU of Canada focused more on organizing workers geographically.(Marion Dutton Savage, Industrial Unionism in America, 1922, page 188.) The absence of an existing industrial union structure within the Canadian OBU resulted in the defection of 20,000 members of the Workers Industrial Union (LWIU). According to the 1922 publication Industrial Unionism in America, Their withdrawal was a staggering blow from which the O. B. U. never recovered.(Marion Dutton Savage, Industrial Unionism in America, 1922, pages 189-190.)When the IWW in the United States was suppressed during the Scare and the Raids, there was pressure to similarly attack Canadas One Big Union movement:The movement was got well under way with a basis of I.W.W. and Socialist support; Calgary was a center of the movement as it had been in the Alberta mining unrest of these years. So obvious was the current of thought that the Calgary Herald of Sept. 6th struck a warning note: There is an element in Western Canada that is somewhat akin to the I.W.W. if not actually affiliated with and controlled by it. Let the I.W.W. of Canada or their imitators, beware lest the strong hand of the law does not stretch out and grasp them as it has their friends on the other side of the 49th parallel. There is a feeling throughout the country that it would be better for all concerned if a few of them were behind the bars.(John Castell Hopkins, The Canadian Annual Review of Public Affairs, 1919, pages 304-05.)The Canadian government imprisoned the most prominent members of the Canadian OBU.(Marion Dutton Savage, Industrial Unionism in America, 1922, page 196.)One Big Union and mainstream unionsThe goal of the IWW  as interpreted by government investigators in 1920  was to break up the system of craft or trade unions, and to organize workers into One Big Union having subdivisions along the lines of industry, rather than those of trade.(Revolutionary Radicalism, New York (State) Legislature, Joint Legislative Committee to Investigate Seditious Activities, Clayton Riley, page 872.) That interpretation appears to have been accepted by Federation of Labor Gompers who in 1922 expressed his belief that the One Big Union idea was designed primarily to put the American Federation of Labor out of business.(The New York Times, April 30, 1922, page 102.) Gompers undermined any labor actions that he perceived might be related to the One Big Union movement; for example, the General Strike(Philip S. Foner, History of the Labor Movement in the United States, 1987, pages 82-87.) and the General Strike.(Editorial, Revolutionary Age, July 19, 1919, as reported in Revolutionary Radicalism, New York (State) Legislature, Joint Legislative Committee to Investigate Seditious Activities, Clayton Riley, pages 697-98. Revolutionary Age was the official organ of the Left Wing Section of the Socialist Party, page 702.) A 1919 editorial proclaimed:The union bureaucrats are particularly against industrial unionism, since industrial unionism ends craft divisions and craft disputes, which constitute the power of the union bureaucracy. In Canada, the One Big Union  Industrial Unionism  has captured the imagination of the organized workers. The One Big Union directed the great general strike in Canada; but, says an observer, The International Brotherhoods have come out against the strikers, shrewdly foreseeing in the One Big Union the destruction of their organization. This is a damning indictment of the old unionism.(Editorial, Revolutionary Age, July 19, 1919, as reported in Revolutionary Radicalism, New York (State) Legislature, Joint Legislative Committee to Investigate Seditious Activities, Clayton Riley, pages 697-98.)In June, 1919, the Federation of Labor (AFL), in session in City, New Jersey, passed resolutions in general opposition to the general strike. The official report of these proceedings described the convention as the largest and in all probability the most important Convention ever held by the organization, in part for having engineered the overwhelming defeat of the so-called Radical element via crushing a One Big Union proposition and a proposal for a nationwide general strike, both by a vote of more than 20 to 1.(Sheet Metal Workers Journal, Amalgamated Sheet Metal Workers International Alliance, Volumes 24-25, Chicago, Illinois, 1919, pages 265-267) The AFL amended its constitution to disallow any central labor union (i.e., regional labor councils) from taking a strike vote without prior authorization of the national officers of the union concerned.(Sheet Metal Workers Journal, Amalgamated Sheet Metal Workers International Alliance, Volumes 24-25, Chicago, Illinois, 1919, pages 265-267) The change was intended to check the spread of general strike sentiment and prevent recurrences of what happened at Seattle and is now going on at Winnepeg.(Sheet Metal Workers Journal, Amalgamated Sheet Metal Workers International Alliance, Volumes 24-25, Chicago, Illinois, 1919, pages 265-267) The penalty for any unauthorized strike vote was revocation of that bodys charter.(Sheet Metal Workers Journal, Amalgamated Sheet Metal Workers International Alliance, Volumes 24-25, Chicago, Illinois, 1919, pages 265-267)In 1919 the Committee, charged with exposing and stamping out radicalism of all types, issued a report that found the AFL to be free from the taint of revolutionary radicalism. However, it found one AFL affiliate, the Ladies Garment Workers Union (ILGWU), to have marked radical tendencies . . . it is founded upon the principles of class struggle . . . it adopts the One Big Union idea and seeks to bring about the overthrow of society.(Philip S. Foner, History of the Labor Movement in the United States, 1987, pages 33-34.)One Big Union Canada also came under considerable pressure from the Canadian Trades and Labour Congress and the AFL.( The Mine Workers (UMW), in particular, came to an agreement with employers to freeze out the Canadian One Big Union.(Marion Dutton Savage, Industrial Unionism in America, 1922, page 197.)In June, 1919, the UMW revoked the charter of District 18, which included Alberta and British Columbia, for joining the OBU. The UMW International persuaded a number of locals to return to the parent organization. The UMW then came to an agreement with employers which would effectively lock out the OBU. With One Big Union seen as the greater threat, employers agreed to require UMW membership on the part of all employees in and around the mines. The companies implemented the dues checkoff to seal the new agreement.(OBU members refused to work under circumstances where they were assessed dues for an organization to which they no longer belonged, and a number of mines organized by the OBU were therefore closed down. The OBU sought relief from the courts, but the courts sided with the United Mine Workers and the employers. The employers and the UMW then together secured injunctions against any OBU members to prevent any interference with UMW miners. The O.B.U. Bulletin for October 23, 1920, reported that the UMW had thirteen such injunctions issued, and had set aside a million dollars to fight the OBU.( The Canadian OBU concluded that Officials of the U.M.W. of A. are the same bunch of crooks who have so often betrayed the miners of the U.S. in their struggles and strikes at the instance of their government and the owners.(Marion Dutton Savage, Industrial Unionism in America, 1922, page 197-98.) The OBU felt particularly angry that the UMW invoked the aid of both the employers and a ruthless capitalist government in order to crush a rival union organization.(Marion Dutton Savage, Industrial Unionism in America, 1922, page 198.)Criticism of One Big Union organizationsThe One Big Union organizations adopted some principles of One Big Union as initially promoted by the IWW. But the OBU idea became popular in Australia at a time when some syndicalist-leaning labor leaders were moving toward communism.(Verity Burgmann, Revolutionary industrial unionism, 1995, page 260.)Although the One Big Union organizations were frequently formed with the help of IWW members or members of IWW offshoot organizations such as the WIIU, the OBU organizations frequently incurred criticism from the original industrial union organizations.(Verity Burgmann, Revolutionary industrial unionism, 1995, page 259.) The IWW advocated organizing bottom-up, the OBU in Australia was increasingly top-down. The IWW advocated job control, the Australian OBU did not.( Shop committees and rank and file participation which had been so important to IWW members were de-emphasized.( The OBU in Australia was described as the plum extracted from the IWW cake to keep down discontent among the dupes.(The Industrial Union News of the WIIU criticized the structure of the Canadian One Big Union organization, declaring the O.B.U. seeks to masquerade under the guise of industrial unionism while organized on a territorial plane, without sound foundations and building from the top down.(Marion Dutton Savage, Industrial Unionism in America, 1922, page 190.)The Industrial Union News also criticized the Canadian OBU for not providing for elections of officials by the entire membership.(Marion Dutton Savage, Industrial Unionism in America, 1922, pages 192-193.) The OBU was described as not red but pale pink, and in league with the reactionary Socialist Party of Canada.(Marion Dutton Savage, Industrial Unionism in America, 1922, pages 195.)The IWW publication Solidarity of July 10, 1920, stated that labor fakirs had seized control of the OBU, and had organized new branches of the OBU in the United States in opposition to the IWW.(Marian Dutton Savage, who published a book on Industrial Unionism in 1922, saw problems with the organizational structure of the Canadian OBU.In neglecting to give adequate recognition to the ties binding workers of the same industry together and in seeking to rely instead on the general feeling of solidarity in the working class, the O. B. U., like the of Labor, has failed to understand the psychology of those it has sought to win and hold. If it is difficult to make skilled and unskilled workers in the same industry realize their community of interest, it is doubly difficult to make those in different industries feel a strong bond of union. The I. W. W. has faced this fact and, unlike the O. B. U., seeks to unite all who work in an industry in one international union having a large measure of control over its own affairs. Although it preaches the brotherhood of all workers as ardently as does the O. B. U., it recognizes that each industry has its own particular problems which can best be solved by workers in that industry, and considers that loyalty to one industry need in no way impair loyalty to the I. W. W. or to the working class as a whole. If the O. B. U. had adopted the same course it would not have lost the strongest group which had affiliated with it.(Marion Dutton Savage, Industrial Unionism in America, 1922, pages 200.)InfluenceThus, the One Big Union organizations were attacked by government, subverted by mainstream unions, frozen out by employers, and criticized by the revolutionary industrial union organizations from which they sprung. They were considered too radical, or not radical enough. By 1925 the One Big Union organizations were largely defunct, and only the concept of One Big Union remained.While attempts to organise One Big Union on militant and revolutionary lines did not succeed, the unions which made the attempt  for example, the IWW, the WIIU, the One Big Union organizations of Canada and Australia, or Nacional del Trabajo (CNT) in Spain  have had a significant influence on the labor movement.See also*union*Federation of Trade Unions*Anarcho-syndicalism*Workers of the World*federation competition in the United StatesNotes
351931
Explosive_train
A triggering sequence, also called an explosive train, is a sequence of events that culminates in the detonation of explosives. For safety reasons, most widely used high explosives are difficult to detonate. A primary explosive of higher sensitivity is used to trigger a uniform and predictable detonation of the main body of the explosive. Although the primary explosive itself is generally a more sensitive and expensive compound, it is only used in small quantities and in relatively safely packaged forms. By design there are low explosives and explosives made such that the low explosives are highly sensitive (i.e. their Figure of Insensitivity is low) and high explosives are comparatively insensitive. This not only affords inherent safety to the usage of explosives during handling and transport, but also necessitates an explosive triggering sequence or explosive train. The explosive triggering sequence or the explosive train essentially consists of an initiator, an intermediary and the high explosive.   For example, a match will not cause explosive to explode, but it will light a fuse which will detonate a primary explosive that will shock a secondary high explosive and cause it to detonate. In this way, even very insensitive explosives may be used; the primary detonates a booster charge that then detonates the main charge. Triggering sequences are used in the mining industry for the detonation of ANFO and other cheap, bulk, and insensitive explosives that can not be fired by only a cap or similar item.  Low Explosive Train An example of a low-explosive train is a rifle cartridge, which consists of # a primer consisting of a small amount of primary explosive which initiates the explosive train# an igniter which is initiated by the primer and creates a flame that ignites the propellant# a propellant consisting of a secondary explosive that emits a large amount of gas as it deflagrates. High Explosive Train High-explosives trains can be either two-step (e.g., detonator and dynamite) or three-step (e.g., detonator, booster of explosive, and main charge of explosive). Primary components A high explosive train includes three primary high explosive components which are used to initiate explosives:# Fuse or fuze# Primer# DetonatorDetonators are often made from tetryl and fulminates. Secondary components In an explosive train there are two secondary high explosive components:# Boosters# charges, also known as chargesExamples of bursting charges are* TNT* B* RDX* PETN Tertiary compments In some cases, the main charge is so insensitive that using typical primary materials becomes impractical due to large amount required. Thus, an explosive booster is used to deliver sufficient shockwave to the main charge.The most significant tertiary material in wideaspread use is ANFO. References 
353261
Bridgend
Bridgend () is a town in the County Borough in Wales,  west of the capital, Cardiff. The river crossed by the original bridge, which gave the town its name, is the Ogmore but the Ewenny also passes to the south of the town. Historically a part of Glamorgan, Bridgend has greatly expanded in size since the early 1980s and had a population of 39,429 in 2001.(http://www.statistics.gov.uk/downloads/census2001/ks_ua_ew_part1.pdf)HistoryPrehistoric and RomanSeveral prehistoric burial mounds have been found in the vicinity of Bridgend suggesting that the area was settled before times. The A48 between Bridgend and Cowbridge has a portion, known locally as Crack Hill, a road. The of Glamorgan would have been a natural low-level route west to the fort and harbour at Neath (Nidum) from settlements in the east like Cardiff and Caerleon (Isca).The Norman invasionAfter the conquest of Saxon England in 1066, the new establishment looked westwards in the following decades to create new seats for lords loyal to The Conqueror. Groups of Norman barons arrived in Wales and in the south and east created what would later become the Marches, while the north and west remained largely unconquered due to the harsh terrain.At Coity, the local Welsh chieftain Morgan Gam already had a stronghold. Sometime in the 11th century Norman Lord Payn de Turberville approached Morgan to turn over control of Coity Castle to de Turberville. Morgan Gam agreed, but only if de Turberville either fought Morgan for the land, or took Gams daughter Sybils hand in marriage. Turberville married Sybil and became Lord of Coity, rebuilding the castle.()In 1106, Newcastle Castle (on Newcastle Hill, overlooking the town centre) and Castle (1116) were built by Fitzhamon and de Londres respectively.() About  north-east of Castle, Maurice de Londres founded the fortified Benedictine Priory in 1141.()These three castles provided a defensive triangle for the area. (A quadrilateral if you include Ewenny Priory.)Early developmentBridgend itself developed at a ford on the Ogmore, which was on the main route between east and Wales. Just north of the town, there is the confluence of three rivers, the River Ogmore, the Llynfi River and the Garw River. South of Bridgend the River Ewenny merges with the River Ogmore and flows into the Channel. In the 15th century, a stone bridge was built to connect permanently each side of the River Ogmore (later rebuilt). Originally this bridge had four arches but in the 18th century a massive flood washed two of them away. The rest of the bridge still stands and still remains a focal point of the town, with aesthetic restoration taking place in 2006.Bridgend grew rapidly into an agricultural town important to many of the local farmers. Although still small by todays standards it became an important town, a tag that remained with it well into the late 20th century.The industrial eraThe discovery of coal in the Wales Valleys north of Bridgend would have a massive impact on the town. The first mining operations opened north of Bridgend in the 17th century, with the Llynfi Valley being the first to be industrialised. Bridgend itself never had coal deposits and remained a market town for some time, but the valleys of the three rivers grew into an important part of the Wales coalfields. Ironworks and brickworks (notably at Tondu) were also established in the same period, by Bedford, although the ironworks faltered after his death and ceased operating entirely in 1836.The Western Railway arrived and Bridgend was at the junction between the main London to Fishguard line and the branch to the three valleys. Coal trains regularly sent coal down the valleys and with the opening of the Vale of Glamorgan railway, coal could be sent directly to port at Barry or through other branch lines to Porthcawl.Bridgend itself saw several quarries open in and around the town centre, the remnants of which, (near Brackla) can still be seen today. An engine works was opened in the town and a larger farmers market also opened in the town centre, where it remained until the 1970s.In 1801, the population of Bridgend County was around 6000. By the beginning of the 20th century this had risen to 61,000. By this time Bridgend was a bustling market town with prosperous valleys to the north, a thriving community and good links to other towns and cities.The Second World WarBridgend played an important part during the World War. It was home to a of war camp at Farm and a large munitions factory (Bridgend &mdash; known as the Admiralty) at Waterton, as well as a large underground munitions storage base at Brackla (known as the 8 xs). This was an overspill of the Arsenal, Woolwich.At its peak the Arsenal had 40,000 workers, many of them women. Large numbers of them were transported by bus from the Rhondda and the valleys. At the time the Arsenal was the largest factory (employee-wise) ever in the UK .The factory complex had three sites in Bridgend, all linked together by a huge network of railways. There are many reminders of the factory sites left to this day Brackla Ordnance Site.In 1945, 67 prisoners of war from Farm managed to escape through a tunnel although all were recaptured.(South Wales Police Museum - Island Farm Prisoner of War Camp, Bridgend) While Bridgend was as important during the war as any other part of Wales, and although it was photographed by the Luftwaffe, it was never blitzed. This was largely due to the areas air pocket, which made bombing extremely hazardous for incoming planes. The close proximity of the P.O.W. camp at Farm may have been something of a deterrent as well. Unlike Bridgend, both Swansea and Cardiff did not escape such massive attacks but the area immediately around Bridgend did suffer bombing raids. Had Bridgend been bombed it would have likely been a massive blow to munitions supplies to the allies and could have changed the course of the war in the Axis favour.The Admiralty ceased full scale production in December 1945 after 5 years. Two of the munitions storage magazines in the Brackla ROF site were converted to a RGHQ (Regional Government Headquarters) during the War as part of the UK of government plans.() It is now in the hands of a private company.Post-warBridgend remained a solid market town after the war. In 1948, Newbridge Fields (a short distance from the town centre) hosted the 1948 Eisteddfod.In 1960, the River Ogmore burst its banks and flooded the town centre. Subsequent floods and extreme weather led the Water Authority to develop concrete flood defence walls along the banks of the River Ogmore in the town centre. The town centre has not been flooded since. During this time Bridgend was chosen to become the headquarters for Wales Police. This action was ideal as geographically, Bridgend stands equidistantly between both Swansea to the west and Cardiff to the east.The cuts of the 1960s saw the loss of passenger rail links in the Vale of Glamorgan and to the northern valleys. The Vale of Glamorgan link to Barry via Rhoose was re-instated in June 2005.In the 1970s, Bridgend would begin to see the catalyst of arguably its biggest growth period. The missing section of the motorway was constructed around the town, plans were afoot to change the Waterton Admiralty into an industrial estate, and the water supply was improved including new treatment works near Ogmore. Two major multinational corporations, the Motor Company and Sony set up factories in, or on the outskirts of the new Industrial Estate (former Waterton Arsenal).During the 1980s with the development of the Brackla Housing Estate the future of Bridgend seemed bright. By the 1990s the estate had grown to become the largest privately-owned housing estate in Europe. Further new housing developments at Broadlands to the south-west of the town centre and the continuing expansion of Brackla to the north-east has caused Bridgends population to swell dramatically. Due to this, traffic congestion and a lack of parking facilities within the town have become important issues in the area. In 1997 a new link road/bypass was built to link the town centre directly to the M4 motorway as well as redirect traffic around the town centre.The closure of the Welsh coal industry brought mass-unemployment and social problems to the valleys to the north. However, this led to a greater general standard of living for many in the areas previously dominated by coal mining but many of the problems stemming from unemployment, including drug-use and economic inactivity still remain today. By the late 1980s all coal mines in the area had ceased operations and the former mine workers either commuted or moved to central Bridgend to work at the newly-developed industrial estates. This was typical for much of South Wales which was at the time moving from a mining-based economy and into a new service, electronic, manufacturing and textile-based one.A new Securicor operated prison (HM Parc Prison) was built near Coity in the late 1990s. The prison opened in November 1997.The McArthur Glen Designer Outlet opened in 1998.The New Millennium1 investment in regeneration and public realm improvements have led to the pedestrianisation of the town centre and the restoration of some buildings.(Town Centre Streetscene Bridgend County Council) Some local traders have argued that this has damaged trade due to a lack of access by taxis and the disabled.(Angry trader calls for town centre shutdown to bring back traffic WalesOnline 25 June 2009) Car parking provision and pricing has also been a concern to retailers with calls for free or reduced price parking to increase town centre visits.(Free parking may tempt shoppers back into town WalesOnline, 22 January 2009)To counteract the dominance of Tesco in the area, Asda were granted planning permission for a new superstore near the town centre. The store was opened on 31 March 2008 by the local MP, and players from Ravens. Over 1500 customers were thought to have walked through the new doors to take a look around the new store.In 2004 an award-winning new bus station was constructed and traffic movements around the town centre were altered. Local committees, together with the council started to use the pedestrianisation of the town centre to its advantage, culminating in several fairs including Continental Markets, Celtic Festivals, a small Mardi-Gras and seasonal markets and events. Bridgend Council estimated in 2009 that these events have brought 900,000 visitors to the town and generated around 53million for the local economy.(Bridgend County Borough Council Report to Town and Community Council Forum, 14th April 2009)Future developments2.5million of European Funding was used to create a riverside cafe culture by constructing a walkway along the Ogmore(River Ogmore Walkway & Bridge, Bridgend Bridgend County Borough Council) which was completed in March 2009.The Brackla Street Centre at Cheapside is due to get a multi-million pound redevelopment by Hawkstone Properties which will include new retail space, architectural improvements and apartments.Construction on a 1500-home sustainable village at Parc Derwen near Coity is due to begin imminently. The scheme is a collaboration between several house-builders and public bodies including the National Assembly, and has been planned with strict guidelines regarding architecture and the environment. There are concerns from Coity in particular that this development may impact on their villages identity.(Bypass drives village for the 21st century ahead WalesOnline 26 February 2008)Studies have been carried out by the local council with a view to improving retail provision in the town centre. Attracting bigger high-street chains to the town, such as & Spencer, Next & Debenhams is seen as key to this.(Can high street giants revive Bridgend? 28 February 2008)At Elder Yard, a derelict Grade II-listed building in the heart of the town centre is due to be converted to a restaurant and provide the impetus for other improvements there including a public courtyard and extra retail and leisure provision.(Unveiled  the master plan for town centre WalesOnline, 6 August 2009)Proposed developmentsTwo schemes linked to sport have emerged in 2009, both promising to significantly improve Bridgend.(Island Farm: the race is on WalesOnline 30 July 2009) These developments have been prompted by the Crusaders wishing to build a new stadium in the town.The first is a sports village at Farm by local company HD Limited. It will provide a 15000-seater stadium for Crusaders, and smaller stadia for Ravens and Bridgend Town. In addition to this, parkland, an extension to Bridgend Science Park, an indoor sports/training centre, a specialist tennis centre and facilities for other sports such as boxing. An outline application was lodged with County Borough Council in September 2009.(Island Farm sports village takes one step closer to reality WalesOnline, 17 September 2009)The second scheme is at a brownfield site to the north east of the town centre at Brackla. It is being developed by Wigan-based developers Greenbank Partnerships, who developed Sports Village and Olympian Homes. Their scheme includes a stadium, hotel, leisure facilities and retail outlets. They hope to regenerate areas of the town centre also.(Greenbank Partnerships and Olympian Homes in negotiation with Bridgend County Borough Council over regeneration plans WalesOnline 3 September 2009)The site has also been earmarked for the creation of a Business Park by the Assembly.(Brackla Business Park Regeneration)PoliticsThe local Member of Parliament is Moon (Labour), the Welsh Assembly Member for Bridgend is Jones AM (Labour) along with regional AMs (South West Wales) Davies AM (Conservative), Suzy Davies AM (Conservative), Jenkins AM (Plaid Cymru) and Peter Black AM (Liberal Democrat).County Borough Council is led by The Labour Party, who secured victory in the May 2008 Local Elections, ousting the Rainbow Alliance. The current leader of the council is Cllr Mel Nott and the current mayor of the county borough is Cllr Chris Michaelides.() The current Youth Mayor of Bridgend County Borough is Abigail Richards.()The council is currently made up of 26 Labour councillors, 14 Independents, 7 Liberal Democrats, 6 Conservatives and 1 Plaid Cymru.()EconomyBridgends to Work Area has expanded since 1991 and the 2001-based area now incorporates the western part of the of Glamorgan.()Bridgend recovered quickly from the decline of traditional industries, particularly coal-mining due to other alternative forms of employment. Wages are generally higher here than in other parts of the Wales valleys. There are large industrial estates at Bridgend and Waterton (formerly Waterton Admiralty) which host a number of small scale and multi-national companies, mainly manufacturing.Fords engine plant near Waterton employs around 2000 workers and is one of the areas largest employers, working on range of low carbon EcoBoost engines. The plant has won praise from Mandelson who in January 2009 described it as a top-of-the-class, world-beating engine production plant. Ford has invested 315million in the Bridgend plant over 5 years.(Ford Bridgend praised by Mandelson WalesOnline, 16 January 2009)There are more successes, IT Consultancy Group Logica opened an office in Bridgend (which has since been expanded). German retailer Lidl has also set up its Welsh headquarters and distribution site at Waterton. Zoobiotic, a company specialising in therapy, has its facility near Bridgend town centre. Also, since 1983, famous board producer Winmau has based its global headquarters in Bridgend.Other notable companies with a presence include bio-technology companies Biotrace, Biomet, Bio-Tec Services International & Diagnostics. Stationery company Staedtler, engineering consultancy Skanska, aeronautic maintenance and project management company TES Aviation and home accessories manufacturer Dekor plc also have significant offices and facilities in the town. The Semiconductor Photomask Company, Inc, has had a manufacturing operation for the last 20 years at the Ewenny Science Park.However, there have been significant economic blows to Bridgend including Sonys closure of the Bridgend plant and downsizing of the Pencoed plant. Other manufacturers to have pulled out of the area include Wrigley Company and Farmers of Britain which went into receivership in June 2009.Bridgend (like Wales in general) suffers from a lack of high-wage service jobs, however the retail sector in particular provides a large proportion of employment in the town and borough. In 2008, 13,100 people in Bridgend County were working in construction and manufacturing while 42,900 were working in the service sector StatsWales 2008 employment report.Sub-regional GVA for the Bridgend & Neath Port Talbot NUTS3 region stood at 12,402 per capita in 2006 ($23,191 at June 2006 values). This figure represents 65% of the UK GVA per capita, 87% of Welsh GVA per capita (14,226) and 103% of West Wales & The Valleys GVA per capita (12,071).Gross disposable income for Bridgend & Neath Port Talbot in 2006 stood at 3,338million or 12,379 per head. This is 88% of UK per head figure (14,053) and slightly above the Welsh per head figure (12,366).In 2008, the average full time gross weekly earnings in Swansea, Bridgend & Neath Port Talbot was 484.20 (531.70 for men, 426.10 for women). This is 97% of the Welsh average (498.10).In the first half of 2009, unemployment in County Borough stood at 8.9%(StatsWales Annual unemployment Rate 30 June 2009) and economic inactivity stood at 21.4%.(StatsWales Annual economic inactivity rates 20 March 2009)The percentage of workless households in December 2008 stood at 20.6% compared to the UK average of 16% and the Welsh average of 18.8%.(StatsWales; Workless households by household status 31 December 2008)Transportrailway station has regular services to Cardiff Central, Parkway and Paddington to the east; Neath, Talbot Parkway, Swansea and Wales to the west; and Maesteg to the north. There are also services to Piccadilly. Bridgend is the western terminus of the of Glamorgan Line which reopened to passenger traffic in 2005.railway station, approximately  north of railway station serves the estates of Wildmill, Pendre and Litchard and is on the Bridgend-Maesteg branch line. A park and ride station at Brackla, about  south-east of railway station is planned and is due to be constructed once capacity improvements have been made to the Wales Main Line. Services to a new railway station in Llanharan began in December 2007.()bus station has services to urban and rural areas in South Wales. Most services are operated by Cymru.A new east-west cycle route has been constructed from Brackla through to Broadlands and into Cefn Glas. Most roads are safe enough to cycle on although at peak times, most areas near roundabouts in particular are hazardous without due care. Bridgend is on the Cycle Route and there are off-road spurs from the Trail to the town centre and a community route in the Ogmore Valley. Glyncorrwg and the Valley about  north of Bridgend near Maesteg is famed for its bike trails, considered amongst the best in Europe.For scheduled and chartered air travel for the county, Bridgend is served by International Airport, to which there are direct rail and bus services.EducationBridgend town has 2 schools, Brynteg Comprehensive and Bryntirion Comprehensive. Brynteg generally serves the area east of the River Ogmore, while Bryntirion serves the areas west of the river. Brynteg is renowned for its rugby alumni, including Williams, Howley, Henson, Mike Hall and James with many talented athletes in other local schools joining Brynteg for the opportunities offered by playing for the school within the Welsh School Rugby Union Leagues. The school has produced several Welsh rugby union internationals but prominent athletes in other sports have also attended, including top female cyclist Cooke. Bryntirion has also produced its fair share of sporting talent, notably Llewellyn and triathlete Jenkins. Bryntirion also has a reputation in the area for the quality of its musical productions.There are also 2 other comprehensive schools in the Bridgend area, Archbishop McGrath Comprehensive and Coleg Cymunedol Y Dderwen. Archbishop McGrath School intends to move to a new base at Brackla in 2011, while Y Dderwen is the result of the amalglamation of Ogmore Comprehensive and Ynysawdre Comprehensive Schools, currently running on a split-site basis with plans to move to a new multi-million pound building in 2013 on the current Tondu site. There two comprehensive schools in the nearby town of Maesteg, these being Maesteg School and the Welsh-medium school Gyfun Gymraeg Llangynwyd.There are at least 9 primary, schools and schools in the town, though several of the junior and infant schools have merged to form single schools in recent years.There are also 2 special educational needs schools; Heronsbridge School which is linked with Brynteg Comprehensive school and at the back of Bridgend College. It is for students of a Primary school age and Comprehensive school age with severe learning disabilities. Another school, Ysgol Bryn Castell, offers education for Key stage 1-4 students with moderate to severe learning disabilities and is linked with Bryntirion Comprehensive school and has also recently opened up a satellite unit at Cynffig Comprehensive school located a few miles west of Bridgend.College is the towns education and education provider which primarily offers vocational courses and GCSEs. It attracts school-leavers from as far as Swansea and Cardiff. It offers a range of higher education courses such as PGCE, National Certificate and National Diploma in various subjects and masters programmes on its Queens Road campus on Bridgend Industrial Estate. These are mainly franchised from the of Glamorgan and of Wales, Newport. There is also the Pencoed Campus with a focus on Sport, Animal Care and Horticulture and Maesteg Campus that offers more community based programmes.Bridgend College has its own residence for students aged 16+ with learning difficulties and physical disabilities who come to the college from all over Wales.HealthSince the closure and redevelopment of Bridgend General Hospital in the 1990s, acute-care and accident and emergency services have been provided by the of Wales Hospital. GPs surgeries are scattered throughout the town, as are dentists. There is also a large hospital, Hospital, near Pen-y-Fai.CultureShopping and visitsIn the town centre the main retail shopping areas are the Rhiw Shopping Centre (containing Bridgend Market), Adare Street, Caroline Street, Derwen Road, Nolton Street, Queen Street, Dunraven Place, Market Street and Cheapside (home of the Brackla Street Centre and ASDA store). These areas are within close proximity to the bus and railway stations as are pay and display car parks.Most high street store names can be found in and around the town centre, which has suffered during 2009 due to the economic climate. Large gaps have been left in the town centre shopping area, as have many other UK towns. During the first two months of 2009, seven high street shops have closed their doors, most notably Woolworths.There are out-of-town shopping areas at Waterton, near the A473, on Cowbridge Road and at The Derwen, Junction 36 of the M4, home to the Designer Outlet.NightlifeThere are numerous houses and restaurants within the town centre. There is only one specific nightclub, Sax formerly Elements and before that Lava-Ignite, although a few of the pubs double up as nightclubs or specifically create a nightclub atmosphere, notably The Roof & The Phoenix (formerly called Barracuda and Tuskers).Bridgend town centre is generally safe although there are incidences of alcohol-fuelled drinking behaviour like any other British town of Bridgends size. CCTV is in operation throughout the town centre and there is usually a Wales Police presence of some form. Since July 2007, the streets of Bridgend are also patrolled on Friday and Saturday evenings by Pastors, an inter-denominational Church response to urban problems, engaging with people on the streets.()In December 2008, Bridgend Council introduced its first alcohol-free zone, restricting the consumption of alcohol to pubs, clubs and other licenced premises in the town centre to help address alcohol-related issues.(Alcohol-free zone set to begin, Bridgend County Borough Council, 26 November 2008)MusicBridgend is home to plenty of rock, rock, screamo, heavy metal & emo music acts that are playing the clubs of the area, making it a prominent part of the South Wales music scene. Metalcore band for My Valentine and bands like for a Friend, Lostprophets, Maclean, Automatic, People In Planes began their careers by playing venues in Bridgend such as the local Recreation Centre, The Football Club and The Tollhouse. There are several smaller venues in and around the town centre including The New Angel Inn (formerly PS Bar and The Angel Inn), The Railway Inn, Barracudas and Sapphires (formerly known as Careys), which all host a number of open-mic nights. Adams played to a 15,000 crowd at Field in the town centre on 2 June 2006. The Recreation Centre has also hosted worldwide acts such as Out Boy and Me the Horizon.The latest new venue is HOBOS which has already seen many acts passing through and had the likes of Funeral For A friend and Kids In Glass Houses members DJing there.EisteddfodauBridgend hosted the Eisteddfod in 1948. The 1998 Eisteddfod was hosted in the nearby town of Pencoed, an outskirting suburb of Bridgend.MediaBridgend has its own commercial radio station: Bridge FM, and is the location of Internet based radio station radio. The main local newspaper is The Glamorgan Gazette, although a free newspaper, The Recorder, has increased its circulation in recent times. Around Town Magazine is the free local lifestyle magazine for Bridgend.TwinningBridgend has twinning arrangements with:*  Langenau, Germany*  Villenave-dOrnon, FranceAt the last attempt, no delegates from Langenau were found to undertake a cultural swap with Bridgend.Attempts to twin Bridgend with the city of Tripoli, Libya have sparked debate.()Parks and Green SpacesCountry Park is the largest (113 acres) Country Park in the Borough. It offers many amenity based areas including an adventure play area, barbecue and picnic areas, car park, cafe, visitor centre and toilets; as well as a patchwork of woodland, grassland and freshwater habitats. Bryngarw Country Park is a Grade II listed Historic Park and Garden and has been designated a Green Flag Park since 2010. The Oriental Garden in the park has been noted as a Visit Wales Sustainable Tourism, Historic Gardens Centre of Excellence by the One Historic Garden, Centre of Excellence ()SportRugby unionIn the regionalisation of Rugby Union in 2003, Bridgend RFC and Pontypridd RFC merged to form the Celtic Warriors. The area represented was massive and there are obvious communication and transport problems in sharing the respective grounds. The decision was made to move the club permanently to the Brewery Field because current Crusaders owner Leighton Samuel, who then owned the Warriors, was the primary leaseholder. Attendances at Warriors matches had been poor but were showing signs of recovery in 2004. But despite a strong finish to the Celtic League season, the region was disbanded to the shock of everyone involved. Professional rugby union in Bridgend and the valleys ended in an instant. The people of the areas involved now have to identify with teams outside the locality, support their semi professional Welsh Premiership team the Bridgend Ravens or some have even switched to rugby league.Ravens are a new rugby union club in the town. Formed from the original Bridgend RFC in 2004 following Bridgend RFCs owner Leighton Samuel making the decision to withdraw from rugby union. The original company was finally wound up by its owner due to mounting debts in 2006. The Bridgend Ravens side are semi-professional and play in the Welsh Division One West. In a recent development the Brewery Field was sold to Bridgend Town F.C. who then immediately offered 50% to the Ravens. So after a number of years of having to rent their historical home from the rugby league side Celtic Crusaders, Bridgend Ravens now partly own their own home again. Bridgend is also home to other rugby union sides including Athletic RFC, Sports RFC and Wales Police RFC.FootballBridgend has two main (soccer) teams, Town F.C., and a Bridgend suburb side Athletic F.C., both sides play in the Football League First Division. Bridgend Town AFC will from 2009 will play at The Brewery Field (The Football Club purchased The Brewery Field in 2009) as the club sold its ground at Coychurch Road ground due to works in conjunction with the new ASDA store. The Football side reached the semi-final of the Welsh Cup during 2008-2009 losing to the eventual winners City 2-1 in a tight game.Bridgends geographical position means South Wales rivals City and City pick up support from the town, though it is widely believed Bridgend is a Cardiff City town overall.Rugby leagueBridgend recently flirted with League rugby league in the guise of the Crusaders recently based at the famous Field along side the union side Bridgend RFC. This side was considered by a few to be a replacement for the Warriors rugby union side after their controversial disbanding in 2004 but also built up a loyal following in their own right. The Crusaders application for a Super League licence was granted by the Football League on 22 July 2008. The decision elevated the club from League One to compete in League XIV from 2009.For the 2010 Super League season, Crusaders initially announced they would play at Newports Parade ground for two seasons. However in the run up to the new season the Celtic Crusaders franchise was sold by owner Leighton Samuel to Football Club parent company, Wrexham Village Ltd and the side moved to Wrexham, playing home fixtures at Racecourse Ground. It is yet unclear whether Crusaders still intend to return to Bridgend in the future.() Bridgends second rugby league side is the Blue Bulls, one the UKs most successful amateur clubs having won two UK national amateur titles in four years and Welsh Champions five years in succession. The Bulls played at Coychurch Road but following the announcement about the setting up of the Celtic Crusaders they were invited to play at the Brewery Field by the owner Leighton Samuel. One year on they were refused permission to continue playing at the Brewery Field in the middle of the season. They were then aided by Porthcawl RFC and staged the remaining 2006 home games at the Porthcawl ground. Subsequently Porthcawl RFC have become their regular home and have even staged an amateur rugby league international there during 2008 (Wales v Ireland).Other sportsBridgend also has local cricket clubs including Great Western CC and Bridgend Town CC, a mens and ladies hockey club, golf courses and tennis & bowls facilities at the local club, the Bridgend Lawn Tennis and Bowls Association.In 2003, Great Western Cricket Club won the Lords Sunday Cup. In 2009, Bridgend Town Cricket Club completed an unbeaten season and received ECB accreditation.()Districts of Bridgend*Brackla*Broadlands*Bryntirion*Glas*Coychurch*Laleston*Litchard*Court*Morfa/Bridgend Town Centre*Newcastle*Oldcastle*Pen-y-Fai*Pendre*Waterton*WildmillNotable people:See People from Bridgend and People from Bridgend county borough* Jonathan Brown (Footballer)* Julie Brown (Actress)* for My Valentine (Band)* Brace (Olympic Athlete - Marathon)* Burston (Author/Journalist)* Cooke (Cyclist)* Cottrell (Historian/Writer)* Crowell (Footballer)* Day (Snooker Player)* Day (Footballer)* Davies (Actor)* Rhys Davies (European Tour Golfer)* Donovan (Actor)* Huw Edwards (BBC newsreader)* David Emanuel (fashion designer)* for a Friend (Band)* Gibbs (Rugby player)* Maclean (Band)* Michael Hall (Rugby player)* Howley (Rugby player)* Marks (Author)* Henson (Rugby player)* Jenkins (Olympic Triathlete)* Jones (Incumbent First Minister of Wales)* Jones (Actress)* Lewis (Musician)* Llewellyn (Rugby player)* Sean McCarthy (Footballer)* The Partisans (Band)* Rees (Footballer)* Gareth Thomas (Rugby player)* Tucker (2008 World Triathlon Champion)* Wadlan (cricketer)* David Williams (crime writer)* Williams (Rugby player)* of One (Band)See also* suicide incidents* (UK Parliament constituency) Bridgend CountyReferencesExternal links* Bridgend County Borough Council* Bridgend College* Bridgend RFC* Bridgend Town Cricket Club* Bridgend Royal Ordnance Factory* BBC - Bridgend Life* Brackla and Bridgend Ordnance Factories* Old Photographs of Bridgend()ca:Bridgendar Ogwrde:Bridgendet:Bridgendes:Bridgendeu:Bridgendfr:Bridgendit:Bridgendlt:Bridendas(stad)no:Bridgendpl:Bridgendro:Bridgend()sk:Bridgendsv:Bridgend
354588
Hydrothermal_vent
A hydrothermal vent is a fissure in a planets surface from which geothermally heated water issues. Hydrothermal vents are commonly found near volcanically active places, areas where plates are moving apart, ocean basins, and hotspots. Hydrothermal vents exist because the earth is both geologically active and has large amounts of water on its surface and within its crust. Common land types include springs, fumaroles and geysers. Under the sea, hydrothermal vents may form features called smokers. Relative to the majority of the deep sea, the areas around submarine hydrothermal vents are biologically more productive, often hosting complex communities fueled by the chemicals dissolved in the vent fluids. Chemosynthetic archaea form the base of the food chain, supporting diverse organisms, including tube worms, clams, limpets and shrimp. Active hydrothermal vents are believed to exist on Jupiters moon Europa, and ancient hydrothermal vents have been speculated to exist on Mars.(Paine, Michael (15 May 2001) Mars Explorers to Benefit from Australian Research space.com)Physical propertiesImage:Phase-diag2.svg|thumb|left|In this diagram, the green dotted line illustrates the anomalous behavior of water. The solid green line marks the point and the blue line the point, showing how they vary with pressure.Hydrothermal vents in the deep ocean typically form along the ridges, such as the Pacific Rise and the Ridge. These are locations where two plates are diverging and new crust is being formed.The water that issues from seafloor hydrothermal vents consists mostly of water drawn into the hydrothermal system close to the volcanic edifice through faults and porous sediments or volcanic strata, plus some magmatic water released by the upwelling magma. In terrestrial hydrothermal systems the majority of water circulated within the fumarole and geyser systems is water plus water that has percolated down into the thermal system from the surface, but it also commonly contains some portion of water, water, and sedimentary formational brine that is released by the magma. The proportion of each varies from location to location.In contrast to the approximately 2 C ambient water temperature at these depths, water emerges from these vents at temperatures ranging from 60 C up to as high as 464 C.()() Due to the high pressure at these depths, water may exist in either its liquid form or as a fluid at such temperatures. At a pressure of 218 atmospheres, the critical point of (pure) water is 375 C. At a depth of 3,000 meters, the hydrostatic pressure of sea water is more than 300 atmospheres (as salt water is denser than fresh water). At this depth and pressure, seawater becomes supercritical at a temperature of 407 C (see image). However the increase in salinity at this depth pushes the water closer to its critical point. Thus, water emerging from the hottest parts of some hydrothermal vents can be a supercritical fluid, possessing physical properties between those of a gas and those of a liquid.(( Besides being superheated, the water is also extremely acidic, often having a pH value as low as 2.8  approximately that of vinegar.Sister Peak (Comfortless Cove Hydrothermal Field, , elevation -2996 m), Shrimp Farm and Mephisto (Red Lion Hydrothermal Field, , elevation -3047 m), are three hydrothermal vents of the black smoker category, located on the Ridge near Island. They are presumed to have been active since an earthquake shook the region in 2002.(( These vents have been observed to vent phase-separated, vapor-type fluids. In 2008, sustained exit temperatures of up to 407 C were recorded at one of these vents, with a peak recorded temperature of up to 464 C. These thermodynamic conditions exceed the critical point of seawater, and are the highest temperatures recorded to date from the seafloor. This is the first reported evidence for direct magmatic-hydrothermal interaction on a slow-spreading mid-ocean ridge.((The initial stages of a vent chimney begin with the deposition of the mineral anhydrite. Sulfides of copper, iron and zinc then precipitate in the chimney gaps, making it less porous over the course of time. Vent growths on the order of 30 cm per day have been recorded.() An April 2007 exploration of the deep-sea vents off the coast of Fiji found those vents to be a significant source of dissolved iron.(& Engineering News Vol. 86 No. 35, 1 Sept. 2008, Tracking Ocean Iron, p. 62)Black smokers and white smokersSome hydrothermal vents form roughly cylindrical chimney structures. These form from minerals that are dissolved in the vent fluid. When the super-heated water contacts the near-freezing sea water, the minerals precipitate out to form particles which add to the height of the stacks. Some of these chimney structures can reach heights of 60 m.() An example of such a towering vent was Godzilla, a structure in the Pacific Ocean near Oregon that rose to 40 m before it fell over.A black smoker or sea vent is a type of hydrothermal vent found on the seabed, typically in the abyssal and hadal zones. They appear as black chimney-like structures that emit a cloud of black material. The black smokers typically emit particles with high levels of sulfur-bearing minerals, or sulfides. Black smokers are formed in fields hundreds of meters wide when superheated water from below Earths crust comes through the ocean floor. This water is rich in dissolved minerals from the crust, most notably sulfides. When it comes in contact with cold ocean water, many minerals precipitate, forming a black chimney-like structure around each vent. The metal sulfides that are deposited can become massive sulfide ore deposits in time. Black smokers were first discovered in 1977 on the Pacific Rise by scientists from Institution of Oceanography. They were observed using a deep submergence vehicle called Alvin belonging to the Hole Oceanographic Institution. Now black smokers are known to exist in the Atlantic and Pacific Oceans, at an average depth of 2100 metres. The most northerly black smokers are a cluster of five named Lokis Castle,() discovered in 2008 by scientists from the of Bergen at 73 degrees north, on the Ridge between Greenland and Norway. These black smokers are of interest as they are in a more stable area of the Earths crust, where tectonic forces are less and consequently fields of hydrothermal vents are less common.() The worlds deepest black smokers are located in the Trough, 5,000 m (3.1 miles) below the oceans surface.()White smokers are vents that emit lighter-hued minerals, such as those containing barium, calcium, and silicon. These vents also tend to have lower temperature plumes.  These alkaline hydrothermal vents also continuously generate acetyl thioesters, providing both the starting point for more complex organic molecules and the energy needed to produce them,  Microscopic structures in such alkaline vents show interconnected compartments that provide an ideal hatchery for the origin of life.(Lane, Nick (2010) Life Ascending: the 10 great inventions of evolution (Profile Books))Biological communitiesLife has traditionally been seen as driven by energy from the sun, but deep sea organisms have no access to sunlight, so they must depend on nutrients found in the dusty chemical deposits and hydrothermal fluids in which they live. Previously, benthic oceanographers assumed that vent organisms were dependent on snow, as deep sea organisms are. This would leave them dependent on plant life and thus the sun. Some hydrothermal vent organisms do consume this rain, but with only such a system, life forms would be very sparse. Compared to the surrounding sea floor, however, hydrothermal vent zones have a density of organisms 10,000 to 100,000 times greater.Hydrothermal vent communities are able to sustain such vast amounts of life because vent organisms depend on chemosynthetic bacteria for food. The water that comes out of the hydrothermal vent is rich in dissolved minerals and supports a large population of chemo-autotrophic bacteria. These bacteria use sulfur compounds, particularly sulfide, a chemical highly toxic to most known organisms, to produce organic material through the process of chemosynthesis.The ecosystem so formed is reliant upon the continued existence of the hydrothermal vent field as the primary source of energy, which differs from most surface life on Earth which is based on energy. However, although it is often said that these communities exist independently of the sun, some of the organisms are actually dependent upon oxygen produced by photosynthetic organisms. Others are anaerobic as was the earliest life.The chemosynthetic bacteria grow into a thick mat which attracts other organisms such as amphipods and copepods which graze upon the bacteria directly. Larger organisms such as snails, shrimp, crabs, tube worms, fish, and octopuses form a chain of predator and prey relationships above the primary consumers. The main families of organisms found around seafloor vents are annelids, pogonophorans, gastropods, and crustaceans, with large bivalves, vestimentiferan worms, and eyeless shrimp making up the bulk of non-microbial organisms.Tube worms form an important part of the community around a hydrothermal vent. The tube worms, like parasitic worms, absorb nutrients directly into their tissues. This is because tube worms have no mouth or even a digestive tract, so the bacteria live inside them. There are approximately 285 billion bacteria per ounce of tubeworm tissue. Tubeworms have red plumes which contain hemoglobin. Hemoglobin combines hydrogen sulfide and transfers it to the bacteria living inside the worm. In return the bacteria nourish the worm with carbon compounds. The two species that inhabit a hydrothermal vent are Tevnia jerichonana, and Riftia pachyptila. One community has been discovered dubbed City, which consists predominantly of eels. Though eels are not uncommon, as mentioned earlier invertebrates typically dominate hydrothermal vents. Eel City is located near Nafanua volcanic cone, Samoa.(Astrobiology Magazine: Extremes of Eel City Retrieved 30 August 2007)Other examples of the unique fauna who inhabit this ecosystem are gastropod Crysomallon squamiferum, a species of snail with a foot reinforced by scales made of iron and organic materials, and the Worm Alvinella pompejana, which is capable of withstanding temperatures up to 80C (176F).In 1993 there were already  more than 100 gastropod species known to occur in hydrothermal vents.(Sysoev A. V. & Kantor Yu. I. (1995). Two new species of Phymorhynchus (Gastropoda, Conoidea, Conidae) from the hydrothermal vents. Ruthenica 5: 17-26. abstract.) Over 300 new species have been discovered at hydrothermal vents,() many of them sister species to others found in geographically separated vent areas. It has been proposed that before the American plate overrode the ridge, there was a single biogeographic vent region found in the eastern Pacific.() The subsequent barrier to travel began the evolutionary divergence of species in different locations. The examples of convergent evolution seen between distinct hydrothermal vents is seen as major support for the theory of natural selection and of evolution as a whole.Image:Deep sea vent chemistry diagram.jpg|thumb|Deep sea vent biogeochemical cycle diagramAlthough life is very sparse at these depths, black smokers are the center of entire ecosystems. Sunlight is nonexistent, so many organisms  such as archaea and extremophiles  convert the heat, methane, and sulfur compounds provided by black smokers into energy through a process called chemosynthesis. More complex life forms like clams and tubeworms feed on these organisms. The organisms at the base of the chain also deposit minerals into the base of the black smoker, therefore completing the life cycle.A species of phototrophic bacterium has been found living near a black smoker off the coast of Mexico at a depth of . No sunlight penetrates that far into the waters. Instead, the bacteria, part of the Chlorobiaceae family, use the faint glow from the black smoker for photosynthesis. This is the first organism discovered in nature to exclusively use a light other than sunlight for photosynthesis.()New and unusual species are constantly being discovered in the neighborhood of black smokers. The worm was found in the 1980s, and a gastropod in 2001 during an expedition to the Oceans Kairei hydrothermal vent field. The latter uses iron sulfides (pyrite and greigite) for the structure of its dermal sclerites (hardened body parts), instead of carbonate. The extreme pressure of 2500 m of water (approximately 25 megapascals or 250 atmospheres) is thought to play a role in stabilizing iron sulfide for biological purposes. This armor plating probably serves as a defense against the venomous radula (teeth) of predatory snails in that community.Biological theoriesAlthough the discovery of hydrothermal vents is a relatively recent event in the history of science, the importance of this discovery has given rise to, and supported, new biological and bio-atmospheric theories.The deep hot biosphereAt the beginning of his 1992 paper The Deep Hot Biosphere, Gold referred to ocean vents in support of his theory that the lower levels of the earth are rich in living biological material that finds its way to the surface.(T. Gold: Proceedings of National Academy of Science http://www.pnas.org/cgi/reprint/89/13/6045) He further expanded his ideas in the book Deep Hot Biosphere.(Thomas Gold, 1999, Deep Hot Biosphere, Springer, ISBN 0387952535) An article on abiogenic hydrocarbon production in the February 2008 issue of Magazine used data from experiments at City (hydrothermal field) to report how the abiotic synthesis of low molecular mass hydrocarbons from mantle derived carbon dioxide may occur in the presence of ultramafic rocks, water, and moderate amounts of heat.(Science Magazine, Abiogenic Hydrocarbon Production at Lost City Hydrothermal Field February 2008 http://www.sciencemag.org/cgi/content/short/319/5863/604)Hydrothermal origin of lifeWchtershuser proposed the world theory and suggested that life might have originated at hydrothermal vents. Wchtershuser proposed that an early form of metabolism predated genetics. By metabolism he meant a cycle of chemical reactions that release energy in a form that can be harnessed by other processes.(G. Wchtershuser: Proceedings of National Academy of Science http://www.pnas.org/cgi/reprint/87/1/200.pdf)It has been proposed that amino-acid synthesis could have occurred deep in the Earths crust and that these amino-acids were subsequently shot up along with hydrothermal fluids into cooler waters, where lower temperatures and the presence of clay minerals would have fostered the formation of peptides and protocells.() This is an attractive hypothesis because of the abundance of CH4 (methane) and NH3 (ammonia) present in hydrothermal vent regions, a condition that was not provided by the Earths primitive atmosphere. A major limitation to this hypothesis is the lack of stability of organic molecules at high temperatures, but some have suggested that life would have originated outside of the zones of highest temperature. There are numerous species of extremophiles and other organisms currently living immediately around deep-sea vents, suggesting that this is indeed a possible scenario.ExplorationIn 1949, a deep water survey reported anomalously hot brines in the central portion of the Sea. Later work in the 1960s confirmed the presence of hot, 60 C (140 F), saline brines and associated metalliferous muds. The hot solutions were emanating from an active subseafloor rift. The highly saline character of the waters was not hospitable to living organisms.(Degens, Egon T. (ed.), 1969, Hot Brines and Recent Heavy Metal Deposits in the Red Sea, 600 pp, Springer-Verlag) The brines and associated muds are currently under investigation as a source of mineable precious and base metals.The chemosynthetic ecosystem surrounding submarine hydrothermal vents were discovered along the Galapagos Rift, a spur of the Pacific Rise, in 1977 by a group of marine geologists led by Corliss of Oregon State University. In 1979, biologists returned to the rift and used ALVIN, an ONR research submersible from Hole Oceanographic Institute, to see the hydrothermal vent communities with their own eyes. In that same year, Lonsdale published the first scientific paper on hydrothermal vent life.()In 2005, Neptune Resources NL, a mineral exploration company, applied for and was granted 35,000 km of exploration rights over the Kermadec Arc in Zealands Economic Zone to explore for massive sulfide deposits, a potential new source of lead-zinc-copper sulfides formed from modern hydrothermal vent fields. The discovery of a vent in the Pacific Ocean offshore of Rica, named the Medusa hydrothermal vent field (after the serpent-haired Medusa of mythology), was announced in April 2007.() The Ashadze hydrothermal field (13N on the Mid-Atlantic Ridge, elevation -4200 m) was the deepest known high-temperature hydrothermal field until 2010, when the Piccard site (, elevation -5000 m) was discovered by a group of scientists from NASA Propulsion Laboratory and Hole Oceanographic Institute. This site is located on the 110 km long, ultraslow spreading Mid-Cayman Rise within the Trough.()ExploitationHydrothermal vents, in some instances, have led to the formation of exploitable mineral resources via deposition of massive sulfide deposits. The Isa orebody located in Australia, is an excellent example.()Recently, mineral exploration companies, driven by the elevated price activity in the base metals sector during the mid 2000s, have turned their attention to extraction of mineral resources from hydrothermal fields on the seafloor. Significant cost reductions are, in theory, possible.(http://www.theallineed.com/ecology/06030301.htm) Consider that in the case of the Mount Isa orebody, large amounts of capital are required to sink shafts and associated underground infrastructure, then laboriously drill and blast the ore, crush and process it, to win out the base metals, an activity which requires a large workforce.The hydrothermal recovery system is a patented proposal to exploit hydrothermal vents for their energy and minerals. A hydrothermal field, consisting of chimneys and compacted chimney remains, can be reached from the surface via a dynamically positioned ship or platform, using conventional pipe, mined using modified soft rock mining technology (continuous miners), brought to the surface via the pipe, concentrated and dewatered then shipped directly to a smelter. While the concept sounds far-fetched, it uses already proven technology derived from the offshore oil and gas industries, and the soft-rock mining industries.Two companies are currently engaged in the late stages of commencing to mine seafloor massive sulfides. Nautilus Minerals is in the advanced stages of commencing extraction from its Solwarra deposit, in the Archipelago, and Neptune Minerals is at an earlier stage with its Rumble II West deposit, located on the Arc, near the Islands. Both companies are proposing using modified existing technology. Nautilus Minerals, in partnership with Dome (now part of Gold), succeeded in 2006 in returning over 10 metric tons of mined SMS to the surface using modified drum cutters mounted on an ROV, a world first.(Nautilus 2006 Press Release 03 http://www.nautilusminerals.com/s/Media-NewsReleases.asp?ReportID138787&_TypeNews-Releases&_TitleNautilus-Outlines-High-Grade-Au-Cu-Seabed-Sulphide-Zone.) Neptune Minerals in 2007 succeeded in recovering SMS sediment samples using a modified oil industry suction pump mounted on an ROV, also a world first.(Kermadec Deposit http://www.neptuneminerals.com/Neptune-Minerals-Kermadec.html)Potential seafloor mining has environmental impacts including dust plumes from mining machinery affecting filter feeding organisms, collapsing or reopening vents, clathrate release, or even sub-oceanic land slides.(Potential Deep Sea Mining in Papua New Guinea: a case study http://www.bren.ucsb.edu/research/documents/VentsThesis.pdf) A large amount of work is currently being engaged in by both the above mentioned companies to ensure that potential environmental impacts of seafloor mining are well understood and control measures are implemented, before exploitation commences.(RSC Article http://www.rsc.org/chemistryworld/issues/2007/january/treasuresdeep.asp)Attempts have been made in the past to exploit minerals from the seafloor. The 1960s and 70s saw a great deal of activity (and expenditure) in the recovery of nodules from the plains, with varying degrees of success. This does demonstrate however that recovery of minerals from the seafloor is possible, and has been possible for some time. Interestingly, mining of manganese nodules served as a cover story for the elaborate attempt by the CIA to raise the sunken submarine K-129, using the Explorer, a ship purpose built for the task by Hughes. The operation was known as Azorian, and the cover story of seafloor mining of manganese nodules may have served as the impetus to propel other companies to make the attempt.ConservationThe conservation of Hydrothermal Vents has been the subject of sometimes heated discussion in the Oceanographic Community for the last 20 years.() It has been pointed out that it may be that those causing the most damage to these fairly rare habitats are scientists.()() There have been attempts to forge agreements over the behaviour of scientists investigating vent sites but although there is an agreed code of practice there is as yet no formal international and legally binding agreement.()GalleryFile:Daikoku cauldron.jpg|The pond of molten sulfur at Daikoku submarine volcano, Trench Marine National Monument, is about 15 feet long and 10 feet wide. The temperature of the molten sulfur was measured at 187C (369F).File:Lost City (hydrothermal field)02.jpg|A ledge on the side of a chimney in the Lost City vent field is topped with dendritic carbonate growths that form when mineral-rich vent fluids seep through the flange and come into contact with the cold seawater. Lost City vent field is located on Massif, a prominent undersea massif, rising about 14,000 feet (4250 m) from the sea floor in the North Ocean.File:Explorer Ridge Zooarium chimney.jpg|Zooarium chimney at Magic Mountain hydrothermal field, located on the Southern Explorer Ridge in the North Ocean, about 150 miles west of Island, Columbia, Canada. The diffuse flow of Zooarium chimney provides an ideal habitat for vent biota.File:Active Magic Mountain chimney.jpg|A black smoker venting fluid at 312 degrees C at Magic Mountain hydrothermal field.Image:Explorer Ridge sulfide chimney.jpg|Sulfide chimney of the Magic Mountain hydrothermal field, British Columbia, Canada.File:Nikko smoke chimnettes.jpg|White smokers on the floor of caldera.File:Slideshow1 part1 hires.jpg|A zoomed-out view looking down on an advancing andesite lava flow (obscured by the plumes) at Northwest Rota volcano. The yellow parts of the plume contain molten droplets of sulfur; the white parts possibly other mineral particles (like alunite, an aluminum-bearing sulfate).File:Bubbles hires.jpg|A degassing event at Brimstone Pit at Northwest Rota volcano started releasing an escalating number of bubbles (probably CO2) as the plume cloud increased in volume. Notice the pieces of sulfur at the base of the cloud.File:Craterplume2 hirez.jpg|Giant smoky plume discovered pouring out of Brimstone Pit near the summit of Northwest Rota volcano.Image:Blacksmoker_in_Atlantic_Ocean.jpg|An unplugged black smoker at a ridge hydrothermal vent in the Ocean.File:Brothers blacksmoker hires.jpg|A black smoker known as The Brothers.File:Nur04512.jpg|Siboglinidae worms feeding at the base of a black smoker chimney.See also*pool*seep*Fumarole*Geyser*springs*Alvin submersible*City (hydrothermal field)*Castle (hydrothermal field)*Mountain (hydrothermal field)*Hydrothermal Vents*of life*BallardReferencesFurther reading* * * * Glyn Ford and Jonathan Simnett, Silver from the Sea, September/October 1982, Volume 33, Number 5, Saudi Aramco World Accessed 17 October 2005* Ballard, Robert D., 2000, The Eternal Darkness, University Press.* http://www.botos.com/marine/vents01.html#body_4* Anaerobic respiration on tellurate and other metalloids in bacteria from hydrothermal vent fields in the eastern pacific ocean* * * External links*Ocean Explorer (www.oceanexplorer.noaa.gov) - Public outreach site for explorations sponsored by the Office of Ocean Exploration.*NOAA, Ocean Explorer Gallery, Submarine Ring of Fire 2006 Gallery, Submarine Ring of Fire 2004 Gallery - A rich collection of images, video, audio and podcast.*NOAA, Ocean Explorer YouTube Channel*Submarine Ring of Fire, Mariana Arc - Explore the volcanoes of the Mariana Arc, Submarine Ring of Fire.*Hydrothermal Vent Systems Information from the Deep Ocean Exploration Institute, Hole Oceanographic Institution* Hydrothermal Vents Video From the Smithsonian Ocean Portal*A new type of hydrothermal vent*Vent geochemistry*Everything you wanted to know about hydrothermal vents and the deep sea  Provided by Scientist.*a good overview of hydrothermal vent biology, published in 2006*Images of Hydrothermal Vents in Indian Ocean- Released by National Science Foundation*Neptune Minerals Ltd webpage - Exploring SMS deposits*Nautilus Minerals Ltd webpage*Ocean Explorer (www.oceanexplorer.noaa.gov) - Public outreach site for explorations sponsored by the Office of Ocean Exploration.*NOAA, Ocean Explorer Gallery, Submarine Ring of Fire 2006 Gallery, Submarine Ring of Fire 2004 Gallery - A rich collection of images, video, audio and podcast.*NOAA, Ocean Explorer YouTube Channel*Submarine Ring of Fire, Mariana Arc - Explore the volcanoes of the Mariana Arc, Submarine Ring of Fire.*Hydrothermal Vent Systems Information from the Deep Ocean Exploration Institute, Hole Oceanographic Institution*How to Build a Hydrothermal Vent Chimney*Giant black smoker retrieved from abyss - a vent chimney retrieved by an Australian CSIRO Research Vessel north of New Guinea in AprilMay 2000.*Ancient Black Smoker - Parys Mountain, Angleseyhidrotermalvldhidrotermalhydrothermalbronja:hydrotermalnehidrotermalventsavuttajath:
356699
Vale
In geography, a vale is a wide valley, usually with a particularly wide plain or flat valley bottom.  Vales commonly occur between the escarpment slopes of pairs of downs, where the chalk dome has been eroded, exposing less resistant underlying rock, usually clay. Places * Vale of Kashmir, a disputed territory, claimed by both Pakistan and IndiaGeorgia* Georgia, a town in the Samtskhe-Javakheti regionNorway* Vle, a historic municipalityPakistan* Vale of PeshawarPortugal* A civil parish in the municipality of Alfndega de FRomania* Vale, a village in Aluni Commune, Cluj County* Vale, a village in Toplia city, Harghita County* Vale (), a village in Slite town, Sibiu CountyUnited Kingdom* Guernsey, parish in Guernsey* Vale, Buckinghamshire, England* Vale, Blaenau Gwent, Wales* of Glamorgan, Glamorgan, Wales* of White Horse, Oxfordshire, England* Royal, Cheshire, North West England (former)* Vale, Dorset, England* Vale, Birmingham, England* Vale, London, England* Vale, Staffordshire, England* of Belvoir, Leicestershire, England* of Evesham, Worcestershire, England* of Leven, West Dunbartonshire, Scotland* of Pewsey, Wiltshire, England* of York, Yorkshire, England* of Pickering, Yorkshire, England* Vale, Birmingham, EnglandUnited States of America* Massachusetts* Vale, Virginia* Vale, Kansas* Kansas* New Hampshire* Vale, Kentucky* Vale, Maryland* Utah* Vale, Kentucky* Pennsylvania* New Jersey* New Jersey* California* Pleasant Vale Township, Illinois* Vale, New Jersey* Indiana* California* Pennsylvania* Vale, New York* Vale, North Carolina (Avery County)* Vale, North Carolina (Lincoln County)* Oregon* South Dakota* West Virginia* Summit, Maryland* Township, Butte County, South Dakota* Tunnel, MissouriPeople* Vale, Mexican actress, singer and comedienne* Vale, Portuguese footballer* Sue Vale, Australian politician* Vale, American comedian* Vale, American singer* Vale, American Civil War Medal of Honor recipient * Vale Pepelo, a character in a New Zealand television animated series broTownOther uses* Rose Vale, a tone of the color Rose* gas field, North Sea gas field* Special, British sports car* Vale Railway, Welsh railway* Vale, warships of the Royal Norwegian Navy* languages, or Ruto-Vale, an African language* Vale, wine region in South Australia* (mining company), Brazilian mining company* Vale, comic book character* Vale F.C., an English football team* Vale, a Latin word meaning farewell or goodbye to a recently deceased person* of Siddim (biblical)* Limited, a mining company in Ontario, Canada.* Vale, The Home Town for the protagonists in the Nintendo Game Series SunSee also* Valley* Landform* Coloradode:Valeeo:Valefr:Valesnl:Valepl:Valept:Vales(dezambiguizare)
357609
Communist_Party_of_Canada
 website            The Communist Party of Canada (CPC) is a communist party in Canada. Although is it currently a minor or small political party without representation in the Federal Parliament or in provincial legislatures, historically the Party has elected representatives in Federal Parliament, Ontario Legislature and Manitoba Legislature as well as in various municipal governments. The party has also contributed significantly to union organizing and history in Canada, peace and anti-war activism, as well as many other movements.The Communist Party of Canada is the second oldest registered party after the Party of Canada, and the only registered political party to historically have been once declared illegal.Platform and ProgrammeAs outlined in its campaign for the Canadian federal election, the party advocates for fundamental change to end corporate control, and open the door to socialism and working class power including the following goals and policies:(Canadian Communist Party 2011 Federal Election Platform)* rights such as employment, higher wage, shorter work week and ending outsourcing.* The creation of a Bill of Rights for Labour enacting socialist rights.* Higher taxes for those with higher incomes; lowering taxes for those of lower incomes.* Electoral reform, dissolving the Senate, enacting MMP, set age to 16.* Expand public ownership and reverse privatization such as ending P3 programs.* Nationalize energy and natural resources and shift emphasis from fossil and nuclear sources to energy.* Peace and disarmament, ending involvement in Afghanistan and Libya and withdrawing from NATO and NORAD.* Preserve and expand health care in Canada as well as other social programs and reduction.* Environmental reforms and change measures.* Anti-globalization such as pulling out of the American Free Trade Agreement.* Expanding public housing and banning evictions and foreclosures due to unemployment.* Repeal state security legislation like the list; more public monitoring of the Canadian Mounted Police and Security Intelligence Service.* Strengthen Aboriginal and Canadian rights and recognition.* Fight inequality and expand the rights of women and homosexuals and transsexuals.* Expand education and other rights.* equality, including immigration reform.* Support family and farming.The Communist Party also presents a more detailed programmatic document, Canadas Future is Socialism, (2001) which outlines the Parties perspective on Canada today and the road to a socialist and ultimately communist society.HistoryOriginsThe Communist Party was organized in conditions of illegality in a rural barn near the town of Guelph, Ontario, on May 28 and 29, 1921. Many of its founding members were labour organizers and anti-war activists and had belonged to groups such as the Party of Canada, One Big Union, the Labor Party, the Workers of the World, and other socialist, Marxist or Labour parties or clubs and organizations. Its first members were also inspired by the Revolution, and radicalised by the negative aftermath of War II as well as the fight to improve living standards and labour rights, including the experience of the General Strike.  The party affiliation as the Canadian section of the Comintern was acceptedin December of 1921, and was thus it adopted a similar to Communist parties around the world.The party alternated between legality and illegality during the 1920s and 1930s.  As the Measures Act was in effect at its time of creation, the Party worked as the Workers Party of Canada in February, 1922 as its public face, and in March began publication of a newspaper, The Worker. When the War Measures Act was finally allowed to lapse by Canadian Parliament in 1924, and the underground organization was dissolved and the partys name changed to the Communist Party of Canada.The Partys first campaigns included establishing a youth organization, the Communist League of Canada as well as solidarity efforts with the Union. By 1923 the Party had raised over $64,000 for the Russian Red Cross, a very large sum of money in that time. It also initiated a Canadian component of the Union Education League (TUEL) which quickly became an organic part of the labour movement with active groups in 16 of 60 labout councils as well as mining and logging camps. By 1925  Party membership stood at around 4,500 people -- composed mainly of miners and lumber workers, but also railroad, farm, and garment workers.() Most of these people came from immigrant communities like Finns and Ukrainians. The Party, working with the TUEL played a vital role in many bitter strikes and difficult organizing drives, and in support of militant unionism. In 192229, the provincial wings of the WPC/CPC also affiliated with the Labour Party, another expression of the CPCs united front strategy. The CLP was a federated labour party. The CPC came to lead the CLP organization in several regions of the country including Quebec and did not run candidates during elections. In 1925 William Kolisnyk was the first communist elected to public office in North America, under the banner of the CLP.  The CLP itself, however, never became an effective national organization.  The Communists withdrew from the CLP in 1928-29, following a shift in Comintern policy, as the organization itself folded with its right-wing separating to form a new organization.Expulsion of factionsFrom 1927 to 1929, the Party went through a series of policy debates and internal ideological struggles which saw the expulsion of both advocates of the ideas of Trotsky and the theory of what the Party called North American Exceptionism. This included Spector, the editor of the partys paper The Worker and party chairman, and Jack MacDonald (who had supported Spectors expulsion) who was removed as the partys general secretary for factionalism, and ultimately expelled with the support of the majority of party members.File:Padlocked newspaper.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Persecution of Clart under the LawMacDonald was also a Trotskyist and joined Spector in founding the International Left Opposition (Trotskyist) Canada, which was part of Trotskys so-called Fourth International Opposition. Also expelled were supporters of Bukharin and Lovestones Opposition, such as Moriarty. The communists disagreed over strategy and tactics, as well the identity of the Soviet Union and Canadas status as an imperialist power. While some communists like B. Salsberg were initially sympathetic to these positions, after debates that dominated party conventions for several years by the early 1930s the vast majority of members had clearly decided to continue with the party.Buck replaced MacDonald as party secretary in 1929, and remained in the position until 1962, steering the party through perhaps its most dynamic period of history, including continued staunch support of the Union.Great DepressionThe stock market crash in late 1929 singled the beginning of a long and protracted economic crisis in Canada and internationally. The crisis quickly led to widespread unemployment, poverty, destitution and suffering among working families and farmers. The federal election|general election of 1930, brought to power the notorious Bennett Conservative government who attacked the labour movement and established relief camps for young unemployed men.The CPC was the only party to make a systemic critique of the depression as a crisis of capitalism. It was also the first political party in Canada to call for the introduction of unemployment insurance; a national health insurance scheme; making education universally accessible; social and employment assistance to youth; labour legislation including health and safety regulations, regulation of the working day and holidays, as well as a minimum wage for women and youth; and state-run crop insurance and price control for farmers. As an indication of the Parties influence on Canadian history, many of these demands campaigned for in the 1930s would finally be legislated federally and provincially in the coming decades.However in 1931, eight of the CPCs leaders were arrested and imprisoned under 98 of Canadas Code of Canada.  The party continued to exist, but was under the constant threat of legal harassment, and was for all intents and purposes an underground organization until 1934 when a massive campaign finally pushed back many of the polices practice of repression, and the communists were released. On the release of Tim Buck, the party held a mass rally attended by an overflow crowd of over 17,000 supporters and sympathizers in Leaf Gardens.Although the party was banned, it organized large mass organizations such as the Unity League, and the Labour Defence League that played an important role in historic strikes like that of the miners in Estivan. From 1933 to 1936, the WUL lead 90 per cent of the strikes in Canada. Already, conditions had taught the social democratics and reformists, as well as the communists, important lessons of cooperation. In 1934, in accordance with the re-examined posistion of the Comintern, the CPC adopted strategy and tactics based on a united front against fascism.In the prairies, the Communists organized the Farmers Unity League which mobilized against evictions and rallied hundreds of farmers into protest Hunger Marches, despite police brutality. Party members were also active in the of Industrial Organizations attempt to unionize the auto and other industrial sectors including Steelworkers, the Seamans Union, the Mill and Smelter Workers Union, the Wood workers of America, and the Electrical, Radio and Machine Workers of America.Among the poor and unemployed, Communists organized groups like the left-wing Workers Sports Association, one of the few ways that working-class youth had access to recreational programmes. The Camp Workers Union, and the National Unemployed Workers Association played a significant role in organizing the unskilled and the unemployed in protest marches and demonstrations and campaigns such as the Trek and the 1938 Vancouver Post-Office sit-down strike. Internationally, the party initiated the mobilization of the 1,500-man Battalion to fight in the Civil War as part of the Brigade. Among the leading Canadian Communists involved in that effort was Dr. Bethune, who is known for his invention of a mobile blood-transfusion unit, early advocacy of Medicare in Canada, and work with the Party of China during the Chinese war of independence.Solidarity efforts around the Spanish Civil War, as well as many labour and social struggles during the Depression, saw much cooperation between members of the CPC and the CCF. After 1935 the CPC advocated for electoral alliances and unity with the CCF on key issues. The proposal was debated in the CCF, with the 1936 BC, Alberta and Saskatchewan conventions generally supporting cooperation while the Ontario convention opposed. While the motion was defeated at that Parties third federal convention, the Communists continued to call for a united front.  The call was particularly urgent in Qubec, where in 1937 the far-right Duplessis government passed an act to protect Qubec against communist propoganda giving the police the power to padlock any premises used by communists (which was undefined in the legislation). Fascist groups attacked Jews, people from racialized communities, and communists.World War IIThe Communist Party opposed Canadas entry into War II and was banned under the of Canada Regulations of the Measures Act in 1940. A number of Communist Party leaders were interned and others went underground or fled to exile in the United States. With 1941 invasion of the USSR and the collapse of the Pact the party reversed its opposition to the war. During the Crisis of 1944, the banned CPC set up Tim Buck Plebiscite Committees across the country to campaign for a yes vote in the national referendum on conscription. Following the vote, the committees were renamed the Communist-Labor Total War Committee and urged full support for the war effort, a no-strike pledge for the duration of the war and increased industrial production. The Council for Democratic Rights was also established with Smith as chair in order to rally for the legalization of the Communist Party and the release of Communists and anti-fascists from internment.The partys first elected of Parliament (MP) was Nielson.  Nielson was elected in North Battleford, Saskatchewan in 1940 under the front Progressive Unity label. Nielsen kept her membership in the party a secret until 1943.Labour-Progressive PartyFile:Nicolae Ceauescu and Tim Buck from Communist Party of Canada, 11 iulie 1968.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Tim Buck meets CeauescuThe Communist Party remained banned, but with the entry of the Soviet Union into the war and the eventual release of the Canadian partys interned leaders, Canadian Communists founded the Party in 1943 as a legal front and thereafter ran candidates under that name until 1959. At its height in the mid-1940s, the party had fourteen sitting elected officials at the federal, provincial and municipal level. Several prominent elected party members were:* Fred Rose was elected to represent a Montreal riding in the House of Commons as an LPP MP, and was removed from office after being convicted of spying for the Soviet Union.* Nielsen, a Saskatchewan MP elected as a Unity candidate, declared her affiliation with the LPP when it was formed in August 1943 and ran unsuccessfully for re-election as an LPP candidate.* Kardash and William Ross were LPP and then Communist school trustees in Winnipeg* Penner and Zuken were popular aldermen in Winnipeg. Zuken was an LPP school trustee before succeeding Penner on city council by which time the LPP had changed its name back to the Communist Party.* A. Kardash and Litterick were Manitoba LPP Members of the Legislative Assembly (MLAs).* MacLeod and Salsberg were LPP members of the Ontario legislature.* Brehaut Ryerson, Carr, Charles Simms and Norman Freed were LPP Toronto aldermen while Stewart Smith was elected to the citys Board of Control.* Rankin sat on Vancouvers city council on behalf of the Committee of Progressive Electors which he helped found in the late 1960s. Though not officially a Communist Party member he was a traveller.In 1946, Gouzenko, a cipher clerk at the Soviet Embassy, defected to Canada alleging several Canadian communists were operating a spy ring which provided the Soviet Union with secret information. The Commission was called by Minister King to investigate the matter. This let to the convictions of Fred Rose and other communists.Khrushchevs 1956 Speech exposing the crimes of Stalin and the 1956 Soviet invasion of Hungary shook the faith of many Communists around the world. As well, the party was riven by a crisis following the return of prominent party member Salsberg from a trip to the Soviet Union where he found rampant party-sponsored antisemitism. Salsberg reported his findings but they were rejected by the party, which initially suspended him from its leading bodies. Ultimately, the crisis resulted in the departure of the Jewish Peoples Order, Salsberg, Laxer and most of the partys Jewish members in 1956.Many, perhaps most, members of the Canadian party left, including a number of prominent party members. In the mid 1960s the States Department of State estimated the party membership to be approximately 3500.(Benjamin, Roger W.; Kautsky, John H.. Communism and Economic Development, in The Political Science Review, Vol. 62, No. 1. (Mar., 1968), pp. 122.) The Soviet Unions 1968 invasion of Czechoslovakia caused more people to leave the Canadian Communist Party.Collapse of the Soviet bloc and party splitIn common with most communist parties, it went through a crisis after the of the Soviet Union, and subsequently split. Under then general secretary George Hewison (198891), the leadership of the CPC and a segment of its general membership began to abandon Marxism-Leninism as the basis of the Partys revolutionary perspective, and ultimately moved to liquidate the Party itself, seeking to replace it with a left, social democratic entity.The protracted ideological and political crisis created much confusion and disorientation within the ranks of the Party, and paralysed both its independent and united front work for over two years. Ultimately, the Hewison-led majority in the Central Committee (CC) of the party voted to abandon Marxism-Leninism. An orthodox minority in the CC, led by Figueroa, Rowley and former leader Kashtan, resisted this effort. At the 28th Convention in the fall of 1990, the Hewison group managed to maintain its control of the Central Committee of the CPC, but by the spring of 1991, the membership began to turn more and more against the reformist policies and orientation of the Hewison leadership.Key provincial conventions were held in 1991 in the two main provincial bases of the CPC - British Columbia and Ontario. At the B.C. convention, delegates threw out Fred Wilson, one of the main leaders of the Hewison group. A few months later in June 1991, Ontario delegates rejected a concerted campaign by Hewison and his supporters, and overwhelmingly reelected provincial leader Elizabeth Rowley and other supporters of the Marxist-Leninist current to the Ontario Committee and Executive.The Hewison group moved on August 27, 1991 to expel eleven of the key leaders of the opposition, including Rowley, Emil Bjarnason, and former central organizer John Bizzell. The Hewison-controlled Central Executive also dismissed the Ontario provincial committee.The vast majority of local clubs and committees of the CPC opposed the expulsions, and called instead for an extraordinary convention of the party to resolve the deepening crisis in a democratic manner. There were loud protests at the CCs October 1991 meeting, but an extraordinary convention was not convened. With few remaining options, Rowley and the other expelled members threatened to take the Hewison group to court. After several months of negotiations between the Hewison group and the opposition All-Canada Negotiating Committee, an out-of-court settlement resulted in the Hewison leadership agreeing to leave the CPC and relinquish any claim to the partys name, while taking most of the partys assets to the Cecil-Ross Society, a publishing and educational foundation previously associated with the party.Following the departure of the Hewison-led group, a convention was held in December 1992 at which delegates agreed to continue the Communist Party (thus the meeting was titled the 30th CPC Convention). Delegates rejected the reformist policies instituted by the Hewison group and instead reaffirmed the CPC as a Marxist-Leninist organization. Since most of the old partys assets were now the property of the Hewison-led Cecil Ross Society, the CPC convention decided to launch a new newspaper, the Voice, to replace the old Canadian Tribune. The convention elected a new central committee with Figueroa as Party Leader. The convention also amended the party constitution to grant more membership control and lessen the arbitrary powers of the CC, while maintaining democratic centralism as its organizational principle.Meanwhile, the former Communists retained the Society as a political foundation to continue their political efforts. They also sold off the partys headquarters at 24 Cecil Street, having earlier liquidated various party-related business such as Eveready Printers (the party printshop) and Progress Publishers. The name of the Cecil-Ross Society comes from the intersection of Cecil Street and Ross Street in Toronto where the headquarters of the party was located. The Cecil-Ross Society took with it the rights to the Canadian Tribune, which had been the partys weekly newspaper for decades, as well as roughly half of the partys assets. The Cecil-Ross Society ended publication of the Canadian Tribune and attempted to launch a new broad-left magazine, New Times which failed after a few issues and then Ginger http://www.pance.ca/ginger/ which only published twice.Reconstituted partyThe renovated party, now with fewer than 1,000 members, was smaller than before the split and had lost a number of assets, including the partys headquarters at 24 Cecil Street in Toronto. The CPC was not in a position to run fifty (50) candidates in the 1993 federal election, the number required to maintain official party status. As a result, the newly-relaunched CPC was deregistered by Elections Canada, and its remaining assets were seized by the government. A prolonged legal battle, v. Canada ensued, resulting in a Supreme Court of Canada ruling in 2003 that overturned a provision in the Elections Act requiring fifty candidates for official party status. Earlier in the legal battle, the party had its deregistration overturned and its seized assets restored. This victory was celebrated by many of the other small parties regardless of political differences on the principle that it was a victory for the peoples right to democratic choice.The CPC publishes a fortnightly newspaper called Voice. and its Quebec section, le Parti communiste du Qubec, published Clart. The CPC also periodically publishes a theoretical/discussion journal Spark!. These publications and other information about the party is available on its site http://www.communist-party.ca.The Communist Party is one of two federally registered Communist parties in Canada, the other being the Communist Party of Canada (Marxist-Leninist). The CPC-ML was founded in 1963 as the Internationalists, an anti-revisionist Maoist party rejecting the reforms of Khrushchev.  Today, the CPC-ML is known during elections as the Marxist-Leninist Party.The CPC is active in several unions, in the civic reform movement, and in a number of social justice, anti-war and international solidarity groups and coalitions. The Party is also working to help refound the Communist League of Canada. Local YCL groups have sprung up in several centres across the country, and a refounding convention of the pan-Canadian YCL happened in March 2007. 2005 split In 2005, the communiste du Qubec split into two rival groups, both of which claim to represent the party.  The national committee of one group, led by Parizeau, voted unanimously to separate from the CPC in June 2005. His opponents reject the validity of this vote, claiming that Parizeau had expelled four of the six members of the national committee who would vote against separating. The Communist Party of Canada had previously expelled Parizeau, and does not recognize the legality of his group.The split followed a lengthy dispute between Parizeau and the Central Executive Committee of the CPC.  In November 2004, Parizeau introduced a series of amendments to the CPC program Canadas Future is Socialism. According to a letter from Ontario leader Rowley, these amendments called on the party to expand its support for Quebec nationalism.The Communist Party of Canada, according to a 2005 release, supports the right of national self-determination, up to and including separation. It does not support the fragmentation of Canada, however, and has called for a new, democratic constitutional arrangement based on the equal and voluntary union of Aboriginal peoples, Qubec, and English-speaking Canada.  Many in the national party executive considered Parizeaus amendments as reflecting a narrower view of Quebec nationalism.Parizeaus amendments were rejected by the Central Executive Committee by a vote of 7-1; Parizeau himself was the only member to vote in favour.  The National Executive Committee (NEC) of the Quebec Party also rejected Parizeaus amendments by a vote of 4-2.In January 2005, Parizeau wrote a letter to PCQ members declaring that the party was in crisis. Describing the four NEC members who opposed his amendments as a Gang of Four and a pro-federalist faction, he summarily dismissed them from office. In turn, Parizeaus opponents called for the CPC to suspend him from office pending an investigation into his activities.This controversy came to a head at the PCQ convention of April 2005. After delegates voted 16-14 to expel one of the four suspended NEC members, Parizeaus opponents staged a mass walkout from the convention hall. The seventeen delegates who stayed voted to establish a new National Committee and Executive, consisting entirely of Parizeaus supporters.On April 27, 2005, the Central Executive of the CPC voted to expel Parizeau for factional activity and the pursuit of a right opportunist line, declared that the expulsions from the PCQ were illegal, and affirmed the authority of the previous National Executive Committee. This decision was confirmed by the partys Central Committee at a meeting held on June 1819, 2005.Parizeaus group published a letter of withdrawal from the CPC on June 15, 2005. In this letter, the CPC was accused of holding des ides chauvines vis--vis du Qubec (chauvinistic ideas relative to Quebec). The CPC has rejected similar accusations from Parizeau in the past, and now holds the position that Parizeaus group has no legal authority to use the PCQ name. Parizeaus opponents in the PCQ have remained active in Quebec, participating in the provinces May Day parades and starting a new periodical, entitled Clart.  Parizeaus group publishes a separate newspaper called La voix du peuple.  The electoral authorities of Quebec have recognized Parizeaus group as the legal owners of the PCQ name.(http://www.electionsquebec.qc.ca/fr/ppc_liste_partis_candidats.asp?sectprov&partiPCQ#texteP)The CPCs account of this situation is available online,(http://www.communist-party.ca/news/Statements/2005/cpc_pcq_en.html) as is the letter from Parizeaus PCQ group.(June 2005)Recent developmentsThe CPC held its 35th Central Convention on February 14, 2007 in Toronto. According to a Toronto Star article the assembly drew 65 delegates most of whom were from Ontario, British Columbia and Quebec with a few from Alberta, Saskatchewan, Manitoba and Nova Scotia. Party leader Miguel Figueroa called for the Communists to field 25 candidates in the upcoming federal election.Allied organizationsTraditionally, the Communist Party and Labour-Progressive Party have had allied organizations which were not formally affiliated with the party but were largely under its control. These groups often originated from left wing labour and socialist movements that existed prior to the creation of the Communist Party and operated political and cultural activities amongst various immigrant groups, published magazines and operated their own cultural centres and meeting halls. From the 1920s through the 1950s the largest immigrant groups represented in the party were Finns, Ukrainians and Jews who were organized in the Organization of Canada (founded in 1911 as the Finnish Socialist Organization of Canada), the of United Ukrainian Canadians (known as the Ukrainian Labor Farmer Temple Association until 1946) and the Jewish Peoples Order (known as the Labour League until 1945) respectively. Also active in the 1930s and 1940s was the Workers Clubs, the Peoples Association (formerly the Polish Workers and Farmers Association), the Peoples Movement and Cultural Association (formerly the Jugoslav Workers Clubs) and the Society. The Farmer-Worker Clubs were formed in the early 1930s but closed by the government under the of Canada Regulations at the outbreak of War II. When the Soviet Union became Canadas ally in 1942, they re-appeared as the of Russian Canadians. The Slav Committee was formed in 1948 in an attempt to put party-aligned cultural associations for Ukrainians, Russians, Poles, Slovaks, Bulgarians, Macedonians, Yugoslavs and Carpatho-Russians under one umbrella. The UJPO broke with the party in 1956 over the revelations of antisemitism in the Soviet Union. An influx of left-wing Greek and Portuguese immigrants in the 1960s and 1970s resulted in the creation of the Democratic Association and the Democratic Association which remain close to the Communist Party.General Secretaries of the CPC*Burpee 1921*Moriarty 19211923*Jack MacDonald 19231929*Buck 19291962*Morris 19621964*Kashtan 19651988*Hewison 19881992*Figueroa 1992PresentCentral Executive CommitteeThe Communist Party of Canadas 35th convention held in February 2007 elected the following members to its leading body, the Central Executive Committee: Figueroa (Party leader), Rowley (leader of the Party of Ontario), Pierre Fontaine (President of the communiste du Qubec), Rankin (leader of the Party of Canada - Manitoba),Gidora, leader of British Columbia Communist Party, Sam Hammond, Chair of the Trade Union Commission of the Party and Cariou (editor of Voice).There is also a larger body, the Committee, which is elected at convention and meets in intervening years. The Central Committee nominates the members of the Central Executive Committee and the composition of the CEC is ratified by convention. Election results Notes:1: A ninth candidate, Nielson was a member of the Communist Party but ran and was elected as a Unity candidate.2: The Communist Party was banned in 1941. From 1943 until 1959 they ran candidates under the name Progressive Party.3: In 1972 the party ran its candidates as independents. It is unknown how many party members ran in that election.4: The party failed to register at least 50 candidates in time for the 1993 election. As a result the party was deregistered and its candidates ran as independents. Party status was not regained until prior to the 2000 general election. It is unknown how many party members ran in the 1993 and 1997 elections as independents.See also* Party candidates, 2011 Canadian federal election* Party candidates, 2008 Canadian federal election* Party candidates, 2006 Canadian federal election* Party candidates, 2004 Canadian federal election* Party candidates, 2000 Canadian federal election* Party candidates, 1997 Canadian federal election*Communist Party of Alberta*Party of Ontario*Party of British Columbia*communiste du Qubec*PROFUNC*Voice*Young Communist League*Youth*of political parties in Canada*Jewish Peoples Order, which was aligned with the party until 1956.*Organization for Jewish Colonisation in the Soviet Union (IKOR)*Canadian communists including many leading figures in the party.ReferencesExternal links*Communist Party of Canada*Communist Party of Canada history*Young Communist Leaguecommuniste du CanadaPartia Kanady kommunistinen puolue zh:
359224
Fritz_Thyssen
Friedrich Fritz Thyssen (9 November 1873, an der Ruhr &ndash; 8 February 1951, Buenos Aires) was a German businessman born into one of Germanys leading industrial families.BiographyYouthThyssen was born in Mlheim in the area. His father, Thyssen (18421926), was head of the Thyssen mining and steelmaking company, which had been founded by his father Thyssen and was based in the Ruhr city of Duisburg. Thyssen studied mining and metallurgy in London, Lige, and Berlin, and after a short period of service in the Army he joined the family business. On 18 January 1900 in Dsseldorf he married Amelie Helle or Zurhelle (am Rhein, 11 December 1877 &ndash; bei Straubing, 25 August 1965), daughter of a factory owner. Their only child, Anna (Anita), (later Anita Grfin Zichy-Thyssen), was born in 1909. Thyssen again joined the army in 1914, but was soon discharged with a lung condition.Weimar GermanyThyssen was a conservative and a German nationalist. In 1923, when France and Belgium occupied the Ruhr to punish Germany for not meeting its reparations payments in full, he took part in the nationalist resistance against the occupiers, leading the Ruhr steelmakers in refusing to co-operate in producing coal and steel for them. He was arrested, imprisoned and received a large fine for his activities, which made him a national hero. Through the 1920s the Thyssen companies continued to expand. Thyssen took over the Thyssen companies on his fathers death in 1926, and in 1928 he formed United Steelworks (Stahlwerke AG), controlling more than 75 percent of Germanys iron ore reserves and employing 200,000 people. He played a prominent role in German commercial life, as head of the German Iron and Steel Industry Association and the Reich Association of German Industry, and as a board member of the Reichsbank.In 1923, Thyssen met former General Ludendorff, who advised him to attend a speech given by Hitler, leader of the Party. Thyssen was impressed by Hitler and his bitter opposition to the of Versailles, and began to make large donations to the party, including 100,000 gold marks ($25,000) in 1923 to Ludendorff.(The Rise and Fall of the Third Reich, William H Shirer. 144.) In this he was unusual among German business leaders, as most were traditional conservatives who regarded the Nazis with suspicion. Postwar investigators found that he had donated 650,000 Reichsmarks to right-wing parties, mostly to the Nazis, although Thyssen himself claimed to have donated 1 million marks to the Nazi Party.(The Rise and Fall of the Third Reich, William H Shirer. 145. On a post-war consequence of this activity see Finance in Germany, History.) Thyssen remained a member of the National Peoples Party until 1932, and did not join the Nazi Party until 1933. In November, 1932, Thyssen and Schacht were the main organisers of a letter to President von Hindenburg urging him to appoint Hitler as Chancellor. Thyssen also persuaded the Association of German Industrialists to donate 3 million Reichsmarks to the Nazi Party for the March, 1933 Reichstag election. As a reward, he was elected a Nazi member of the Reichstag and appointed to the Council of State of Prussia, the largest German state (both purely honorary positions).In 1932 he bought by Lugano the Villa Favorita, built in the beginning of the 18th century and which had belonged to Friedrich Leopold of Prussia, where he put to safe his collection.Nazi GermanyOnce the Nazi dictatorship took hold, however, Thyssen began to have second thoughts. Although he welcomed the suppression of the Communist Party, the Social Democrats and the trade unions, he disliked the mob violence of the SA. In 1934 he was one of the business leaders who persuaded Hitler to suppress the SA, leading to the of the Long Knives. Thyssen was horrified, however, at the simultaneous murder of various conservative figures such as von Schleicher.Thyssen accepted the exclusion of Jews from German business and professional life by the Nazis, and dismissed his own Jewish employees, but he did not share Hitlers violent anti-Semitism. As a Catholic, he also objected to the increasing repression of the Catholic Church, which gathered pace after 1935: in 1937 he sent a letter to Hitler, protesting the persecution of Christians in Germany.() The breaking point for Thyssen was the violent pogrom against the Jews in November, 1938 known as Kristallnacht, which caused him to resign from the Council of State. By 1939 he was also bitterly criticising the regimes economic policies, which were subordinating everything to rearmament in preparation for war.(Richard J. Evans, The Third Reich in Power,, Allen Lane 2005, 372)World War IIOn 1 September 1939 World War II broke out. Thyssen sent Gring a telegram saying he was opposed to the war, shortly before leaving for Switzerland with his family. He was expelled from the Nazi Party and the Reichstag, and his company was briefly nationalised. It was returned to other members of the Thyssen family some years after the war. In 1940 Thyssen took refuge and moved to France, intending to emigrate to Argentina, but was caught by the German occupation of France while he was visiting his ill mother in Belgium. He was arrested by France and taken back to Germany, where he was confined, first in a sanatorium near Berlin, then from 1943 in concentration camp. His wife Amelie did not escape to Argentina and spent the whole war in the camp with her husband. She had spent the good times with her husband and would also join him in the difficult times.  In February, 1945 he was sent to concentration camp. He was comparatively well-treated and transferred to Tyrol in late April 1945 together with other prominent inmates, where the SS left the prisoners behind. He was liberated by the 42nd Infantry Division & 45th Infantry Division on May 5, 1945.(georg-elser-arbeitskreis.de (German))Later lifeWhile Thyssen was imprisoned in Germany, a biography was published in the States in 1941 under the title I Paid Hitler. The book was written by a journalist named Reves, based on memoirs dictated by Thyssen. This book supports the view that the German industrialists as a class supported and funded Hitler and put him into power. After the war Thyssen disputed the authenticity of this book, and this was upheld by the postwar denazification tribunal.Thyssen was nevertheless tried for being a supporter of the Nazi Party. He did not deny that he had been a Nazi supporter until 1938, and he accepted responsibility for his companies mistreatment of Jewish employees in the 1930s, although he denied involvement in the employment of slave labour during the war. Thyssen agreed to pay 500,000 Deutschmarks as compensation to those who suffered as a result of his actions, and was acquitted of other charges. In January 1950, he and his wife emigrated to Aires, where he died the following year. Thyssen was buried in the family mausoleum in Mlheim.(Thyssen Buried in Ruhr, New York Times, Feb 9, 1953, p. 27)In 1959, Thyssens widow Amlie and daughter Anita Grfin Zichy-Thyssen established the Thyssen Foundation to advance science and the humanities, with a capital of 100 million Deutschmarks. Amlie Thyssen died in 1965. Anita Grfin Zichy-Thyssen ran the Foundation until her death in 1990. The family has no say in the running of the Foundation.See also* AG* familyReferences(External links* Ancestors of Baroness Francesca Anne Thyssen-Bornemisza de Kaszon* Ancestors of Archduchess Eleonore of Austria* Ancestors of Archduke Ferdinand of Austria* Ancestors of Archduchess Gloria of Austria* Thyssen-Bornemissza de Kszon et Imprfalva FamilyThyssenThyssenThyssenThyssenThyssenThyssenThyssen
360916
Arusha
footnotes                :This article refers to the city of Arusha.  For other uses, see (disambiguation).Arusha is a city in northern Tanzania. It is the capital of the Region, which claims a population of 1,288,088, including 281,608 for the District (2002 census). Arusha is surrounded by some of Africas most famous landscapes and parks. Situated below Mount Meru on the eastern edge of the eastern branch of the Rift Valley, it has a mild climate and is close to Serengeti, Crater, Manyara, Gorge, National Park, and Kilimanjaro, as well as having its own National Park on Mount Meru.Arusha is a major international diplomatic hub. The city hosts and is regarded as the de facto capital of the African Community. Since 1994, the city has also hosted the Criminal Tribunal for Rwanda. It is a multicultural city with a majority African population, large Arab and Indian minorities, and many European and American ex-pats, engaged in diplomatic affairs and the fast-growing local tourist industry. Religions and denominations of Arushas population are Catholic, Anglican, Jewish, Muslim, and Hindu.Geography and climateDespite its proximity to the equator, Arushas elevation of 1,400 m on the southern slopes of Mount Meru keeps temperatures relatively low and alleviates humidity. Cool dry air is prevalent for much of the year. The temperature ranges between 13 and 30 degrees Celsius with an average around 25 degrees. It has distinct wet and dry seasons, and experiences an eastern prevailing wind from the Ocean, a couple of hundred miles east. Almost within the entire city; if you go north you will be going up hill, and going south is always down hill.Historythumb|left|250px|Arusha clock tower area, 1953.The town was founded by German colonialists when the territory was part of East Africa in 1900. A garrison town, it was named after the local tribe Wa-Arusha, who are known as Larusa by the Maasai.The German military fortress, called a Boma, armed with a mounted Maxim gun, was completed in 1901. The first commander was First Lieutenant Georg Kuster - derogatorily referred to in Swahili as Bwana Fisi meaning Mr. Hyena. After 1903 Arusha quickly developed into a significant trading and administrative centre, with about two dozen Indian and Arab shops clustered along what is today Boma Road.(Philip Briggs, Northern Tanzania : The Bradt Safari Guide with Kilimanjaro and Zanzibar, second edition (2009).)In 1904 the German Imperial authorities established a European colony here with the sponsored settlement of Boer refugee families, mostly of German descent, in the aftermath of Africas divisive War. The Germans arranged for the Boers to be taken by boat to Tanga, from where they travelled to Arusha by ox-wagon. When the oxen all succumbed to tsetse-borne disease, the Germans provided the Boers with teams of (forced) local laburers. In August 1905 they reached the Arusha district and met the Pieter Joubert trek, which had just arrived. For their immediate sojourn they set up camp on the farm of Mr. Nelie von Landsberg.(Philip Briggs, Northern Tanzania : The Bradt Safari Guide with Kilimanjaro and Zanzibar, second edition (2009).)After 1906 the government sponsored German peasants to develop small-holdings at Leganga on southeastern Meru between Usa River and Maji ya Chai. Several Evangelical Lutheran settlers had already become established west of Arusha town when the government decided to settle German refugees from southern Russia. Forty people were recruited at a cost of 7000 marks each, and each family was given fifty hectares to grow wheat, maize, and vegetables.(Joseph Wilson Parsalaw, A history of the Lutheran Church, Diocese in the Arusha Region from 1904 to 1958 (Makumira publication), 1999.)In 1907 Margaret Trappe - great-grandmother of Ohio industrialist Kenyon Painter - made her home in German East Africa. An accomplished horse woman she was the first female professional hunter ever listed. The Trappe family built their home on the slopes of Mount Meru with their farm Momella eventually becoming part of Arusha National Park. In the 1960s parts of the movie Hatari! with Wayne were filmed at Momella. Kenyon Painter later became one of the towns most significant investors, having invested over a million dollars in the area. He built Arushas first post office, church and other landmarks.(Philip Briggs, Northern Tanzania : The Bradt Safari Guide with Kilimanjaro and Zanzibar, second edition (2009).)In March 1916 the British occupied Arusha. The British expelled the German settlers, reallocated the German estates to British settlers and alienated vast new tracts themselves.Margaret visited Arusha in 1956. Official documents ceding independence to Tanganyika were signed by the Kingdom at Arusha in 1961. The Declarations for Self Reliance in Tanzania were signed in 1967 in Arusha.The Accords were signed at Arusha on August 4, 1993, by representatives of competing factions in the Rwandan civil war.In 1994 the UN Security Council decided by its Resolution 955 of 8 November 1994 that Arusha should host the Criminal Tribunal for Rwanda. The establishment of the tribunal with its employees has influenced the local economy of Arusha. The tribunal is about to downsize due to its closure in 2014, but its legal successor, the Residual Mechanism for Criminal Tribunals established by Nations Security Council Resolution 1966, will continue entertaining a branch in Arusha, opening on 1 July 2012. Arusha officially became a city on 1 July 2006.(Arusha Times) Industry and economyThe primary industry of the region is agriculture, with large vegetable and flower producers sending high-quality produce to Europe. Small-scale agriculture was badly hit by the coffee crisis of recent years and is now largely farming. Arusha has several factories including a brewery, tyre and fibreboard plant, and a large pharmaceuticals maker.The region around Arusha is the sole source of a gem-quality mineral called Tanzanite, currently produced in large quantities by corporate mining concerns.Tourism is also a major contributor to the economy in Arusha, being the second largest contributor of income in Tanzania. Given the towns location near some of the most popular national parks and game reserves in Africa including Selous National Park (one of the largest national parks in the world), Serengeti National Park, Kilimanjaro National Park, Ngorongoro Conservation Area among others, Arusha has become a popular staging point for tourists visiting Tanzania and East Africa for photo safaris and hiking treks to Mt. Kilimanjaro.  Many documentary and feature-length films have been set in and around Arusha, including the 1962 Hawks film Hatari with Wayne.Arusha is home to the offices of the African Community, and plays host to the Criminal Tribunal for Rwanda and the Court on Human and Peoples Rights, all of which contributes to the local economy.The famous International Conference Center, host to many international meetings, is located here.DistrictsImage:ictr office 3.jpg|thumb|250px|Offices of the Criminal Tribunal for Rwanda, 2003.thumb|250px|Arusha Clock Tower.Among Arushas notable districts are the Central Business Area, located by the Clocktower, Sekei in the North-West which is largely residential with a vibrant nightlife, Njiro, a posh rapidly-growing suburb in the South, and Tengeru, a lively market-town in the East.North of Arusha is a district called Karatu, Ngorongoro, Monduli, Arumeru and Longido. It is about 90 minutes north of Arusha by daladala along the Arusha-Nairobi Road. Robanda Safari Camp is one of the favorite Safari Camp. Robanda Safari Camp is located just outside Serengeti Ikoma Gate. This location was carefully chosen so as to be right in the path of the wildebeest migration. The best time to witness this spectacular migration is from May to August and from October to December. There is a high animal concentration year round though, with big herds of wildebeest and zebra, elephant and giraffe. Other animal species include lion, hyena, gazelle, topi, and buffalo.Arushas clock tower  is popularly supposed to be situated at the midpoint between Cairo and Town, therefore representing the halfway point between the two termini of the old Empire in Africa.  However, the actual circle midpoint between these two cities lies in central Congo. The clock tower is currently adorned by the logo of the Coca-Cola Company.TransportArusha is mostly served by International Airport for international travellers, some  east, approximately halfway to Moshi. The airport provides international and domestic flights. Airport is a smaller domestic airport in the west of the city, currently undergoing expansion. It serves more than 87,000 passengers yearly, amazingly for its size. It is surrounded by hills to the north and east; the local habitat is a mix of savanna woodlands, agriculture and remnant forest. There are no passenger train services to or from Arusha, but there are regular coaches (buses) to Nairobi, Dodoma and Es Salaam, plus other local towns.CultureArusha has moderate weather, a location near scenic countryside and a lively music scene.  Tanzanian hip-hop is currently popular with the youth market.  It is mostly performed in Swahili, with various genres influenced by American music, locally known as Flava. Some examples of this genre are the band, Plastaz, singers Nakaaya, Watengwa and Waturutumbi.Arusha hosts many of Tanzanias festivals, and the yearly festival is hosted by a few Tanzanian corporate sponsors that attract various artists from around the world. Artists like Shaggy and Rule have performed in Arusha.Arusha also hosts the annual Arusha Nane Nane Agricultural show. Nane Nane is one of the many vibrant public holidays in Tanzania, held on August 8 (the 8th of the 8th month, nane nane means eight eight in Swahili). Farmers and other stakeholders exchange knowledge and business. It attracts up to a half million people every year.Arusha is also known for its vibrant night life, with popular local clubs like the Velocity, Colobus Club and the Blue Triple A.The National Natural History Museum is located in Arusha at the Old German Boma.  The museum is small and contains three exhibits on early man, plants and animals of the Arusha region, and culture history of the colonial period of Arusha.(http://aroundarusha.com/content/natural-history-museum)EducationThere are four international schools in and around Arusha: School Moshi (Arusha Campus), Arusha International school, Braeburn School, and St Constantines International School.The of St Jude provides free education to children from the poorest families.International School Moshi was founded in 1969 and now has 460 students from 46 nationalities on two campuses in Moshi and Arusha. The Arusha campus was established in 1986 and now has 200 day students, and offers courses from pre-kindergarten to grade 10. Grades K-10 follow the Baccalaureate Primary years programme (PYP) and Middle Years programme (MYP) curriculum with an African and international perspective. It has been an IB World school since 2007.()Also there is several higher learning Institutions including College of Tourism - Arusha Campus, Technical college, Institute of community Development, Nelson Mandela African Institute of Science and Technology, and Southern Africa Management Institute, Training Centre for Development Cooperation (MS-TCDC), Institute of Accountancy Arusha, Training Institute, Olmotonyi, Wildlife Research Institute, Makumira University College, The Arusha University and Mount Meru University. Whereas plan for Aga Khan University-Arusha Campus is in the initial stages.University offers Undergraduate and Graduate semester long and summer programs in Tanzania to study at the Nyerere Centre for Peace Research. For more details, see the Arcadia University webpage on its programs in Tanzania (http://www.arcadia.edu/abroad/default.aspx?id11378).SportsArusha is Tanzanias rugby home with the national team playing its international matches there. Joshua Pieterson who played for the national team was the second youngest international rugby player ever behind Johnny Wilkinson. Southern Pool A of the Castel Beer Trophy was hosted here too.FC, playing in Amri Abeid Memorial Stadium, represents the city in Tanzanian league football.The Meru Marathon was held from 1985 to 2004 in Arusha.() The all-comers record for the fastest marathon performance in Tanzania, 2:13:46, was set at the event by former runner Ako on August 1, 1993.()On May 21st, 2011, the Drake University Bulldogs beat the CONADEIP All-Stars 17-7 in the first ever American Football Game in Tanzania.In popular cultureArusha was the setting for the 1962 film Hatari! directed by Hawks and starring Wayne. In the video game 3, a highway sign is seen that says Arusha, though it is crossed out, suggesting that the city was destroyed by the Covenant or The Flood.Sister cities*  North Carolina, USA*  City, Missouri, USA*  Mrzzuschlag, Austria*  Tifariti, SaharaSee also* Accords* Cultural Heritage Centre* Declaration* National Park* Region* Manyara* Longido* Meru (Tanzania)* Selian* Tanzania* National Park See also * Nations Security Council resolution References Arusha Volunteers-affordable volunteer opportunities in Tanzania External links * The University of Arusha* Mount Meru University* Makumira University College*Institute of Accountancy Arusha* Arusha Technical College* The Nelson Mandela African Institute of Science and Technology* Tanzania Wildlife Research Institute* Forestry Training Insitute Olmotonyi (FTI)* MS Training Centre for Development Cooperation (MS-TCDC)* Eastern and Southern Africa Management Institute* National College of Tourism - Arusha Campus* Arusha NGO Network* Website of the Arusha Times* AroundArusha.com* International School Moshi (Arusha Campus)* The Umoja Centre* Kisongo Academic college* No Limits Foundation* St. Constantines international school* School of St Jude* Mambo Arusha* David Marshs Childhood Map of European Area of Arusha, ca. 1956* MSN Map - elevation  1254m* Penn Museum Archival Video* Arusha Volunteers-affordable volunteer opportunities in Tanzaniaaf:Arushaar:()da:Arushade:Arushaet:Arushaes:Arushaeo:Arushafa:fr:Arushagl:Arushako:hr:Arushait:Arushahe:(mji)()(stad)ja:no:Arushapl:Aruszaro:Arusha()sr:fi:Arushasv:Arushatr:Arusha()vi:Arushawar:Arushayo:Arushazh:
362192
Jack_Williamson
 influenced  Bradbury, Asimov, PohlJohn Stewart Williamson (April 29, 1908  November 10, 2006), who wrote as Jack Williamson (and occasionally under the pseudonyms Will Stewart and Nils O. Sonderlund) was a U.S. writer often referred to as the Dean of Fiction following the death in 1988 of Robert A. Heinlein.(SFWA Pressbook. Jack Williamson, Greg Bear: Two SFWA pillars honored with 2006 Heinlein Award. http://www.sfwa.org/pressbook/SFWAPR/20060717-HeinleinAward.html) Early life Williamson was born April 29, 1908 in Bisbee, Territory, and spent his early childhood in western Texas. In search of better pastures, his family migrated to rural Mexico in a horse-drawn covered wagon in 1915.(Williamson, Jack. Wonders Child: My Life in Science Fiction (Benbella Books, 2005)) The farming was difficult there and the family turned to ranching, which they continue to this day.  He served in the Army Air Corps in War II as a forecaster. Writing career Williamson discovered the local library and used it to educate himself. As a young man, he discovered the magazine Stories, after answering an ad for one free issue. He strove to write his own fiction, selling his first story at age 20: The Metal Man appeared in the Dec. 1928 issue of Amazing Stories. His work during this early period was heavily influenced by A. Merritt.(Moskowitz, Sam. Jack Williamson: Four-Way Pioneer. Amazing Stories October, 1964) Noting the Merritt influence, Budrys described The Metal Man as a story full of memorable images. (Galaxy Bookshelf, Science Fiction, December 1967, pp.190)Early on, Williamson became impressed by the works of J. Breuer and struck up a correspondence with him. A doctor who wrote science fiction in his spare time, Breuer had a strong talent and turned Williamson away from dreamlike fantasies towards more rigorous plotting and stronger narrative. Under Breuers tutelage, Williamson would send outlines and drafts for review.( Their first work together was the novel Birth of a New Republic in which Moon colonies were undergoing something like American Revolutiona theme later taken up by many other SF writers, particularly in A. Heinleins Moon Is a Harsh Mistress.Wracked by emotional storms and believing many of his physical ailments to be psychosomatic, Williamson underwent psychiatric evaluation in 1933 at the Clinic in Topeka, Kansas, in which he began to learn to resolve the conflict between his reason and his emotion.( From this period, his stories take on a grittier, more realistic tone.By the 1930s he was an established genre author, and the teenaged Asimov was thrilled to receive a postcard from Williamson, whom he had idolized, congratulating him on his first published story and saying welcome to the ranks.( Williamson remained a regular contributor to the magazines, though not reaching financial success until many years later. He published many collaborations with the science fiction author Pohl. He continued to write as a nonagenarian and won both the Hugo and Awards during the last decade of his life, by far the oldest writer to win those awards.(( Academic career Williamson received his of Arts and Master of Arts degrees in English in the 1950s from New Mexico University (ENMU) in Portales (near the Texas panhandle), joining the faculty of that university in 1960. He remained affiliated with the school for the rest of his life. In the late 1990s, he established a permanent trust to fund the publication of El Portal, ENMUs journal of literature and art. In the 1980s, he made a sizable donation of books and original manuscripts to ENMUs library, which resulted in the formation of a Special Collections department; the library now is home to the Jack Williamson Science Fiction Library, which ENMUs website describes as one of the top science fiction collections in the world.(Jack Williamson Science Fiction Library. ENMU Golden Library website) In addition, Williamson hosted the Jack Williamson Lectureship Series, an annual panel discussion in which two science fiction authors were invited to speak to attendees on a set topic. The Jack Williamson Liberal Arts building houses the Mathematics, Art, and Languages & Literature Departments of the university.Williamson completed his Ph.D. in English literature at the University of Colorado in Boulder, focused on Wells earlier works, demonstrating that Wells was not the naive optimist that many believed him to be. In the field of science, Jack Williamson coined the word terraforming in a science-fiction story published in 1942 in Science Fiction.() Later years In the mid 1970s, Williamson was named a Grand Master of Science Fiction by the Fiction Writers of America. He was only the second person to receive this honor. The first was A. Heinlein.After retiring from teaching full-time in 1977, Williamson spent some time concentrating on his writing, but after being named Professor Emeritus by ENMU, he was coaxed back to co-teach two evening classes, Creative Writing and Fantasy and Science Fiction (he pioneered the latter at ENMU during his full-time professorship days). Williamson continued to co-teach these two classes into the 21st century.In 1994 Williamson received a Fantasy Award for Lifetime Achievement.()In November 2006, Williamson died at his home in New Mexico at age 98.(Terry, Karl. Sci-fi legend Williamson dies. Portales News-Tribune November 11, 2006 http://www.pntonline.com/news/williamson_9214___article.html/fiction_enmu.html) Despite his age, he had made an appearance at the Spring 2006 Jack Williamson Lectureship and published a 320-page novel, The Stonehenge Gate, in 2005. Notable works  The Legion of Space While attending a Books course, Williamson learned that Sienkiewicz had created one of his works by taking the Musketeers of Alexandre Dumas and pairing them with Falstaff of Shakespeare. Williamson took this idea into science fiction with The of Space.Desperate for money, he searched for a quick source of income. While most pulps of the time were slow to pay, the recently re-started Astounding was an exception. However, they did not accept novels, so Williamson submitted three short stories and a novelette. Learning that they were also accepting novels for serialization, he sent in Legion of Space, which was published in six parts. It quickly became a genre favorite, and was quickly collected into a hardcover.The story takes place in an era when humans have colonized the System but dare not go farther, as the first extra-solar expedition to Star failed and the survivors came back as babbling, grotesque, diseased madmen. They spoke of a gigantic planet, populated by ferocious animals and the single city left of the evil Medusae. The Medusae bear a vague resemblance to jellyfish, but are actually elephant-sized, four-eyed, flying beings with hundreds of tentacles. The Medusae cannot speak and communicate with one another via a microwave code.The Falstaff character is named Giles Habibula. He was once a criminal, and can open any lock ever made. In his youth he was called Giles The Ghost. Jay Kalam (Commander of The Legion) and Hal Samdu are the names of the other two warriors. In this story these warriors of the 30th Century battle the Medusae, the alien race from the lone planet of Barnards Star. The Legion itself is the military and police force of the Solar System after the overthrow of an empire called the Hall that once ruled all humans.In this novel, renegade Purple pretenders ally themselves with the Medusae as a means to regain their empire. But the Medusae, who are totally unlike humans in all ways, turn on the Purples, seeking to destroy all humans and move to the Solar System, as their own world, far older than Earth, is finally spiraling back into Barnards Star. One of the Purples, John Ulnar, supports the Legion from the start, and he is the fourth great warrior. His enemy is the Purple pretender Eric Ulnar, who sought the Medusae out in the first place, seeking to become the next Emperor of The Sun.The Medusae conquered the Moon, set up their bases there, and went on to attempt conquest of the Solar System. The Medusae had for eons used a reddish, artificial gas to keep their dying world from freezing. The Medusae learned from the first human expedition to their world that the gas rots human flesh, and the Medusae use it as a potent chemical weapon, attempting ecological destruction by means of projectiles fired from the Moon. Their vast spaceships also have very effective plasma weapons, very similar to those the Romulans had in a Star Trek episode called of Terror.The Legion works also featured a force field called AKKA which can erase from the Universe any matter, of any size, anywhere, even a star or a planet. AKKA was a weapon of mass destruction and the secret of it was entrusted to a series of women. AKKA was used in the past to overthrow the Purple tyranny. It was also used to wipe out most of the Medusae, though they had tried to steal the secret. When they were wiped out, the Moon where they had established their base was erased out of existence. At the end of the story, John Ulnar falls in love with the keeper of AKKA, Aladoree Anthar, and marries her. Aladoree Anthar is described as a young woman with lustrous brown hair and gray eyes, beautiful as a goddess.Williamson next wrote Cometeers which takes place twenty years after Legion of Space in which the same characters battle another alien race, this one of different origin.In this second tale, they fight Cometeers who are an alien race of energy beings controlling a comet which is really a giant force field containing a swarm of planets populated by their slaves. The slave races are of flesh and blood, but none are remotely similar to humans. The Cometeers cannot be destroyed by AKKA, as they are incorporeal from the Universes point of view and exist for the most part in an alternate reality. The ruling Cometeers feed on their slaves and literally absorb their souls, leaving disgusting, dying hulks in their wake. It is said that they do so, as they were once fleshly entities themselves of various species. Hence, the ruling Cometeers keep other intelligent beings as slaves and cattle. They fear AKKA, though, as it can erase all their possessions.They are defeated by the skills of Giles Habibula. Giles broke into a secret chamber guarded by complex locks and force fields that the incorporeal Cometeers could not penetrate. In it the ruler of the Cometeers had kept its own weapon of mass destruction, one that would cause the Cometeers to disintegrate. The ruling Cometeer kept this weapon to enforce its rule over the others of its kind. Once the Cometeers were destroyed, their slaves were ordered by the Legion to take the comet and leave the Solar System, and never return.Another novel, Against the Legion, tells of a Purple pretender who sets up a robotic base on a world over seventy light years from Earth, and tries to conquer the Solar System via matter transporter technology he has stolen. In this story robots are outlawed, as they are in Dune. The story also features Jay Kalam, lobbying to allow the New Cometeers to leave the Solar System in peace, as many people were demanding that AKKA be used to obliterate the departing swarm of planets once and for all.In 1983, Williamson published a final Legion novel, The Queen of the Legion. Giles Habibula reappears in this final novel, which is set after the disbanding of the Legion. Contraterrene An editor suggested that Williamson combine the ideas of contraterrene matter (antimatter) and asteroid mining. This brought about the Seetee (C-T) series of short stories written as by Will Stewart.Comic stripAn unfavorable review of one of his books, which compared his writing to that of a strip, brought Williamson to the attention of The New York Sunday News, which needed a science fiction writer for a new comic strip. Williamson wrote the strip Mars, loosely based on his novel Ship for several years (195255), until the paper dropped all comics. Bibliography  Series ;of Space Series# Legion of Space, 1947 6-part serial in Astounding, 1934# Cometeers, 1950 4-part serial in Astounding, 1936, plus One Against the Legion, 3-part serial in Astounding, 1939# One Against the Legion, 1967 3-part serial in Astounding, 1939, plus Nowhere Near#* Three from the Legion, (Omnibus of 3 novels plus Nowhere Near) 1980# The Queen of the Legion, 1983;Series# Folded Hands, 1947 in Astounding# The Humanoids, 1949 3-part serial as ..And Searching Mind in Astounding, 1949# Humanoid Touch, 1980#* The Humanoids / With Folded Hands (Omnibus) (1996);Series* Seetee Shock (1949) (as by Will Stewart) from Astounding, 1949* Ship (1951) (as by Will Stewart) previously published stories 1942-3* Seetee Ship/Seetee Shock (1971);Trilogy (with Frederik Pohl)# Undersea Quest (1954)# Undersea Fleet (1956)# Undersea City (1958)# Undersea Trilogy (Omnibus) (1992);of Cuckoo (with Frederik Pohl)# Star (1975)# Around A Star (1983);Trilogy (with Frederik Pohl)# The Reefs of Space (1964)# Starchild (1965)# Rogue Star (1969)# The Starchild Trilogy (omnibus) (1977) Novels * The Girl from Mars (1930, with J. Breuer)* The Green Girl (1930)* Golden Blood (1933)* Xandulu (1934)* The Blue Spot (1935)* Islands of the Sun (1935)* Realm of Wizardry (1940)* Than You Think (1948)* Dragons Island  (1951) (also known as The Not-Men)* Bridge (1955, with James E. Gunn)* The Dome Around America (1955) (also known as Gateway to Paradise)* The Trial of Terra (1962) 4 previously published stories, 1951-1962* The Reign of Wizardry (1964)* Bright New Universe (1967)* Trapped in Space (1968)* The Moon Children (1972)* The Power of Blackness (1975)* Brother to Demons, Brother to Gods (1979) 5 previously published stories, 1977-78* Manseed (1982)* Lifeburst (1984)* Firechild (1986)* Lands End (1988, with Pohl)* Mazeway (1990)* The Singers of Time (1991, with Pohl)* Beachhead (1992)* Demon Moon (1994)* The Black Sun (1997)* The Fortress of Utopia (1998) originally in Stories, 1939* The Silicon Dagger (1999)* The Stone from a Green Star (1999) originally in Stories, 1931* Terraforming Earth (2001) (Co-winner of 2002 John W. Campbell Memorial Award)* The Stonehenge Gate (2005) Collections * The Legion of Time, and After Worlds End (1952)* The Pandora Effect (1969)* People Machines (1971)* The Early Williamson, 1975* The Best of Jack Williamson (1978)* The Alien Intelligence (1980)* Millions de Soleils (1988)* Into the Eighth Decade (1990)* The Prince of Space/The Girl from Mars (1998) written with Miles J. Breuer* The Collected Stories of Jack Williamson, Volume One, The Metal Man and Others (1999)* The Collected Stories of Jack Williamson, Volume Two, Wolves of Darkness (1999)* The Blue Spot, and Entropy Reversed (Released Entropy) (2000) from {Astounding}, 1937* The Collected Stories of Jack Williamson, Volume Three, Wizards Isle (2000)* Dragons Island and other stories (2002) & 2 shorts* The Collected Stories of Jack Williamson, Volume Four, Spider Island (2002)* Seventy-Five: The Diamond Anniversary of a Science Fiction Pioneer, Stephen Haffner & Richard A. Hauptmann, eds. (2004)* The Collected Stories of Jack Williamson, Volume Five, The Crucible of Power (2006)* In Memory of Wonders Child Stephen Haffner, ed. (2007)* The Worlds of Jack Williamson: A Centennial Tribute (1908-2008), Stephen Haffner, ed. (2008)* The Collected Stories of Jack Williamson, Volume Six, Gateway to Paradise (2008)* With Folded Hands . . . And Searching Mind, The Collected Stories of Jack Williamson, Volume Seven (2010)* At the Human Limit, The Collected Stories of Jack Williamson, Volume Eight (forthcoming) Short stories * The Metal Man, 1928* The Cosmic Express, 1930* The Moon Era, 1931* Born of the Sun, 1934* Star Bright, 1939* The Angel From Hell, 1939 (in Tales, writing as Nils O. Sonderlund)* Hindsight, 1940* Collision Orbit, 1942 (writing as Will Stewart) Seetee Ship* Minus Sign, 1942 (writing as Will Stewart) Seetee Ship* Opposites - React!, 1943 (writing as Will Stewart) Seetee Ship* With Folded Hands..., 1947* The Man from Outside, 1951* Beans, 1958* Jamboree, 1969* The Highest Dive, 1976* The Humanoid Universe, 1980* The Firefly Tree, 1997* The Pet Rocks Mystery, 1998* Eden Star, 2000* The Ultimate Earth, 2000 (awarded the Hugo for Best Novella in 2001) Autobiography Wonders Child: My Life in Science Fiction. Bluejay Books, New York, 1984. (Hardcover)(Wonders Child: My Life in Science Fiction. Benbella Books, Dallas, 2005. (Paperback, updated with new photographs and epilogue) Bibliography The Works of Jack Williamson: An Annotated Bibliography and Guide, Richard A. Hauptmann (NESFA Press, 1997) See also * engineering (Williamson invented this term in Dragons Island and it has since passed into common use.)* Terraforming* Psionics* Opera* Anti-matter* Ship* Pohl* Android Listen to * NPR audio broadcast on Jack Williamson* Dimension X: With Folded Hands References refs() External links * Bibliography* John Clute on Jack Williamson* * * Williamson Biography on ENMU website* Books by Jack Williamson from Haffner Press* Jack Williamson Science Fiction Library at ENMU* Jack Williamson Lectureship Series* Eastern New Mexico University press release* Scifi.com interview* McCaffery, Larry (July 1991) An Interview with Jack Williamson. Fiction Studies #54 Volume 18, Part 2* Jack Williamson Obituary* Obituaries: Jack Williamson, Daily Telegraph, November 15, 2006WilliamsonWilliamsonWilliamsonWilliamsonWilliamsonWilliamsonja:WilliamsonWilliamsonWilliamsonWilliamsonWilliamson
363829
Elmer_Ambrose_Sperry
significant_awards    Elmer Ambrose Sperry (October 12, 1860  June 16, 1930) was a prolific inventor and entrepreneur, most famous as co-inventor, with Anschtz-Kaempfe of the gyrocompass.Sperry was born at New York, United States of America. He spent three years at the state school in New York, then a year at University in 1878 and 1879, where he became interested in dynamo electricity. He moved to Illinois, early in 1880 and, soon after founded the Sperry Electric Company. In 1900 Sperry established an electrochemical laboratory at D.C., where he and his associate, Clifton P. Townshend, developed a process for making pure caustic soda from salt and discovered a process for recovering tin from scrap metal. Sperry experimented with diesel engines and gyroscopic compasses and stabilizers for ships and aircraft. In 1910 he started the Gyroscope Company in New York; his first compass was tested that same year in . His compasses and stabilizers were adopted by the States Navy and used in both world wars. In 1918 he produced a high-intensity lamp which was used as a searchlight by both the Army and Navy. After setting up eight companies and taking out over 400 patents, Sperry died in Brooklyn on 12 June 1930.  His companies included: *Sperry Electric Mining Machine Company, (1888);*Sperry Electric Railway Company, (1894);*Chicago Fuse Wire Company, (1900); and*Rail Service (1911)a railroad defect detection company.*Gyroscope Company (1910), founded to manufacture Sperrys development of the gyrocompass, originally invented by Anschtz-Kaempfe in 1908. Sperrys first model was installed on the battleship USS Delaware in 1911.The companies eventually evolved into the Corporation.Sperry was also a founding member of the US Consulting Board, 1915.In 1916, Sperry joined Peter Hewitt to develop the Automatic Airplane, one of the first successful precursors of the UAV. was named for him, as was the annual A. Sperry Award for Advancing the Art of Transportation.The Sperry Center building on the SUNY Cortland campus in Cortland, NY is named after him.He was awarded the Institutes Cresson Medal in 1929.References*Thomas P. Hughes, Elmer Sperry: Inventor and Engineer (Baltimore: Johns Hopkins University Press, 1971).*Fahrney, Delmer S. (RAdm ret): History of Radio-Controlled Aircraft and Guided Missiles*External links*Obituary, New York Times, Elmer Sperry Dies; Famous Inventor, June 17, 1930*Elmer A. Sperry case file at the Institute contains records concerning his 1914 Franklin Award for the gyroscopic compass* for the gyroscopic compass, filed June, 1911; issued September, 1918*US patent search page, search for Elmer and Sperry in Inventor name, 1790-present, yields about 160 resultssome recent ones are by EA Sperry Jr, earliest ones not found*Ambrose SperryAmbrose SperrySperryAmbrose SperryAmbrose SperryAmbrose SperryAmbrose Sperry
366600
Harmony_(disambiguation)
Harmony is the art of using chords in music.Harmony may also refer to: love and agreement with those who care* Agreement (see Harmonia)Art* Harmony (or unity), one of the of art Mythology * (mythology), goddess of harmony and concordMusic*Harmony (Schenker), a book by Heinrich Schenker on music theory*(band), a melodic progressive metal band from Sweden*(Dutch band), a 1970s band*(Australian Band)*Harmony (Three Dog Night album)*Harmony (Anne Murray album)*Harmony (Gordon Lightfoot album)*Harmony (Honeyz album)*Harmony (Londonbeat album)*Harmony (Never Shout Never album)*Harmony, a song by John, from the album Yellow Brick Road*Harmony, a song by The Ray Conniff Singers, from the album of the same name of 1974*Harmony, a 1979 disco song by Lane*Harmony, a song by Clinic from their 2002 album with Thee*Harmony, a song by Minogue from her 2002 CD Single In Your Eyes*Harmony, a song by Mondays from their 1990 album n Thrills and Bellyaches*The Company, an American stringed instrument manufacturer*Records, a budget/reissue subsidiary of Columbia Records active in the 1920s and 1930s*Harmony (musical), on the life and career of the Harmonists*(singing duo), contestants on ITV talent show Got Talent.PlacesCanada*Nova ScotiaUnited States*California*Florida*Indiana*Maine*Maryland*Minnesota*New York*North Carolina*Oklahoma *Pennsylvania**Historic District, Harmonists first settlement in America*Rhode Island*Wisconsin (disambiguation)  *Township, Pennsylvania (disambiguation)*Harmony (Passions), a fictional New England coastal town which serves as the setting for the soap opera PassionsPeople*Korine, American film director and screenwriter*Rose, adult actressFictional*Kendall, television character on Buffy the Vampire Slayer and AngelComputing*Harmony, a technology developed by RealNetworks*(toolkit), a never-completed Qt-like software widget toolkit*search, an evolutionary algorithm used in optimization problems*Harmony, a Java programming language Open source implementation*Project Harmony, a Canonical initiative about contributor agreements for Open Source software*ECMAScript Harmony, codename for the next version of the scripting language*(drawing tool), procedural-drawing tool by Ricardo CabelloMiscellaneous*harmony or harmony, long-distance assimilation in linguistics; see (linguistics)*Harmony (ISS module), a segment of the International Space Station*Harmony (Stargate Atlantis), an episode of the science fiction television series Stargate Atlantis*Airways, based in Vancouver, Canada*Gold (mining)*Gold USA, television and anime company*Science Academy*Society, pietist, communal, German-American religious group that existed from around 1805 to 1905*Game of Harmony, a 1990 title published by Accolade for Atari ST (and perhaps other platforms)*Harmony Remote, a universal remote*(horse), a racehorseSee also*School (disambiguation)ca:Harmony(rozcestnk)de:Harmony(desambiguacin)fr:Harmonyko:( )hr:Harmonijait:Harmonylv:Harmonijanl:Harmonyja:pl:Harmony(desambiguao)()sk:Harmony( )vi:Harmonyvo:Harmonyzh:
367843
Religion_in_China
File:Huxisanxiaotu.jpg|thumb|250px|right|laughs at Tiger Brook, Confucianism, Taoism, and Buddhism are one, a litang style painting portraying three men laughing by a river stream, 12th century, Dynasty.File:Famen temple 7.jpg|thumb|250px|right|The imposing stupa enshrining the relic of Buddhas finger bone, at Temple, a Buddhist complex in Baoji, Shaanxi.File:Mazu.jpg|thumb|200px|Statue of Mazu in Island, Fujian. Mazu is perhaps the most popular goddess in Southern Chinese provinces and Taiwan.Religion in China has been characterized by pluralism since the beginning of history. The Chinese religions are family-oriented and do not demand the exclusive adherence of members. Some scholars doubt the use of the term religion in reference to Buddhism and Taoism, and suggest cultural practices or thought systems as more appropriate names.(Taylor, Rodney L. Proposition and Praxis: The Dilemma of Neo-Confucian Syncretism. Philosophy of East and West, Vol. 32, No. 2 (Apr., 1982). pg. 187) The questions of what should be called religion or religious in China, and who should be called religious is up to debate.() Generally, the percentage of people who call themselves religious in China has been among the lowest in the world.Buddhism remains a main popular religion in China since its introduction in the 1st century; the largest group of religious traditions is however that of folk religion or Shenism, a term coined by A.J. Elliot,(http://www.questia.com/googleScholar.qst?docId5008625740) which he used to collectively name Chinese folk religions, as the ethnic religion of the Hans, which encompasses Taoism, and the worship of the shens, a collection of various local ethnic deities, heroes and ancestors, and figures from mythology, among which the most popular ones in recent years have been Mazu (goddess of the seas, patron of Southern China), Huangdi (divine patriarch of all the Chinese, Volksgeist of the Chinese nation),(Over 10,000 Chinese Worship Huangdi in Henan)(Compatriots across the strait honor their ancestry)(The Yan-huang Culture Festival and Worshiping Ceremony) the Black Dragon,(Return to folk religions brings about renewal in rural China. By Edward A. Gargan (Philadelphia Inquirer, September 14, 2001))(The Politics of Legitimation and the Revival of Popular Religion in Shaanbei, North-Central China)(Miraculous response: doing popular religion in contemporary China) Caishen (god of prosperity and richness),() and others.Although an established presence since the 7th century, in China declined as a result of persecution during the 10th through 14th centuries. It was reintroduced in the 16th century by Jesuit missionaries. In the 18th and 19th centuries, with the widespread influx of European ideology into China, Western religions gained a foothold, notably causing the Rebellion. While the Party of China came to power in 1949, it was regarded as an atheist faction which viewed traditional religions as backwards, and Western religions such as Christianity as the tool of Western colonialism, and has steadfastly maintained separation of church from state affairs(Separation of Church and State  Part 3/3) in order to prevent recurrence of situations like the Taiping Rebellion. After the opening up of the 1980s, more religious freedoms were granted, and traditional beliefs like Taoism and Buddhism were supported as an integral part of the Chinese culture.Nowadays Shenism-Taoism and Buddhism are the largest religions in China with respectively over 30%(Adherents.com)(Chinese Folk Religion Adherents by Country)(Asia Sentinel - How Now Tao?) (of which 160 millions, or 11% of the total population of the country, are Mazuists(Chinas Leaders Harness Folk Religion For Their Aims)) and 18-20%(Buddhism in China. By staff reporter ZHANG XUEYING)(Pew Forum: Religion in China on the Eve of the 2008 Beijing Olympics)(Prof: Christians remain a small minority in China today) of the population adhering to them, thriving throughout the country as the government is allowing them to spread.(Buddhism Thrives as China Relaxes Religious Policy. My Sinchew 2009.07.07.) Almost 10% of the population is composed of those regarded as non-Han ethnicities who following their traditional tribal religions.(http://www.hudong.com/wiki/%E5%B0%91%E6%95%B0%E6%B0%91%E6%97%8F)(Tribal Religion Adherents by Country) Christians are 3-4% of the population according to various detailed surveys,()(China Survey Reveals Fewer Christians than Some Evangelicals Want to Believe)(http://www.purdue.edu/newsroom/research/2010/100726T-YangChina.html)(2008 Pew Forum survey) although American press states there might be more due to the house church movement;(Fox News: Christianity Gaining Popularity in China) Muslims are 1-2%.(CIA  The World Factbook  China) The remaining section of the population, ranging between 40% and 60%, is mostly agnostic or non-religious; purely atheists are 14-15%.((Adherents.com)( Various religious movements, both indigenous and exogenous, are scattered across the country.(David Ownby. Falun Gong and the Future of China. Oxford University Press, 2008.) Confucianism as a religion is popular among intellectuals.(Kim Hwan-young. Revival of Confucianism could unify Asia Korea JoongAng Daily.)China has many of the worlds highest statues, and even the highest absolute one amongst all. Most of them represent buddhas, deities and religious personalities and have been built in the 2000s. The worlds tallest statue is the Temple Buddha, located in Henan. Recently built in the country are also the worlds tallest pagoda(Photo in the News: Tallest Pagoda Opens in China - National Geographic) and the worlds tallest stupa.(Buddha Relics Enshrined in Worlds Highest Pagoda)Ancient and Pre-historicPrior to the advent of Chinese civilization and religion in the region generally known today as Asia including the territorial boundaries of modern-day China; tribal or primal religious practices were the way in which prayers, sacrifices or offerings were communicated to the spiritual world by groups or mediatory individuals such as shamans.(http://www.omf.org/omf/uk/asia/religions/animism) Following the dawn of Chinese civilization, an early indigenous form of religious practice in Chinese history began to develop from the more primitive elements of animism, folk religions and Shamanism; known as Taoism,(http://factsanddetails.com/china.php?itemid85&catid3&subcatid8) and is considered a Traditional Chinese Religion along with Confucianism and other Chinese folk religions with a constituency of almost 400 million followers in China alone. Animism in China and Shamanism which has the longest recorded history in China,(http://www.tutorgig.com/ed/Shamanism) is still practiced formally by numerous ethnic groups around China, including the Chinese, but whose historic text and literature usually neglect this religious aspect of the Han peoples history.(http://website.leidenuniv.nl/~haarbjter/shamanism.htm)(http://people.cohums.ohio-state.edu/bender4/eall131/EAHReadings/module03/local_beliefs.html)(http://chinaperspectives.revues.org/5288)(http://www.yale.edu/seacrn/asia_members.htm)(http://www.china.org.cn/english/features/EthnicGroups/136932.htm)(http://english.peopledaily.com.cn/data/minorities/Xibe.html)Modern historyThe Republic of China was established October 1, 1949. Its government is officially atheist, having viewed religion as emblematic of feudalism and foreign colonialism, and maintained separation of state and the church. This changed during the Cultural Revolution, in 1966 and 1967. The Revolution led to a policy of elimination of religions; a massive number of places of worship were destroyed.(About.com: Agnosticism / Atheism  Religion in China: General Information)This policy relaxed considerably in the late 1970s at the end of the Cultural Revolution and more tolerance of religious expression has been permitted since the 1980s. The Constitution of the Peoples Republic of China guarantees freedom of religion  in Article 46.  The policy regarding religious practice in China states that No state organ, public organization or individual may compel citizens to believe in, or not to believe in, any religion; nor may they discriminate against citizens because they do, or do not believe in religion. The state protects normal religious activities, and continues with the statement that: nobody can make use of religion to engage in activities that disrupt social order, impair the health of citizens or interfere with the educational system of the state.(http://english.people.com.cn/92824/92845/92875/6442436.html) Since the mid-1980s there has been a massive program to rebuild Buddhist and Taoist temples. In recent times, the government has expressed support for Buddhism and Taoism, organizing the Buddhist Forum in 2006 and the International Forum on the Daodejing in 2007. The government sees these religions as an integral part of Chinese culture.(Harvard - Tacit Knowledge in Taoism and Its Influence on Chinese Culture)There are five recognized religions by the state, namely Buddhism, Taoism, Islam, Catholicism, and Protestantism.(White Paper-Freedom of Religious Belief in China) To some degree, the government also controls the institutions in the religions it recognizes.(http://www.npr.org/templates/story/story.php?storyId128644059) In October 2007, the new statute of China cites religion as an important element of citizens life.(WorldWide Religious News-China statute uses religion for first time) However, the Chinese government has also banned certain new religious movements.Temple economyScholars have studied how folk religion-based society, elastic and polytheistic in spirit, provided the groundwork for the development of dynamic grassroots capitalism with Chinese characteristics in Dynasty China and modern capitalism in contemporary Taiwan.(Council of Foreign Relations. Symposium on Religion and the Future of China: Religion, Civil Society, and Economic Life. June 11, 2008.)(Hill Gates - Robert P. Weller. Hegemony of Chinese Folk Ideologies. Sage Publications, 1987.)(Gordon Redding. The Spirit of Chinese Capitalism. Walter de Grutyer, 1990.)(Hill Gates. Chinas motor: one thousand years of petty-capitalism. Cornell University, 1996.) The revival of Chinese folk religion with its ritual economy or economy, studied by on-ground researches,(Graeme Lang, Lars Ragvald. Grasping the Revolution: Fieldwork on Religion in China. Department of Asian and International Studies, City University of Hong Kong. Retrieved 31st July 2011.) is also the key of the contemporary economic development in rural China.(Mayfair Mei-hui Yang (Director of Asian Studies, University of Sydney, Australia). Ritual Economy and Rural Capitalism with Chinese Characteristics. University of California Press. Retrieved 31st July 2011.)(Pui-lam Law. The Revival of Folk Religion and Gender Relationships in Rural China. Hong Kong Polytechnic University Press. Retrieved 31st July 2011.)DemographicsFile:AnShan01.jpg|thumb|250px|Jade Buddha, the largest jade statue in the world, in the interior of Jade Buddha Temple in City, Liaoning.File:Sineesche-paapen-0103-cropped.jpg|thumb|250px|A variety of Chinese priests and monks seen by Nieuhof between 1655 and 1658.Chinese Buddhists are evenly distributed across the whole country. Southern provinces are the stronghold of ethno-national Han Shenism thickly mingled with Zhengyi Southern Taoism. Chinese folk religion can also be found up through central provinces until it becomes sparse in the north-eastern zones (where Beijing is situated), which are largely secularized, the vast majority of their population being atheist and agnostic with significant proportions of Buddhists and Quanzhen Northern Taoists.Sichuan is a stronghold of Taoism in its various brands, covering the area where Tianshi Taoism developed and the Masters had their main seat. Christians are mostly concentrated in easternmost provinces and coastal areas, particularly in Zhejiang, Anhui, and generally in the Wu-speaking zone, curiously the areas which were most affected by the Taiping regime. Buddhism is the dominant religion in Tibet, other westernmost provinces where ethnic Tibetans constitute a significant amount of the population, and Mongolia in the north; it is also having a growing influence among ethnic Hans.(In China, A Different Brand of Buddhism - Ethnic Han Turning To Tibetan Doctrine For Guidance)(http://www.unhcr.org/refworld/pdfid/4b6fe1b70.pdf) Islam is the majority religion in the ethnic Hui areas, particularly Ningxia, and in the Uyghur province of Xinjiang. Many non-Han minority ethnic groups follow their own traditional ethnic religions (for example the Stone Religion, Moz and Dongbaism). Confucianism as a religion is popular among intellectuals.(A great diversity of religious movements are thriving across China.(Robin Munro. Detained in China and Tibet: a directory of political and religious prisoners. p. 269: list of proscribed Buddhist and Taoist-inspired sects.) The majority are indigenous, and into this group some are totally new whilst others were already active before the communist revolution in 1949, and are being re-introduced from Taiwan. The most relevant among these last are Yiguandao (and other sects within the Xiantianism category),(Yiguandao in China) Tiendery-Tientism,(Religions in Taiwan: Between Mercantilism and Millenarianism) Yaochidao and Zailiism;( among the very new ones the most notable are the various Qigong-inspired groups, such as Gong, Gong, Gong and Wang Gong, and Christian-inspired Taiping-style sects such as Zhushenism, Linglingism, Fuhuodao, Mentuhui and Lightning from the East.(Kristin Kupfer. Geheimgesellschaften in der VR China.)(Tony Lambert. Chinese cults target youth.) Other movements are allogenous in origin, for example the Faith.(Video: Chinese Bahais in 1985) All these movements are not recognised by the government, and most of them are regarded as cults; some are also banned and harshly repressed.(Robin Munro. Detained in China and Tibet: a directory of political and religious prisoners.)File:Altar to Zhuge Liang inside the ancestral temple in his hometown Yinan, Shandong, China.png|thumb|left|250px|Altar to Liang inside an ancestral temple in his hometown Yinan, Shandong.Image:Buddha inside new temple.jpg|thumb|left|250px|Modern-style temple in Qibao, Shanghai.StatisticsCommunist governments often suppress religious freedom and officially (often forcibly) endorse atheism. Due to this the relation between the Government and religions was not smooth in the past.(Top 50 Countries With Highest Proportion of Atheists / Agnostics (Zuckerman, 2005)Source: Zuckerman, Phil. Atheism: Contemporary Rates and Patterns, chapter in The Cambridge Companion to Atheism, ed. by Michael Martin, Cambridge University Press: Cambridge, UK (2005).) In recent years, the Chinese government has opened up to religion, especially traditional religions such as Mahayana Buddhism, Taoism and Shenism because the Government also continued to emphasize the role of religion in building a Harmonious Society, which was a positive development with regard to the Governments respect for religious freedom.(U.S. Department of States: International Religious Freedom Report 2007 - China (includes Tibet, Hong Kong, and Macau))According to an old Chinese government estimate, there were over 100 million followers of various faiths in China.(Religious beliefs) Other estimates put about 100 million or about 8% Chinese who follow Buddhism, with the second largest religion as Taoism (no data), Islam (19 million or 1.5%) and Christianity (14 million or 1%; 4 million Roman Catholics and 10 million Protestants).(China in Brief  china.org.cn) According to the 1993 edition of The Atlas of Religion, the number of atheists in China is between 10 and 14 percent.(OBrien, Joanne, and Palmer, Martin. The Atlas of Religion. University of California Press (Berkely, 1993) in Zuckerman, pg. 53)The accuracy of the religious data in China from census sources is questionable. While official data estimated 100 million religious believers in China, a survey taken by University found that 31.4% of people above the age of 16, or about 300 million people, considered themselves religious. The survey also found that the major religions are Buddhism, Taoism, Islam and Christianity, accounting for 67.4 percent of believers. About 200 million people are Buddhists, Taoists or worshippers of legendary figures such as the Dragon King and God of Fortune, accounting for 66.1 per cent of all believers, while Christianity accounted for 12% of believers, or 40 million people.(Survey finds 300 million China believers)(Religious Believers thrice the estimate) The official China Daily called the Shanghai professors research the countrys first major survey on religious beliefs.(Religious Believers Thrice The Official Estimate Poll. China Daily, February 7, 2007. Chinadaily.com.cn) The Chinese government have accepted these new numbers. The wide disparity among these estimates underscores the difficulty of accurately surveying the religious view of a nation of over a billion people and the lack of reliable data.Average data from various surveys put the total number of Chinese Buddhists at a growing 18% to 20% of the total population, or around 300 million people.((( However, some estimates suggest that the cultural adherents or even outright religious adherents of Buddhism could number as high as 50%, or about 660 million.(Buddhists in the world)(SEANET Work - Counting the Buddhist World Fairly, by Dr. Alex Smith (archived from the original on 2005-02-05).) Estimates for Shenism and Taoism put their intermingled membership at 300 to 400 million, or 20% to 30% of the total population.((Adherents.com - Major Religions Ranked by Size)The number of adherents of Buddhism and Chinese ethnic religions can also be overlaid in percentage because many Chinese consider themselves both Buddhist and Shenist-Taoist.(Religions and Beliefs in China)(SACU Religion in China)(Index-China Chinese Philosophies and religions)(The Diaspora Han Chinese)(U.S. Department of States  International Religious Freedom Report 2006: China (includes Tibet, Hong Kong, and Macau)) The minority religions are Christianity (between 40 million, 3%,( and 54 million, 4%(), Islam (20-30 million, 1.5%-2%), the traditional tribal religions of the non-Han ethnic groups (Moz, Stone Religion, Dongbaism, Bn),( Judaism, Hinduism, and a number of new religions and sects (particularly Xiantianism and Gong).According to the surveys of Phil Zuckerman on Adherents.com in 1993; there was 59% (over 700 million)( of the Chinese population was irreligious and 8% - 14% was atheist (from over 100 to 180 million) as of 2005.( There are intrinsic logistical difficulties in trying to count the number of religious people anywhere, as well as difficulties peculiar to China. According to Phil Zuckerman, low response rates, non-random samples, and adverse political/cultural climates are all persistent problems in establishing accurate numbers of religious believers in a given locality.(Zuckerman, Phil. Atheism: Contemporary Numbers and Patterns. In Martin, Michael The Cambridge Companion to Atheism. (New York: Cambridge University Press) 2006. pg. 47) Similar difficulties arise in attempting to subdivide religious people into sects. These issues are especially pertinent in China for two reasons. First, it is a matter of current debate whether some several important belief systems in China constitute religions. As Daniel L. Overmeyer writes, in recent years there has been a new appreciation...of the religious dimensions of Confucianism, both in its ritual activities and in the inward search for an ultimate source of moral order.(Overmeyer, Daniel L. et al. Introduction. The Journal of Asian Studies, Vol. 54, No. 2 (May, 1995). pp. 314-321) Many Chinese belief systems have concepts of a sacred and sometimes spiritual natural world yet do not always invoke a concept of god (with the exception of worship).(Ethel R. Nelson, Richard E. Broadberry, and Ginger Tong Chock. Gods Promise to the Chinese. p 8. ISBN 0-937869-01-5.)In 2010, according to an official survey conducted by the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences and published in the 2010 Bluebook Annual Report on Chinas Religions, the number of Protestants in China is 23.05 million, or 1.8% of the total population.(http://www.cathnewsindia.com/2010/08/13/faiths-in-turmoil-in-china-says-report/)(http://www.chinadaily.com.cn/usa/2010-08/12/content_11144948.htm)(http://designative.info/2010/08/19/living-in-china-over-23-million-christians/) At the same time, a survey conducted by sociologist Fenggang Yang (specialised in the study of religion in Chinese societies) and the Purdues Center on Religion and Chinese Society, revealed that 18% of the Chinese are Buddhist, 15% are non-religious and 3.2% are Christian.( These statistics are fairly similar to those reported by the 2008 Pew Forum survey.(2008 Pew Forum survey)Cultural backgroundFile:Confuciusstatue.jpg|thumb|200px|Statue of Confucius at a temple in Chongming, Shanghai.Confucius mores and moralsThe mores background of the people is deeply shaped by the Confucian philosophy (; Rujia). Confucius thought stresses ethical, moral and social values. This system of values is sometimes considered as the proper culture of the Chinese; consequently, for centuries it has targeted religious tendencies. According to the Confucian thought every culture should carry on its own primordial religion, which two main aspects are reverence for nature and for the ancient fathers; in the case of the Chinese it is the folk religion and Taoism compound, which pivotal element is the worship of ancestor gods. Confucianism arose during the 5th century BCE from the teachings of Confucius, collected under the name of the Analects. The Dynasty eventually made Confucianism the official state culture, along with Taoism which was the official religion.Confucian social and political system remained established until 1912, when it was rejected by the new of China and subsequently by the Republic of China. Since the 2000s(http://www.chinanews.cn/culture_education/2007-12-12/41982.html ) Confucianism have been experiencing a great revival in China, as it is supported by the central government. The Peoples Republic of China is establishing institutes for Confucian education all over the world.( The headquarter of all Institutes around the world locates in Beijing.(Confucius Institute Headquarters Founded in Beijing  china.org.cn) China has established 300 of such institutes as of 2010.(Daily Estimate. China: Confucius back in Beijing with a statue in Tiananmen Square.) With the recent rise of nationalism and conservatism among Chinese intellectuals, a growing number of them are converting to Confucianism and working to make it an institutional religion (see the relative section).(Fenggang Yang. Cultural Dynamics in China: Today and in 2020. Asia Policy, Number 4. July 2007. p. 48: Confucian Fundamentalism.)Veneration of AncestorsChinese of ancestors (, baizu; or , jingzu) dates back to the prehistory and is considered an integrant part of folk religion, and a mandatory practice in Confucianism. Chinese culture and religions all value piety as a top virtue and De, and the act is a continued display of piety and respect towards departed ancestors. The veneration of ancestors can even extend to legendary figures or historical, such as the founder of ones surname, virtuous individuals such as Confucius or Yu, or the mythological figures like Huangdi, the Yellow Emperor, considered the patriarch of all Chinese.The two major festivals involving ancestor veneration are the Festival and the Ninth Festival, but veneration of ancestors is conducted in many other ceremonies, including weddings, funerals, and triad initiations. Worshipers generally offer prayers in a Jingxiang rite, with food, light incense and candles, and burn offerings of paper. These activities are typically conducted at the site of ancestral graves or tombs, at an temple, or at a household shrine.Notable religionsFile:Altar to Guandi, Temple of Guandi, Jinan, Shandong, China.png|thumb|250px|Altar to Guandi at the Temple of Guandi of Jinan, Shandong.File:Wiki taijo 001.jpg|thumb|250px|Statues inside the temple of a Taizu deity (deified important ancestor) in Maoming, Guangdong.Chinese ethnic religionChinese folk religion (simplified Chinese:  or , pinyin: Zhongguo minjian zongjiao or Zhongguo minjian xinyang) or Shenism (Shenjiao, )(Reinventing Chinese Syncretic Religion: Shenism)(How we came to pai shen)(Religious diversity in Singapore) are labels used to describe the collection of ethnic religious traditions which have been the majority belief system in China and among Chinese ethnic groups for the most part of the civilizations history till today. Shenism comprises mythology and includes the worship of shens (, shn; deities, spirits, awarenesses, consciousnesses, archetypes) which can be nature deities, clan deities, city deities, national deities, cultural heroes and demigods, dragons and ancestors.It is sometimes considered a brand of Taoism, a Folk Taoism, since over the centuries institutional Taoism has been attempting to assimilate or administrate local religions; actually and more accurately Taoism can be defined as a branch of Shenism, since it sprang out of folk religion and philosophy. Chinese folk religion is sometimes seen as a constituent part of Chinese traditional religion, but more often, the two are regarded as synonymous. Unlike Taoism, the religious aspects found in Confucianism (worship of Confucius and his disciples, worship of Tian, rituals and sacrifices) never took independence form and have thus remained for centuries part of Shenism.With around 400 million adherents Chinese folk religion is one of the major religions in the world, comprising about 6% of world population.(( In China over 30% of the population adheres to Shenism or Taoism.(Despite being heavily suppressed during the last two centuries of the of China, from the Taiping Movement to the Revolution, it is now experiencing a revival(Unofficial Religion in China: Beyond the Partys Rules. Roundtable before the Congressional-Executive Commission on China. May 2005. p.36: revival of Chinese Ethnic Religion in Mainland China.)(Richard Madsen. The Upsurge of Religion in China. Journal of Democracy, Volume 21, Number 4. October 2010.) and is supported by the of the Peoples Republic of China, particularly in the forms of Mazuism in southern China (officially, about 160 million Chinese are Mazuists),( Huangdi worship,((( Black Dragon worship in Shaanxi,((( and Caishen worship.(Scholars have studied how Chinese folk religion-inspired society, elastic and polytheistic in spirit, provided the groundwork for the development of dynamic grassroots Chinese-style pre-modern capitalism in Dynasty China and modern capitalism in contemporary Taiwan.(Council of Foreign Relations. Symposium on Religion and the Future of China: Religion, Civil Society, and Economic Life. June 11, 2008.)(Hill Gates - Robert P. Weller. Hegemony of Chinese Folk Ideologies. Sage Publications, 1987.)(Gordon Redding. The Spirit of Chinese Capitalism. Walter de Grutyer, 1990.)(Hill Gates. Chinas motor: one thousand years of petty-capitalism. Cornell University, 1996.) Chinese folk religion with its ritual economy is also the key of the contemporary economic development in rural China.(Mayfair Mei-hui Yang (Director of Asian Studies, University of Sydney, Australia). Ritual Economy and Rural Capitalism with Chinese Characteristics. University of California Press. Retrieved 31st July 2011.)(Pui-lam Law. The Revival of Folk Religion and Gender Relationships in Rural China. Hong Kong Polytechnic University Press. Retrieved 31st July 2011.)left|thumb|250px|Prayer plaques in a Confucian temple.Religious ConfucianismReligious Confucianism ( Rujiao, Religion of the Scholars; or  Kongjiao, Religion of Confucius) is a relatively new and still numerically small phenomenon, limited to the Chinese intelligentsia. Nevertheless, being well embedded in the Chinese academia, in recent years it has become very influential.Whether Confucianism is a religion or not has been debated for more than one hundred years.( Religious aspects promoted by Confucianism include the establishment of temples for ancestral worship of Confucius and his disciples, knowledge and worship of Tian, ritual and sacrifice; however, over the centuries Confucianism never developed an official institutional structure as Taoism did, and its religious aspects never completely detached from folk religion.Since 2003 the debate seems to have taken a turn.( Large numbers of intellectuals and students are converting to Confucianism,( making it a strong intellectual force.( A more and more influent movement among them is working to turn Confucianism into a religion (and a movement of its own, independent from the Chinese folk religion), to obtain recognisation by the Chinese government, and even make Confucianism the official state religion of China. Scholar Fenggang Yang calls this movement Confucian Fundamentalism.(In 2003 the Confucian intellectual Kang Xiaoguang published a cultural nationalist manifesto in which he made four suggestions: Confucian education must enter official education at any level, from elementary to high school; the state must establish Confucianism as the state religion by law; Confucian religion must enter the daily life of ordinary people through standardization and development of doctrines, rituals, organisations, churches and activity sites; the Confucian religion must be spread through NGOs.(All the suggestions appear to be being gradually implemented. Since the Jiashen Manifesto published in 2004, intellectuals are calling for a return to the Chinese traditional culture. The Government has since then supported the revival of the Chinese traditional religions, holidays and celebrations. In 2005 the for the Study of Confucian Religion was established, and scholars who criticised Confucianism as a religion lost their influence.( Also in 2005 Guoxue education started to be implemented in schools of any level. Being well received by the population, even Confucian televangelists started to appear on television since 2006.(The most enthusiast and cultural nationalist and conservatist Confucian Fundamentalists proclaim the uniqueness and superiority of Confucian Chinese culture, and have generated some popular sentiment against Western cultural influences in China.( In January 2011 a statue of Confucius was unveiled on Square.(WantChinaTimes. Confucius Returns To China.)(Shanghaiist. Confucius statue unveiled near Tiananmen Square.)TaoismFile:Xuanmiaoguan.JPG|thumb|250px|Temple, a Taoist complex in Suzhou, Jiangsu.File:Changchun-Temple-TaiQingDian-TaiShangLaoJun-0308.jpg|thumb|200px|Altar to Laozi as Daode Tianjun (Lord of the Way and the Virtue) and the Pure Ones at Changchun Temple, Wuhan, Hubei.Taoism (; Daojiao in Chinese) refers to a variety of related philosophical and religious traditions and concepts, born in China itself in the 6th century BCE and ity traditionally traced to the composition of the Te Ching attributed to the sage Laozi, a person who subsequently came to be venerated by Taoist as Daode Tianjun in the Pure Ones. Taoist thought focuses on health, longevity, immortality, wei (non-action) and spontaneity. These traditions have influenced Asia for over two thousand years and some have spread internationally.(Miller (2003), p. ix.)Reverence for nature and ancestor spirits is common in popular Taoism. Organized Taoism distinguishes its ritual activity from that of the folk religion, which some professional Taoists (Daoshi) view as debased. alchemy, astrology, cuisine, several martial arts, traditional medicine, fengshui, and many styles of qigong breath training disciplines are intertwined with Taoism throughout history.Taoism was established as a religion in the late Eastern Dynasty (25-220). During the and Southern Dynasties (386-589), Neo-Taoism adopted concepts and methods from its rival, Buddhism. Some emperors supported it for political reasons while many educated men and women were attracted by its beauty and power. Taoism experienced its silver age from the Dynasty (618-907) to the Song Dynasty (960-1127). Many sects arose during this period. Taoist temples and Taoist masters spread throughout China. After the Dynasty (12711368), Taoism divided into two main sects: Quanzhen and Dao.(Travel China Guide - Taoism History)Taoism gradually developed with the support of the rulers. However, during the Dynasty (13681644), national conflicts sapped the energy and support for Taoism. In the Dynasty (16441911), the Manchu rulers adopted Tibetan Buddhism and lost interest in Taoism.( After 1949, The Republic of China found Taoism detrimental to socialist reconstruction while permitting some practical arts linked to Taoism, such as the use of traditional herbal medicines.( Judith A. Berling, Taoism, or the Way, at: http://www2.kenyon.edu/Depts/Religion/Fac/Adler/Reln270/Berling-Taoism.htm) In 1956 a national organization, the Taoist Association (with chapters in every province and city) was set up to administer Taoist activities.Banned during the Cultural Revolution (along with all other religions), Taoism is undergoing a major revival today.(Rebirth of Taoism fills spiritual void in rush to consumerism) Both the Taoist Association and the Taoist Association (local chapters of the Chinese Taoist Association) report their own membership to number over 100 million individuals.(http://goliath.ecnext.com/coms2/gi_0199-6375255/The-history-of-two-Taoist.html) Shenism, which includes Taoism, is estimated to be the largest religion in China with 20-30%(( of the total population worshiping Shenist ethnic deities or adhering to Taoist institutions.In April 2007, China took place the Forum on the Daodejing, during which celebrities and government officials expressed will to support Taoism as one of the foundations of culture.(The Way of Harmony: International Forum on the Daodejing - News) Chinese Taoist clergy is organizing missionary systems to spread the spirituality around the world.((Keen Zhang. Academics to promote oriental wisdom of Daoism. China.org.cn, November 11, 2009.)BuddhismFile:GoldenSummit.JPG|thumb|250px|Golden Temple at the summit of Shan, in Sichuan. Emei Shan is one of the Four Sacred Mountains of Chinese Buddhism.File:Litang11.jpg|thumb|250px|Altar inside Monastery, a Buddhist complex in Tibet.Buddhism (called , Fojiao) was introduced from India during the Dynasty, traditionally in the 1st century. It became very popular among Chinese of all walks of life, admired by commoners, and sponsored by emperors in certain dynasties. It is estimated that by the 9th century Buddhist institutions had become the most powerful of China, surpassing the Taoist ones and challenging the authority of the government.This led to the so called Anti-Buddhist Persecution, which saw Buddhism repressed. Although the persecution was heavy, Buddhism survived and reflourished in the following centuries. It experienced important developments at the time of some Chinese dynasties, such as and Northern Dynasties, Dynasty, Dynasty, Dynasty, and others. Buddhism is deeply embedded in the of China, philosophy, and in Chinese pop culture today.The entry of Buddhism into China was marked by interaction and syncretism with Taoism in particular.(Maspero, Henri. Translated by Frank A. Kierman, Jr. Taoism and Chinese Religion. pg 46. University of Massachusetts, 1981.) Originally seen as a kind of foreign Taoism, Buddhisms scriptures were translated into Chinese using the Taoist vocabulary.(Prebish, Charles. Buddhism: A Modern Perspective. Pg 192. Penn State Press, 1975. ISBN 0271011955.) Chan Buddhism was particularly shaped by Taoism, integrating distrust of scripture, text and even language, as well as the Taoist views of embracing this life, dedicated practice and the every-moment.(Dumoulin, Heinrich, Heisig, James W. & Knitter, Paul. Zen Buddhism: A History (India and China). Pp 68, 70-73, 167-168. World Wisdom, Inc, 2005. ISBN 0941532895.) In the period Taoism incorporated such Buddhist elements as monasteries, vegetarianism, prohibition of alcohol, the doctrine of emptiness, and collecting scripture into tripartite organisation. During the same time, Chan Buddhism grew to become the largest sect in Chinese Buddhism.(Dumoulin, Heinrich, Heisig, James W. & Knitter, Paul. Zen Buddhism: A History (India and China). Pp 166-167, 169-172. World Wisdom, Inc, 2005. ISBN 0941532895.)Buddhism was not universally welcomed, particularly among the gentry. The Buddhas Dharma seemed alien and amoral to conservative and Confucian sensibilities.(Dumoulin, Heinrich, Heisig, James W. & Knitter, Paul. Zen Buddhism: A History (India and China). Pp 189-190, 268-269. World Wisdom, Inc, 2005. ISBN 0941532895.) Confucianism promoted social stability, order, strong families, and practical living, and Chinese officials questioned how a monks monasticism and personal attainment of nirvana benefited the empire.( However, Buddhism and Confucianism eventually reconciled after centuries of conflict and assimilation.(Moore, Charles Alexander. The Chinese Mind: Essentials of Chinese Philosophy and Culture. Pp 133, 147. University of HawaiiPress. 1967. ISBN 0824800753.)With the rise of Peoples Republic of China in 1949 Buddhism was banned and many temples and monasteries destroyed. Restrictions lasted until the 1980s. The Association of China was founded in 1953. In recent times, Buddhism has recovered popularity and it is returned to be the largest organized faith in the country. While estimates of the number of Buddhists in China range widely, Chinese government statistics estimates the number of Buddhists at 100 million.(Buddhists praised for contributions)Today the most popular form of Buddhism in China is a mix of the Pure Land and Chn schools. The most recent surveys put the total number of Chinese Buddhists at a growing 18% to 20% of the total population, or around 300 million people,((( thus making China the country with the most Buddhist adherents in the world, followed by Japan. Other sources claim the Chinese Buddhists to be over 660 million people (50%).((((Counting the Buddhist World Fairly, by Dr. Alex Smith) However, it is difficult to estimate accurately the number of Buddhists because many Chinese Mahayanists identify themselves as Taoist (Taoism is a major branch of traditional religion) and Buddhist at the same time.Buddhism is growing fast among successful urban professional people.(Chinas Spiritual Awakening) The vast majority of Chinese Buddhists are Mahayana; while minority are Vajrayana, among them Tibetans, Mongols, and Manchu who traditionally follow their Buddhism, and small communities of Theravada also exist among the minority ethnic groups live in southern provinces as Yunnan and Guangxi which border Burma, Thailand and Laos.Buddhism is supported by the government. The 108-metre-high Statue of Hainan was enshrined on April 24, 2005 with the participation of 108 eminent monks from various Buddhist groups in Hong Kong, Macao and Mainland China, and tens of thousands of pilgrims. The delegation also included monks from the Theravada and Vajrayana traditions.(Giant Buddhist Statue Enshrined in Hainan)(Holy statue of Guanyin Buddha unveiled) China is one of the countries which own many of the worlds highest Buddhist statues.In April 2006 China organized the Buddhist Forum and in March 2007 the government banned mining on Buddhist sacred mountains.() In May of the same year, in Changzhou, worlds tallest pagoda was built and opened.()(Photo in the News: Tallest Pagoda Opens in China)(China inaugurates worlds tallest pagoda - INQUIRER.net, Philippine News for Filipinos) In March 2008 the Taiwan-based Chi Foundation was approved to open a branch in China.(Tzu Chi Foundation Approved To Open Branch In Mainland China - ChinaCSR.com - Corporate Social Responsibility (CSR) News and Information for China)In 2010 remains of the skull of Buddha have been unveiled and enshrined as relics (sarira) at Temple in Nanjing.(Buddha remains unveiled in east China temple - Xinhua)(Buddha remains unveiled in East China temple - China Daily) A famed historical pagoda-tower destroyed a century and a half ago is being rebuilt to host the relic.(World-famed tower to enshrine Buddha remains) Yet in 2009 Gautama Buddhas fingerbone relic was enshrined in a world tallest stupa recently built within the domains of Temple, in Shaanxi.(However, some restrictions of Buddhism are due to controversies about its hierarchy, and the issue of the succession of Gyatso the current 14th Lama (who wasnt invited to the World Buddhist Forum). Tenzin Gyatso  who was not only the spiritual leader of Gelug Buddhism, the major branch of Tibetan Buddhism, but also the sovereign of Tibet  is in exile, and China currently intends to elect its own 15th Dalai Lama. In August 2007 China has prohibited the reincarnation of Tibetan buddhas without permission of the government, thus limiting the influence of Tenzin Gyatso on new Gelug Buddhist monks.()ChristianityImage:Xujiahui kathedrale.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Ignatius Cathedral of Shanghai.File:HarbinNangangChurch1.jpg|thumb|right|250px|A Protestant church in Harbin, Heilongjiang.Image:Lords Prayer in Chinese.jpg|thumb|left|160px|The Lords Prayer in Chinese, 1889.Image:HongKong_StMarysChurch.jpg|thumb|200px|St. Marys Anglican Church, in Kong (Special Administrative Region of China).Christianity () in China comprises Protestants (), Catholics (), and a small number of Christians. Christianity has been a growing minority religion for over 200 years.(Austin, (2007)) Growth has been more significant since the loosening of restrictions on religion after the 1970s within the Peoples Republic. Religious practices are still often tightly controlled by government authorities. Currently, Chinese over age 18 in the PRC are permitted to be involved with officially sanctioned Christian meetings through the Patriotic Movement or the Catholic Patriotic Association.( p.165) Many Chinese Christians who want to avoid the state-controlled religious movements meet in unregistered house churches  risking fines, imprisonment, torture, and even, in some cases, death.()Christianity had existed in China as early as the 7th century AD, having multiple cycles of strong presence for hundreds of years at a time, disappearing for hundreds of years, and then being re-introduced. The arrival of the Persian missionary Alopen in 635, during the early part of the dynasty, is considered by some to be the first entry of the Christian religion into China. What Westerners referred to as Nestorian Christianity flourished for hundreds of years, until Emperor Wuzong of the Tang dynasty adopted anti-religious measures in 845, expelling Buddhism, Christianity, and Zoroastrianism and confiscating their considerable assets. Christianity again came to China in the 13th century during the Mongol-established dynasty, when the Mongols brought Nestorianism back to the region, and contacts began with the Papacy, such as Franciscan missionaries in 1294. When the native Chinese dynasty overthrew the Yuan dynasty in the 14th century, Christians were again expelled from China.At the end of the Ming dynasty in the 16th century, Jesuits arrived in Beijing via Guangzhou. The most famous of the Jesuit missionaries was Ricci, an Italian mathematician who came to China in 1588 and lived in Beijing in 1600. Ricci was welcomed at the imperial court and introduced Western learning into China. The Jesuits followed a policy of accommodation to the traditional Chinese practice of worship, but this doctrine was eventually condemned by the Pope. Roman Catholic missions struggled in obscurity for decades afterwards.Christianity began to take root in a significant way in the Chinese Empire during the Dynasty, and although it has remained a minority religion in China, it has had significant recent historical impact. Further waves of missionaries came to China in the Dynasty as a result of contact with foreign powers. Orthodoxy was introduced in 1715 and Protestants began entering China in 1807. The pace of missionary activity increased considerably after the Opium War in 1842. Christian missionaries and their schools, under the protection of the Western powers, went on to play a major role in the Westernization of China in the 19th and 20th centuries.The Rebellion was influenced to some degree by Christian teachings, and the Rebellion was in part a reaction against Christianity in China. Christians in China established the first modern clinics and hospitals,(Gulick, (1975) pp. 561-562) and provided the first modern training for nurses. Both Roman Catholics and Protestants founded numerous educational institutions in China from the primary to the university level. Some of the most prominent Chinese universities began as religious-founded institutions. Missionaries worked to abolish practices such as binding,(Burgess, (1957) pp. 47) and the unjust treatment of maidservants, as well as launching charitable work and distributing food to the poor. They also opposed the opium trade( and brought treatment to many who were addicted. Some of the early leaders of the Republic, such as Yat-sen were converts to Christianity and were influenced by its teachings.The subject of Chinas Christian population is controversial. The government of the Republic of China census enumerated 4 million Roman Catholics and 10 million Protestants.((How To Count The Number Of Christians In China) However, independent estimates have ranged from 40 million to 54 million Christians in China as the most common and reliable numbers.((BBC NEWS | Asia-Pacific | Survey finds 300m China believers)(CIA - The World Factbook - China) Between 1949-2007, indigenous Chinese Christianity has been growing.( p.164)(Counting Christians in China: a cautionary report. Industry & Business Article - Research, News, Information, Contacts, Divisions, Subsidiaries, Business Associations) Most of the growth has taken place in the unofficial house church movement.IslamImage:YinchuanMosque.jpg|left|thumb|200px|Mosque in Yinchuan, Ningxia.File:5848-Linxia-Yu-Baba-Gongbei-general-view.jpg|thumb|left|200px|The gongbei (shrine) of the Sufi master Baba in City, Gansu.Islam (called , Yisilanjiao or  Huijiao) dates to a mission in 651, only eighteen years after the Muhammads death, by an envoy led by ibn Abi Waqqas, the uncle of Muhammad himself.(BBC Islam in China (650-present)) The Gaozong Emperor showed esteem for Islam and established the Mosque, or Memorial Mosque, in memory of the Prophet.( While modern historians say that there is no evidence for Waqqs himself ever coming to China,(Lipman, Jonathan Newman. Familiar Strangers, a history of Muslims in Northwest China. page 25. University of Washington Press, 1997. ISBN 0-295-97644-6.) they do believe that Muslim diplomats and merchants arrived to Tang China within a few decades from the beginning of Muslim Era.(Muslims went to China to trade, virtually dominated the import and export industry by the time of the Dynasty, while the office of Director General of Shipping was consistently held by a Muslim.((Islamic culture in China) Larger immigration began when hundreds of thousands of Muslims were relocated to help to administer China during the Dynasty.(Islamic Education in China) A Muslim, Yeheidieerding led the construction of the Yuan capital of Khanbaliq, in present-day Beijing.(Gernet, Jacques. A History of Chinese Civilization. 2. New York: Cambridge University Press, 1996.ISBN 0-521-49712-4) During the Dynasty, Muslims continued their influence on government. Six of the founder of Ming Dynasty, Zhu Yuanzhangs most trusted generals were Muslim, including Lan Yu who led a decisive victory over the Mongols, effectively ending the Mongol dream to re-conquer China. The Emperor hired He, Chinas foremost explorer, to lead seven expeditions to the Ocean. Muslims who were descended from earlier immigration began to assimilate by speaking Chinese dialects and by adopting Chinese names and culture. This era, sometimes considered the Age of Islam in China,( also saw Nanjing become an important center of Islamic study.(Looking East: The challenges and opportunities of Chinese Islam)The rise of the Dynasty (16441911) saw numerous rebellions. The Qing rulers belonged to the Manchu, a minority in China. The Muslim revolt in the northwest occurred due to violent and bloody infighting between Muslim sects, the Gedimu, Khafiya, and Jahariyya, while the rebellion in Yunnan occurred because of repression by Qing officials. resulted in five bloody Hui rebellions, most notably the Rebellion, which occurred in Yunnan province from 1855 to 1873, and the Dungan revolt, which occurred mostly in Xinjiang, Shensi and Gansu, from 1862 to 1877. The Manchu government ordered the execution of all rebels killing a million people in the rebellion,() several million in the Dungan revolt( However, many Muslims like Zhanao, Anliang, Fuxiang, Qianling, and Julung defected to the Qing dynasty side, and helped the Qing general Zuo Zongtang exterminate the Muslim rebels. These Muslim generals belonged to the Khafiya sect, and they helped Qing massacre Jahariyya rebels. General Zuo moved the han around hezhou out of the area and relocated them as a reward for the Muslims there helping Qing kill other Muslim rebels.In 1895, another Revolt (1895) broke out, and loyalist Muslims like Fuxiang, Anliang, Guoliang, Fulu, and Fuxiang suppressed and massacred the rebel Muslims led by Dahan, Yonglin, and Wanfu. A Muslim army called the Braves led by General Fuxiang fought for the Qing dynasty against the foreigners during the Rebellion. They included well known Generals like Anliang, Fulu, and Fuxiang.After the fall of the Dynasty, Yat Sen, proclaimed that the country belonged equally to the Han, Manchu, Mongol, Tibetan and people. In the 1920s the provinces of Qinhai, Gansu and Ningxia came under the control of Muslim Governors/Warlords known as the clique. These Muslims served as Military Generals in the Revolutionary Army and were members of the ruling Kuomintang party of the of China.During Maoist rule, in the Revolution, mosques were often defaced, destroyed or closed and copies of the Quran were destroyed along with temples, churches, monasteries, and cemeteries by the Red Guards.(Goldman,Merle (1986). Religion in Post-Mao China, The Annals of the American Academy of Political and Social Science. 483.1:145-56)(Muslims in China)Today Islam is experiencing a revival. There is an upsurge in Islamic expression and many nation-wide Islamic associations have organized to co-ordinate inter-ethnic activities among Muslims. Muslims are found in every province in China. Of Chinas 55 officially recognized minorities, ten groups are predominately Muslim. Statistics are hard to find, and the number of Muslims in China today is somewhere between 20 to 100 million by one source.( But most estimates figures that there are 20 to 30 million Muslims (1.5% to 2% of the population).((China (includes Hong Kong, Macau, and Tibet))(China Muslim Silaturrahim)(China Daily - NW China region eyes global Muslim market)(Muslim Media Network) while according to government figures, there are 20 million Muslims (1.4%)( with 35,000 Islamic places of worship, and more than 45,000 imams. In 2006 a record number of Chinese traveled to Mecca for the hajj, up 40 percent from the previous year.(4 Chinese Muslims die during Haj)JudaismJudaism (called , Youtaijiao in Chinese) was introduced during the Dynasty (between the 7th and the 10th century) or earlier, by small groups of Jews settled in China. The most prominent early community was at Kaifeng, in Henan province (Jews). In the 20th century many Jews arrived in Kong, Shanghai, and Harbin during those cities periods of economic expansion in the first decades of the century, as well as for the purpose of seeking refuge from anti-Semitic pogroms in Empire (the early 1900s), the communist revolution and civic war in Russia (19171918), and anti-Semitic Nazi policy in Central Europe, chiefly in Germany and Austria (19371940), and the last wave from Poland and other Eastern European countries (the early 1940s).(Encyclopedia of Diasporas. Immigrant and Refugee Cultures Around the World. Vol. I, Jewish Diaspora in China by Xu Xin, pp.152-163, Ember, Melvin; Ember, Carol R.; Skoggard, Ian (Eds.), Springer 2004, ISBN 0306483211)Shanghai was particularly notable for its volume of Jewish refugees (Ghetto), most of whom left after the war, the rest relocating prior to or immediately after the establishment of the Peoples Republic. Today, the Kaifeng Jewish community is functionally extinct. Many descendants of the Kaifeng community still live among the Chinese population, mostly unaware of their Jewish ancestry. Meanwhile, remnants of the later arrivals maintain communities in Shanghai and Kong. In recent years a community has also developed in Beijing, especially by Chabad-Lubavitch.More recently, since the late 20th century, along with the study of religion in general, the study of Judaism and Jews in China as an academic subject has begun to blossom (i.e. of Jewish Studies (Nanjing), China Judaic Studies Association).(China Judaic Studies Association)Non-Han indigenous religionsFile:Narshi Gonpa Ngawa Sichuan China.jpg|thumb|250px|The Gompa, a Bnpo monastery in Aba, Sichuan.Besides Chinese practicing their ethnic Shenism, various Chinese non-Han minority ethnicities have retained their own ethnic religions. An estimate puts the number of followers of these tribal religions at roughly 60 million, or 4% of the whole Mainland Chinese population (its not clear whether the figure includes Tibetan and Theravada Buddhists).( The of the Peoples Republic of China promotes and protects the tribal religions of minority nations as pivotal expression of their identity.Numerically, the most significant tribal religion is that of the Zhuang, a people inhabiting the Zhuang Autonomous Region of Guangxi. About 80-90% out of 18 million of the Zhuang follow their ethnic faith, Moz (Chinese: , Mojiao).(http://www.chinatravel.com/facts/chinese-ethnic-groups/zhuang-ethnic-minority-.htm Zhuang Ethnic Minority) It is a polytheistic, animistic and shamanic system codified into a mythology and a sacred scripture, the Epic. A very similar religion of the same name is adhered to by the Zhuang-related Buyei people.Bn (Tibetan: ; called , Benjiao by the Chinese) is the oldest spiritual tradition of Tibet, dominant before the introduction of Buddhism. The Bnpo religion is traditionally considered founded by the mythical figure of Shenrab Miwoche. With the spread of Buddhism, Bn incorporated styles, iconography and clergy system of the new religion, whereas remaining a distinguished tradition. Simultaneously, Bnpo elements combined with original Buddhism gave origin to Buddhism. An estimated 10% of Tibetans follow Bn.The traditional religion of the Qiang people (200.000, most residing in north-western Sichuan) has been recently systematised into the so-called Stone Religion following competition by institutional Taoism and Buddhism. Nowadays most of the Qiang follow it, a system which is mainly animistic and pantheistic, focusing on the worship of nature.(Qiang Ethnic Group) In the White Stone Religion white stones are symbols of the Qiang gods, particularly the God of Heaven, the God of Earth, the God of the Mountains, the God of the Trees and the Goddess of the Mountains.(The shaman and the white stone -characteristics of Qiang religion)Dongbaism (, Dongbajiao in Chinese) is the primary religion of the Nakhi people. About two-thirds of today Nakhis (200.000 on 300.000) are Dongbaists. Although it has remained exclusive to the Nakhis, the Dongbaist religion is not considered native by scholars. Deep similarities between Dongbaist practices and the Bnpo ones seem to proof that Dongbaism arose roughly during the 11th or 12th century. Bnpos are considered to have settled among the Nakhis spreading their religion; Dongbaism eventually originated by the combination of Bn with Nakhi native beliefs. Dongbaists worship nature, personified by human-snake-chimera creatures called Shv or Shu.In the Moz, Qiang and Dongbaist religions, as well as in the tribal religions of other minorities, structures similar to those of Taoism are identifiable, particularly in the clergy system. Ritual specialists of these religions are very similar in social function to Taoist masters. This is because in imperial times, the Chinese central governments sent Taoist missionaries to national minorities in Southern China in order to incorporate their religions into official institutional Taoism, expanding and establishing governmental power.New religious movementsFile:Qigong taiji meditation.jpg|thumb|250px|Dynasty era fragments representing Qigong practices.Image:Temple of Heaven, Beijing, China - 001.jpg|thumb|250px|The Round Mound Altar, the altar proper at the of Heaven in Beijing, where the Emperor communed with Heaven.A great diversity of religious movements are thriving across China.( The majority are indigenous, and into this group some are totally new whilst others were already active before the communist revolution in 1949, and are being re-introduced from Taiwan. The most relevant among these last are Yiguandao (and other sects within the Xiantianism category),( Tiendery-Tientism,( Yaochidao and Zailiism.(Among the very new ones the most notable are the various Qigong-inspired groups, such as Gong, Gong, Gong and Gong, and Christian-inspired Taiping-style sects such as Zhushenism, Linglingism, Fuhuodao, Mentuhui and Lightning from the East.(( Other movements are allogenous in origin, for example the Faith.(Other religionsHeaven worshipThe Heaven worship was the bureaucratic belief system subscribed to by most dynasties of China until the overthrow of the Dynasty. It was a panentheistic system, centering on the worship of Tian (the Heaven) as an omnipotent force. This religious system predated Taoism, Confucian thought and the introduction of Buddhism and Christianity; its dogmas supported the basements of the imperial hierarchy.It had monotheistic features in that Heaven was seen as an omniscient entity, endowed with personality but no corporeal form. Heaven as a monotheistic god was variously referred to as Shangdi (literally Lord Above). Worship of Heaven included the erection of temples, the last and greatest being the of Heaven in Beijing, and the offering of prayers. Heaven was believed to manifest itself through the powers of the weather and natural disasters. No iconographies were permitted in Heaven worship. Heaven was seen as a judge of humans. Especially evil people were believed to be killed by Heaven through lightning, with their crimes inscribed on their (burnt) spines.From the writings of Confucius, we find that Confucius himself believed that Heaven cannot be deceived, Heaven guides peoples lives and maintains a personal relationship with them, and that Heaven gives tasks for people to fulfill to teach them righteousness (yi, ).( However, this faith system was not truly monotheistic since other lesser gods and spirits, which varied with locality, were also worshiped along with Shangdi. Still, variants such as Mohism approached high monotheism, teaching that the function of lesser gods and ancestral spirits is merely to carry out the will of Shangdi, which included observing universal love (jianai, ) and shunning fatalism.After the advent of Taoism and Buddhism, Heaven monotheism faded in popular belief. However, some of its concepts remained in use throughout the premodern period. These concepts, often influenced heavily by Confucian theory, include the of Heaven, the Emperors role as Son of Heaven, and the legitimate overthrow of a dynasty when its mandate ended. These structures actually consolidated the authority of the Emperor.Emperors who favoured Taoism and Buddhism neglecting the worship of Heaven were often seen as anomalous. Elements were also incorporated in folk religion. Execution by lightning, for example, became one of the roles of the thunder gods. The concept of the almighty Heaven remained in popular expressions. Where an Anglophone would say Oh my God or Thank God, a Chinese person might say Oh Heaven ( or ) or Thank the heavens and the earth ().ManichaeismManichaeism (called , Monijiao), an religion, entered China between the 6th century and the 8th century due to contacts between the Dynasty and states of Asia, particularly Tokharistan.(Sammuel Lieu. Manichaeism in China. The Circle of Ancient Iranian Studies.) In 731, a Manichaean priest was asked by the Chinese Emperor to realize a summary of the religions teachings. He wrote the Compendium of the Teachings of Mani the Buddha of Light. The Tang government approved Manichaeism to be practiced by foreigners but prohibited preaching among Chinese people.(A turning point occurred in 762 with the conversion of Khan of the Uyghurs.( Since 755, the Chinese Empire had been weakened by the Shi Rebellion, and the Uyghurs had become the only fighting force serving the Tang Dynasty. Bogu Khan encouraged Manichaeism to spread in China. Manichaean temples were established in the two capitals, Changan and Luoyang, as well as in several other cities in the Northern and Central China.(The decay of Uyghur power in 840 brought the closure of many Manichaean institutions.( Wuzong of Tang started the Anti-Buddhist Persecution, which was not exclusively against Buddhism but extended to all foreign religions. The religion was severely suppressed, but didnt die out. During the period of the Dynasties, it re-emerged as a popular underground phenomenon, particularly in Southern China.(In 1120, a rebellion led by Xi was believed to be caused by adherents of underground religious communities, whose meeting places were said to host political protests. This event brought crackdowns of unauthorized religious congregations and destruction of scriptures. In 1280, the Mongol rule gave a century of freedom to Manichaeism,( but, in 1368, the Dynasty started new persecutions.( The religion gradually collapsed, eventually dying out during the following centuries.HinduismFile:longmen-apsara-near-jingshansidong.jpg|right|thumb|250px|An apsara from the Longmen Grottoes in Luoyang, China. Hinduism is a minor religion in Peoples Republic of China, with roughly about 130,000 followers and composing only of 0.01% of Chinas total population.Some examples of influence by Hinduism on ancient Chinese religion included the belief of Six Schools or Six Doctrines as well as use of Yoga, stupas (later became pagoda in East Asia). However, in China, Hinduism has never gained much popularity, unlike the beliefs of Buddhism.There was a small Hindu community in China, mostly situated in southeastern China. A late 13th-century bilingual Tamil and Chinese-language inscription has been found associated with the remains of a Shiva temple in Quanzhou. This was one of possibly two south Indian-style Hindu temples that were built in the southeastern sector of the old port, where the foreign traders enclave was formerly located.ZoroastrianismZoroastrianism (called , Suoluoyasidejiao, or , Xianjiao) expanded in Northern China during the 6th century via the Road. It gained the status of an official religion in some Chinese regions. Zoroastrian temples have been found in Kaifeng and Zhenjiang. According to some scholars, they remained active until the 12th century, when the religion started to fade from the Chinese landscape.See also* Confucianism* Neo-Confucianism* Confucianism* worship;Main religions* in China* in China* in China* folk religion* Taoism;Pre-modern religions* worship* Wonderism;Other religions* Bn* Dongbaism* Xiantianism* Gong* in China* in China;Concepts* and po* of the people;Other areas* in Taiwan* in Hong Kong* in MacauReferencesFurther reading* * *De Groot, J.J.M. (Jan Jakob Maria), The Religious System of China: Its Ancient Forms, Evolution, History and Present Aspect, Manners, Customs and Social Institutions Connected Therewith, Publishers, Leiden, The Netherlands, 1892-1910. 6 volumes.* * *Manchao, Cheng, The Origin of Chinese Deities, Foreign Languages Press, Beijing, 1995. ISBN 7-119-00030-6** ** * Yao and Yanxia Zhao, Chinese Religion (Continuum, 2010)* Yang, CK., Religion in Chinese Society (California U. Press, 1970)* Zrcher, E. The Buddhist Conquest of China. (E. J. Brill, Leiden, 1972)* Albert A. Dalia, Medieval Chinese fantasy novel, Dream of the Dragon Pool - A Daoist Quest, http://www.aadalia.comExternal links* China Temples Network* China Kongzi Network* Chinese Confucian Network** Chinese Confucian Networks Taoist Section* China Kongzi Anniversary* Confucius Institutes of China;Buddhist organisations  more* Chinese Buddhist Association* Chinese Buddhist Online Network* Chinese Buddhist Culture Network* International Chinese Buddhist Association* Mount Wutai Buddhist Association* Mount Emei Buddhist Association* Mount Jiuhua Buddhist Association* Buddhist Life Network* Chinese Buddhist Temples Online Network* Chinese Buddhist Music and Art Association* Buddhist Information Network* Chinese Buddhist System Center* Chinese Buddhist Studies* Chinese Buddhist Online Community* Baoguang Temple Buddhist Association* Huayan Temple Buddhist Association* Tianjin Jile Temple Buddhist Association* Guoen Temple Buddhist Association* Daci Temple Buddhist Association* Shaolin Temple Buddhist Association;Taoist organisations  more* Chinese Taoist Association* Wudang Taoist Tradition Institute* Wudang Taoist Tradition Association* Mount Longhu Taoist Tradition Association* Louguantai Taoist Tradition Association* Macao Taoist Association* Chinese Taoist Cultural Network* Taoist Network* China Taoism Magazine* Taoist Culture News;Shen culture organisations  more* Fujian Ancestral Temples Network* Kong Clan Network  Confucius Descendants Network* Su Clan Ancestral Network* Jiangxi Liu Clan Ancestral Network* Wuhua Li Clan Ancestral Network* Mazu Culture Network* Macao Mazu Culture Network* Hong Kong Guang Gong Culture Network* Quzi (Qu Yuan) Temples Networkdinin der Volksrepublik Chinaen Chinein Cinana Chinain ChinanboenstvoKiinassareligionzh:
369707
Adjuntas,_Puerto_Rico
 footnotes                Adjuntas () is a small mountainside municipality in Rico located central midwest of the island on the Central Mountain range (La Cordillera Central), north of Yauco, Guayanilla and Peuelas; southeast of Utuado; east of Lares and Yauco; and west of Ponce. Adjuntas is spread over 16 wards and Adjuntas Pueblo (the downtown area and the administrative center of the city).  Adjuntas is about two hours by car westward from the capital, San Juan. It is the principal city of the Adjuntas Statistical Area.Adjuntas is nicknamed the Switzerland of Puerto Rico, because of its relatively chilly weather. Many Puerto Rican mountain towns have colder weather than the rest of the island; Adjuntas is no exception: the average yearly weather is 72 degrees Fahrenheit. The cool weather attracts a good number of island tourists during the summer months. The town has a small hotel named Monte Rio and a good size parador, or country inn, called Villa Sotomayor. It also has the distinction of being the postal area with the lowest numerical code in the United States Postal Service (00601).Historythumb|left|220px|Adjuntas was founded August 11, 1815, by Diego Maldonado, gaining administrative independence from Utuado. It was one of the main cities where the Anusim, Maranos, and other Sephardi Jews settled. Many of these families were of the Torres, Perez or Peretz, and Bennazzar families among others. Berberena and Mozarabes settled there too.Tano families from neighboring Utuado can also be found in this area, along with escaped cimarrones, or African slaves, who intermarried with the Tano.  DNA genetic evidence shows that many Africans fled up the Camino Real into the mountains to escape the plantations of Ponce.  The Mandinka, Wolof & Fulani mtDNA African haplotype, L1b, is present here.(http://africandnaproject.homestead.com/L1bmtDNA.html)  Tano haplogroups A & C can also be found in this area.After the mid-19th century, Adjuntas welcomed many immigrants from the Mediterranean islands Corsica and Majorca. Some of them established coffee plantations. During the last decades of the 19th Century, the coffee produced in Adjuntas was exported to Europe, States and even the Vatican.It was proclaimed villa, or a first order municipality, by the Government Monarchy in 1894.Adjuntas was occupied by the States Army forces during the American War of 1898 and was visited by President Roosevelt in 1906.The discovery of rich deposits of copper, gold and other minerals during the 1960s motivated some local community and environmental leaders to oppose the mining. By the 1990s, they convinced the Puerto Rican government to take a stand against the mining industry, on behalf of conservation. Today, instead of mining, with the leadership of Casa Pueblo, a community organization, Adjuntas leads the preservation of natural resources movement in Puerto Rico.GeographyThe terrain in Adjuntas is very mountainous, due to its location in the Cordillera Central. Its highest peaks are Guilarte (3,773 ft; 1,150 m) and Vaquias (3,346 ft; 1,020 m).ClimateAdjuntas features a rainforest climate that borders on a highland climate. While the town technically features a tropical rainforest climate, due to its high elevation, the climate is noticeably cooler than the norm for this climate category. Summers are warm (83-85F) in the daytime and mild at nighttime (60-63F).Meanwhile winters are moderately warm with cool temperatures at night. During daytime high temperatures are around   in the town, and  in the nearby mountains. Winter night temperatures are between in the  and  range, but after fronts temperatures can drop down to .Cityscape Barrios The municipality of Adjuntas is made up of 17 barrios (wards/districts).*Adjuntas Pueblo*Capez*Garzas*Guayabo Dulce*Guayo*Guilarte*Juan Gonzlez*Liman*Pellejas*Portillo*Portuguez*Saltillo*Tanam*Vegas Abajo*Vegas Arriba*Yahuecas*YayalesTourismDespite its mountainous location, Adjuntas receives a good share of tourists that want to visit the haciendas established there during past centuries. Some of them are: Hacienda Bareal, Hacienda El Muerto, Hacienda Arbela, and Hacienda Pietri. Other landmarks are the Guilarte mountain, and the Inabn waterfall.Perhaps the most known touristic landmark in Adjuntas is Casa Pueblo, a local museum and cultural institution founded by a group of activists that fought against the mine exploitation of the area for decades. Casa Pueblo is responsible for many environmental projects, namely the preservation of hundreds of acres of woods and water bodies.Culture Sports The town has a professional volleyball team called Gigantes de Adjuntas. The team won a title in 1973.EconomyAgricultureAdjuntas main industry is the growing of tropical crops such as bananas, coffee, citron and peaches.DemographicsGovernmentthumb|right|220px|Central Square in Adjuntas town Symbols Both the flag and the of arms of Adjuntas have similar symbolisms. A white diagonal stripe divides the flag in two triangles. The upper one is purple, while the lower one is green. In the middle of each triangle lies a white cross known as the Illescas cross. The cross also symbolizes Saint Joachim and Saint Ana, patrons of the town. The white color symbolizes purity, while purple represents Joachims cloth and green the nature of the town.TransportationThe main road to Adjuntas is PR-10, that connects the cities of Ponce in the south and Arecibo in the north. In addition, there is a small airport that caters to private airplanes.Notable AdjunteosAmong the notable Adjunteos are the following:*Aristides Moll - writer *First Lieutenant Csar Luis Gonzlez - The first Puerto Rican pilot in the States Army Air Force and the first Puerto Rican pilot to die in War II. His name is listed on the Roll of Honor of the 314th Troop Carrier Group World War II(ROLL OF HONOR of the 314th Troop Carrier Group) and Adjuntas has honored his memory by naming a street Calle Cesar Gonzlez after him.*Felipe Neri Orta - musician*Helen Rodrguez Vlez - recipient of the Prime Time Awards Program de EE.UU.*Jesus M. Benitez - writer*Josefina Moll - writer *Pelegrn Lpez de Victoria - writer *Rafael J. de Cordero - writer *Roque Navarro Jimnez - musician*Winston Ruiz - ComposerReferencesFurther reading*Mi Pueblo Adjuntas, 1992, by Rafael J. Mirabal-Linares*Entre Fotos y Palabras, 2005 by Rafael J. Mirabal-LinaresExternal links* Welcome to Puerto Rico Adjuntas* nameAdjuntas, Puerto RicoPuerto Ricoes:Adjuntasfr:Adjuntas it:Adjuntas(gemeente)pt:AdjuntasPuerto Rico
370443
PLS
PLS or Pls may refer to:Organizations* Partito Liberale Svizzero (Italian for Party of Switzerland)* Ludique Societas, Medieval & Renaissance Players of Toronto* Polska Liga Siatkwki (English: Volleyball League)* Law SchoolScience and technology* least squares regression, a statistical method* Logic Sequencer, a version of the logic array which can be programmed to provide sequences of logic operations* leach solution, a mining processComputers* (complexity), a complexity class* (file format), multimedia playlist format* An internet slang abbreviation for please* Lexicon SpecificationMedicine and biology* syndrome, a disease affecting the teeth and skin* limb syndrome* lateral sclerosis* syndrome* Lowland SheepdogTransportation* load system, U.S. Army wheeled vehicle designed to pick up standard 20-ft MILVAN by itself with Crane Handling Unit* PLS, the IATA airport code for International Airport in the Turks and Caicos Islands* PLS, the National Rail station code for railway station, EnglandLand surveying* Land Survey System* Land SurveyorBusiness*label security, mortgage securization done by private institutionde:PLSfr:PLSko:PLSit:PLSpl:PLSfi:PLS
372023
1984_in_Canada
Events from the year 1984 in Canada.Incumbents*Monarch: II*Governor General: Schreyer then Sauv*Prime Minister: Trudeau then John Turner then Mulroney*of Alberta: Lougheed*of British Columbia: Bennett*of Manitoba: Pawley*of New Brunswick: Hatfield*of Newfoundland: Peckford*of Nova Scotia: Buchanan*of Ontario: Davis*of Prince Edward Island: James Lee*of Quebec: Lvesque*of Saskatchewan: DevineEventsJanuary to June*January 12 - Nerysoo becomes government leader of the Northwest Territories, replacing Braden*February 29 - Trudeau announces he will retire as soon as the Party of Canada can elect another leader*April 5 - A fire races through Number 26 Colliery located in Bay on Breton Island killing one miner. This effectively closes the mine permanently, ending years of coal mining in Bay.*May 8 - Cpl. Lortie enters the Quebec National Assembly and opens fire, killing 3 and wounding 13. Jalbert, sergeant-at-arms of the assembly, succeeds in calming him, for which he will later receive the Cross of Valour.*June 30 - John Turner becomes Canadas seventeenth prime minister replacing the retiring Trudeau.July to December*August 31 - MuchMusic first airs.*September 1 - Sports Network (TSN) first airs.*September 3 - In protest of the upcoming Papal visit, Bernard Brigham, a retired American armed forces officer, bombs Montreals Central Station, killing 3 people and wounding more than 30.*September 4 - In the 1984 federal election, the incumbent government of the Liberal Party of Canada is defeated as the Conservative Party of Canada, led by Mulroney, wins the largest parliamentary majority in Canadian history.*September 920 - John Paul II tours Canada.*September 17 - Brian Mulroney is sworn in as Canadas eighteenth prime minister.*October 5 - Garneau becomes the first Canadian in space, aboard the Shuttle Challenger.*November 6** Saskatchewan MLA Thatcher is convicted of the murder of his ex-wife Joanne.** Nova Scotia election: Buchanans Progressive Conservatives win a third consecutive majorityFull date unknown* Labatt introduces the first twist-off cap on a reusable bottle.* Telelatino Network signs on in October.Arts and literatureNew books*Neuromancer: Gibson*La Dtresse et lenchantement: Roy*Dinner Along the Amazon: Findley*The Summer Tree: Gavriel KayAwards*See Governor Generals Awards for a complete list of winners and finalists for those awards.*in Canada First Novel Award: Robertson, Willie*Lampert Award: Birdsell, Night Travellers and McKay, Gone to Grass*Lowther Award: Wallace, Signs of the Former Tenant*Leacock Award: Lautens, No Sex Please...Were Married*Metcalf Award: FreemanFilm*Camerons Terminator propels the Canadian director to international fameTelevision*Jeopardy! is relaunched with Canadian Trebek as host*City Television ends its run on Canadian televisionSport*May 19 - The NHLs Oilers win the Cup defeating the York Islanders 52 at Edmonton and ending the Islanders dynasty. The first in Oilers club history and of a new dynasty.*August 12 - At the Summer Olympics held in Los Angeles Canada has its best performance ever, mostly due to the boycott of the games by the Bloc countries.*Cup - Blue Bombers win 4717 over the Tiger-Cats*Cup - Gryphons win 2213 over the Allison MountiesBirthsJanuary to June*February 10 &mdash; Pellini, canoeist*February 15 &mdash; de Jonge, canoeist*March 13 &mdash; Noel Fisher, actor*April 25 &mdash; Soonias, volleyball player*April 27 &mdash; Bouchard, ice hockey player*May 29 &mdash; Steacy, hammer thrower*June 13 &mdash; Charron-Watson, swimmer*June 16 &mdash; Nash, ice hockey playerJuly to December*July 20 &mdash; Tritton, judoka*August 4 &mdash; Dickens, swimmer*September 5 &mdash; Radu, water polo player*September 27 &mdash; Lavigne, singer-songwriter, fashion designer and actress*October 1 &mdash; Tomiuk, water polo player*October 4 &mdash; Thomas, basketball player*October 24 &mdash; Frizell, hammer thrower*October 26 &mdash; Perreault, water polo player*November 26 &mdash; Rempel, speed skater*November 28 &mdash; Fleury, ice hockey playerDeathsJanuary to June*February 7 - James Sinclair, politician, businessman and father of Margaret Sinclair, one-time wife of Prime Minister Trudeau, and grandfather of Trudeau (b.1908)*February 9 - Earl Rowe, politician and 20th Governor of Ontario (b.1894)*March 22 - Fox, politician (b.1906)*March 26 - Laskin, jurist and 14th Justice of Canada (b.1912)*March 30 - Dugas, early AIDS patient, the alleged Patient Zero for AIDS (b.1953)*April 11 - Raynault, politician and of Montreal (b.1891)*May 17 - Sinclair, journalist, writer and commentator (b.1900)*May 19 - Paulley, politician (b.1909)*May 30 - Pearkes, politician, soldier and recipient of the Cross (b.1888)July to December*August 12 - Breau, guitarist (b.1941)*September 25 - Pidgeon, actor (b.1897)*October 2 - Strom, politician and 9th of Alberta (b.1914)*October 19 - Notley, politician (b.1939)*December 31 - Ronning, diplomat and politician (b.1894)au Canada
374390
Anthropocene
The Anthropocene is a recent and informal geologic chronological term that serves to mark the evidence and extent of human activities that have had a significant global impact on the Earths ecosystems. The term was coined by ecologist Eugene Stoermer but has been widely popularized by the Prize-winning atmospheric chemist Crutzen, who regards the influence of human behavior on the Earths atmosphere in recent centuries as so significant as to constitute a new era for its lithosphere.In 2008 a proposal was presented to the Stratigraphy Commission of the Society of London to make the Anthropocene a formal unit of geological time.() A large majority of that Stratigraphy Commission decided the proposal had merit and should therefore be examined further. Steps are being taken by independent working groups of scientists from various geological societies to determine if the Anthropocene will be formally accepted into the Geological Time Scale.()Many scientists are now using the term and the Society of America will host its 2011 annual meeting entitled Archean to Anthropocene: The past is the key to the future.(http://www.geosociety.org/meetings/2011/) The Anthropocene has no precise start date, but based on atmospheric evidence may be considered to start with the Revolution (late 18th century).(() Other scientists link it to earlier events, such as the rise of agriculture. Evidence of relative human impact such as the growing human influence on land use, ecosystems, biodiversity and species extinction is controversial, some scientists believe the human impact has significantly changed (or halted) the growth of biodiversity.() The Anthropocene may have begun as early as 14,000 to 15,000 years before present, based on lithospheric evidence; this has led other scientists to suggest that the onset of the Anthropocene should be extended back many thousand years(); this would be closely synchronous with the current term, Holocene. Etymology Anthropocene was originally coined by ecologist Eugene Stoermer but subsequently popularized by the Prize-winning scientist Crutzen by analogy with the word Holocene. The Greek roots are anthropo- meaning human and -cene meaning new. Crutzen has explained, I was at a conference where someone said something about the Holocene. I suddenly thought this was wrong. The world has changed too much. So I said: No, we are in the Anthropocene. I just made up the word on the spur of the moment. Everyone was shocked. But it seems to have stuck.() Crutzen first used it in print in a 2000 newsletter of the Geosphere-Biosphere Programme (IGBP), No.41. In 2008, Zalasiewicz suggested in Today that an anthropocene epoch is now appropriate.()As early as 1873, the Italian geologist Stoppani acknowledged the increasing power and impact of humanity on the Earths systems and referred to the anthropozoic era.() A similar term, Homogenocene (from old Greek: homo-, same geno-, kind, kainos-, new and -cene, period) was first used by Michael Samways in his editorial article in the Journal of Insect Conservation (1999) titled, Translocating fauna to foreign lands: here comes the Homogenocene.() Samways used the term to define our current geological epoch, in which biodiversity is diminishing and ecosystems around the globe become more similar to one another. The term was used by John L. Curnutt in 2000 in Ecology, in a short list titled A Guide to the Homogenocene.() Curnutt was reviewing Alien species in North America and Hawaii: impacts on natural ecosystems by George Cox. Revkin coined the term Anthrocene in his book Global Warming: Understanding the Forecast (1992), in which he wrote, we are entering an age that might someday be referred to as, say, the Anthrocene. After all, it is a geological age of our own making. The word evolved into the Anthropocene, which is generally regarded as being a more suitable technical term.()Definition of epochWhile much of the environmental change occurring on Earth is a direct consequence of the revolution, Ruddiman has argued that the Anthropocene began approximately 8,000 years ago with the growth of farming. At this point, humans were dispersed across all of the continents (bar Antarctica), and the Revolution was ongoing. During this period, humans developed agriculture and husbandry to supplement or replace hunter-gatherer subsistence. Such innovations were followed by a wave of extinctions, beginning with large mammals and land birds. This wave was driven by both the direct activity of humans (e.g. hunting) and the indirect consequences of land-use change for agriculture.This period (10,000 years to present) is usually referred to as the Holocene by geologists. For the majority of the Holocene, human populations were relatively low and their activities considerably muted relative to that of the last few centuries. Nonetheless, many of the processes currently altering the Earths environment were already occurring during this period.In terms of trace elements, there are distinct signatures left by modern societies. For example, in the Fremont Glacier, there is a layer of chlorine from 1960s atomic weapon testing programs present in ice cores, as well as a layer of mercury associated with coal plants in the 1980s.Nature of human effectsBiodiversityMany species have gone extinct due to human impact. Most experts agree that human beings have accelerated the rate of species extinction, though the exact rate is controversial, perhaps 100 to 1000 times the normal background rate of extinction.(http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/science-environment-13335683) In 2010 a study published in Nature found that marine phytoplankton  the vast range of tiny algae species accounting for roughly half of Earths total photosynthetic biomass - have declined substantially in the worlds oceans over the past century. Since 1950 alone, algal biomass decreased by around 40%, probably in response to ocean warming - and the decline has gathered pace in recent years.(Ocean greenery under warming stress) Some authors have postulated that without human interference the biodiversity of this planet would continue to grow at an exponential rate.(ClimateOne obvious geological signal of human activity is increasing atmospheric dioxide (CO2) content. During the glacial-interglacial cycles of the past million years, natural processes have varied CO2 by approximately 100 ppm (from 180 ppm to 280 ppm). As of 2011, anthropogenic net emissions of CO2 have increased its atmospheric concentration by a comparable amount from 280 ppm (Holocene or pre-industrial equilibrium) to about 390 ppm.(Recent Global CO2, Earth System Research Laboratory, NOAA) This signal in the Earths climate system is especially significant because it is occurring much faster,(Deep ice tells long climate story) and to an enormously greater extent, than previous, similar changes. Most of this increase is due to the combustion of fuels such as coal, oil and gas, although smaller fractions are the result of cement production and land-use changes (e.g. deforestation). Anthropocene temporal limit 	Arguing the early Anthropocene hypothesis, Ruddiman claims that the Anthropocene, as defined by significant human impact on greenhouse gas emissions, began not in the industrial era, but 8,000 years ago, as ancient farmers cleared forests to grow crops.()()() Ruddimans work has in turn been challenged on the grounds that comparison with an earlier interglaciation (Stage 11, around 400,000 years ago) suggest that 16,000 more years must elapse before the current Holocene interglaciation comes to an end, and that thus the early anthropogenic hypothesis is invalid. But Ruddiman argues that this results from an invalid alignment of recent insolation maxima with insolation minima from the past, among other irregularities which invalidate the criticism. Furthermore, the argument that something is needed to explain the differences in the Holocene is challenged by more recent research showing that all interglacials differ.(Interglacial diversity, Nature Geoscience 2, 751 - 755 (2009) )However, the fact remains that 8,000 years ago the planet sustained a few million people and was still fundamentally pristine,() hence the early Anthropocene hypothesis does not account for a substantial human footprint on Earth. On the other hand, also the Industrial Revolution proposed by Crutzen () does not seem to be the most suitable start of Anthropocene. In fact, although it is unquestionable that the Industrial Revolution ushered in an unprecedented global human impact on the planet,() much of Earths landscape had been already profoundly modified by human activities.() Anthropocene beginning should hence be anticipated to the moment when humankind has joined with the other environmental forces in shaping the planet. In doing so, it is difficult, perhaps even unrealistic, to identify a Year Zero of the Anthropocene. In fact, the human impact on Earth has grown progressively, with few substantial slowdowns. However, a plausible starting point of the Anthropocene could be at c. 2,000 BP, which roughly coincides with the start of the final phase of Holocene, the Subatlantic.()At this time, the Empire encompassed large portions of Europe, the Middle East and North Africa, in China the classical dynasties were flowering, the Middle kingdoms of India had already the largest economy of the ancient and medieval world, the Napata/Meroitic kingdom extended over the current Sudan and Ethiopia, the Olmecs controlled central Mexico and Guatemala, and the pre-Incan Chavn people managed large areas of northern Peru. Although often apart from each other and intermixed with buffering ecosystems, the areas directly impacted by these civilizations and others were large. Additionally, some activities, such mining, implied much more widespread perturbation of natural conditions.()	 Anthropocene marker A marker that accounts for a substantial global impact of humans on the total environment, comparable in scale to those associated with significant perturbations of the geological past, is needed in place of minor changes in atmosphere composition.()() A useful candidate for this purpose is the pedosphere, which can retain information of its climatic and geochemical history with features lasting for centuries or millennia.()  Human activity is now firmly established as the sixth factor of soil formation.()  It affects pedogenesis either directly, by, for example, land levelling, trenching and embankment building for various purposes, organic matter enrichment from additions of manure or other waste, organic matter impoverishment due to continued cultivation, compaction from overgrazing or, indirectly, by drift of eroded materials or pollutants. Anthropogenic soils are soils markedly affected by human activities, such as repeated ploughing, the addition of fertilizers, contamination, sealing, or enrichment with artefacts (in the Reference Base for Soil Resources they are classified as Anthrosols and Technosols). They are recalcitrant repositories of artefacts and properties that testify to the dominance of the human impact, and hence appear to be reliable markers for the Anthropocene. Some anthropogenic soils should be hence viewed as the golden spikes of geologists (Boundary Stratotype Section and Point), which are locations where there are strata successions with clear evidences of a worldwide event, including the appearance of distinctive fossils.() See also * Anthropocentrism* biomes* Ecocriticism* of global warming* Geoengineering* extinctionReferencesFurther reading* * * *  External links * The Anthropocene, copy of original IGBP article on Crutzens website, May 2000.* The Anthropocene Debate: Marking Humanitys Impact, by Kolbert, Yale Environment 360, May 17, 2010* Have humans created a new geological age?, NewScientist, January 24, 2008* Videos of a Radcliffe conference on Biodiversity in the Anthropocene, March 10, 2006* Debate over the Early Anthropogenic Hypothesis, RealClimate, December 2005* * Earth Is Us, Dot Earth blog, New York Times, January 28, 2008* Anthropocene, Encyclopedia of Earth* Recent work on the Early Anthropocene Hypothesis presented at AGU, December 2008*  Thierry Picquet, New era in the evolution of the world, Plantarisation*Humanity Blamed for 9,000 Years of Global Warming*Nothing new under the sun: Anthropogenic global warming started when people began farming Economist review; includes nice graphic showing the rise in methane (a greenhouse gas), from agricultural slash-and-burn started 8,000 years ago.*How Did Humans First Alter Global Climate? American 2005*Methane: A Scientific Journey from Obscurity to Climate Super-Stardom NASA*Anthropocene: Have humans created a new geological age?  News, 11 May 2011ca:Antropoccs:Antropocnda:Antropocnde:Anthropoznes:Antropocenofr:Anthropocneit:Antropocenehe:nl:Antropoceennn:Anthropocenpl:Antropocenpt:Antropocenoru:fi:Antroposeenisv:Antropocenth:vi:Anthropocenevls:Anthropoceenzh:
375290
Operation_Ivory_Coast
casualties22 injured1 helicopter and 1 airplaneOperation Ivory Coast was a failed rescue mission conducted in Vietnam during the War by States Special Operations Forces and other elements of the U.S. Military.On November 21, 1970, a joint States Air Force/States Army force commanded by Air Force Brigadier General J. Manor and Army Colonel D. Bull Simons landed 56 U.S. Army Special Forces soldiers(Schemmer (1976), p. 91.) by helicopter in the Ty prison camp located only  west of Hanoi, Vietnam. The missions objective was the recovery of 61 American prisoners of war thought to be held at the camp, situated in an area where 12,000 North Vietnamese troops were stationed within .( The mission failed when it was found during the raid that all the prisoners had been previously moved to another camp.The specially selected raiders extensively trained and rehearsed the operation at Air Force Base, Florida, while planning and intelligence gathering continued from May 25 to November 20, 1970.(Schemmer (1976), p. 36, 153.) Despite the absence of prisoners, the raid was executed with a high degree of success,(Schemmer (1976), p. 153.) incurring only two minor casualties and the loss of two aircraft, one of which had been part of the plan from the start.()() Criticism of intelligence failures to determine that the camp was empty of U.S. POWs, both public and within the administration of President M. Nixon, led to a major reorganization of the United States intelligence community a year later.(Schemmer (1976), p. 206.)Planning, organization and trainingPolar CircleThe concept of a rescue mission inside North Vietnam began on May 9, 1970. An Air Force intelligence unit concluded through analysis of aerial photography that a compound near Tay, suspected since late 1968 of being a of war camp, contained 55 American POWs, and that at least six were in urgent need of rescue.(Schemmer (1976), pp. 27-28.)(Gargus (2007), p. 111.)(The USAF intelligence unit was the 1127th Field Activities Group, Belvoir, Virginia.)  On May 25 the unit met in the Pentagon with BG Blackburn, Special Assistant for Counterinsurgency and Special Activities (SACSA) to report their findings. Blackburn was responsible directly to the of the Joint Chiefs of Staff and had also been the first commander of the covert and Observation Group in Vietnam.(Schemmer (1976), p. 31.)Blackburn immediately met with General G. Wheeler, the JCS Chairman, to recommend a rescue of all the POWs at Sn Ty.(Schemmer (1976), p. 36.) To study the feasibility of a raid, Wheeler authorized a 15-member planning group under the codename Polar Circle that convened on June 10. One of its members was an officer who would actually participate in the raid as a rescue helicopter pilot.(Schemmer (1976), pp. 51-52.)(LTC Warner A. Britton was a career rescue expert, having begun his 26-year career in World War II as an OA-10 (USAAF variant of the PBY Catalina) pilot in the Air Force. While he had limited experience flying the HH-53, he had commanded two rescue squadron detachments in Vietnam.) The study group, after a review of all available intelligence, concluded that Son Tay contained 61 POWs.(Thigpen (2001), p. 141.)When Blackburns recommendation that he lead the mission himself was turned down, he asked COL Arthur D. Simons on July 13 to command the Armys personnel, and selected Eglin Air Force Base as the training site.(Schemmer (1976), pp. 61-62.)(Schemmer states that Fort Bragg, North Carolina, was their base of choice, but that the commander of the Special Warfare Center refused their request of a specific secure location. However, Gargus (pp. 10-11) stated that Simons was not named as deputy (to take advantage of his unique position in selecting the best leaders for a ground force) until after Manor had been selected to command the mission, and that it was Manor who chose Eglin, the ideal training site for the joint raiding force.)Ivory CoastThe second phase, Operation Ivory Coast, began August 8, 1970, when Admiral H. Moorer, the new J.C.S. Chairman, designated  Manor as commander and Simons as deputy commander of the mission task force. Ivory Coast was the organization, planning, training, and deployment phase of the operation. Manor set up an Air Force training facility at Eglins Field and brought together a 27-member planning staff that included 11 from the prior feasibility study.((Schemmer (1976),pp. 261-262, Appendix IV.)Simons recruited 103 personnel from interviews of 500 volunteers, most Special Forces personnel of the 6th and Special Forces Groups at Fort Bragg, Carolina.(Schemmer (1976), pp. 73-74.) USAF planners selected key Air Force commanders, who then picked personnel for their crews. Helicopter and A-1 Skyraider crews were put together from instructors at Eglin and personnel returned from Southeast Asia. Two crews for C-130E(I) Combat Talons(Thigpen (2001), p.168.)(The MC-130 designation for the Combat Talon did not appear until 1977.) were assembled from squadrons in Germany and North Carolina.(Thigpen (2001), pp. 142-143.)(None of the flight members had flown together as crews before training began.) All were then asked to volunteer for a temporary duty assignment without additional pay and without being told the nature of the rescue mission.(Gargus (2007), pp. 23, 49.)(Among those who entered North Vietnam, only four Army and eleven Air Force officers (all members of the planning group) had advance knowledge of the target. Because of Eglins proximity to Cuba, many members believed the target was there.)  103 Army and 116 Air Force personnel were selected for the project, including ground force members, aircrewmen, support members, and planners.(Schemmer (1976), pp. 252-254.)(Schemmers list includes 4 USAF pararescuemen in Thailand who were added after JCTG deployed but did not train in Florida; all aircraft support personnel who deployed; a small team from AFLC who maintained voice radio jamming equipment installed in the A-1s; and technical representatives of Instruments for maintenance of the terrain following radars because of the low mean-time-between-failure rate of its APQ-115 (Thigpen, 2001, p. 39).)(Gargus (2007), pp. 269-271, 280-283.)(Garguss list includes the 14 HC-130 crewmen (omitted by Schemmer) who did not train in Florida.) The 219-man(Gargus (2007), p. 276.)(CPT Nina Gusev, an intelligence officer with the Tactical Fighter Wing, was added to the planning staff in Thailand and was the only woman involved in the mission.) task force planned, trained, and operated under the title of the Joint Contingency Task Group (JCTG).(Schemmer (1976), p. 62.)The planning staff set up parameters for a night-time raid, the key points of which were clear weather and a quarter-moon at 35 degrees above the horizon for optimum visibility during low level flight.( From these parameters two mission windows were identified, October 1825 and November 1825.( Training proceeded at Eglin using a replica of the prison compound for rehearsals(Gargus (2007), p. 46-46, 61, 64.)(The often-made assertion that the mockup was taken down during the day and reassembled at night to avoid detection by Soviet satellites is a myth. While the geometry and dimensions of the prison compound were exact in the mockup, and it had been built of two-by-four studs and cloth to facilitate such disassembly, the mockup was too crude and blended too well with roads and other features already present to be identified as Sn Ty. However, to satisfy security concerns, aerial photographs were taken to be certain of that conclusion. Similarly, reports that full-size trees were uprooted and relocated to exact locations are also in error. Even were such a labor-intensive idea not outlandish, the probable loss of the assault helicopters during practice would have canceled the mission.) and a five foot-by-five foot $60,000 scale table model (codenamed Barbara) for familiarization.(Schemmer (1976), p. 86.)(Thigpen (2001), p. 148.)(Gargus (2007), p. 32.)(Barbara was named for Barbara L. Strosnider, a GS-6 administrative assistant in the USAF Directorate of Plans who transcribed plans for both the feasibility and planning groups.)Air Force crews flew 1,054 hours in southern Alabama, Georgia, and Florida conducting dissimilar (aircraft) formation training with both UH-1H and HH-3E helicopters at night and at low-level(Gargus (2007), p. 63-64.) (a flight profile for which procedures had to be innovated by the two selected crews),(Thigpen (2001), p. 145.) and gaining expertise in navigation training using FLIR, which until Ivory Coast had not been part of the Combat Talons electronics suite.(Gargus (2007), pp. 58-59.) A vee formation in which the slower helicopters drafted in echelon slightly above and behind each wing of the Combat Talon escort aircraft was chosen and refined for the mission.Special Forces training began September 9, advancing to night training on September 17, and joint training with air crews on September 28 that included six rehearsals a day, three of them under night conditions. By October 6, 170 practice sessions of all or partial phases of the mission were performed on the mockup by the Special Forces troopers, many with live fire.(Gargus (2007), p. 48.) On that date, the first full-scale rehearsal, using a UH-1H as the assault helicopter, was conducted at night and included a 5.5-hour,  flight of all aircraft, replicating the timing, speeds, altitudes, and turns in the mission plan.(Thigpen (2001), p. 147.) The rehearsal spelled the end of the option to use the UH-1 when its small passenger compartment resulted in leg cramps to the Special Forces troopers that completely disrupted the timing of their assault, more than offsetting the UH-1s only advantage (smaller rotor radius) over the larger HH-3.(Gargus (2007), p. 75.) Further dress rehearsals and a total of 31 practice landings by the HH-3E in the mockups courtyard confirmed the choice.(Schemmer (1976), p. 94.)On September 24, Manor recommended approval of the October window to US of Defense Laird, with October 21 as the primary execution date. However at a House briefing on October 8 with National Security Advisor Kissinger and General M. Haig,(Also present were Blackburn and LTG W. Vogt, Jr., of the Joint Staff and Blackburns boss. Schemmer (1976), p. 113.) Kissinger delayed the mission to the November window because President Nixon was not in Washington and could not be briefed in time for approval of the October window. This delay, while posing a risk of compromising the secrecy of the mission, had the benefits of additional training, acquisition of night-vision equipment, and further reconnaissance of the prison.(Schemmer (1976), p. 115, quoting Manor.)Manor and Simons met with the commander of Task Force 77, Admiral Frederic A. Bardshar, aboard his flagship USS America on November 5 to arrange for a diversionary mission to be flown by naval aircraft.(Gargus (2007), p. 106.)(America was about to rotate home and would be replaced by the Ranger.) Because of policy restrictions of the bombing halt then in place, the naval aircraft would not carry ordnance except for a few planes tasked for and Rescue.(Schemmer (1976), p. 120.)Between November 10 and November 18(The Special Forces personnel arrived in Thailand at 03:00 November 18, which was 15:00 in Washington D.C.) the JCTG moved to its staging base at Royal Thai Air Force Base, Thailand,(Gargus (2007), p. 111.)(Takhli, once a major F-105 Thunderchief base, was about to deactivate, and was chosen both for that reason and the presence of a secure complex formerly used by the Intelligence Agency.) and began studying the weather. On November 18, Typhoon Patsy struck the Philippines and headed west towards Hanoi. Weather forecasts indicated that Patsy would cause bad weather over the Gulf of Tonkin on November 21, preventing carrier support operations, and then converging with a cold front coming out of southern China, cause poor conditions over North Vietnam for the remainder of the window. The presence of the cold front, however, indicated that conditions in the objective area on November 20 would be good and possibly acceptable over Laos for navigation of the low level penetration flights. A reconnaissance flight on the afternoon of November 20 by an RF-4C Phantom carrying a weather specialist confirmed the forecast.(Gargus (2007), p. 116.)(The specialist was LTC Frank A. Ross, of the 10th Weather Squadron, who was a qualified fighter pilot.) Manor authorized the advancement of the mission date by 24 hours.(Thigpen (2001), pp. 150-151.)Mission organizationSpecial ForcesOn November 18, President Nixon approved execution of the mission, and the final phase, Operation Kingpin, began.(Thigpen (2001), p. 150.) The fifty-six Special Forces troopers selected to conduct the raid were flown on the evening of November 20 by a conventional Hercules from Takhli to their helicopter staging base at Udorn RTAFB. The Special Forces were organized into three platoons: a 14-man assault group, codenamed Blueboy, which would crash-land within the prison compound; a 22-man support group, Greenleaf, which would provide immediate support for the assault team, and a 20-man security group, Redwine, to protect the prison area from NVA reaction forces and provide backup support if needed for either of the other two groups. Simons (using the call sign Axle)  accompanied the Greenleaf group, while the ground force commander, LTC Elliott P. Bud Sydnor, Jr. (Wildroot), was with the Redwine group.(Gargus (2007), p. 267.)(Simons official role was deputy commander of the Joint Contingency Task Group.)(Gargus (2007), p. 207, reference the call signs.)()(Major John Waresh, co-pilot of A-1E Peach 01, also states that Simons callsign was Axle. Schemmer (p.91), however, states that Wildroot was Simons call sign, and (p. 169) implies that access to recorded radio traffic of the mission was used to confirm this. However the traffic from Blueboy to Wildroot referred to by Schemmer was directed to the ground commander, who was Sydnor, not Simons.)The 56 raiders were heavily armed: 51 personal sidearms, 48 CAR-15 carbines, 2 rifles, 4 grenade launchers, 2 shotguns, and 4 machine guns. They carried 15 mines, 11 demolition charges, 213 grenades, and were equipped with a plethora of wire cutters, bolt cutters, axes, chain saws, crowbars, ropes, bullhorns, lights, and other equipment (much of it acquired from commercial retail sources) to execute the mission.(Schemmer (1976), pp. 159-160.) The ground force was also equipped for voice communications with 58 UHF-AM and 34 VHF-FM radios, including a survival radio for each individual soldier.(Schemmer (1976), p. 104.)(There were two AN/PRC-41 sets for UHF air-to-ground communication, ten AN/PRC-77 sets for directing air strikes, 24 AN/PRC-88 squad radios for communication within and among the groups, and 56 Air Force AN/PRC-90 survival radios pre-set to SAR frequencies. During training, each of the 92 radios had a backup set, plus 50 additional sets for redundancy, with Schemmer noting the force was as well-equipped in communications as a battalion of infantry.)Aviation support  right|thumb|HH-3E Jolly Green identical to the helicopter carrying the Blueboy assault group.116 aircraft (59 Navy and 57 Air Force) participated in the operation, with 28 aircraft (crewed by 92 airmen) assigned direct roles in the target area.(Thigpen (2001), p. 152; Gargus (2007), pp. 108, 278-280.)(Aircraft assigned to the USAF support force included two HC-130P helicopter refueling and command aircraft (Lime 01-02), twelve KC-135 tankers (refueling tracks Orange and Lemon), two EC-121T airborne early warning aircraft (Frog 01-02), two RC-135M Rivet Card/Combat Apple ELINT aircraft, and one KC-135A Combat Lightning radio relay plane (Luzon). A Sabreliner, three C-130 Hercules airlifters, and a standby SAR force of two HH-53s and four A-1 Sandys rounded out the Air Force participants. The USN provided ten Intruders and 27 Corsairs in multiple roles including aerial refueling, six F-4J Phantom and six F-8J Crusader fighters, two E-1B Tracer airborne early warning aircraft, one KA-3B Skywarrior tanker, and six EKA-3B Skywarrior tanker-ECM aircraft. The 59th naval aircraft was an EP-3B Bat Rack Orion from the VQ-1 detachment at NAS Agana, Guam. A 60th scheduled aircraft aborted before launch from Ranger. Not included in these totals are a C-123 Candle flare ship and an EC-130 ABCCC aircraft, Alley Cat , that diverted from other Laotian missions to aid the SAR, two Starlifters staged at Udorn to transport critically ill POWs, nor the UH-1H transported from Florida to Thailand with the JCTG.) Two C-130E(I) Combat Talons, modified in August with the temporary addition of looking infrared (FLIR) sets borrowed from another classified C-130 program,(Gargus (2007), p. 58.)(The FL-2B FLIRs were obtained from the Operational Evaluation and Training Squadron, Norton AFB, California, which used them in Project Heavy Chain.) were assigned to navigate the mission. One was to lead the helicopter assault formation (Cherry 01) and the second, as a backup, to escort the A-1 strike formation (Cherry 02).(Gargus (2007), p. 52.)(The formation designations were those used by the JCTG.) Because of the variances in cruising speeds between the helicopters and fixed-wing aircraft, the forces flew separate routes, with the faster strike formation trailing the helicopter formation by several minutes and zig-zagging across its route. Each Combat Talon crew cross-trained to assume the role of the other, but the assault formation was required to have a navigation leader with four fully functioning engines all the way to the objective.(The 28 aircraft with direct roles were:Execution of Operation KingpinPenetration into North VietnamBeginning at 22:00,(Gargus (2007), p. 153.)(All times are UTC+7 (+12 Standard Time).) aircraft began leaving five bases in Thailand and one in South Vietnam.(Gargus (2007), p. 153.)(Takhli (C-130E(I)), Korat (EC-121, F-105G), Udorn (helicopters, HC-130,F-4), Nakhon Phanom (A-1), U Tapao (KC-135), and Danang (EKA-3).)  Cherry 02, the Combat Talon escort for the A-1 strike formation, took off from Takhli at 22:25,( but Cherry 01 had difficulty starting an engine and took off 23 minutes late at 23:18. Cherry 01 adjusted its flight plan and made up the time lost at engine start.(Gargus (2007), p. 155.) At 23:07 the HC-130P aerial refuelers (call signs Lime 01 and Lime 02) took off from Udorn, followed by the helicopters ten minutes later.( Shortly after midnight, the A-1 Skyraiders lifted off four minutes early from Phanom Royal Thai Air Force Base under clandestine, blacked-out conditions.(Gargus (2007), p. 156.) The helicopters encountered thick clouds over northern Laos at their refueling altitude and climbed to  AGL (Above Ground Level) to refuel from Lime 01 on the flight plans fourth leg. Lime 01 then led them to the next checkpoint for handoff to Cherry 01 at 01:16.((Thigpen (2001), p. 153.)The formations flew roughly parallel tracks that crossed Laos to the west of the of Jars before turning northeastward.(Gargus (2007), p. 181.) Both formations flew twelve planned legs.(Gargus (2007), p. 72.) The flight path was a corridor  wide for safe terrain clearance in the event of formation breakup or a helicopters loss of drafting position,(Gargus (2007), p. 70.) with the Combat Talon navigators tasked with keeping the formations on the centerline of the corridor.(Gargus (2007), p. 58.) The pilots of both formations required a flight path of descending legs, each approximately  above the terrain in the mountain valleys,( because the HH-3E had difficulties in climbing while in formation. The Combat Talon C-130s experienced  sluggish flight controls at the required airspeeds, and the A-1s were hampered by their heavy ordnance loads.(Gargus (2007), pp. 56-57, 71.)The slow speeds required for the formations ( for the helicopters and  for the A-1s)(Gargus (2007), p. 69.) degraded nearly all modes of the Combat Talons AN/APQ-115 TF/TA navigational radars. The Terrain Following mode computed changes in altitude only to a programmed minimum airspeed of , well outside the parameters of the mission. The Terrain Avoidance mode, adapted from the AN/APQ-99 terrain avoidance radar of the RF-4C photo reconnaissance aircraft, was distorted by the nose-high attitude dictated by the slow speeds and would no longer display hazardous terrain directly in front of or below the Combat Talons flight path. The radar, used to calculate wind drift and speed, often had to use information in its computers memory because of processing lapses. While the ground-mapping radar, correlating landmarks shown on maps to radar returns, was not affected, the jungle terrain did not provide easily identifiable points. All of these handicaps were overcome with the external pod installation of FLIR, which readily identified the rivers and lakes used as turning points.(Gargus (2007), pp. 57-59.)The assault formation approached from the southwest, using the clutter returns of the mountains to mask them from radar detection, while U.S. Navy aircraft launched at 01:00( from the carriers USS Oriskany(CVW-19 (NM) embarked. Aircraft from VA-153, VA-155, VF-191, VF-191, VAQ-130, and VAW-111 participated.) and Ranger(CVW-2 (NE) embarked. Aircraft from VA-25, VA-113, VA-145, VF-21, VF-154, VAQ-134, and VAW-111 participated.) in the largest carrier night operation of the Vietnam War.(Gargus (2007), p. 131.)(The Hancock, CVW-21 (NP) embarked, had arrived on the line that day, and provided only two EKA-3B tanker aircraft of its VAQ-129 detachment to the diversion, both of which staged before the raid to Danang Air Base, where TF77s Skywarriors were based during their carriers rotations. Oriskany launched 25 aircraft and Ranger 26.) Starting at 01:52, twenty Corsairs and Intruders, flying in pairs at stepped-up altitudes to deconflict their flight paths, entered North Vietnamese airspace on three tracks,( dropping flares to simulate an attack. The last track also dropped chaff to mimic the mining of Haiphong harbor. Over the Gulf of Tonkin, twenty-four other aircraft in thirteen orbits provided support and protection.(Gargus (2007), p. 175.)(An additional support aircraft, an A-7 scheduled to be the last of six SAM suppression aircraft, was a deck abort aboard Ranger.) The operation prompted a frantic air defense reaction at 02:17 that provided a highly effective diversion for the raiders and completely saturated the North Vietnamese air defense system.(Both Air Force formations,(Gargus (2007), p. 71.) over a period of thirteen minutes, were unavoidably and separately exposed for several minutes each to an early warning radar located at Na San, North Vietnam,  to the north, because the flight tracks had to be routed around uncharted mountains.( Neither formation was detected, possibly because of the diversion.(Gargus (2007), p. 160.) The rescue forces entered the Red River valley at  AGL to find conditions clear and visibility excellent. The helicopter formation reached its Initial Point (20 kilometers12 minutes flying timefrom Son Tay) with the A-1 strike formation two minutes behind, as planned.(Thigpen (2001), p. 154.) The HH-3E assault team helicopter had flown formation just behind and above the left wingtip of Cherry 01, drafting on the leader to gain the additional airspeed needed to bring its cruise airspeed safely above the stalling speed of the Combat Talon.( Two of the HH-53s and Cherry 01 accelerated and climbed to  AGL while the four assault helicopters broke formation and descended to  in single file, timed to land forty-five seconds apart.((Combat assaultCherry 01 transmitted the execute command Alpha, Alpha, Alpha to all aircraft(Gargus (2007), p. 186.) as it overflew the prison and dropped four illumination flares, then performed a hard turning descent to  to drop two battle simulators(Thigpen (2001), p. 144.)(Battle simulators were firecrackers encased in plastic sleeves and attached to a droppable pallet.) south and southeast of Sn Ty. After Apple 03 made its strafing pass with side-firing miniguns on the prisons guard towers, Cherry 01 successfully dropped one of two planned napalm ground markers as a point of reference for the A-1s, then departed the area to orbit over Laos.(The assault helicopters in single file encountered winds that caused them to break formation  to the right of their intended track. The pilots of the gunship helicopter, Apple 03, preceding the others, observed a compound nearly identical to the prison camp in size and layout (previously labeled a secondary school by intelligence sources) and steered toward it, followed by the assault lift force. However, Apple 03 recognized the river next to the actual location and corrected their flight path.(Gargus (2007), p. 188-189.) Banana, carrying the Blueboy assault team, descended on the wrong location and found the expected courtyard to be much smaller than required and the treeline enclosing the compound rather than tracking through it. By then Blueboy, as previously rehearsed, was firing its weapons from all openings in the HH-3E. Bananas pilots recognized the error, applied power, and quickly passed north to the actual target.(Gargus (2007), p. 192.)Despite the error, and trees taller than briefed that forced a steeper descent, the assault team crashlanded into the courtyard of Son Tay prison at 02:19(Gargus (2007), pp. 284-288.)(Gargus has a detailed timeline, all times based on the time of the Alpha execute code (02:18).) with all weapons firing. Although one raider, acting as a door gunner, was thrown from the aircraft,(Gargus (2007), p. 200.)(1LT George Petrie landed on his feet near the east gate, which was his personal assignment to secure.) the only casualty was the helicopters flight engineer, whose ankle was fractured by a dislodged fire extinguisher.(The casualty was Air Force TSG Leroy Wright, who continued his participation despite the broken ankle and received the Air Force Cross for his effort.) Army Captain J. Meadows used a bullhorn to announce their presence to the expected POWs while the team dispersed in four elements on a rapid and violent assault of the prison, killing guards and methodically searching the five prisoner blocks cell by cell.(Gargus (2007), pp. 197-204.)(This assault phase confirmed 42 North Vietnamese killed at the prison site by cross-checking individual Blueboy and Redwine personnel accounts at debriefing. All other counts are estimates.)At 02:19,( Apple 01 (after observing Banana fire on the site) landed the Greenleaf support group outside the south side of the secondary school, thinking it to be the target prison compound. Unaware that it was 400 meters from the objective, it lifted off to relocate to its holding area. The secondary school was actually a barracks for troops,(Traditionally, the troops are identified as Chinese or possibly Russian (Schemmer, pp. 171 and 214). However, one raider states they were NVA (Buckler, interviewed Vietnam magazine June 1997--see external links), while another (Powell, also linked) asserts that their nationality was never determined.) and alerted by Bananas aborted assault, opened fire on Greenleaf as two of its elements assaulted the compound. The support group attacked the location with small arms and hand grenades in an eight minute firefight, after which Simons estimated that 100 to 200 hostile soldiers had been killed. Two A-1s supported Greenleaf with an air strike using phosphorus bombs on a wooden footbridge east of the area. Apple 01 returned at 02:23, and by 02:28( the support group had disengaged under fire and reboarded the helicopter for the short movement to the correct landing area.(Schemmer (1976), p. 172.)(Schemmer noted that Apple 01 made three combat assault landings in nine and one half minutes. The disengagement was supported by fire from the teams M-60 machine gun, which used all rounds to intimidate the opponents.)The pilot of Apple 02(LTC John V. Allison.) observed the errors in navigation by the helicopters in front of him and made a hard turn towards the prison. He also observed Apple 01 unload at the secondary school and initiated Plan Green, the contingency plan for the loss or absence of Greenleaf. The Redwine security group, including ground force commander Sydnor, landed at 02:20( outside Son Tay prison and immediately executed the previously rehearsed contingency plan. In the meantime Cherry 02 arrived with the A-1 force, dropped two more napalm ground markers, and created other diversions to disguise the target area by dropping MK-6 log flares and battle simulators at road intersections that North Vietnamese reaction forces might be expected to use.(Gargus (2007), p. 187.) Cherry 02 then orbited in the area as on-call support for the ground teams.(Thigpen (2001), p. 155.)After a thorough search that included a second sweep ordered by Meadows, Blueboys three teams found that the prison held no POWs.(Gargus (2007), P. 202.)(Meadows himself did not enter any cellblock but coordinated his team from the center of the courtyard.) Meadows transmitted the code phrase Negative Items to the command group.((Gargus (2007), p.203; Schemmer (1976), p. 172; Thigpen (2001), p. 156; and Glines.)(Sources are near-unanimous that the code was items, not packages.) Pathfinders clearing the extraction LZ blew up an electrical tower that blacked out the entire west side of Son Tay including the prison area. At 02:29( Sydnor ordered the A-1s to attack the vehicle bridge over the Song Con leading into the area and three minutes later called for extraction by the HH-53s, idling on the ground in a holding area a mile away.( Before the first helicopter arrived, a truck convoy approached the prison from the south, but was stopped by two Redwine security teams that each fired an M72 light antitank weapon into the lead vehicle.(Gargus (2007), p. 286.)(The convoy was engaged separately by the teams, four minutes apart.)At 02:28( Cherry 02s radar navigator noted that Song search radars for North Vietnamese to air missiles were active. SAM launches at the F-105 Weasel force began at 02:35,( with at least 36 missiles fired at the rescue forces.(Gargus (2007), p. 297.)(Participants anecdotally put the number of SAMs much higher, with three or more in the air continuously for eleven minutes.) One F-105 was briefly enveloped in burning fuel by a near-miss at 02:40( and returned to base. Its replacement was severely damaged six minutes later by another SAM.(Gargus (2007), p. 287.) 20 other SAMs fired at Navy aircraft all missed. Two MiG-21 interceptors on alert duty at Phc Yn Air Base were never given permission to launch despite several requests to do so.(Gargus (2007), p. 223.)The HH-53s returned singly, and Apple 01 landed at the extraction LZ first, at 02:37. It lifted off with its passengers at 02:40,( followed a minute later by the landing of Apple 02, which departed at 02:45.( Apple 03, the last aircraft out, was cleared to leave its holding area at 02:48.( The raid had been executed in only 26 minutes,(Gargus (2007), pp. 285-287.)(Raid time calculated from 02:19 (first landing) to 02:45 (last extraction).) well within the planned 30-minute optimum time.( Although at first it was feared one raider had been left behind, all the troopers were accounted for. One Redwine trooper had been wounded in the leg and was the only casualty to hostile fire on the raid.(Gargus (2007), p. 208.)(SFC Joseph M. Murray was hit from behind as he prepared to grenade the first structure he encountered after debarking Apple Two. His assailants were killed by team leader MSG Herman Spencer.)By 03:15 the assault formation was out of North Vietnam,(Schemmer (1976), p. 179.) and landed back at Udorn at 04:28, five hours after launch.(Schemmer (1976), p. 183.) The crew of the damaged F-105 was compelled to eject over Laos thirty minutes after being hit when it flamed out from lack of fuel in sight of its tanker.(Gargus (2007), p. 227.)(Campbell and Hill (1996), p. 120.)(The F-105G lost was s/n 62-4436, nicknamed Fat Fanny.) Lime 01, refueling at Udorn, returned as King 21 to coordinate the Search and Rescue (SAR) effort, while Lime 02 refueled Apple 04 and Apple 05 to extend their flight time. Supported by a C-123 Candlestick flare aircraft diverted from its station on another mission, a SAR force was launched, and when its Sandy A-1s arrived from Nakhon Phanom to cover the pickups, Apples 04 and 05 each recovered one of the downed airmen at first light after three hours on the ground.(Image:SonTayRaiders.JPG|Blueboy assault group aboard Banana HH-3E at the start of the mission.(Gargus (2007), p. 191.)(Note the scaling ladder in the upper left and three extra fire extinguishers carried aboard the assault helicopter.)(Schemmer (1976), p. 160.)(As a security measure, insignia of rank was not worn by the raiders in Thailand until after the raid was launched.) CPT Richard Meadows is seated in the left foreground.Image:HH-3 Banana 1 in Son Tay camp.JPG|HH-3 Banana in prison compound looking east. The guard tower is directly over the east entrance gate.Image:Wreckage of HH-3 Banana 1.JPG|Wreckage of HH-3 Banana looking toward west compound wallImage:Equipment left behind by Son Tay raiders.JPG|Equipment left behind by Sn Ty raidersAftermathIntelligence controversyFile:ManorNixon.jpg|left|thumb|Post-raid Office debriefing of Simons and Manor (3rd and 4th from left respectively)The mission was deemed a tactical success because of its execution, but clearly involved an failure. The 65 prisoners at Sn Ty had been moved on July 14, probably due to the threat of flooding, to a camp  closer to Hanoi that the POWs dubbed Camp Faith.(Schemmer (1976), pp. 66, 223.)(Thigpen (2001), p. 157.)(Thigpen notes, however, that the senior POW in North Vietnam, Air Force MG John Flynn, contends that the move was due to construction at the camp to improve its security, after which the prisoners were to have been returned.) Although relatively near Sn Ty, the risk of disastrous consequences from lack of reconnaissance, planning, and rehearsing precluded a switch of targets at the last minute. A mission with Camp Faith as the objective required a lengthy delay for a new window of acceptable conditions,(Schemmer (1976), p. 133.)( Moorer advised Nixon at their November 18 meeting that the next window would be in March 1971, four months hence.) which increased the chance of security compromise and further withheld personnel and equipment from their parent commands. New reports of increasing numbers of deaths among POWs argued strongly against such a delay. The raid went as planned in the event the renewed activity at Sn Ty noted in aerial reconnaissance photos taken November 13 involved POWs.(Gargus (2007), p. 117.)Although the mission objective involved an intelligence failure, the gathering of accurate intelligence for the operation, in both quality and quantity, was remarkably successful.(Schemmer (1976), p. 217-219.)(Thigpen (2001), p. 157.)(Gargus (2007), pp. 257, 260-261.) The failure lay in compartmentalization of the information and isolation of the JTCG from the normal intelligence flow.(Gargus (2007), p. 260.) As a planner and participant stated in his history of the operation: The raid was allowed to take place because those who had the correct intelligence information were not aware that someone was contemplating a POW rescue.(Gargus (2007), p. 264.)Further, when intelligence regarding the moving of the prisoners was received, prompting the Intelligence Agency to do an intensive overnight re-analysis of all of its data, because of the 12-hour time difference with Southeast Asia and the 24-hour advancement of the operation due to Typhoon Patsy, the day of the operation had already arrived.(Schemmer (1976), p. 145-146.) By the time a final meeting regarding Go/No Go took place at 05:00 in Washington with Defense Secretary Laird, the launch of the raid was less than five hours away.(Gargus (2007), p. 262.) There was no consensus on the reliability of the data, and Blackburn was strongly predisposed to go ahead.(Schemmer (1976), p. 220.) One military analyst observed that as a result, the highest-level decision-makers succumbed to the phenomenon of groupthink.()Recognition of participantsFor their actions, members of the task force received six Distinguished Service Crosses,(DSCs were awarded to Simons, Sydnor, Meadows, MSG Thomas J. Kemmer (Blueboy), SFC Tyrone J. Adderly (Redwine), and SSG Thomas E. Powell (Greenleaf). Schemmer (1976), p. 259.)  five Air Force Crosses,(AFCs were awarded to MAJ Herbert D. Kalen (Banana), LTC Warner A. Britton (Apple 01), LTC John V. Allison (Apple 02), MAJ Frederic M. Donahue (Apple 03), and TSG Leroy M. Wright (Banana). Schemmer (1976), p. 260.) and at least 85 Stars, including all 50 members of the ground force who did not receive the DSC.(Schemmer (1976), pp. 259-260, Appendix III.)(The likelihood that more than 85 SS were awarded is due to the listing by Schemmer of Silver Stars for all the crew of Cherry 02 but only for two members of Cherry 01, and for all helicopter crewmen except seven who were added to the mission at the last minute from units already stationed in Southeast Asia. Likely these are omissions in research and were awarded to the 17 men not listed.) Manor received the Distinguished Service Medal.(Remarks on Presenting Medals to Members of a Search and Rescue Mission to Sontay, Vietnam, Nixon Library Foundation. Accessed 13 December 2009)The successful demonstrations of joint operating capability in Ivory Coast and Kingpin were, in part, a model for the creation of a joint States Special Operations Command in 1987.Sn Ty raider Apple 1 HH-53 68-10357 was subsequently converted to MH-53M Pave Low standard, served in Bosnia and Iraq and was finally retired in 2008 after 38 years of service. It is now on display in the Cold War Gallery of the Museum of the United States Air Force in Dayton, Ohio.( )Impact of the raidCriticism of the raid, particularly in the news media and by political opponents of the Vietnam War and the Nixon Administration, was widespread and of long duration. Not only was the failure denounced as the result of poor or outdated intelligence, but charges made that the operation caused increased mistreatment of the prisoners.((Schemmer (1976), pp. 190-200.)However, as a result of the raid, the North Vietnamese consolidated their POW camps to central prison complexes. An area of the infamous Hilton formerly housing civilian and South Vietnamese prisoners became Camp Unity, a block of large communal areas housing 50 POWs each. After their repatriation, many POWs said that being in close contact with other Americans lifted their morale, as did knowledge of the rescue attempt.(Schemmer (1976), pp. 222-235. )(Schemmer devotes an entire chapter to the positive effects of the raid on the prisoners situation.) Some POWs said that food, medical care, and even seemingly basic things like mail delivery vastly improved after the raid.(, p. 16)The Defense Department conducted an investigation into a possible breach of security as the reason behind the movement of the prisoners, and concluded that none occurred.(Schemmer (1976), pp. 206-210.)(Gargus (2007), pp. 249-251.) The intensity of the criticism, and leaks of information including reports of the operation, caused the Nixon Administration to reorganize both the military communications network and the governments intelligence apparatus.( Notes ;Footnotes;CitationsReferences**Campbell, John M., and Hill, Michael (1996). Roll Call: Thud; a Photographic Record of the F-105 Thunderchief. Atglen, PA: Schiffer History. ISBN 0-7643-0062-8,*Gargus, John (2007), The Son Tay Raid: American POWs in Vietnam Were Not Forgotten, Texas A&M Press. ISBN 1-58544-622-X***Schemmer, Benjamin F. (1976). The Raid, Harper & Row, Publishers. ISBN 0-553-75625-7*Thigpen, Col. Jerry L. (2001). The Praetorian STARShip: The Untold Story of the Combat Talon, Air University Press/Diane Publishing. ISBN 1-58566-103-1;Websites*** External links * Son Tay Raider Association* Rescue Attempt: The Son Tay Raid, exhibit page at National Museum of the United States Air Force* Interview with Sergeant Terry Buckler About the Son Tay Prison Camp Raid During the Vietnam War, republished from Vietnam Magazine, June 1997 Sgt. Buckler was a radio-telephone operator (RTO) with the Redwine group and the youngest participant* Account by Thomas Powell for The Patriot Files SSgt. Powell was an machine gunner with the Greenleaf group and was awarded the DSC.* Son Tay: A Story of Success, VietnamGear.com, republished from Behind the Lines Magazine, July 2005. The article asserts that an American-led MACV-SOG reconnaissance mission took place prior to Kingpin, that the troops in the secondary school were Chinese special operations instructors known to be present, and that both sides classified that information.* Color map of Son Tay raid, National Museum of the United States Air Force* Son Tay Raid - military topographical mapsheet* Operation Kingpin: The Son Tay Raid at specialoperations.com* Lt. Col. Mark Amidon (USAF), Groupthink, politics and the decision to attempt the Son Tay rescue. Parameters US Army War College Quarterly, Autumn 2005. Opinion piece analysis of Kingpin decision-making* Son Tay Raid MH-53M Pave Low IV Retired, Small Wars Journal* The Son Tay Raid November 21, 1970  Kingpinde Son TayIvory CoastSlonokoena obalatp kch Sn Ty
376298
List_of_locomotive_builders
This is a list of the worlds locomotive builders by country, and is still a work in progress.  The list includes both current and historical builders.  Many companies changed names multiple times; the attempt is to give the most recognisable name, generally the one used for the longest time or during the companys best known period.__NOTOC__Argentina*  Material Ferroviario S.A. http://www.materfer.com/* FADEL Australia Generally, most locomotives for Australian railways were built from GE/EMD/Alco (USA) components, with the bodies built by Australian companies. Comeng, Clyde Engineering, and Goninan were the most prominent, building hundred of locomotives for Rail, Corporation New South Wales (as the State Rail Authority), etc. Most of these companies have now merged to form the four listed below. Active Companies * Avteq - Melbourne* Group Rail - Newcastle & Perth http://www.unitedgroupltd.com/business_rail_overview.aspx* Rail - South Wales http://www.downeredi.com/index.cfm?DivisionID5* EDI Walkers - Queensland Defunct Companies * M Baldwin (not the USA company) built mainly small cane and mining engines* Engineering - became EDI Rail* Comeng - Engineering, became Clyde Engineering - Melbourne* A. Goninan - became United Goninan, became United Group Rail, Newcastle* E. Goodwin* Martin and Co. - Gawler* Deakin Walkers - became EDI Walkers* workshops, Queensland Railways* Morrison-Knudsen Australia* Phoenix Engine Company, Queensland* Springall and Frost, Ipswich, Queensland Belgium  Active Companies * Bombardier Transportation Brugge, formerly BN-Eurorail, formerly Brugeoise et Nivelles SA.* Alstom Charleroi, formerly ACEC Defunct Companies * La Meuse http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/File:AMTP_130T_La_Meuse.jpg http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/File:Locomotive_La_Meuse.JPG* Anglo-Franco-Belge* de TubizeBrazil* GE Transportation - Brazil http://www.getransportation.com/br/pr/BulgariaExpress Service Ltd Canada  Active companies * Transportation - Montreal QC http://www.bombardier.com/index.jsp* Technologies - Vancouver, BC http://www.railpower.com/index.html Defunct companies * Locomotive Company - Kingston ON* Motors Diesel Division - London ON - now Diesel Canadian operations* Locomotive Works - Montreal QC China * Two Groups** Northern Rail Corporation Limited (CNR)** Corporation Limited (CSR)  http://www.csrgc.com/ * CNR February 7th Locomotive Works(http://www.27rail.com.cn/_mainpage/eindex1/eindex1.aspx)* CNR Railway Vehicles http://www.cccar.com.cn/* Heavy Machinery http://www.chmp.com.cn/cp.asp?id129* CNR Locomotive and Rolling Stock Company http://www.dloco.com* Locomotive and Rolling Stock Works http://www.qscn.com/english/Index.asp* CSR Locomotive and Rolling Stock, Co. http://www.cqsf.com/* CNR Railway Vehicle http://www.tangche.com/Lists/yingwen/default.aspx* Locomotive and Rolling Stock Works http://www.tyloro.com/Lists/enindex/default2.aspx* Electric Manufacturing Group Corporation Ltd http://www.xemw.com/en/index.html* CSR Locomotive Works http://www.zyloco.com/english/default.htm* Zhuzhou Electric Locomotive Company (Gofront) * Zhuzhou CSR Times ElectricCroatia* Konar  http://www.koncar-kev.hr/Czech Republic* KD - (eskomoravsk Kolben-Dank)* Works - Plze http://www.skoda.cz/skoda-holding Denmark * Scandia* Frichs* Pedershaab* TriangelFinland* Lokomo* Tampella* Valmet* Oy / Talgo Oy* Saalasti Oy* Rautaruukki Oyj* Valtionrautatiet (Finnish State Railways)France*Alstom http://www.transport.alstom.com/home/*du Nord de la France (ANF) - now owned by Transportation*and Lotz acquired by Alstom in 1972*CFD http://www.cfd.fr/*Electro-Mchanique acquired by Alstom in 1985* Cail* Alsacienne de Constructions McaniquesGermany* AEG* Adtranz* Maschinenbau* Kassel* Hennigsdorf (multiple units) ; formerly Hennigsdorf ; formely Borsig Lokomotiv Werke* Borsig (August Borsig Lokomotiv-Werke in Tegel)* Gmeinder* Hanomag* Henschel* Krupp* Krauss-Maffei* Kiel (MaK) * L. Schwarzkopff* Schichau-Werke* Schma* AG * Vossloh * Voith * Windhoff* and Koppel GmbH*Fahrzeugtechnik Dessau http://www.fahrzeugtechnik-dessau.com/engl/index.htm*Robel trackwork http://www.robel.info/e_home.htm*Interlock steam http://www.interlok.info/indexe.htm* Vulcan StettinGreece* Basileiades* Shipyards Co. http://www.hellenic-shipyards.gr/pg/rolling.htmHungary* Ganz(http://www.traction-ganztrans.hu/en/index.php) India * Heavy Electricals Limited http://www.bhel.com/bhel/product_services/product.php?categoryid65&linkTransportation%3EElectrics%20for%20Urban%20Transportation%20System* Locomotive Works http://www.clwindia.com/* Locomotive Works (DLW) http://www.diesellocoworks.com/* Rock Locomotive Workshops* Earth Movers Limited* SAN Locomotive & Engineering Co Ltd. Benglore.http://www.san-engineering.com/Iran*MLC (Mapna Locomotive Engineering and Manufacturing Company)*ParsVentra locomotives, HyderabadItaly*Ipe  http://www.ipelocomotori.it/*Valente http://www.valente.it/it/locomotori_diesel.htm*Ansaldo Breda   http://www.ansaldobreda.it/home2_eng.aspJapan*Heavy Industries Rolling Stock Company  http://www.khi.co.jp/sharyo/index_e.html*Ltd. http://www.hitachi-rail.com/*Heavy Industries http://www.mhi.co.jp/indexe.html*Toshiba http://www.toshiba.co.jp/worldwide/Korea*Rotem http://www.rotem.co.krNetherlands*Allan*Heemaf http://www.heemaf.nl/*WerkspoorNew ZealandThe various Workshops below were part of the New Zealand Railways or NZR until it was privatised, but the Active ones still operating are now separate companies. Active*Workshops Lower Hutt*Hillside Workshops DunedinDefunct*Workshops Christchurch*Workshops Wanganui*Workshops Auckland (to 1928)*Workshops Auckland (from 1929) Private Companies*& G Price Thames*Scott Brothers Christchurch*Mills WellingtonPakistan*Pakistan Locomotive Factory, Risalpur (from 1993)Poland*Pafawag*Pesa*Fablok *Bumar http://www.bumar.com/eng/index1.php?idcywilnye*Newag *H. Cegielski (Pozna)Romania* Electroputere - Craiova* FAUR - Bucharest* Reia - Reia http://www.ucmr.com/* Softronic - Craiova http://www.softronic.ro/indexen.htmlRussia*CJSC Transmashholding **Electric Locomotive Factory(NEVZ) **Bryanskiy Machine-building Plant**Kolomensky Zavod (KTZ) http://www.kolomnadiesel.com*BMZ http://www.bmz.032.ru*Group **Ludinovoteplovoz *Ekaterinburg Electric Locomotive Factory EERZ http://www.erz.ru/*Mytischy Subway Carriages Factory (Metrovagonmash) http://www.metrowagonmash.ru/*Saint Petersburg Subway Carriages FactorySerbia* Goa* Industrija Ni (MIN)Slovakia*Avokov  http://www.avokov.sk/index_uk.html South Africa * Carriage and Wagon http://www.ucw.co.za* Dorbyl http://www.dcd.co.za*Girdlestone steam http://www.pgrail.co.za/*Transwerk http://www.transwerk.co.za/Spain*Vossloh Rail Vehicles http://www.vossloh-espana.com*Talgo  http://www.talgo.com/htm/spain.htm*CAF http://www.caf.net/caste/home/index.php*La Maquinista Terrestre y Martima*Babcock & Wilcock* EuskaldunaSweden* ASEA (rail business sold to Alstom)* Mekaniska Verkstad* NOHAB http://www.nohab.se/*STT http://www.stt-train.se/eng/stt_eng.html Switzerland * Boveri & Cie* Locomotive and Machine Works (SLM) (now owned by Rail)* DLM AG, Dampflokomotiv- und Maschinenfabrik AG http://www.dlm-ag.ch/* Rail http://www.stadlerrail.com/default.asp?ms1&h1&id56&n189&s2Turkey*Tlomsa http://www.tulomsas.com.tr/english.html Ukraine * Luhanskteplovoz* JSC Krukovskiy Wagon Works United Kingdom Historically, major railways in the Kingdom built the vast majority of their own locomotives.  Commercial locomotive builders were called upon when requirements exceeded the railway works capacity, but these orders were generally to the railways own designs.  British commercial builders concentrated on industrial users, small railway systems, and to a large extent the export market.  British-built locomotives were exported around the world, especially to the current or former Empire.  With the almost total disappearance of British industrial railways, the shrinking of the export market, and much reduced demand from Britains railways, few British locomotive builders survive. Active companies * Keef Ltd http://www.alankeef.co.uk/ (narrow-gauge diesel/steam locomotives, permanent way)* Equipment Company Ltd http://www.clayton-equipment.co.uk/ (diesel/electric/battery locomotives)* Barclay http://www.brushtraction.com/fbrushbarclay/under.htm * Traction http://www.brushtraction.com/ (diesel/electric locomotives)* Steam Railway http://freespace.virgin.net/hanson.mike/Exmoor.htm (narrow-gauge steam locomotives)* Engine Company http://www.hunsletengine.com/ (diesel locomotives/narrow-gauge steam locomotives)* Cowans Sheldon http://www.clarkechapman.co.uk/site/cowanssheldon.asp?nav_id468 (railway cranes)* Engineering Ltd (narrow-gauge diesel locomotives)* project, steam for the 21st century http://www.5at.co.uk/* Steam Loco Design http://www.steam-loco-design.co.uk/ Defunct companies * Barclay* Whitworth* and Porter* Engine Company* Bagnall* Baguley* Peacock and Company* Railway Carriage and Wagon Company* Hawthorn & Co* BREL* Electric Vehicles* Thomson-Houston* Cravens (multiple units/coaching stock)* and Metcalfe* Winton* Car Co.* Dbs* England* Electric* Jennings & Co.* Walker and Company* Railway Carriage & Wagon Company (multiple units/coaching stock)* Greenwood & Batley Ltd (Greenbat)* Leslie* C. Hibberd & Co Ltd* Clarke* Fowler & Co.* Stuart* Kitson* Lewin* Wardle* Metro-Cammell (multiple units/coaching stock)* Metropolitan-Vickers* Railway Carriage and Wagon Company* Rail* Muir-Hill* Gaskell and Company* Reid* British Locomotive Company* and Sons* Pressed Steel (multiple units/coaching stock)* and W Hawthorn to 1870* Ruston & Hornsby* Waggon Works* Stephensons and Hawthorns* Stephenson and Company* Roberts and Company; became Brothers and Company in 1843; Stewart and Company in 1852; to North British Locomotive Company in 1903.* Hill (Rotherham) Ltd* and Ley* Foundry* Brothers - narrow gauge for Ireland* Wickham & Co* & Rogers* Engine CompanySee also * of British railway-owned locomotive builders* of early British private locomotive manufacturers United States  Active companies * Equipment Corporation http://www.brookvilleequipment.com/index.htm* Transportation http://www.getransportation.com/na/en/* Diesel http://www.emdiesels.com/emdweb/emd_index.jsp*Wiese http://www.wieseusa.com/index.html*Wabtec http://www.wabtec.com/*Colmar http://www.colmarequipment.com/railroad.shtml*Corporation http://www.harscorail.com/*Railway Equipment Companyhttp://www.nationalrailway.com*Rail Services Corporation http://www.progressrail.com*Power & Equipment Solutions, Inc. http://www.railequipmentsolutions.com Defunct companies In addition to these, many railroads operating steam locomotives built their own locomotives in their shops.  Notable examples include the  and Ohio Railroads Clare Shops, Norfolk and Westerns Roanoke Shops, Railroads Works and the Southern Pacifics Sacramento Shops.  Estimates  of the total locomotive production in the USA is approximately 175,000 engines. * Locomotive Company (ALCO)* Locomotive Works* Locomotive Works (operated by Uriah Wells)* Car and Manufacturing Company* Locomotive Works (later known as Baldwin-Lima-Hamilton)* Locomotive Works* and Ettinger* Locomotive Works (also known as Harkness and as Moore & Richardson)* Manufacturing Company* Locomotive and Machine Works* Locomotive Works* Locomotive Works* Denmead* Manufacturing Company* Engineering Company* and Harrison* Road Machinery Company* Fairbanks-Morse* Locomotive Works* Locomotive Works* Locomotive Works* Locomotive Works* Locomotive and Car Works* Locomotive Works* K. Porter, Inc (Smith & Porter, later Porter, Bell & Co)* Shipbuilding* Locomotive Works* Locomotive Works* Machine Shop* Locomotive Works (later Lima-Hamilton, then Baldwin-Lima-Hamilton)* and Canals Machine Shop* Machine Shop* Locomotive Works* Machine Works* Locomotive Works* Savage Locomotive Works* Manufacturing Company* Manufacturing Company* Jersey Locomotive and Machine Company (began as Swinburne & Smith)* York Locomotive Works (also known as Breese, Kneeland & Company)* and Company* Locomotive Works* Locomotive and Car Works* Locomotive Works* Company* Locomotive Works* Island Locomotive Works* Locomotive Works* Locomotive and Machine Works (also known as Rogers, Ketchum & Grosvenor)* Locomotive Works (New York)* Winans Locomotive Works* Locomotive Works* Louis Car Company* Swinburne (William Swinburne left New Jersey L&MCo to form his own company)* and Brother Iron Works* Locomotive Manufacturing Company* H. Paul & Sons* Iron Works* United Aircraft* Locomotive and Car Works (also known as Smith & Perkins)* Iron Works* Point Foundry* Electric Corporation (WEMCO)* Locomotive Works* WilmarthUruguay*CIR S.A. http://www.ciruy.com/?dohome&setbranchmetal**Servi Piezas http://www.ciruy.com/?dohome&setbranchservipiezasSee also* of rolling stock manufacturers References  External links * Jernbanen.dk - Lokomotivfabrikker - List of builders of Danish locomotives (in Danish)* Steam Locomotive Builders from Steamlocomotive dot Comgyrt cgek listjaja:de fabricantes de locomotivas
